This book is the Gospel that Matthew wrote. We call this
book
Matthew
The genealogy of Jesus, with the names listed in three groups of 14 generations each.
Matthew 1:1-17
1 This is the record of the ancestors of Jesus the Messiah, the descendant of King
David and of Abraham, from whom all we Jews have descended. 2 Abraham was the
father of Isaac. Isaac was the father of Jacob. Jacob was the father of Judah and
Judah’s older and younger brothers. 3 Judah was the father of Perez and Zerah, and
their mother was Tamar. Perez was the father of Hezron. Hezron was the father of
Ram. 4 Ram was the father of Amminadab. Amminadab was the father of Nahshon.
Nahshon was the father of Salmon. 5 Salmon and his wife Rahab, a non-Jewish woman,
were the parents of Boaz. Boaz was the father of Obed. Obed’s mother was Ruth,
another non-Jewish woman. Obed was the father of Jesse. 6 Jesse was the father
of King David. David was the father of Solomon. Solomon’s mother was previously
married to Uriah. 7 Solomon was the father of Rehoboam. Rehoboam was the father
of Abijah. Abijah was the father of Asaph. 8 Asaph was the father of Jehoshaphat.
Jehoshaphat was the father of Jehoram. Jehoram was an ancestor of Uzziah. 9 Uzziah
was the father of Jotham. Jotham was the father of Ahaz. Ahaz was the father of
Hezekiah. 10 Hezekiah was the father of Manasseh. Manasseh was the father of
Amon. Amon was the father of Josiah. 11 Josiah was the grandfather of Jeconiah
and Jeconiah’s brothers. They lived at the time when the Babylonian army took the
Israelites as captives to the country of Babylon.
12 After the Babylonians took the Israelites to Babylon, Jeconiah became the father of
Shealtiel. Shealtiel was the grandfather of Zerubbabel. 13 Zerubbabel was the father
of Abiud. Abiud was the father of Eliakim. 14 Eliakim was the father of Azor. Azor was
the father of Zadok. Zadok was the father of Akim. 15 Akim was the father of Eliud.
Eliud was the father of Eleazar. Eleazar was the father of Matthan. Matthan was the
father of Jacob. 16 Jacob was the father of Joseph. Joseph was Mary’s husband, and
Mary was Jesus’ mother. Jesus is the one who is called {whom we call} the Messiah.
17 As you can calculate, I have grouped Jesus’ ancestors as follows: There was a
succession of 14 of them from the time when Abraham lived to the time when King
David lived. There was a succession of 14 of them from the time when David lived to
the time when the Israelites were taken {the Babylonian army took the Israelites} away
to Babylon. There was a succession of 14 of them from the time when the Israelites
were taken {the Babylonian army took the Israelites} away to Babylon until the time
when the Messiah was born.
When Joseph learned that Mary was pregnant, he decided to divorce her, but an
angel told him to take her as his wife because it was the power of the Holy Spirit that
had enabled her to be pregnant
Matthew 1:18-25
18 This is the account of what happened just before Jesus Christ was born. Mary, his
mother, {had publicly promised Joseph that she would marry him} had been publicly
promised to marry Joseph. Before they began to sleep together, Mary realized that
she was pregnant. It was the power of the Holy Spirit that had caused her to become
pregnant. 19 Joseph, her future husband, was a man who obeyed God’s commands.
One of those commands was that men must divorce women who had acted immorally.
So when Joseph learned that Mary was pregnant, he assumed that she was pregnant asMATTHEW 1:20
1345
MATTHEW 2:11
a result of her acting immorally. So he decided to break the engagement. But because
he did not want to shame her publicly, he decided to do it privately. 20 While he was
seriously considering this, much to his surprise, in a dream he saw an angel whom
the Lord had sent. The angel said, “Joseph, descendant of King David, do not be afraid
that you(sg) would be doing wrong if you(sg) would marry Mary. Instead, begin to treat
her as your wife, because the Holy Spirit, not a man, has caused her to be pregnant.
21 She will give birth to a son. Since it is he who will cause that his people will be
saved from the guilt of their having sinned, name the baby Jesus, which means ‘the
Lord saves people’.” 22 All this happened as a result of what the Lord told the prophet
Isaiah to write long ago about what was going to happen. This is what Isaiah wrote:
23 “Listen, a virgin will become pregnant and will give birth to a son. They will call
him Emmanuel.” Emmanuel means ‘God is with us’. 24 When Joseph got up from
sleep, he did what the angel whom the Lord had sent commanded him to do. He took
Mary home to be his wife. 25 But he did not have sexual relations with her until she
had given birth to a son. And Joseph named him Jesus.
2
After some astrologers saw an unusual star, they traveled westwards to find the
place where the infant Jesus was. King Herod helped direct them, but then an angel told
them not to go back to King Herod.
Matthew 2:1-12
1 Jesus was born in Bethlehem town in Judea province during the time [MTY] that
King Herod the Great ruled there. Some time after Jesus was born, some men who
studied the stars and who lived in a country east of Judea came to Jerusalem. 2 They
asked people, “Where is the one who has been born in order that he might be the king
of you Jews? We believe that your new king has been born, because we have seen the
star that we believe indicated that he has been born. We saw it while we were in our
country east of here. So we have come to worship him.”
3 When King Herod heard what those men were asking, he became worried that
someone else might be proclaimed {people might proclaim someone else} king of the
Jews to replace him. Many of the people of Jerusalem [MTY, HYP] also became worried
because they were afraid of what King Herod might do. 4 Then Herod gathered together
all the ruling priests and men who taught the people the Jewish laws and he asked
them where the prophets had predicted that the Messiah was to be born. 5 They said to
him, “He will be born in Bethlehem, here in Judea province, because it was written by
the prophet Micah {the prophet Micah wrote} long ago what God said: 6 ‘You who live
in Bethlehem [APO], in Judea province, your town is certainly very important [LIT],
because a man from your town will become a ruler. He will guide my people who live
in Israel.’ ”
7 Then King Herod secretly summoned those men who studied the stars. He asked
them exactly when the star first appeared. By what they told him, he was able to know
the approximate age of the baby. 8 Then he concealed what he really planned to do and
said to them, “Go to Bethlehem and inquire thoroughly where the infant is. When
you have found him, come back and report to me so that I, myself, can go there and
worship him, too.”
9 After the men heard what the king told them, they went toward Bethlehem. To
their surprise, the star that they had seen while they were in the eastern country went
ahead of them again until it stood above the house where the child was. 10 When they
saw the star, they rejoiced greatly and followed it. 11 They found the house and entered
it and saw the child and his mother, Mary. They bowed down and worshipped him.MATTHEW 2:12
1346
MATTHEW 2:23
Then they opened their treasure boxes [MTY] and they gave gold, costly frankincense,
and myrrh to him. 12 Because God knew that King Herod planned to kill Jesus, in a
dream the men who studied the stars were warned {he warned the men who studied
the stars} that they should not return to King Herod. So they returned to their country,
but instead of traveling back on the same road, they went on a different road.
Following an angel’s instructions, Joseph took his family to the country of Egypt to
escape from Herod.
Matthew 2:13-21
13 After the men who studied the stars left Bethlehem, an angel from the Lord
appeared to Joseph in a dream. He said, “Get up, take the child and his mother,
and flee to Egypt. Stay there until I tell you (sg) that you should leave, because King
Herod is about to send soldiers to look for the child so that they can kill him.” 14 So
Joseph got up, he took the child and his mother that night, and they fled to Egypt.
15 They stayed there until King Herod died, and then they left Egypt. By doing that, it
was {they} fulfilled what the prophet Hosea wrote, which had been said by the Lord
{which the Lord had said},
I have told my son to come out of Egypt.
16 While King Herod was still living, because he realized that he had been tricked by
the men who studied the stars {the men who studied the stars had tricked him}, he
became furious. Then, assuming that Jesus was still in Bethlehem or the surrounding
regions, Herod sent soldiers there to kill all the boy babies two years old and younger.
Herod calculated how old the baby was, according to what the men who studied the
stars told him about when the star first appeared. 17 Because Bethlehem and Ramah
towns were in the area where the descendants of Jacob’s wife Rachel lived, when soldiers
killed the infant boys, they fulfilled what Jeremiah the prophet wrote,
18 Women in Ramah were weeping and wailing loudly. Women who were the
descendants of Rachel, the ancestor of the women there [SYN], were grieving for
what happened to their children. Even though people tried to comfort them, they
would not be comforted {stop mourning}, because their children were dead.
19 After Herod died and while Joseph and his family were still in Egypt, an angel that
the Lord had sent appeared to Joseph in Egypt in a dream. 20 He said to Joseph, “Take
the child and his mother and go back to Israel to live, because the people who were
looking for the child in order to kill him have died.” 21 So Joseph took the child and
his mother, and they went back to Israel.
Following an angel’s warning, Joseph and his family returned to Nazareth, and thus
a prophecy about the Messiah was fulfilled.
Matthew 2:22-23
22 When Joseph heard that Archaelaus now ruled in Judea district instead of his
father, King Herod the Great, he was afraid to go there. Because he was warned {God
warned Joseph} in a dream that it was still dangerous for them to live in Judea, he
and Mary and Jesus went to Galilee District 23 to Nazareth to live there. The result was
that what had been said by the ancient prophets {what the ancient prophets had said}
about the Messiah, that he would be called {people would call him} a Nazareth-man,
was fulfilled {came true}.
3
John the Baptizer announced the coming of Jesus, and he baptized many people who
heard his message.
Matthew 3:1-6MATTHEW 3:1
1347
MATTHEW 3:12
1 While Jesus was still in Nazareth town, John, whom the people called the Baptizer,
went to a desolate place in Judea district. 2 He was preaching to the people who came
there. He kept saying, “You need to turn away from your sinful behavior, because
God [MET] will soon begin to rule over people, and he will reject you if you do not
turn away from your sinful life.” 3 John was the person who fulfilled what was said by
Isaiah the prophet {what Isaiah the prophet predicted when he said}, long ago:
In a desolate area ◄people will hear someone/someone will be heard► shouting to
the people who pass by,
Prepare yourselves to receive the Lord when he comes!
Make yourselves ready so that you will be prepared when he comes [MET, DOU],
just like people improve and straighten out the road for an important official!
4 John wore coarse clothing made from camel’s hair. And as the prophet Elijah did
long ago, he wore a leather belt around his waist. His food was only grasshoppers and
honey that he found in that desolate area. 5 People who lived in Jerusalem city [MTY],
many [HYP] people who lived in other places in Judea district [MTY], and many [HYP]
people who lived in the area around the Jordan River [MTY] came to John to hear him
preach. 6 After they heard him tell them to turn away from their sinful behavior, they
openly confessed their sins, and as a result they were baptized by John {John baptized
them} in the Jordan River.
John told the Pharisees and Sadducees that they needed to repent before he would
baptize them.
Matthew 3:7-10
7 After John noted that many men of the Pharisee religious group and of the
Sadducee religious group were coming to him to be baptized {in order that he would
baptize them}, he said to them, “You people are evil like poisonous snakes [MET]! I
warn you that God will some day punish [MTY] everyone who sins. ◄And do not think
that you can escape from his punishing you [MTY] if you do not turn from your sinful
behavior!/Did someone tell you that you can escape from his punishing you [MTY] if
you do not turn from your sinful behavior?► [RHQ] 8 Do what is appropriate [IDM] for
people who have truly turned away from their sinful behavior before you come to me
in order to be baptized {that I baptize you}. 9 God promised to give Abraham many
descendants. In order to fulfill that promise, God does not need you! I tell you that he
can change these stones to make them descendants of Abraham. So do not start to
say to yourselves, ‘Since we are descendants of our ancestor Abraham, God will not
punish us even though we have sinned.’ 10 God is ready to punish you if you do not
turn away from your sinful behavior, just like a man who lays his axe at the roots of
a fruit tree in order to chop it down and throw it into the fire if it does not produce
good fruit [MET].”
John said that someone greater than him would soon come who would enable some
of the people to change their lives and who would severely punish the others.
Matthew 3:11-12
11 “As for me, I am not very important, because I baptize you only with water. I
baptize you because of your feeling sorry that you have sinned. But someone else
will come soon who is very great; he will do powerful deeds (OR, act powerfully).
Because he is superior to me, I am not worthy even to do a menial task for him, such
as to carry his sandals.
He will put his Holy Spirit within you to truly change the way you live [MET], and
he will judge others of you and punish you in the fire in hell. 12 He is like a farmer
who wants to clear away the grain that is on the ground where it has been threshedMATTHEW 3:13
1348
MATTHEW 4:10
{they have threshed it}. That farmer uses a huge fork to throw the grain into the air
to separate the wheat from the chaff [MET], and then he cleans up the threshing area.
Similarly, God will separate righteous people from the evil people like a farmer who
gathers the wheat into his storage area, and then God will burn the people who are
like chaff with a fire that will never be put out [MET].”
When John baptized Jesus, God showed that Jesus was his Son by sending the Holy
Spirit upon him.
Matthew 3:13-17
13 During that time, Jesus went from Galilee District to the Jordan River, where John
was. He did that in order to be baptized by John {in order to ask that John would
baptize him}. 14 When Jesus asked John to baptize him, John objected, saying, “I need
to be baptized by you {you to baptize me} because you are superior to me. Since you
are not a sinner, ◄you(sg) should not come to me to be baptized by me {to ask that
I baptize you(sg)}!/why do you come to me to be baptized by me {ask that I baptize
you(sg)} [RHQ]?►” 15 But Jesus said to him, “Baptize me at this time, because in this
way we two will do everything that God requires.” Then John consented to baptize
him.
16 After he was baptized {John baptized Jesus}, Jesus immediately came up out of
the water. Just then, it was as though the sky was opened {split apart}. Then Jesus
saw God’s Spirit coming down upon him. He came in the form of a dove. 17 Then
God [SYN] spoke from heaven, saying, “This is my Son. I love him. I am very pleased
with him.”
4
After Jesus fasted 40 days, Satan tempted him in various ways.
Matthew 4:1-11
1 Then Jesus was led by the Spirit {God’s Spirit led Jesus} into a desolate area to
be tempted by the devil {in order that the devil would tempt him}. 2 After he did
not eat food for 40 days, and 40 nights. he was hungry. 3 Satan, the tempter, came to
him and said, “Because you claim that you have a relationship with God as a son has
with his father [MET], prove it by commanding these stones to become bread so that
you can eat them!” 4 But Jesus said to him, “No! I will not change stones into bread,
because it is written in the Scriptures {in the Scriptures Moses wrote}, ‘Eating food
[SYN] sustains people physically, but it does not sustain them spiritually [SYN]. Instead,
paying attention to everything that God has spoken to them is what sustains people
spiritually.’ ” 5 Then the devil took Jesus to Jerusalem, the city that is dedicated to God.
He set him on the highest part of the Temple, 6 and said to him, “Because you claim
that you have a relationship with God as a son has with his father, prove it by jumping
down to the ground. You will not be hurt, because it is written in the Scriptures, ‘God
will command his angels to protect you. They will lift you up in their hands when you
are falling, in order that you will not get hurt. You will not even strike your foot on a
stone.’ ” 7 But Jesus said, “No! I will not jump down, because in another place in the
Scriptures it is written {there are these words that Moses wrote}: ‘Do not try to test
the Lord your God to see if he will prevent something bad from happening to you when
you do something foolish!’ ” 8 Then the devil took him on top of a very high mountain.
There he showed him all the nations in the world and the magnificent things in those
nations. 9 And then he said to him, “I will let you rule all these nations and give you
the magnificent things in them if you bow down and worship me.” 10 But Jesus said
to him, “No, I will not worship you, Satan, so go away! It is written in the Scriptures,
‘It is the Lord your God whom you (pl) must worship, and you (pl) must serve onlyMATTHEW 4:11
1349
MATTHEW 4:25
him!’ ” 11 Then the devil went away, and right away, angels came to Jesus and took
care of him.
Jesus went to Galilee and preached that people needed to repent to belong to the
group whom God would consider his people.
Matthew 4:12-17
12 While Jesus was in Judea, John the Baptizer’s disciples told him that John had been
put in prison and kept there {that Herod Antipas had put John the Baptizer in prison
and kept him there}. So Jesus returned to Galilee District. While he was in Galilee,
he first went to Nazareth town. 13 Then he left Nazareth and went to Capernaum city
in order to live there. Capernaum is located beside Galilee Lake in the region which
was formerly the regions of the tribes of Zebulun and Naphtali. 14 One reason that he
went there was so that these words that were written by the prophet Isaiah might be
fulfilled {so that he might fulfill these words that the prophet Isaiah wrote}:
15 “Zebulun region and Naphtali region are on the road which is near Galilee Lake
and on the eastern side of the Jordan River. They are the regions in Galilee District
where many non-Jews are living. 16 Although the people there will be like people who
sit in a dark place [MET], they will suddenly perceive clearly a new teaching, as people
who have seen a big light shining on them [MET] perceive everything clearly. The
people who are located in a dangerous [MET] region will suddenly perceive clearly
what God teaches, as people on whom a light shines perceive things clearly [MET,
DOU].
17 From that time, while Jesus was in Capernaum city, he began to preach this to
people: “God [MTY/EUP] will very soon begin to rule, and he will judge you when he
rules. So you (pl) need to turn from your sinful ways so that God will not punish you.”
Jesus summoned four fishermen, who immediately left their work and went with
him.
Matthew 4:18-23
18 One day while Jesus was walking by Galilee Lake, he saw two men, Simon, who
was later called Peter, and Andrew, his younger brother. They were casting their
fishing net into the lake because they earned money by catching and selling fish. 19 He
said to them, “Just like you have been gathering fish, come with me and I will teach
you how to gather people to become my disciples.” [MET] 20 They immediately left the
work that they were doing with their fishing nets, and they went with him.
21 As the three of them walked on from there, Jesus saw two other men, James, and
John, the younger brother of James. They were in their boat with Zebedee, their father,
mending their fishing nets. Jesus told them that they should leave their work and go
with him. 22 They immediately left their fishing boat and their father, and they went
with Jesus.
Jesus taught and healed many people when he was in Galilee District.
Matthew 4:23-25
23 Jesus went with those four men throughout all of Galilee District. He was teaching
the people in the buildings where we Jews worship God. He was preaching the good
message that tells how to become members of the group of people whose lives God
rules over. He was also healing all the Galileans who had diseases or who were sick.
24 When people who lived in other parts of Syria District heard [PRS] what he was
doing, they brought to him people who suffered from illnesses, people who suffered
from many kinds of diseases, people who suffered from severe pains, people who were
controlled by demons {whom demons controlled}, people who were epileptics, and
people who were paralyzed. And Jesus healed them all. 25 Then crowds started to go
with him. They were people from Galilee District, ◄from the Decapolis/from the TenMATTHEW 5:1
1350
MATTHEW 5:16
Towns area►, from Jerusalem city, from other parts of Judea district, and from areas
east of the Jordan River.
5
On a hillside, Jesus taught his disciples and others what kind of people God esteems.
Matthew 5:1-12
1 When Jesus saw the crowds, he went up on a hillside. He sat down in order to
teach his disciples. They came near to him to listen to him. 2 Then he began to teach
them by saying,
3 God is pleased with people who recognize that they have a spiritual need;
he will allow them to be the people whose lives he rules over.
4 God is pleased with people who mourn because they have sinned;
they will be encouraged {he will encourage them.}
5 God is pleased with people who are meek;
they will inherit the earth that God will recreate.
6 God is pleased with people who sincerely desire to live righteously just like they
desire to eat and drink [MET];
they will be enabled {he will enable them} to do all that he desires [MET].
7 God is pleased with people who act mercifully;
he will act mercifully to them.
8 God is pleased with people who think only about that which pleases him;
some day they will be where God is and will see him.
9 God is pleased with people who help other people to live peacefully;
they will be considered to be {he will consider that they are} his children [MET].
10 God is pleased with people to whom evil things are done {to whom other people do
evil things} because they conducted themselves righteously;
he will allow them to be where he rules over people.
11 God is pleased with you when other people insult you, when other people do evil
things to you and when other people say falsely that you are evil because you
believe in me. 12 When that happens, rejoice and be glad [DOU], because God
will give you a great reward in heaven. God will think highly of you, just like he
thought highly of the prophets whom your ancestors persecuted long ago.
Jesus taught that we should live in such a way that other people will see how we live
and will praise God.
Matthew 5:13-16
13 “You are able to influence evil people [MTY] and improve the way they live in order
that they do not become more evil, just like salt is able to improve the flavor of food and
to preserve it [MET] from spoiling. Salt that no longer tastes salty cannot become salty
again [RHQ]. As a result, that salt becomes useless. It is rejected by people, thrown
on the ground, and walked on {People reject it, throw it on the ground and walk on
it} [MET]. Similarly, if the way you live no longer influences people to live in a godly
manner, God will reject you. 14 You enable evil people [MTY] to perceive God’s truth as
a light enables people to perceive what is around them. Just like everyone can see [LIT]
the lights of a city on a hill [MET], other people can see what you do. 15 After people
light a lamp, they never put it under a basket. Instead, they put it on a lampstand in
their houses in order that it can shine on everyone there. 16 Similarly, you need to do
what is right [MET] in such a manner that other people can see the good deeds that
you do, and as a result they will praise your Father who is in heaven.”MATTHEW 5:17
1351
MATTHEW 5:29
Jesus taught that it is important to obey all of God’s commandments.
Matthew 5:17-20
17 “I came to earth, not to annul the laws that God gave Moses or what the prophets
[MTY] wrote. Instead, I came to cause to happen what the authors of those books
predicted would happen. So do not think any longer that I have come to earth in
order that I might annul what they wrote. 18 Keep this in mind: Every point of those
laws, including those points that seem least important, and even the smallest details
of the laws [MTY] will surely be in effect [HYP, LIT] until the heavens and the earth
disappear and until all that God told their authors to write happens. 19 Since all God’s
laws are important, if anyone disobeys any of those commandments, even if it would
be one of the least important ones, and if that person teaches people to disobey any
of those commandments, it will be said {God will say} that that person is the least
important of those in the place where [EUP] God rules. But those who obey those
commandments and teach other people to obey them, it will be said {God will say}
that they are very important among those that God rules. 20 Keep this in mind: You
assume that the Pharisees and the men who teach our laws faithfully obey what God
commands. But if you do not obey those laws better than they obey them, you will
by no means enter the place where God rules.”
Jesus taught that we should not be angry, and that we should quickly settle accounts
with those whom we have wronged.
Matthew 5:21-26
21 “You have heard your religious teachers say that it was said {that Moses said}
to your ancestors, ‘Do not murder anyone.’ This implied that if someone murders
another person, the judge will condemn that person and sentence him to be executed
{say that someone must execute him}. 22 But what I say to you is this: If you are angry
with someone, God will judge you. If you say to someone, ‘You are worthless,’ the
Jewish Council will judge you. If you hate someone, and say to them 'You fool!' you.
yourself, will be in danger of being thrown into the fires in hell.
23 So, when you take your gift for God to the altar, if you remember that you have
offended someone, 24 leave your gift by the altar, and first go to the person you have
offended. Tell that person that you are sorry for what you have done, and ask that
person to forgive you. Then go back and offer your gift to God. 25 Also, when a fellow
citizen takes you to court in order to accuse you, settle accounts with that person
quickly while you are walking with that person to court. Do that while there still is
time to do so in order that he will not take you to the judge, because if the judge favors
the person who is accusing you, he will declare that you are guilty and send you to the
prison guard, and the prison guard will put you in prison. 26 Keep this in mind: If you
go to prison, you will never get out because you will never be able to pay all that the
judge says that you owe [MET]. And remember also that you ought to settle accounts
with God before you die, too.”
Jesus taught about the way to refuse to sin when we are tempted to do something
wrong.
Matthew 5:27-30
27 “You have heard God’s commandment, ‘Do not commit adultery.’ 28 But what I
say to you is this: If a man only looks at a woman desiring to have sex with her, God
considers that his doing that [MET] is sin. 29 If because of what you see [MTY] you are
tempted to sin, stop looking at those things! Even if you have to gouge out one of your
eyes and throw it away [HYP] to avoid sinning, do it! It is good that you not sin and
as a result go to heaven, even though while you are still here on earth you lack one or
both of your eyes. But it is not good that you continue to have two eyes and sin and,MATTHEW 5:30
1352
MATTHEW 5:42
as a result, God sends your whole body to hell. 30 If you are tempted to use one of
your hands to sin [MTY], stop using your hand. Even if you have to cut your hand off
and throw it away to avoid sinning, do it [HYP]! It is good that you do not sin and as
a result you go to heaven, even though while you are still here on earth you lack one
or both of your hands. But it is not good that you sin and, as a result, God sends your
whole body to hell.”
Jesus taught that people should not divorce their spouses.
Matthew 5:31-32
31 “It is written {Moses wrote}, ‘If a man is divorcing his wife, he should write a
document on which he states that he is divorcing her.’ 32 But now listen to what I
say to you: A man may divorce his wife only if she has committed adultery, and not
for any other reason. If a man divorces his wife for any other reason, and he has sex
with another woman, he makes his wife become one against whom he has committed
adultery, because in God’s estimation she still is his wife. Also, if a man marries a
woman who is divorced {whose husband has divorced her}, God considers him guilty
of committing adultery.”
Jesus taught that people should not add anything to make their words more credible
when they promise to do something.
Matthew 5:33-37
33 “You have also heard your religious teachers say that it was written {that Moses
wrote} to your ancestors, ‘Make sure that you do what you promised the Lord that
you would do!’ [DOU] 34 But now listen to what I say to you: Never promise to
do anything and then ask a superior being to affirm that what you are saying will
happen. For example, do not promise that you will give something and then ask spiritual
beings in heaven [MTY] to affirm that you will do it, because heaven is where God sits
on his throne [MTY] to rule over people. 35 Also, do not promise that you will give
something and then ask spiritual beings on earth [MTY] to affirm that you will do it,
because the earth is where God rests his feet [MET]. Also, do not promise that you will
do something and ask religious authorities in Jerusalem to affirm that you will do it,
because Jerusalem is the city where God, the great King rules.
36 Also, do not promise that you will do something and then say that your head should
be cut off {someone should cut off your head} if you do not do it. You are not even
able to change the color of the hair of your head by making one black hair white or
one white hair black. 37 If you talk about doing something, just say ‘Yes, I will do it,’
or ‘No, I will not do it.’ If you say anything more than that, it is from Satan, the Evil
One.”
Jesus taught that everyone should be kind to all people, even to people who mistreat
us.
Matthew 5:38-42
38 “You have heard your religious teachers say that it is written {Moses wrote},
‘Retaliate like this: If someone damages one of your eyes, someone should damage one
of that person’s eyes. If someone damages one of your teeth, someone should damage
one of that person’s teeth.’ 39 But now listen to what I say to you: Do not take revenge
for evil deeds done {that other people do} to you. Instead, if someone insults you by
striking you on one cheek, turn your other cheek toward that person in order that
he can strike it also. 40 If someone wants to sue you and take your ◄inner garment/
shirt►, give him your ◄outer garment/coat► also. 41 If a military authority compels
you to go with him one mile and carry his gear, go with him two miles and carry his
gear. 42 Also, if someone asks you for something, give him what he is asking for. If
someone requests you to lend him something, do not refuse to lend it to him.”MATTHEW 5:43
1353
MATTHEW 6:10
Jesus taught that we should love the people whom we would not normally love.
Matthew 5:43-48
43 “You have heard your religious teachers say that it is written that Moses wrote,
‘Love the citizens of your country and hate your enemies.’ 44 But now listen to what I
say to you: Love your enemies as well as your friends, and pray for those who cause
you to suffer. 45 Do that in order to imitate what God, your Father who is in heaven,
does. He desires that you [MET] do like he does. He acts kindly to all people. For
example, he causes the sun to shine equally on wicked people and on good people,
and he sends rain both on righteous people and on unrighteous people. 46 If you love
only the people who love you, ◄do not expect God to reward you in heaven!/will God
reward you in heaven?► [RHQ] This is based on the fact that everyone, even the tax
collectors, who you think are very great sinners, love [RHQ] those who love them. If
you act like them, ◄you are not any different from tax collectors!/in what way are you
different from tax collectors?► [RHQ] 47 If you want God to bless only your friends,
◄you are not acting any better than other people!/are you acting any better than other
people?► [RHQ] Even the non-Jews, who you think sin very much (OR, you think are
unacceptable to God), want God to bless their friends [RHQ], but God does not reward
them for that. 48 You need to love those who do not love you, and in that way become
perfect as God your Father, who is in heaven, is perfect.”
6
Jesus taught how we should give to needy people. He also taught his disciples how
to pray.
Matthew 6:1-13
1 “When you do your good deeds, make certain that you do not do them when other
people are watching so that they may see you and think highly of you. If you do good
deeds merely in order that other people may think highly of you, God, your Father who
is in heaven, will not give you any reward. 2 So, whenever you give something to the
poor, do not announce it as people announce something that they want other people to
know about by playing a fanfare on a trumpet [MET]. That is what the hypocrites do
◄in the synagogues/in the Jewish meeting places► and on the main roads in order
that people might see what they do and praise them. Keep this in mind: People praise
those hypocrites, but that is the only reward they will receive! 3 Instead of doing as
they do, when you give something to the poor, do not let other people know that you
are doing that [MET]. 4 In that way, you will be giving to the poor secretly. As a result
God, your Father who observes you while no one else sees you, will reward you.
5 Also when you pray, do not do what the hypocrites do. They like to stand in the
Jewish meeting places and on the corners of the main streets to pray, in order that
other people will see them and think highly of them. Keep this in mind: People praise
them, but that is the only reward they will get. 6 But as for you, when you pray, go
into your private room and close the door in order to pray to God, your Father, whom
no one can see. He observes you where no one else observes you, and he will reward
you. 7 When you pray, do not repeat words many times as the people who do not
know God do when they pray. They repeat meaningless words because they think that
if they use many words, their gods will listen to them and give them what they ask
for. 8 Do not repeat words as they do, because God your Father knows what you need
before you ask him. 9 So pray things like this: Father, you who are in heaven, we
(exc) desire that you be honored/revered {that people honor/revere you}. 10 We (exc)
desire that people let you rule over their lives. We(exc) want people who live on the
earth to do what you desire, as those who live in heaven do what you want them toMATTHEW 6:11
1354
MATTHEW 6:23
do. 11 Give us (exc) each day the food [SYN] that we (exc) need for that day. 12 Forgive
our sins just like we (exc) have forgiven the people who sin against us (exc). 13 Do
not let us(exc) do wrong things when we(exc) are tempted {someone or something
tempts us}, and rescue us (exc) when Satan the evil one tempts us to do evil things.*”
Jesus taught more about forgiving others.
Matthew 6:14-15
14 “Forgive the people who sin against you, because, if you forgive other people, God,
your Father who is in heaven, will forgive your sins. 15 But if you do not forgive other
people, neither will God forgive your sins.”
Jesus taught about abstaining from food.
Matthew 6:16-18
16 “When you abstain from eating food in order to please God, do not look sad as the
hypocrites look. They make their faces appear sad in order that people will see that
they are abstaining from food and will think highly of them. Keep this in mind: People
will think highly of those people for that, but that is the only reward those people will
get! 17 Instead, each of you, when you abstain from food, should comb your hair and
wash your face as usual, 18 in order that other people will not notice that you are
fasting because you will look as you always do. But God, your Father, whom no one
can see, will observe that you are abstaining from food. God your Father sees you even
though no one else sees you, and he will reward you.”
Jesus taught that we should do deeds that please God. That will be like putting
treasures in heaven.
Matthew 6:19-21
19 “Do not selfishly accumulate large quantities of money and material goods for
yourselves on this earth, because the earth is where everything is destroyed. For
example, on earth termites ruin things, and things rust, and thieves enter buildings
and steal things. 20 Instead, do deeds that will please God. Your doing such deeds
will be like storing treasures in heaven [MET]. Nothing perishes in heaven. In heaven
no termites ruin things, nothing rusts, and thieves do not enter buildings and steal.
21 Remember that the things that you think are the most valuable are the things that
you will be constantly concerned about [MET]. So if you want to be storing treasures
in heaven, you need to be constantly thinking about God and heaven, instead of your
earthly possessions.”
Jesus taught that we should be generous with what we possess.
Matthew 6:22-23
22 “Your eyes are like a lamp [MET] for your body, because they enable you to
see things. So if your eyes are healthy, you are able to see everything well [MET].
Similarly, if you are generous with your money and other possessions, you will be able
to know much of what God wants you to know [MET]. 23 But if your eyes are bad, you
are not able to see things well. And if that continues, the time will come when you
will not be able to see at all. You will be in complete darkness [MET]. Similarly, if you
continue to be greedy, you will be in spiritual darkness. If all that your eyes can see
and your mind can think about involves your greedily desiring material possessions, all
that you do will be evil [MET].”
Jesus taught that we should not try to serve God and accumulate money at the same
time.
Matthew 6:24
* 6:13 people should praise you forever.MATTHEW 6:24
1355
MATTHEW 7:3
24 “No one is able to serve two different bosses at the same time.
If he tried to do
that, he would dislike one of them and love the other one, or he would be loyal to
one of them and despise the other one [DOU]. Similarly, you cannot devote your life
to worshipping God and worshipping money and material goods at the same time.”
Jesus taught that we should not worry about having enough food and clothes.
Matthew 6:25-34
25 “Because you should be concerned about what God thinks is important and not
about material goods, I tell you that you should not worry about things that you need
in order to live. Do not worry about whether you will have enough food to eat, and
something to drink, or enough clothes to wear. It is important to have sufficient food
and drink and clothing, but the way you conduct your lives is much more important
[RHQ]. 26 Look at the birds. They do not plant seeds, and they do not harvest crops and
gather them into barns. But they always have food to eat because God, your Father
who is in heaven, provides food for them. And you are certainly worth a lot more
than birds [RHQ]! So you can be assured that God will supply what you need! 27 ◄None
of you can, just by worrying, add time to your life./Can any of you, just by worrying,
add time to your life?► [RHQ] You cannot add even one minute to your life! So you
should not worry about things such as food and clothing!
28 You should also not worry about whether you will have enough clothes to wear
[RHQ]. Think about the way flowers grow in the fields. They do not work to earn
money, and they do not make their own clothes. 29 But I tell you that even though
King Solomon, who lived long ago, wore very beautiful clothes, his clothes were not
as beautiful as one of those flowers. 30 God makes the wild plants very beautiful, but
they grow in the field for only a short time. One day they grow, and the next day they
are thrown into an oven {someone cuts them and throws them into an oven} to be
burned to make heat for baking bread. But you are more important to God than wild
plants are, and you live much longer. So ◄God will certainly provide clothes for you
who live a long time but trust him so little!/will not God surely very adequately clothe
you, who live a long time but trust him so little?► [RHQ] 31 Because of God’s caring for
you, do not worry and say, ‘Will we have anything to eat?’ or ‘Will we have anything
to drink?’ or ‘Will we have clothes to wear?’ [RHQ] 32 Those who do not know God
are always worrying about things like that. But God, your Father who is in heaven,
knows that you need all those things, so you should not worry about them. 33 Instead,
the most important thing you should be concerned about is to let God completely
direct your life, and to strive to live righteously. If you do that, all the things that you
need will be given to you {God will give you all the things that you need}. 34 So each
day do not be worried about what will happen to you the next day, because when that
day [PRS] comes, you will be concerned about what happens during that day. You will
have enough to be concerned about each day. So do not worry ahead of time.”
7
Jesus taught that we should not condemn others for their faults since we have faults
ourselves.
Matthew 7:1-5
1 “Do not talk about how sinfully others have acted, in order that God will not say
how sinfully you have acted. 2 If you condemn other people, God will condemn you. To
the same extent that you condemn others, you will be condemned {God will condemn
you}. 3 ◄None of you should be concerned about someone else’s small faults [MET]!/
Why should any of you be concerned about someone else’s small faults?► [MET, RHQ]
That would be like noticing a speck in that person’s eye. But you should be concernedMATTHEW 7:4
1356
MATTHEW 7:13-14
about your own big faults. They are like [MET] planks in your own eye, which you do
not notice. 4 ◄You should not say to other people about their minor faults, ‘Let me
remove the specks from your eyes!’/Why do you say to other people about their minor
faults, ‘Let me remove the specks from your eyes?’► [RHQ] You should not say that if
a plank is still in your own eye [MET]. 5 You hypocrite, stop committing your own sins!
That will be like removing the plank from your own eye [MET]. Then, as a result, you
will be able to perceive things spiritually so that you can help other people get rid of
the faults [MET] that are like specks in their eyes.”
it.
Jesus taught that we should not teach spiritual truth to those who will not appreciate
Matthew 7:6
6 “You do not give holy things to dogs that would ignore those things and attack you
[CHI]. You do not throw pearls in front of hogs, because they would just ignore them
and trample them. Similarly, do not give precious spiritual truth to people you know
will not value it but instead will do evil things to you.”
Jesus taught that God is ready to give good things to us if we persist in prayer.
Matthew 7:7-11
7 “Keep asking God for what you need. If you do that, he will give it to you.
Confidently keep expecting God to give you the things that you need, and he will give
them to you. It will be like [MET] looking for what you need and finding it. Keep on
praying persistently to God. Then God will answer you. It will be like [MET] knocking on
a door in order to enter a room. And the way will be opened {God will open the way}
for you to get what you pray for. 8 Remember that God will give things to everyone
who continues to ask him for them. He will give things to whoever confidently keeps
asking. He will open the way for people to get the things that they keep persistently
praying for.
9 ◄No man among you would give a stone to his son if his son were to ask for
bread./Would anyone among you give a stone to his son if his son were to ask for
bread?► [RHQ] 10 Likewise, ◄no man would give a poisonous snake to his son if his
son would ask for a fish./would anyone give a poisonous snake to his son if his son
would ask for a fish?► [RHQ] 11 You, who are evil, know how to give good things to
your children. So God, your Father who is in heaven, will certainly give good things
to the people who ask him.”
Jesus taught that we should treat others as we would like them to treat us.
Matthew 7:12
12 “So in whatever way you want others to act toward you (pl), that is the way you
(pl) should act toward them, because that sums up what Moses wrote in the laws that
God gave him and also what the prophets wrote long ago.”
Jesus taught that we should try to walk on the narrow road that leads to heaven.
Matthew 7:13-14
13-14 “Going to where people live eternally with God in heaven is difficult. It is like
going along a narrow road [PRS, MET] that leads to a narrow gate. Not many people
find that way. The way that most people take is easy, but it results in their being
punished {God punishing them} in hell. That way is like a wide road that people walk
on [PRS, MET] until they reach the wide gate, but that road and that gate lead to
where they will be destroyed {God will destroy them}. Many people enter that gate.
So I am telling you to leave the wide road and enter the narrow gate to heaven.”
Jesus taught about how to recognize false prophets.
Matthew 7:15-20MATTHEW 7:15
1357
MATTHEW 7:29
15 “Beware of people who come to you and say falsely that they are telling you
what God has said. They seem to be harmless, but they are extremely harmful. They
are like wolves that have covered themselves with sheepskins to make people believe
that they are sheep [MET], but they actually are wolves that attack people [MET]. 16 So
how will you know that they are false? Well, by seeing what plants produce, you
know what kind of plants they are [MET]. For example, thornbushes cannot produce
grapes, so ◄no one can pick grapes from thornbushes./can anyone pick grapes from
thornbushes?► [RHQ] And thistles cannot produce figs, so ◄no one can pick figs from
thistles./can anyone pick figs from thistles?► [RHQ] 17 Here is another example: All
good fruit trees produce good fruit, but all unhealthy trees produce worthless fruit.
18 No good fruit tree is able to produce worthless fruit, and no unhealthy tree is able
to produce good fruit. 19 And all the trees that do not produce good fruit are chopped
down and burned in a fire {people chop them down and burn them in a fire} to get
rid of them. Similarly, those who falsely claim to be prophets will be thrown {God
will throw false prophets} into the fires of hell. 20 By seeing what plants produce, you
know what kind of plants they are. Similarly, when you see what the people who come
to you do, you will know if they are false prophets.”
Jesus warned that he will reject those who do not do what God desires.
Matthew 7:21-23
21 “Even though many people habitually call me ‘Lord’, pretending that they have
my authority, some of them will not go to heaven where God rules, because they do
not do what he desires. Only those people who do what my Father, who is in heaven,
desires will go there. 22 On the day [MTY] that God judges everyone, many people,
trying to tell me that they deserve to go to heaven, will say to me, ‘Lord, we(exc)
spoke God’s message as your representatives [MTY, RHQ]! As your representatives
we(exc) expelled demons from people [RHQ]! And as your representatives, many
times we(exc) performed miracles [RHQ]!’ 23 Then I will declare to them, ‘I have
never said that you belonged to me. Go away from me, you who do what is evil!’ ”
Jesus warned that undesirable things would happen to those who did not obey his
teaching.
Matthew 7:24-27
24 “So then, anyone who hears what I say and does what I command, will be like a
wise man who built his house on rock. 25 Even though the rain came down and the
river flooded, and the winds blew and beat against that house, it did not fall down
because it had been built {he built it} on a solid foundation. 26 On the other hand,
anyone who hears what I say but does not obey what I say will be like a foolish man
who built his house on the sand. 27 When the rain fell and the rivers flooded, and
the winds blew and beat against that house, it crashed down and broke completely
apart, because it was built on the sand. So it is important for you to obey what I teach
you.”
The crowds were amazed at Jesus, because he taught with his own authority.
Matthew 7:28-29
28 When Jesus finished saying all those things, the crowdswho had been listening to
him were amazed at the new teaching that he had taught them. 29 The reason they
were amazed was that he was teaching as a person does who has authority. He was
not teaching like the men who taught the Jewish laws, who just repeated what other
people had taught them.MATTHEW 8:1
1358
MATTHEW 8:15
8
Jesus healed a leper and made it possible for him to associate with people again.
Matthew 8:1-4
1 When Jesus went down from the hillside, large crowds followed him. 2 After he
left the crowds, a man who had the skin disease called leprosy unexpectedly came and
knelt before him. He said to Jesus, “Lord/Sir, please heal me, because I know you are
able to heal me if you are willing to.” 3 Then Jesus, disregarding the religious law that
forbade people to come close to lepers, stretched out his hand and touched the man.
He said to him, “I am willing to heal you, and I heal you now!” Immediately the man
was healed from his leprosy {he was no longer a leper}. 4 Then Jesus said to him, “Go
and show yourself to a nearby priest so that he can examine you and verify that you
no longer have leprosy. Then, after he tells the local people, they will know that you no
longer have leprosy, and you will be able to associate with them again. Make sure that
now you do not report about my healing you to anyone other than the priest. Then
go to the Temple in Jerusalem and give the priest the offering that Moses commanded
that people who have been healed from leprosy should offer as a sacrifice to God.”
Jesus healed from a distance a Roman officer’s servant because the officer trusted in
him.
Matthew 8:5-13
5 When Jesus went to Capernaum city, a Roman officer who commanded 100 soldiers
came to him. He begged Jesus to help him. 6 He said to him, “Sir, my servant is lying
in bed at home and is paralyzed, and he has severe pain.” 7 Jesus said to him, “I will
go to your house and heal him.” 8 But the officer said to him, “Lord/Sir, do not bother
to go. I am a non-Jew, so I am not worthy for you, a Jew, to come into my house
[MTY] and associate with me. Instead, just command that my servant be healed, and
he will be healed. 9 I believe this because, as for me, I am a man under the authority
of others, and I also have soldiers under my authority. When I say to one of them
‘Go!’ he goes. When I say to another ‘Come!’ he comes. When I say to my slave,
‘Do this!’ he does it. And I believe that you speak with a similar kind of authority.”
10 When Jesus heard this, he marveled. He said to the crowd that was walking with
him, “Listen to this: I have never before found anyone who has as firm a faith in me
as this non-Jewish man has. Not even in Israel, where I would expect people to believe
in me, have I found anyone who has the kind of faith in me that he has! 11 I tell
you truly that many other non-Jewish people who will believe in me like this Roman
officer will come from distant countries, including those far to the east and far to the
west [SYN], and they will sit down to eat with [MTY] Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob in
heaven, where God rules. 12 But the Jews [IDM] who should have allowed God to rule
over them will be sent to hell, where there is total darkness. And as a result, they
will weep because of their suffering and will grind their teeth because they will have
severe pain [MTY].” 13 Then Jesus said to the officer, “Go home. What you believed
would happen, that I would heal your servant from a distance, will happen.” Then the
officer went home and found out that his servant became well at the exact time that
Jesus told him that he would heal him.
Jesus healed Peter’s mother-in-law.
Matthew 8:14-15
14 When Jesus and some of his disciples went to the home of Peter, Jesus saw Peter’s
mother-in-law. She was lying on a bed because she had a fever. 15 He touched her
hand, and as a result, immediately she no longer had a fever [PRS]. Then she got up
and served them some food.MATTHEW 8:16
1359
MATTHEW 8:32
Jesus healed many sick people and expelled demons from other people.
Matthew 8:16-17
16 That evening when ◄the Sabbath/the Jewish rest day► ended and restrictions
about traveling ended, many people who were controlled by demons {whom demons
controlled} and people who were sick [MTY] were brought to Jesus. He caused the
demons to leave just by speaking to them, and he healed all the people who were
sick. 17 By doing this he fulfilled the words that had been said by the prophet Isaiah
{that the prophet Isaiah had said} about the Messiah: “He healed people who had
sicknesses and he cured them of their diseases.” [DOU]
Jesus told a man what to expect if he went with Jesus. He told another man to follow
Jesus immediately, not to wait until later.
Matthew 8:18-22
18 Jesus saw the crowd around him, but he needed to rest. So he told his disciples
to take him by boat to the other side of the lake. 19 As they were walking toward the
boat, a man who taught the Jewish laws came to him and said, “Teacher, I will go
with you wherever you go.” 20 In order that the man might know what he could expect
if he went with him, Jesus said to him, “Foxes have holes in the ground in which to
live, and birds have nests, but even though I am the one who came from heaven, I do
not have a home where I can sleep [MTY].” 21 Another man who was one of Jesus’
disciples said to him, “Sir/Lord, permit me first to go home. After my father dies I will
bury him, and then I will come with you.” 22 But Jesus said to him, “Come with me
now. God considers that people who do not have eternal life are dead [MET]. Let those
people do the work of burying people who die.”
The disciples were amazed when Jesus calmed a storm on the lake.
Matthew 8:23-27
23 Then Jesus got into the boat. The disciples also got in, and they started sailing close
to the shoreline around Lake Galilee. 24 Suddenly strong winds blew on the lake, and
very high waves were splashing into the boat and filling it. But Jesus was sleeping.
25 They went and woke him up, and said to him, “Sir/Lord, rescue us! We are about to
drown!” 26 He said to them, “◄You should not be terrified!/Why are you terrified?►
[RHQ] I am disappointed that in spite of all you have seen me do, ◄you do not believe
very much that I can rescue you./do you not believe that I can rescue you?► [RHQ]”
Then he got up and rebuked the wind and told the waves to calm down. And the
wind stopped blowing and the lake became calm. 27 As a result, they were amazed,
and they said to one another, “This man is certainly an extraordinary person [RHQ]!
All things are under his control! Even the winds and the waves obey him [PRS]!”
Jesus expelled some demons from two men.
Matthew 8:28-34
28 When they came to the east side of the lake, they arrived in the region where
the Gadarenes lived. Jesus got out of the boat and began walking on the road. Then
two men who were controlled by demons {whom demons controlled} came out of the
burial caves where they were living. Because they were extremely violent and attacked
people, no one dared to travel on the road near where they were living. 29 Suddenly
they shouted to Jesus, “You are the Son of God! Because you have nothing in common
with us [IDM, RHQ], leave us alone Have you come here [RHQ] to torture us before
the time [MTY] God has appointed to punish us?” 30 There was a large herd of pigs not
far away, digging for food with their noses. 31 So the demons begged Jesus, saying,
“You are going to cast us out of the men, so send us into the herd of pigs!” 32 Jesus
said to them, “If that is what you want, go!” So the demons left the men and enteredMATTHEW 8:33
1360
MATTHEW 9:13
the pigs. Suddenly the whole herd of pigs rushed down the steep bank into the lake
and drowned. 33 The men who were tending the pigs became afraid and ran into the
town and reported everything that had happened, including what had happened to
the two men who had been controlled by demons {whom demons had controlled}.
34 Then it seemed as if all the people [HYP] who lived in that town [MTY] went to meet
Jesus. When they saw him and the two men who had been controlled by the demons,
they begged Jesus to leave their region because they thought that he would destroy
more things than just the pigs (OR, because they realized he must be very powerful).
9
Jesus showed that he had power to forgive sins as well as to heal a paralyzed man.
Matthew 9:1-8
1 Jesus and his disciples got into the boat. They skirted around the lake and went
to Capernaum, the city where he was living. 2 Some men brought to him a man who
was paralyzed and who was lying on a sleeping pad. When Jesus perceived that
they believed that he could heal the paralyzed man, he said to him, “Young man, be
encouraged! I forgive your sins.” 3 Some of the men who taught the Jewish laws said
among themselves, “He claims that he can forgive sins! That means that he claims to
be equal with God He is insulting God!” 4 Jesus knew what they were thinking. So
he said, “◄You should not think evil thoughts, accusing me because I claim that I am
God!/Why do you think evil thoughts, saying that it is wrong for me to claim that I am
God?► [RHQ] 5 It would not be risky for someone to say to this man, ‘I forgive your
sins’, because no one could see whether or not it really happened. But no one, without
having the power to heal, would say to him, ‘Get up and walk!’, because people could
easily see whether it happened or not! [RHQ] 6 So I am going to do something in order
that you may know that God has authorized me, the one who came from heaven, to
forgive the sins of people while I am on the earth, as well as to heal people.” Then he
said to the paralyzed man, “Get up, pick up your sleeping pad, and go home!” 7 And
immediately the man got up, picked up his sleeping pad, and went home! 8 When the
crowds saw this, they were awestruck. They praised God for giving authority to a
human being to do such things.
Jesus invited Matthew to go with him, and he told the Pharisees that they needed to
repent.
Matthew 9:9-13
9 As Jesus was going away from there, he saw me, a man named Matthew. I was
sitting at a table where I collected taxes for the Roman government. He said to me,
“Come with me and become my disciple!” So I got up and went with him. 10 Then
I invited Jesus and his disciples to my home for a meal. While they were sitting
and eating in my home, many tax collectors and other people who were {whom
the Pharisees} considered to be habitual sinners came unexpectedly to eat with us.
11 When the Pharisees saw that, they came to us disciples and said, “◄It is disgusting
that your teacher, who claims to be righteous, eats and associates with tax collectors
and other sinners!/Why is it that your teacher, who claims to be righteous, eats and
associates with tax collectors and other sinners?►” [RHQ] 12 Jesus heard what they
said, so he told them this parable: “It is people who are sick who need a doctor [MET],
not people who are well.” What he meant by that was that it was people who knew
that they were sinners who were coming to him in order to be helped spiritually. 13 He
continued by saying, “You need to learn what these words that God said mean: ‘I
want you to act mercifully to people and not just to offer sacrifices.’ Keep in mind
that I came from heaven, not to invite people who think [IRO] that they are righteousMATTHEW 9:14
1361
MATTHEW 9:26
to turn away from their sinful lives and come to me, but to invite people who know they
are sinners to turn from their sins and come to me.”
Jesus illustrated why it was not appropriate for his disciples to fast, and that living
according to his new message was better than following the old traditions like fasting.
Matthew 9:14-17
14 Later, the disciples of John the Baptizer came to Jesus and asked him, “We (exc)
and the Pharisees often abstain from food to show that we want to please God, but
your disciples do not do that. Why do they not?” 15 Jesus wanted to show them and the
Pharisees that it was not appropriate for his disciples to abstain from food and mourn
while he was still with them. So he gave them this illustration: “When a bridegroom
is with his friends at the time of the wedding, ◄his friends certainly do not mourn, do
they?/do his friends mourn?► [RHQ] No, they do not mourn, because they are not sad
at that time. But when the bridegroom is taken {someone takes the bridegroom/his
enemies take the bridegroom} from them, they will abstain from food, because then
they will be sad.”
16 Jesus wanted to show them that people who desire to live in accordance with
his new message should not try to continue to obey the old religious traditions like
◄abstaining from food/fasting► [MET]. So he said to them, “People do not sew a patch
of unshrunken cloth on an old garment to mend a hole. If they did that, when they
washed the garment, the patch would shrink and tear the garment, and the hole would
become bigger. 17 Neither does anyone pour freshly-squeezed grape juice into old skin
bags to store it. If anyone did that, those skin bags would tear because they would
not stretch when the grape juice ferments and expands. They would be ruined, and the
wine would be spilled {spill} on the ground. Instead, people put new wine into new
skin bags, and the bags will stretch when the wine ferments. As a result, both the wine
and the bags are preserved.”
Jesus healed a woman who had constant hemorrhaging. He also caused a young
girl to become alive again.
Matthew 9:18-26
18 While Jesus was saying that, a leader of the Jewish meeting place came and bowed
down before him to show respect. Then he said, “My daughter just died! But if you
come and lay your hand on her, she will live again!” 19 So Jesus got up, and he and
we disciples went with the man. 20-21 Then a woman who had been suffering constant
vaginal bleeding for twelve years came near Jesus. She was saying to herself, “I want
Jesus to heal me without anyone finding out that I have this problem of bleeding. So if I
touch him or even if I just touch his garment, I will be healed without anyone finding
out about it.” So she came behind him and touched the tassel of his garment. 22 Then
Jesus turned around to see who had touched him. And when he saw the woman, he
said to her, “Be encouraged, dear woman. Because you believed [PRS] that I could
heal you, I have healed you.” The woman was healed at that very moment.
23 Then Jesus and some of us disciples came to the Jewish leader’s house. Jesus heard
the flute players playing funeral music and the crowd that had gathered wailing loudly
because the girl had died. 24 Knowing that he would cause her to live again, he said to
them, “Go away and stop the funeral music and wailing, because the girl is not dead!
She is just sleeping!” The people laughed at him, because they knew that she was dead.
25 But Jesus told them to get out of the house. Then he went into the room where
the girl was lying. He took hold of her hand and she became alive again and got up.
26 And the people of that whole region heard [PRS] about it.MATTHEW 9:27
1362
MATTHEW 10:5
Jesus healed two blind men.
Matthew 9:27-31
27 As Jesus went away from there, two blind men followed him and shouted, “Have
mercy on us and heal our eyes, you who are the Messiah, the Descendant of King
David!” 28 Jesus went into the house, where he was staying, and then the blind men
went in, too. Jesus said to them, “Do you believe that I am able to heal your eyes?”
They said to him, “Yes, Lord!” 29 Then he touched their eyes and he said to them,
“Because you believe that I can heal your eyes, I am healing them right now!” 30 And
they were able to see [IDM]! Then Jesus told them sternly, “Be sure [IDM] that you do
not tell anybody what I did for you!” 31 But they went out and reported it throughout
that whole region.
Jesus expelled a demon, but the Pharisees accused him of doing such things by Satan’s
power.
Matthew 9:32-34
32 When Jesus and we disciples left the house, some people brought to Jesus a man
who was unable to speak because he was controlled by a demon {a demon controlled
him}. 33 After Jesus had expelled the demon, the man who had been unable to speak
began to speak! The crowd who saw this marveled. They said, “Never before have
we seen anything as marvelous as this happen in Israel!” 34 But the Pharisees said, “It
is Satan, who rules the demons, who enables this man to expel demons from people.”
Jesus told his disciples to pray that God would send more workers to tell his message
to those who were ready to respond.
Matthew 9:35-38
35 Then we went with Jesus through many of [HYP] the cities and towns in Galilee
district. He was teaching ◄in the synagogues/ in the Jewish meeting places►, and
preaching the good message about how God rules over people’s lives. He also was
healing the people who had various diseases and illnesses. 36 When he saw the
crowd of people, he pitied them because they were harassed and dejected. They
were like sheep that do not have a shepherd [SIM]. 37 Then he gave this illustration to
us disciples: “The people who are ready to receive my message are like a field that is
ready to be harvested {for people to harvest}. But there are only a few of you who are
teaching people my message. 38 So pray and ask the Lord God to send more workers
who will gather people together and teach them my message, just like a landowner
sends workers into his field to gather the [MET] harvest.”
10
Jesus selected twelve apostles and instructed them before sending them out to various
places.
Matthew 10:1-15
1 He told us twelve disciples to come to him. Then he gave us the power/authority to
expel evil spirits that controlled people. He also enabled us to heal all people who had
diseases or who were sick. 2 Here is a list of us twelve disciples whom he called apostles
(which means ‘messengers’): Simon, to whom he gave the new name Peter; Andrew,
Peter’s younger brother; James, the son of Zebedee; John, the younger brother of
James; 3 Philip; Bartholomew; Thomas; me, Matthew, the tax collector; James, the son
of Alpheus; Thaddeus; 4 Simon, a member of the party that wanted to overthrow the
Roman government; and Judas Iscariot (OR, Judas, the man from Kerioth Town), who
later enabled the Jewish leaders to seize Jesus.
5 When Jesus was about to send us twelve apostles to tell his message to people in
various places, he gave us these instructions: “Do not go where the non-Jews liveMATTHEW 10:6
1363
MATTHEW 10:23
[MTY] or into the towns where the Samaritans live, because they hate you. 6 Instead,
go to the people of Israel [SYN] who have gone away from God like sheep that have
gotten lost [MET]. 7 When you go to them, proclaim to them that God [EUP/MTY] will
soon begin to rule over people. 8 Heal sick people, cause dead people to become alive,
heal people who have leprosy, and cause demons to leave people who are controlled
by them {whom demons control}. Do not charge money for helping people, because
God did not charge you anything for helping you. 9-10 Do not take any money with you
[MTY], nor a knapsack. Do not take an extra shirt, nor sandals in addition to what you
are wearing, nor a walking stick. Every worker deserves to get pay from the people
for whom he works, so you deserve to receive food and a place to stay from the people
to whom you go. 11-12 In whatever town or village you enter, find out which person
is worthy that you should stay in his home. And as you go into that house, ask God
to bless the people who live there [MTY]. Stay in that home until you leave that town
or village. 13 If the people who live in [MTY] that house are worthy of being blessed
{God blessing them}, God will bless them. If the people who live in that house are not
worthy of being blessed {of God blessing them}, God will bless you instead of blessing
them. 14 If the people who live in any house or town do not welcome you to their home
or town, nor listen to your message, leave that house or town. And as you leave,
shake off the dust from your feet. By doing that, you will warn them that God will
punish them for rejecting your message. 15 Note this carefully: At the time when God
judges all people, he will punish the people who lived in Sodom and Gomorrah [MTY],
the ancient cities which God destroyed because their people were extremely wicked. But
in any town where the people [MTY] refuse to hear your message, God will punish
them even more severely.”
Jesus instructed his disciples to be wary of their religious leaders, and to endure
when they are persecuted by people who refuse to accept the new message.
Matthew 10:16-25
16 “Take note: After I send you out, you will be as defenseless as sheep [MET] in
the midst of people who are as dangerous as wolves. So you should wisely stay away
from such people, like you stay away from poisonous snakes [SIM]. You should be as
harmless as doves are [SIM]. 17 Also, be on guard against our religious leaders. They
will arrest you and take you to the members of the religious councils to put you on
trial and punish you because you are my disciples. You will be whipped {The local
leaders will whip you} in their meeting places. 18 And because you teach about me,
you will be taken {the religious leaders will take you} to governors and kings in order
that they may put you on trial and punish you. As a result, you will testify to those
rulers and to other non-Jews about what I have done. 19 When the religious leaders
arrest you, do not be worried about what you will say to them, because at that very
time the Holy Spirit will tell you the words that you should say. 20 It is not that you
will decide what to say. Instead, you will say what the Spirit of your heavenly Father
tells you to say. 21 You will be taken {People who do not believe in me will take you} to
the authorities to be killed because you believe in me. For example, people will betray
their brothers, and fathers will betray their children. Children will rebel against their
parents and cause them to be killed. 22 Many people will hate you because you believe
in me. Nevertheless, many people will keep on believing in me until they die. They
are the people whom God will take to live with him. 23 When people in one town
cause you to suffer, escape to another town and tell the people there about me. Note
this: I, the one who came down from heaven, will certainly return to earth before
you have finished going from one town to another town throughout Israel and telling
people about me.MATTHEW 10:24
1364
MATTHEW 10:39
24 A disciple should not expect to be greater than his teacher, and servants are not
superior to their master. 25 You do not expect that people will treat a disciple better
than they treat his teacher, or that they will treat a servant better than they treat his
master. Similarly, because I am your teacher and master, you can expect that people
will mistreat you, because they have mistreated me. The most you can expect is that
people will treat you like they treat me. I am like the ruler of a household [MET]. But
people have insulted me by calling me Beelzebub, the ruler of the demons. So they will
certainly insult you more, you who are only like members of my household [MET]!”
Jesus instructed his disciples that they should not fear those who persecute them.
Matthew 10:26-33
26 “Do not be afraid of people who insult you and do evil things to you. God wants
everything that is unknown now to be revealed {God wants you to reveal everything
that is unknown now}. He does not want his truth to remain hidden [MET] and kept
secret [DOU]. 27 So, instead of being afraid, what I say to you secretly as people do at
night [MTY], tell publicly as people do during the daytime [MTY]. What I say to you
privately as people do when they whisper to you [MTY], proclaim publicly [MTY, DOU].
28 Do not be afraid of people who are able to kill your body [SYN] but are not able to
destroy your soul. Instead, fear God because he is able to destroy both a person’s body
and a person’s soul in hell. 29 Think about the sparrows. They have so little value that
you can buy cares two of them for only one small coin [RHQ]. But when any sparrow
falls to the ground and dies [LIT], God, your heavenly Father, knows it, because he
cares about everything. 30 He cares about you, too. He even knows how many hairs
you have on your head! 31 God values you much more than he values sparrows
[LIT]. So, do not be afraid of people who threaten to kill you 32 If people, without being
afraid, are willing to tell others that they are my disciples, I will acknowledge before
my Father who is in heaven that they are my disciples. 33 But if they are afraid to say
in front of others that they are my disciples, I will tell my Father, who is in heaven,
that they are not my disciples.”
Jesus instructed his disciples that they should be willing to suffer because of their
faith in him.
Matthew 10:34-39
34 “Do not think that I came to earth to cause people to live together harmoniously.
The result of my coming is that some of those who follow me [MTY] will be killed.
35 Because I came to earth, people who do not believe in me will oppose those who
do believe in me. For example, some sons will oppose their fathers, some daughters
will oppose their mothers, and some daughters-in-law will oppose their mothers-in-
law. 36 This shows that sometimes a person’s enemies will be members of his own
household. 37 People who love their fathers or mothers more than they love me are not
worthy to have a relationship with me. And people who love their sons or daughters
more than they love me are not worthy to belong to me. 38 People who are ready to
execute a prisoner force him to carry a cross to the place where they will nail him to it
[MET]. Those who are not willing to allow other people to hurt and disgrace them like
that because of being my disciples are not worthy to belong to me. 39 People who deny
that they believe in me in order to escape being killed will not live with God eternally
[MET], but people who confess that they believe in me and, as a result are killed, will
live with God eternally [MET].”
Jesus instructed his apostles about the people whom God rewards, and then he sent
them to various towns.
Matthew 10:40-42MATTHEW 10:40
1365
MATTHEW 11:12
40 “God considers that everyone who welcomes you, welcomes me [SIM], and he
considers that everyone who welcomes me welcomes him, the one who sent me [SIM].
41 Those who welcome someone because [MTY] they know that person is a prophet
they will receive the same reward that prophets receive from God. Likewise, those
who welcome a person because [MTY] they know that person is righteous will receive
the reward righteous people receive from God. 42 Note this: Suppose people see that
you are thirsty [MTY] and give you a drink of cold water because they know that
[MTY] you are one of my disciples. God will certainly reward people who do that.
They might consider that what they did is insignificant, but God will consider it very
significant” [LIT].
11
1 When Jesus had finished instructing us twelve disciples about what we should
do, he sent us to various Israelite towns. Then he went to teach and preach in other
Israelite towns in that area.
Jesus showed the messengers from John the Baptizer that he was the Messiah, and
he told the people that John was the man like Elijah who was to prepare the way for
the Messiah.
Matthew 11:2-15
2 While John the Baptizer was in prison, he heard what Jesus, the man whom he
thought was the Messiah, was doing. So he sent some of his disciples to him in order
3 to ask him, “Are you the Messiah who the prophets prophesied would come, or is it
someone else that we should expect to come?” 4 After they asked Jesus that question,
he answered them, “Go back and report to John what you hear me telling people and
what you see me doing. 5 I am enabling blind people to see and lame people to walk.
I am healing people who have leprosy. I am enabling deaf people to hear and dead
people to become alive again. I am telling poor people God’s good message. 6 Also tell
John that God is pleased with people who do not stop believing in me because what I
do is not what they expected the Messiah to do.”
7 When John’s disciples had gone away, Jesus began to talk to the crowd of people
about John. He said to them, “Think about what sort of person you went to see in
the desolate area when you went there to see John. ◄You did not go there to listen to a
man who constantly changed his message, like a reed that is blown {blows} back and
forth in the wind [MET]!/Did you go there to listen to a man whose message changes
continually like long grass that is blown {blows} back and forth in the wind changes
its direction?► [MET, RHQ] 8 Then what kind of person did you go there to see [RHQ]?
◄You did not go there to see a man who was wearing expensive clothes./Did you go
there to see a man who was wearing expensive clothes?► [RHQ] No! You know very
well that people who wear beautiful clothes reside in kings’ palaces and not in desolate
areas. 9 Then what kind of person did you go to see [RHQ]? Did you go there [RHQ]
to see John because he was ◄a prophet/a person who speaks what God tells him to
say►? Yes! But I will tell you that John is more important than an ordinary prophet.
10 He is the one to whom God was referring when he said to the Messiah these words
that are written {about whom the prophet Malachi wrote} in the Scriptures:
Listen! I am going to send my messenger to go before you [SYN] to prepare the people
[MET] for your coming.
11 Note this: Of all the people who have ever lived, God does not consider that any of
them are greater than John the Baptizer. However, God considers that all those people
who have let God rule their lives are greater than John, even if they are insignificant
people. 12 From the time that John the Baptizer preached until now, other people haveMATTHEW 11:13
1366
MATTHEW 11:24
violently attacked the people who have allowed God [MTY/EUP] to rule their lives,
and they have suffered (OR, people have very eagerly been asking God to take control
of their lives, OR, Israelite people who have thought that I would become their king
have been extremely eager to be included in my kingdom) (OR, have been violently
attacked and made to suffer). 13 All this that I am saying about John is confirmed by the
fact that all the men who wrote the Scriptures [MTY, SYN] foretold about God ruling
people’s lives, until John the Baptizer came. 14 Even though most of you are unwilling
to believe what I am saying, I will tell this truth to anyone who is willing to believe it:
John is the man who is like Elijah [MET]. He is the one who one of the prophets said
would come in order to prepare the people to welcome the Messiah. 15 If you want to
understand this, you must think carefully [MTY] about what I have just said [MTY].”
Jesus rebuked the people who refused to believe both him and John the Baptizer.
Matthew 11:16-19
16 “◄I will illustrate what you people who have heard what John the Baptizer and I
have taught are like./Do you know what you people who have heard what John and I
have taught are like?► [RHQ] You are like children who are playing games in an open
area. Some of the children are calling to the others, saying, 17 ‘We played happy music
on the flute for you, but you did not dance! Then we sang sad funeral songs for you,
but you did not cry [MET]!’ 18 Similarly, you are dissatisfied with both John and me!
When John came and preached to you, he did not eat good food and did not drink
wine, like most people do. But you rejected him saying, ‘A demon is controlling him!’
19 In contrast, I, the one who came from heaven, eat the same food and drink wine as
other people do. But you reject me, saying, ‘Look! This man eats too much food and
drinks too much wine, and he associates with tax collectors and other sinners!’ But
people who really think about what John and I have done will realize that what we
do is truly wise [MET, PRS].”
Jesus explained why the people of Corazin, Bethsaida, and Capernaum would be
punished more severely than the people of Tyre, Sidon, and Sodom.
Matthew 11:20-24
20 The people who lived in the towns [MTY] in the area where Jesus was saw him
perform many miracles. But they did not turn away from their sinful behavior. So
Jesus began to reproach them by saying to them, 21 “You people who live in Chorazin
city [MTY] and you people who live in Bethsaida city [MTY] will suffer terribly in hell!
I did great miracles in your cities, but you did not turn from your sinful behavior. If
the miracles that I performed in your cities had been done in the ancient cities of
Tyre and Sidon, the wicked people who lived there long ago would have sat in ashes,
wearing coarse cloth to show that they were sorry for their sins. 22 So note this: God
will punish the wicked people who lived in the cities of Tyre and Sidon [MTY], but
he will punish you even more severely on the final day when he judges all people.
23 also have something to say to you people who live in Capernaum city [MTY]. ◄Do
not think that you will be honored {that God will honor you} in heaven!/Do you think
that you will be honored {that God will honor you} in heaven?► [RHQ] That will not
happen! On the contrary, after you die, you will be sent {God will send you} down into
the place where sinful people will be punished {he will punish sinful people} forever.
God destroyed the ancient city of Sodom because the people who lived in that city were
extremely wicked. If I had performed in Sodom the miracles that I performed in your
city, the people there would have turned away from their wicked behavior and their city
[MET] would still exist now [MTY]. But you, although I did miracles in your city, you
did not turn from your wicked behavior. 24 So note this: God will punish the peopleMATTHEW 11:25
1367
MATTHEW 12:7
who lived in Sodom city [MTY], but he will punish you even more severely on the final
day when he judges all people.”
Jesus thanked God for revealing his truth to uneducated people, and he urged the
people to come to him to get rid of the burden of trying to obey religious laws.
Matthew 11:25-30
25 At that time Jesus prayed, “Father, you rule over everything in heaven and on
the earth. I thank you that you have prevented people who think that they are wise
[IRO] because they are well-educated, from knowing these things. Instead, you have
revealed them to people who accept your truth as readily as little children [MET] do.
26 Yes, Father, you have done that because it seemed good to you to do so.”
27 Then Jesus said to the people there who wanted him to teach them, “God, my Father,
has revealed to me all the things that I need to know in order to do my work. Only my
Father knows who I really am. Furthermore, only I and those people to whom I wish
to reveal him know what God my Father is like. 28 Come to me, all you people who
are very weary of trying to obey all the many laws that your religious teachers tell you
to obey [MET]. I will enable you to quit trying to obey all those laws. 29-30 Let me help
you carry those loads, just like two oxen who have a yoke on their necks [MET, DOU]
help each other pull a heavy load. It will not be difficult for you to do the things that
I ask you to do for me [DOU]. Because I am gentle and humble [DOU], accept what I
teach about what God wants you to do. And as a result, you will quit worrying about
obeying all the religious laws, and your spirits will be at peace.”
12
Jesus showed the religious leaders that the Scriptures indicated that God permitted
some people to disobey religious laws when they needed food. He also showed them
that he had the authority from God to tell people what was right to do on the Sabbath.
Matthew 12:1-8
1 During that period of time, on a ◄Sabbath/Jewish day of rest►, Jesus and we
disciples were walking through some grain fields. And because we were hungry, we
began to pick some of the heads of grain and eat them. The laws of Moses permitted
people to do that if they were hungry. 2 Some Pharisees saw us do what they considered
to be work. So they said to Jesus, accusing him, “Look! Your disciples are doing work
that is not permitted in our laws [PRS] for us to do on our day of rest!” 3 Jesus wanted
to show them that the record in the Scriptures indicated that God permitted people to
disobey certain religious laws when they needed food. So he said to them, “It is written
{Someone wrote} in the Scriptures [RHQ] what our revered ancestor King David did
when he and the men with him were hungry. You have read about that, ◄but you
do not think about what it implies!/so why do you not think about what it implies?►
[RHQ] 4 David entered the big tent where they worshipped God and asked for some
food. The high priest gave him the bread that had been {they had} presented to God.
According to the laws of Moses, only priests were permitted to eat that bread, but
David and the men who were with him ate it. And God did not consider that what
they did was wrong 5 Also, think about the laws that Moses wrote [RHQ]. He said that
even though the priests, by working in the Temple on our Jewish day of rest, are not
obeying the Jewish day of rest laws, they are not guilty. You have surely read that,
but you do not understand what it means. 6 Note this: God allows men to work in the
Temple on our rest day because that work must be done. But in addition, I tell you
that I have more authority than the authority of the Temple. So, it is more important
for you to obey my teachings than to obey your traditions about our rest day. 7 You
should think about these words of God in the Scriptures: ‘I want you to act mercifullyMATTHEW 12:8
1368
MATTHEW 12:24
toward people, and not just offer sacrifices.’ If you understood what that means, you
would not condemn my disciples, who have done no wrong. 8 And I want you to know
that I, the one who came from heaven, have the authority to determine what is right
for my disciples to do on the days of rest.”
Jesus healed a man on the Sabbath. At the same time, he told the Pharisees that they
were mistaken in thinking that it was wrong to heal a person on the Sabbath.
Matthew 12:9-14
9 After Jesus left there that day, he went into a building where we Jews worship God.
10 He saw a man with a shriveled hand there. The Pharisees thought that Jesus would
be disobeying the tradition about not working on the day of rest if he healed the man,
so one of them asked him, “Does God permit us to heal people on our day of rest?”
They asked that question so that they might accuse him if he healed someone ◄on the
Sabbath/on the Jewish rest day►. 11 He replied to them, “Would anyone among you
who has only one sheep that falls into a hole ◄on the Sabbath/on the Jewish rest
day► just leave it there [RHQ]? Certainly not! You would take hold of it and lift it
out right away, and that would be acceptable work on our day of rest, too 12 Because
sheep are valuable, their owners may work on our day of rest in order to rescue them.
So, because people are more valuable than sheep, it is certainly right for us to do
something good by healing another person any day, including our day of rest!” 13 Then
he said to the man, “Stretch out your withered hand!” The man stretched it out, and
it became normal like the other hand! 14 Then the Pharisees left the meeting house.
They were worried that the people would reject their traditions and would accept Jesus’
teaching instead. So they met together to plan how they could kill him.
Jesus explained that his acting humbly when he healed people was a fulfillment of
prophecy.
Matthew 12:15-21
15 Because Jesus knew that the Pharisees were plotting to kill him, he took us disciples
and went away from there. Crowds, including many sick people, followed him, wanting
him to heal them, and he healed them all. 16 But he told them firmly that they should
not tell other people yet who he was. 17 By acting humbly like that he fulfilled what
was written by Isaiah the prophet {what Isaiah the prophet wrote} long ago about
the Messiah. Isaiah wrote that God said:
18 Take note of my servant whom I have chosen, the one whom I love and with
whom I am pleased. I will put my Spirit in him, and he will proclaim that God will
judge the non-Jews justly. 19 He will not quarrel with people, neither will he shout.
He will not teach with a loud voice in the main streets. 20 Until he has justly judged
the people who trust in him and has declared them not guilty, he will not destroy
anyone who is weak like a smashed stalk [MET], nor will he silence anyone who is
as helpless as a smoldering linen wick [MET, DOU]. 21 As a result, the non-Jews will
confidently expect that he will do great things for them.
Jesus refuted the argument that he was expelling demons by Satan’s power, and he
warned that making such statements is an unforgivable sin against the Holy Spirit.
Matthew 12:22-32
22 One day when Jesus was at home, some men brought to Jesus a man who, because
of being controlled by a demon {a demon controlled him}, was blind and unable to
speak. Jesus healed him by expelling the demon. As a result, the man began to talk
and was able to see. 23 All the crowd who saw it marveled. They began asking each
other, “Could this man be the Messiah, the descendant of King David, whom we have
been expecting?” 24 Because the Pharisees and the men who taught the Jewish lawsMATTHEW 12:25
1369
MATTHEW 12:37
heard that the people thought that Jesus might be the Messiah because he had expelled
the demon, they said, “It is not God, but Beelzebub, the ruler of the demons, who
enables this man to expel demons from people!” 25 But Jesus knew what the Pharisees
were thinking and saying. So, in order to show them that what they said did not make
sense, he said to them, “If the people in [MTY] one nation fight against each other,
they will destroy their nation {their nation will be destroyed}. If people who live in
the same city or house fight each other, they will certainly not remain as one group
or family. 26 Similarly, if Satan were expelling his own demons [MTY], it would be
as though he was fighting against himself. ◄His kingdom would not continue!/How
could his kingdom continue?► [RHQ] His rule over them would certainly not last!
27 Furthermore, if it is true that Satan enables me to expel demons, is it also true that
your disciples who expel demons do so by Satan’s power [RHQ]? No So they will show
you that you are not thinking logically. 28 But because it is God’s Spirit who enables
me to expel demons, that proves that the power of God to rule people’s lives has come
to you.
29 I will illustrate why I am able to expel demons. ◄A person cannot go into the
house of a strong man► [RHQ] But if he ties up the strong man, then he will be able
to steal the things in that man’s house.
30 No one can be neutral. Those who do not acknowledge that the Holy Spirit enables
me to expel demons are opposing me, and those who do not gather people to become
my disciples are causing those people to [DOU] go away from me.
31 You are saying that it is not the Holy Spirit who is enabling me to expel demons.
So I will say this to you: If those who offend and slander other people in any way
are then sorry and ask God to forgive them, God will forgive them. But people who
discredit what the Holy Spirit does will not be forgiven {God will not forgive people
who discredit what the Holy Spirit does}. 32 God is willing to forgive people who
criticize me, the One who came from heaven. But I warn you that those who say
evil things about what the Holy Spirit does will not be forgiven {God will not forgive
people who speak evil words about what the Holy Spirit does}. They will not be
forgiven {He will not forgive them} now, and they will never be forgiven {he will
never forgive them}.”
Jesus said that we can judge what people are like by seeing what they do.
Matthew 12:33-37
33 “Think about this: You can know whether a person is good and what that person
says is good, in the same way that you can know whether a tree [MET] and the fruit it
produces [MET] are good. You can also know whether a person and what that person
says is evil in the same way that you can know whether a tree [MET] and its fruit [MET]
are blighted. You can know whether a tree is good by seeing its fruit, and similarly
people can know the evil character of you Pharisees by listening to your accusations
against me. 34 What you teach harms people spiritually like poisonous snakes harm
them physically [MET]! You are not able to speak good things because you are evil
[RHQ]. Evil people [SYN] like you speak what comes from all that is in their ◄inner
beings/hearts►. 35 Good people speak good things. That is like taking good things
out of buildings where they are stored. But evil people speak evil things. That is
like taking evil things out of buildings where they are stored. 36 I tell you that on
the day when God judges [MTY], he will make people recall every useless word they
have spoken, and he will judge them accordingly. 37 Based on the words that you have
spoken, God will either declare that you are righteous based on the words that you
have spoken, or else he will condemn you.”MATTHEW 12:38
1370
MATTHEW 12:50
Jesus told the Jewish leaders that the only miracle that they would see him do would
be one like God did for Jonah.
Matthew 12:38-42
38 Then some of the Pharisees and men who taught the Jewish laws responded to
what Jesus was teaching by saying to him, “Teacher, we want to see you perform
a miracle that would prove to us that God sent you.” 39 Then Jesus said to them,
“You people have already seen me perform miracles, but you are evil, and you do not
faithfully worship God [MET]! You want me to perform a miracle that would prove
to you that God sent me, but God will enable you to see only one miracle. It will be
like what happened to Jonah the prophet [MET]. 40 Jonah was in the stomach of a
huge fish for three days and nights before God caused him to live again. Similarly, for
three days and nights I, the one who came from heaven, will be in a place where dead
people are, and then God will cause me to live again. 41 When God judges all people,
the people who lived in Nineveh will stand in front of him with you people who have
seen me perform miracles. The people of Nineveh turned from their sinful ways as a
result of hearing what Jonah preached. Jonah was important, but I, who am more
important than Jonah, have come and preached to you, but you have not turned from
your sinful ways. So when God judges all people, he will condemn you. 42 The queen
from Sheba, South of Israel, who lived long ago, came from a distant region in order to
listen to King Solomon teach many wise things. But now I, a man who is much greater
and wiser than Solomon, am here, but you have not listened to what I have told you.
So at the time when God judges all people, the queen from Sheba will stand in front
of him, along with you people, and will condemn you.”
Jesus taught that those who have had evil spirits expelled from them need to have
their lives controlled by the Holy Spirit.
Matthew 12:43-45
43 “Sometimes when an evil spirit leaves a person, it wanders around in desolate
areas, seeking someone in whom it can rest. If it does not find anyone, 44 it says to
itself, ‘I will return to the person [MET] in whom I used to live.’ So it goes back and
finds that the Spirit of God is not in control of that person’s life. The person’s life is like
a house that has been swept clean and everything put in order [MET], but it is empty.
45 Then this evil spirit goes and gets seven other spirits that are even more evil, and
they all enter that person and begin living there. So, although that person’s condition
was bad before, it becomes much worse. That is what you wicked people who have
heard me teach will experience.”
Jesus said that those who do God’s will are as important to Jesus as his own relatives
are.
Matthew 12:46-50
46 While Jesus was still speaking to the crowds, his mother and his younger brothers
arrived. They stood outside the house, wanting to speak with him. 47 Someone said
to him, “Your mother and your younger brothers are standing outside the house,
wanting to talk to you.” 48 Then Jesus said to the person who told him that, “◄I will
tell you something about my mother and brothers [MET]./Do you know who I consider
to be like my mother and my brothers?►” [MET, RHQ] 49 He then pointed toward us
disciples and said, “These are ones whom I love as much as I love my mother and my
brothers [MET]. 50 Those who do what God my Father who is in heaven wants, are as
dear to me [MET] as my brother, my sister, or my mother.”MATTHEW 13:1
1371
MATTHEW 13:17
13
Jesus taught a parable about different kinds of soil.
Matthew 13:1-10
1 That same day Jesus, along with us disciples, left the house where he was teaching
and went to Galilee lake. He sat down there, 2 and a very large crowd gathered around
him to listen to his teaching. So, in order that they would not jostle him (OR, to speak
to the people better), he got into a boat and sat down to teach them. The crowd stood
on the shore and was listening. 3 He was telling them many parables. One of the
parables that he told them was this: “Listen! A man went out to his field to sow some
seeds. 4 As he was scattering them over the soil, some of the seeds fell on the path.
Then some birds came and ate those seeds. 5 Other seeds fell on ground where there
was not much soil on top of the rock. Those seeds sprouted very soon, because the
sun quickly warmed the shallow soil. 6 But when the young plants came up, they were
scorched by the sun, and they withered because they did not have deep roots. 7 Other
seeds fell on ground that contained roots of thorny weeds. The thorny weeds grew
together with the young plants, and they crowded out the plants. 8 But other seeds fell
on good soil, and the plants grew and produced a lot of grain. Some plants produced
100 times as many seeds as were planted. Some plants produced 60 times as much.
Some plants produced 30 times as much. 9 If you want to understand this [MTY], you
should consider carefully what I have just said.”
Jesus told the disciples why he taught them using parables.
Matthew 13:10-17
10 We disciples approached Jesus and asked him, “Why do you use parables when
you speak to the crowd?” 11 He answered us saying, “God [EUP/MTY] is revealing to
you what he did not reveal before, about how he wants to rule over people’s lives. But
he has not revealed it to others. 12 Those who think about what I say and understand
it, God will enable them to understand more. But those who do not think carefully
about what I say will forget even what they already know. 13 That is why I use parables
when I speak to people, because although they see what I do, they do not perceive
what it means, and although they hear what I say, they do not really understand what
it means. 14 What these people do completely fulfills what God told the prophet Isaiah
to say long ago to the people who did not try to understand what he said,
You will hear what I say, but you will not understand it. You will keep seeing what
I do, but you will not understand what it means [DOU].
15 God also said to Isaiah,
These people have become unresponsive [MTY] to what they see me do and to what
they hear me say. They listen unwillingly [MTY] to what I say, and they do not pay
attention to [MTY] what I do. If it were not so, they would perceive [MTY] what I am
doing, they would understand [MTY] what I say to them, and they would turn away
from their sinful lives and turn to me, and I would save them from being punished for
their sins [MET].
16 But as for you, God is pleased with you because you [SYN] have seen what I
have done and because you [SYN] understand what I say [DOU]. 17 Note this: Many
prophets and righteous people who lived long ago longed to see what you are seeing
me do, but they did not see it. They longed to hear the things that you have been
hearing me say, but they did not hear what you hear me say.” [DOU]
Jesus explained that the parable about the kinds of soil illustrates four different ways
people respond to his teaching.
Matthew 13:18-23MATTHEW 13:18
1372
MATTHEW 13:33
18 “Since God wants you to understand what I am teaching you, listen as I explain the
parable about the man who sowed seeds in various kinds of soil. 19 The people who
hear about how God rules over people’s lives and do not understand what they have
heard are like the path where some of the seeds fell. Satan, the Evil One, comes and
causes these people to forget [MET] what they have heard [MET]. 20 Some people are
like the shallow soil on top of rock. When they hear God’s message, they immediately
accept it joyfully. 21 But because it does not penetrate deeply into their inner beings,
they believe it for only a short time. They are like the plants that did not have deep
roots. When they are treated badly and caused to suffer because they believe God’s
message, they soon stop believing it. 22 Some people are like the soil that had the roots
of thorny weeds in it. They hear God’s message, but they desire to be rich, so they
worry only about [MTY, PRS] material things. As a result, they [PRS] forget God’s
message, and they do not do [IDM] the things that God wants them to do. 23 But some
people are like the good soil where some of the seeds fell. Just like the plants that grew
in this soil produced a lot of grain, these people hear my message and understand it.
Some of them do many things [IDM] that please God, some do even more things that
please God, and some do very many things that please God.”
Jesus told a parable about wheat and weeds.
Matthew 13:24-30
24 Jesus also told the crowd another parable, by which he tried to explain that
although God [MTY/EUP] is a king, he will not immediately judge and punish all the
wicked people. Jesus said, “God is like a landowner who sent his servants to sow good
wheat seed in his field. 25 While those servants were sleeping and not watching the
field, an enemy of the landowner came and scattered weed seeds in the midst of the
wheat. Then he left. 26 After the seeds sprouted and the green plants grew, the heads
of grain began to form. But the weeds also grew. 27 So the servants of the landowner
came and said to him, ‘Sir, you [RHQ] gave us good seeds and those are the ones we
[RHQ] planted in your field. So where did the weeds come from?’ 28 The landowner
said to them, ‘My enemy did this.’ His servants said to him, ‘So, do you want us to
pull up the weeds and put them in a pile?’ 29 He said to them, ‘No, do not do that,
because you might pull up some of the wheat at the same time. 30 Let the wheat and
the weeds grow together until harvest time.’ At that time I will say to the reapers,
‘First gather the weeds, tie them into bundles to be burned. Then gather the wheat
and put it into my barns.’ ”
Jesus illustrated the effects of people letting God rule their lives.
Matthew 13:31-33
31 Jesus also told this parable: “The number of (OR, God’s influence in the lives of)
people whose lives God rules over will continue to grow. It is very much like mustard
seeds grow after a man plants them in his field. 32 Although mustard seeds are among
the smallest of all the seeds that people plant, here in Israel they become large plants.
When the plants have fully grown, they are larger than the other garden plants. They
become shrubs that are large enough for birds to build nests in their branches.”
33 Jesus also told this parable: “The way people who let God [MTY/EUP] rule their
lives [MET] can influence the world is like yeast that a woman mixed with about 50
pounds of flour. That small amount of yeast made the whole batch of dough swell up.”
Jesus’ use of parables fulfilled a prophecy in Scripture.
Matthew 13:34-35MATTHEW 13:34
1373
MATTHEW 13:50
34 Jesus told the crowd parables to teach them all these things. When he spoke [HYP]
to them, he habitually used such illustrations. 35 By doing that, he fulfilled what God
told one of the prophets to write long ago:
I will speak [MTY] in parables; I will tell parables to teach what I have kept secret
since I created the world.
Jesus explained the parable about wheat and weeds. The wheat represents those who
obey God, and the weeds represents those who disobey God. The reaping represents
judgment.
Matthew 13:36-43
36 After Jesus dismissed the crowds, he went inside. Then we disciples approached
him and said, “Explain to us the parable about the weeds that grew in the wheat
field.” 37 He answered, “The one who sows the good seed represents me, the one
who came from heaven. 38 The field represents this world [MTY], where people live.
The seeds that grew well represent the people who let God rule their lives [MET]. The
weeds represent the people who do what the devil, the Evil One, tells them to do. 39 The
enemy who sowed the weed seeds represents the devil. The time when the reapers will
harvest the grain represents the time when the world will end. The reapers represent
the angels. 40 The weeds are gathered and burned. {The reapers gather the weeds.
Then they burn them.} That represents the judging of people, which God will do when
the world will end. It will be like this: 41 I, the one who came from heaven, will send
my angels, and they will gather from everywhere the people who cause others to quit
believing in me [MET] and all those who disobey God’s commands. 42 They will throw
those people into the fires of hell. There those people will weep and grind their teeth
because of the great pain that they are suffering. 43 God’s brightness will shine on the
people who have lived as he wants them to. It will shine on them as brightly as the
sun shines. It will shine on them in the place where God, their Father, rules over
them. If you want to understand this [MTY], you should think carefully about what I
have just said.”
Jesus illustrated the value of letting God rule our lives.
Matthew 13:44-50
44 “What people do who begin to allow God [MTY/EUP] to rule their lives is like what
a certain man did to acquire a treasure. A treasure was hidden in a field by someone
{Someone hid a treasure in a field and never dug it up again}. When another man
found it, he hid it by burying it again in order that no one else would find it. Being very
happy that he had found something very valuable, he went and sold all his possessions
to obtain money to buy the field the treasure was in. He then went and bought the
field, and so he was able to acquire that treasure.
45 Also, what people do who begin to allow God [MTY/EUP] to rule their lives is like
what a merchant did who was looking for good quality pearls to buy. 46 When he
found one very costly pearl that was for sale, he sold all his possessions to acquire
enough money to buy that pearl. Then he went and bought it.
47 What God [MTY/EUP] will do to people who falsely say that they are letting him rule
their lives is like what certain fishermen did with the fish they caught in a lake, using
a large net. They caught all classes of fish, both useful and worthless fish. 48 When the
net was full, the fishermen pulled it up onto the shore. Then they sat there and put
the useful fish into buckets, and threw the worthless ones away. 49 What they did in
separating the good fish from the bad ones is like what will happen to people when the
world ends. The angels will come to where God is judging people, and will separate
the wicked people from the righteous ones. 50 They will throw the wicked people intoMATTHEW 13:51
1374
MATTHEW 14:9
the fire in hell. And those wicked people will weep and gnash their teeth because of
the intense pain they are suffering.”
Jesus illustrated the value of understanding his parables.
Matthew 13:51-52
51 Then Jesus asked us, “Do you understand all these parables I have told you?” We
said to him, 52 “Yes, we understand them.” Then he said to us, “Because you understand
all these parables, you will understand the following parable: You, along with all others,
will teach people what you heard me say about God ruling people’s lives. You will add
that to what you formerly learned. You will be like a manager of a household who
takes both new things and old things out of his storage room.”
Jesus did not do many miracles in Nazareth because people there rejected him as the
Messiah.
Matthew 13:53-58
53 When Jesus had finished telling these parables, he took us and left that area.
54 We went to Nazareth, his hometown. ◄On the Sabbath/On the Jewish rest day► he
began to teach the people in the Jewish worship house. The result was that the people
there were astonished. But some said, “This man is just an ordinary person like us.
So how is it that he knows so much and understands so much [RHQ]? And how is it
that he is able to do such miracles [RHQ]? 55 ◄He is just the son of the carpenter!/Isn’t
he just the son of the carpenter that lived here?► [RHQ] His mother is Mary, and his
younger brothers are James, Joseph, Simon and Judas [RHQ]! 56 ◄And his sisters also
live here in our town./Do not his sisters live in our town?► [RHQ] So how is he able to
do all these miracles?” 57 The people were unable to accept that he was the Messiah.
So Jesus said to them, “People honor me and other prophets everywhere else we go,
but in our hometowns we are not honored, and even our own families do not honor
us!” 58 Jesus did not perform many miracles there because the people did not believe
that he was the Messiah.
14
Herod had John the Baptizer imprisoned and then killed because John criticized
Herod for marrying his brother’s wife.
Matthew 14:1-13
1 During that time Herod Antipas, the ruler, heard reports about Jesus performing
miracles. 2 He said to his servants: “That must be John the Baptizer. He must have
risen from the dead, and that is why he has power to perform miracles.” 3-4 The
reason Herod thought that was this: Herod had married Herodias, the wife of his
brother Philip, while Philip was still living. So John had been saying to him, “What
you did by marrying your brother’s wife while your brother is still alive is against God’s
law!” Then, to please Herodias, Herod told his soldiers to arrest John. They bound
him with chains and put him in prison. 5 Herod wanted to have John executed, but
he was afraid that the people who had accepted what John taught would riot if he did
that, because they believed that John was a prophet.
6 But when Herod gave a party to celebrate his birthday, the daughter of Herodias
danced for his guests. This pleased Herod. 7 So he promised to give her whatever she
asked, and he asked God to punish him if he did not do what he had promised. 8 So
Herodias’ daughter went and asked her mother what to ask for. Her mother told her
to ask for John the Baptizer’s head. So her daughter went back and said to Herod:
“Cut off the head of John the Baptizer and please bring it here on a platter so that
my mother can know for sure that he is dead!” 9 The king was distressed because he
now knew he should not have made that promise to her. But because he had madeMATTHEW 14:10
1375
MATTHEW 14:33
an oath in front of his guests when he made that promise, and he did not want them
to think that he would not do what he had promised, he commanded that the girl be
given what she requested. 10 He sent the executioner to go to the prison and to cut off
John’s head. 11 The executioner did that, and put John’s head on a platter and gave
it to the girl. Then the girl took it to her mother. 12 John’s disciples then went to the
prison, took John’s body and buried it, and they reported to Jesus what had happened.
13 After Jesus heard that, he took just us disciples with him and we went by boat on
Galilee Lake to an uninhabited place.
Jesus miraculously fed more than 5,000 people.
Matthew 14:13-21
After the crowds heard that we had gone to an uninhabited place, they left their
towns and followed Jesus, walking along the shore. 14 When Jesus came to the shore,
he saw a large crowd of people who had gathered there, waiting for him. He felt sorry
for them, and he healed those among them who were sick.
15 When it was nearly evening, we disciples came to him and said, “This is a place
where nobody lives, and it is very late. Dismiss the crowds so that they can go into
the nearby towns. Have them do that so that they can buy food for themselves.” 16 But
Jesus said to us, “They do not need to leave to get food. Instead, you yourselves give
them something to eat!” 17 We said to him, “But we have only five loaves of bread and
two cooked fish here!” 18 He said to us, “Bring them to me!” 19 He told the people who
had gathered there to sit on the grass. Then he took the five flat loaves and the two
fish. He looked up toward heaven, thanked God for them, and broke them into pieces.
Then he gave them to us disciples, and we distributed them to the crowd. 20 All the
people in the crowd ate until they had enough to eat. Then we disciples gathered the
pieces that were left over, and we filled twelve baskets with them. 21 Those who ate
were about 5,000 men. We did not count the women and children!
Jesus walked on Galilee lake, and then Peter tried to do the same.
Matthew 14:22-33
22 Right after that happened, Jesus told us disciples to get in the boat and to go
ahead of him further around the lake while he dismissed the crowds. 23 After he
dismissed them, he went up into the hills to pray by himself. When it was evening,
he was still there alone. 24 By this time we were already many hundred meters from
the shore. The boat was being severely tossed around by the waves {The waves were
severely tossing the boat} because the wind was blowing against it. 25 Then Jesus
came down from the hills to the lake. Some time between three and six o’clock in
the morning he walked on the water toward our boat. 26 When we disciples saw
someone walking on the water, we thought that we must be seeing a ghost. We were
terrified, and we screamed out because we were afraid. 27 Immediately Jesus said to
us, “Cheer up! It is I. Do not be afraid!” 28 Peter said to him, “Lord, if it is you, tell
me to walk on the water to you!” 29 Then Jesus said, “Come!” So Peter got out of the
boat and walked on the water toward Jesus. 30 But when Peter looked at the tossing
waves which the strong wind caused, he became afraid. He began to sink, and cried
out, “Lord, save me!” 31 Immediately Jesus stretched out his hand and grabbed him.
He said to Peter, “You only trust a little bit in my power ◄Why did you doubt that I
could keep you from sinking?/You should not have doubted that I could keep you from
sinking!► [RHQ]” 32 Then Jesus and Peter got in the boat, and the wind immediately
stopped blowing. 33 All of us disciples who were in the boat worshipped Jesus and
said, “Truly you are the ◄Son of/man two is also► God!”MATTHEW 14:34
1376
MATTHEW 15:14
Jesus healed many sick people in the Gennesaret region.
Matthew 14:34-36
34 When we had gone further around the lake in the boat, we came ashore at
Gennesaret town. 35 The men of that area recognized Jesus. So they sent people
to inform those who lived in that whole surrounding region [MTY] that Jesus was in
their area. So the people brought to Jesus all the sick people who lived in that region.
36 The sick people kept begging him to allow them to touch him or just to touch the
edge of his robe so that they would be healed. And all who touched him or his robe
were healed {he healed all who touched him or his clothing}.
15
Jesus rebuked the religious leaders for ignoring God’s commands in order to uphold
their own religious traditions.
Matthew 15:1-9
1 Then some Pharisees and men who taught the Jewish laws came from Jerusalem
to talk to Jesus. They said, 2 “◄We think it is disgusting that your disciples disobey
the traditions of our ancestors!/Why do your disciples disobey what our ancestors
wrote down and our elders taught us?► [RHQ] They do not perform the proper ritual
of washing their hands before they eat!” 3 Jesus answered them, “◄What is really
disgusting is that you refuse to obey God’s commands just so that you can follow
what your ancestors taught you!/Why do you refuse to obey what God commanded
people to do, just so that you can follow your own traditions?► [RHQ] 4 God gave
these two commands: ‘Honor your father and your mother,’ and ‘People who speak
evil about their father or mother must be executed.’ 5 But you tell people, ‘You can
say to your father or mother, “What I was going to give to you to help provide for
you, I have now promised to give to God.” ’ 6 And if you do that, you think that you
do not need to give anything to help your parents. In that way, by teaching people
your traditions, you disregard what God commanded. 7 You only pretend to be good!
Isaiah prophesied accurately about you also when he quoted what God said about your
ancestors. God said, 8 ‘These people talk as if they honor me [MTY], but they do not
think about honoring me at all [MET]. 9 It is useless for them to worship me, because
they teach what people thought up as if I myself had commanded it.’ ”
Jesus said that people are defiled by the words that come out of their mouths, rather
than by any kind of food that they eat.
Matthew 15:10-11
10 Then Jesus again summoned the crowd to come nearer to him. Then he said to
them, “Listen to what I am about to tell you, and try to understand it. 11 Nothing
that a person puts into his mouth to eat causes God to consider that person to be
unacceptable. Instead, it is the words that come out of people’s mouths [SYN] that
cause God to reject them.”
Jesus explained that people’s inner thoughts are what make them unacceptable to
God.
Matthew 15:12-20
12 Later we disciples went to Jesus and said, “Do you know that the Pharisees heard
what you said, and as a result they felt offended [RHQ]?” 13 Then, to teach us what
God would do to the Pharisees, Jesus told us this parable: “My Father in heaven will
get rid of all those who teach things that are contrary to his truth, just like a farmer
gets rid of plants that he did not plant, by pulling them up along with their roots
[MET]. 14 Do not pay any attention to the Pharisees. They do not help people who do
not know God’s truth to understand it, just like blind guides do not help blind peopleMATTHEW 15:15
1377
MATTHEW 15:31
to perceive where they should go [MET]. If a blind person tries to lead another blind
person, they will both fall into a big hole [MET]. Similarly, both the Pharisees and their
disciples will end up in hell.”
15 Peter said to Jesus, “Explain to us the parable about what a person eats.” 16 He
replied to them, “◄I am disappointed that even you, who should understand what I
teach, still do not understand!/Why is it that even you who should understand what I
teach, still do not understand?► [RHQ] 17 ◄You ought to understand that all food that
people eat enters their stomachs, and later the refuse passes out of their bodies./Cannot
you understand that all food that people eat enters their stomachs and later the refuse
passes out of their bodies?► [RHQ] Because food does not alter what we think and desire,
what we eat does not cause God to consider that we are unacceptable to him. 18 You
should know that what comes out of people’s mouths, meaning everything that they say
[SYN], comes from their inner beings/hearts. Many of the things that they say cause
God to consider them to be unacceptable to him. 19 It is people’s innermost beings
that cause them to think things that are evil, to murder people, to commit adultery,
to commit other sexual sins, to steal things, to testify falsely, and to speak evil about
others. 20 It is these actions that cause God to consider people to be unacceptable to
him. To eat with unwashed hands does not cause God to consider people unacceptable
to him.”
Jesus healed a non-Jewish woman’s daughter after testing the mother’s faith in him.
Matthew 15:21-28
21 After Jesus took us and left Galilee district, we went into the region where the cities
of Tyre and Sidon are located. 22 A woman from the group of people called Canaanites
who live in that region came to the place where Jesus was staying. She kept shouting
to him, “Lord, you are the descendant of King David, you are the Messiah! Have pity
on me and my daughter! She is suffering very much because a demon controls her.”
23 But Jesus did not answer her at all. We disciples came to him, and knowing that the
woman was not a Jew, we said to him, “Tell her to leave, because she keeps bothering
us by yelling behind us!” 24 But Jesus said to her, “I have been sent {God has sent
me} to help only the Israelite people at this time [SYN]. They are like sheep that have
gotten lost [MET] because they do not know the way to heaven.” 25 But she came closer
to Jesus and knelt down in front of him to worship him. She pled, “Lord/Sir, help me!”
26 Then, to suggest to her that he needed to help the Jews first and not the non-Jews,
whom the Jews called dogs, he told her, “It is not good for someone to take food that
has been prepared for the children and throw it to the little dogs.” 27 But to show that
she believed that non-Jews could also receive help from God, the woman said to Jesus,
“Lord/Sir, what you say is correct, but even the little dogs eat the crumbs that fall to
the floor when their masters sit at their tables and eat!” 28 Then Jesus said to her, “O
woman, because you believe firmly in me, I will heal your daughter as you desire!”
At that moment the demon left her daughter, and she became well.
Jesus healed many people on a hillside near Galilee lake.
Matthew 15:29-31
29 After Jesus, along with us disciples, departed from that area, we went back to
Galilee Lake and walked along it. Then Jesus climbed the hill near there and sat down
to teach the people. 30 Crowds kept coming to him for the next two days and brought
lame, crippled, and blind people, those who were unable to talk, and many others
who had various sicknesses. They laid them in front of Jesus so that he would heal
them [SYN]. And he healed them. 31 The crowd saw him heal people who could notMATTHEW 15:32
1378
MATTHEW 16:9
talk, crippled people, lame people, and blind people, and they were amazed. They
said, “Praise God who rules over us who live in Israel!”
Jesus miraculously fed over 4,000 people.
Matthew 15:32-39
32 Then Jesus called us disciples to him and said to us, “This crowd of people has
been with me for three days and have nothing left to eat. I feel sorry for them. I do not
want to send them away while they are still hungry, because if I did that, they might
faint on the way home.” 33 We disciples said to him, “In this place where nobody
lives, ◄we cannot possibly obtain enough food to feed such a large crowd!/how can
we obtain a large enough amount of food to feed such a large crowd?► [RHQ]” 34 Jesus
asked us, “How many small loaves do you have?” We said to him, “We have seven
small loaves and a few cooked fish.” 35 He told the people to sit on the ground. 36 Then
he took the seven small loaves and the fish. After he thanked God for them, he broke
them into pieces, and he kept giving them to us. Then we kept distributing them to the
crowd. 37-38 Because Jesus made the food multiply miraculously, all those people ate
and had plenty to satisfy them. There were 4,000 men who ate, but no one counted
the women and the children who also ate. Then we disciples collected the pieces of
food that were left over, and we filled seven large baskets with them.
39 After Jesus dismissed the crowd, he, along with us, got in the boat, and we sailed
around the lake to the region called Magadan.
16
Jesus again told the religious leaders that the only miracle that he would do for them
was one like God did for Jonah.
Matthew 16:1-4
1 Some Pharisees and Sadducees came to Jesus and asked him to perform a miracle
that would prove that Godhad sent him. 2 He answered them, “In this country, in the
evening you say, ‘It will be good weather tomorrow, because the sky is red.’ 3 Early
in the morning you say, ‘It will be stormy weather today, because the sky is red, and
dark clouds have formed.’ You understand how to predict the weather by looking at
the sky, but you cannot seem to look at what is happening now, and by that understand
what God is doing. 4 You evil people have seen me perform miracles but you do not
faithfully worship God [MET]. You want to see me perform a miracle that would prove
that God has sent me. But God will enable you to see only one miracle. It will be like
what happened [MET] to Jonah, the prophet, who was inside a huge fish for three days
and then came out of it to live again.” Then Jesus left them and sailed away, along
with us disciples.
Jesus rebuked the disciples for worrying about not having enough food.
Matthew 16:5-12
5 We forgot to take bread when we sailed to another edge of the lake. 6 Then Jesus
said to us, “Beware that you do not accept the yeast [MET] that the Pharisees and
Sadducees distribute.” 7 Then, not realizing that he was speaking figuratively, we
said to one another, “He must have said that because we forgot to bring any bread!”
8 Because Jesus knew what we were saying, he said to us, “◄I am disappointed that
you are discussing among yourselves, thinking that it was because you did not bring
any bread that I talked about the yeast of the Pharisees and Sadducees./Why are you
discussing among yourselves thinking that it was because you did not bring any bread
that I talked about the yeast of the Pharisees and Sadducees?► [RHQ] You believe only
a little what I am able to do for you. 9 ◄You should understand that I can continueMATTHEW 16:10
1379
MATTHEW 16:23
to do miracles to provide for what you need./Do you not yet understand that I can
provide miraculously for you if you need food?► [RHQ] Do you not remember that
5,000 people ate when I multiplied the five small loaves and the two fish? And after
everyone had enough to eat, you collected twelve baskets of left-over pieces [RHQ]!
10 Do you not remember [RHQ] that 4,000 people ate when I multiplied the seven small
loaves and a few fish? And after everyone had enough to eat, you collected seven large
baskets of left-over pieces 11 ◄You should have understood that I was not speaking
about real bread that contains yeast./Why have you not understood that I was not
speaking about real bread that contains yeast?► [RHQ] What I was saying was that
you should not accept what the Pharisees and Sadducees say, because it would affect
you like yeast affects [MET] dough.” 12 Then we understood that he was not talking
about the yeast that is in bread. Instead, he was talking about the wrong teaching of
the Pharisees and Sadducees.
Jesus commented on the implications of Peter’s recognition of Jesus being the
Messiah.
Matthew 16:13-20
13 When Jesus came with us disciples to the region near Caesarea Philippi town, he
asked us, “Who do people say that I, the one who came from heaven, really am?”
14 We answered, “Some people say that you are John the Baptizer, who has come back
to life again. Others say that you are the prophet Elijah, who has returned from heaven
as God promised. Still others say that you are the prophet Jeremiah or one of the other
prophets who lived long ago, who has come back to life again.” 15 Jesus said to us,
“What about you? Who do you say that I am?” 16 Simon Peter said to him, “You are
the Messiah! You are the Son of the all-powerful God.” 17 Then Jesus said to him,
“Simon, son of Jonah, God is pleased with you. What you just said was not [SYN]
revealed to you by any human. Instead, it was my Father who lives in heaven who
revealed this to you. 18 I will also tell you this: You are Peter, which means rock. You
are like a rock. What you and your fellow apostles teach (OR, what you do) will be like
a foundation on which I will create congregations of people who believe in me. And
the demons [PRS], who live where the dead people who lived evil lives are, will not
be able to come and prevent [MET] me from doing that.” 19 Then, speaking to all of
us, he said, “I will enable you (pl) to have authority [MTY] over the groups of people
over whose lives God rules. Whatever you forbid regarding those people [MTY], it
will have been forbidden by God. Whatever you permit [MET] regarding them, it will
have been permitted by God.” 20 Then Jesus warned us disciples strongly not to tell
anyone at that time that he is the Messiah.
Jesus began to teach the disciples about his coming death and resurrection.
Matthew 16:21-23
21 From that time Jesus began to teach us disciples that it was necessary for him
to go to Jerusalem city. There the ruling elders, the chief priests, and the men who
taught the Jewish laws would cause him to suffer and ◄be killed/die►. Then on the
third day after that, he would become alive again. 22 Because Peter assumed that
the Messiah would not suffer and die, he took Jesus aside and began to rebuke him
for talking about suffering and dying. He said, “Lord, may God never permit that to
happen to you! That must certainly not happen!” 23 Then Jesus turned to look at
Peter, and he said to him, “Stop talking to me like that [MTY]! Stop saying what Satan
[MET] would say, and stop trying to prevent from happening what God has planned!
You are a hindrance to me, because you are not thinking like God thinks. Instead,
you are thinking like people think!”MATTHEW 16:24
1380
MATTHEW 17:12
Jesus taught the disciples more about what they would face as his disciples, and
about his coming again.
Matthew 16:24-28
24 Then Jesus said to us disciples, “If any one of you wants to be my disciple, you
must not do only what you yourself want to do. You must be willing to let people hurt
you and disgrace you. That is like what they do to criminals whom they force to carry
a cross [MET] to the place where the criminals will be executed. That is what anyone
who wants to be my disciple must do. 25 You must do that, because those who try to
save their lives by denying that they belong to me when people want to kill them for
believing in me will not live eternally, but those who are killed because of being my
disciples will live with God eternally. 26 People might get everything they want in this
world, but ◄if they do not become my disciples, they would really be gaining nothing
because they would not get eternal life!/what would they gain if they do not become
my disciples and thus do not get eternal life?► [RHQ] ◄There is absolutely nothing
that people can give to God that would enable them to gain eternal life./What can
people give to God that could enable them to gain eternal life?► [MTY, RHQ] 27 Listen
carefully: I, the one who came from heaven, will leave this earth, but I will return,
and the angels of heaven will accompany me. At that time I will have the glorious
radiance that my Father has, and I will reward everyone according to what they did
when they were living on earth. 28 Listen carefully! Some of you who are here now
will see me, the one who came from heaven, when I return to rule. You will see this
before you die!”
17
Jesus’ appearance changed while Moses and Elijah talked with him on a mountain.
Matthew 17:1-8
1 A week after Jesus said that, he took Peter, James, and John, the younger brother
of James, and led them up a high mountain where they were away from other people.
2 While they were there, the three disciples saw that Jesus’ appearance was changed.
His face shone like the sun, and his clothing shone and became as brilliant as light.
3 Suddenly Moses and Elijah, who were important prophets many years ago, appeared
and started talking with him. 4 Peter saw them and said to Jesus, “Lord, it is wonderful
for us to be here! If you want me to, I will make three shelters, one for you, one for
Moses, and one for Elijah.” 5 While Peter was speaking, a bright cloud appeared and
covered them. They heard God speaking about Jesus from inside the cloud. He said
to them, “This is my Son. I love him. He pleases me very much. So you must listen
to him!” 6 When the three disciples heard God speaking, they were terrified. As a
result, they fell prostrate on the ground. 7 But Jesus went to them and touched them
and said to them, “Stand up! Do not be afraid any more!” 8 And when they looked
up [MTY], they saw that Jesus was the only one who was still there.
Jesus explained that John the Baptizer fulfilled the prophecy about Elijah returning.
Matthew 17:9-13
9 When they were walking down the mountain, Jesus commanded them, “Do not
tell anyone what you saw on the mountain top until God has caused me, the one who
has come from heaven, to become alive again after I die.” 10 Those three disciples
had just seen Elijah and he did not do anything to prepare people for the coming of
the Messiah, so they asked Jesus, “If what you say is true, why do the men who teach
the Jewish laws say that it is necessary for Elijah to come back to earth before the
Messiah comes?” 11 Jesus answered them, “It is true that God promised that Elijah
would come to prepare many [HYP] people for the Messiah’s coming. 12 But note this:MATTHEW 17:13
1381
MATTHEW 17:27
Elijah’s representative has already come, and our leaders have seen him, but they did
not recognize him as the one who would come before the Messiah. Instead, they treated
him badly, just like they desired. And those same rulers will soon treat me, the one
who came from heaven, in the same manner.” 13 Then the three disciples understood
that when he was talking about Elijah, he was referring to John the Baptizer.
Jesus healed an epileptic boy, and he rebuked his disciples for not having enough
faith to do miracles.
Matthew 17:14-21
14 When Jesus and the three disciples returned to the rest of us disciples and to the
crowd that had gathered, a man approached Jesus and knelt before him. 15 He said to
him, “Sir/Lord, have mercy on my son and heal him! He has epilepsy and suffers very
much. Because of this illness, he has fallen in the fire and in the water many times.
16 I brought him to your disciples in order that they might heal him, but they were not
able to heal him.” 17 Jesus responded by saying to everyone who had gathered there,
“You who have seen how I help people do not believe that you can do anything! Your
minds are distorted! How long do I have to be with you before you are able to do
what I do [RHQ]? How long do I have to endure your not believing [RHQ]? Bring the
boy here to me!” 18 When they brought the boy to Jesus, Jesus rebuked the demon
that was causing the epilepsy. As a result, the demon came out of the boy, and right
then the boy was healed. 19 Later, some of us disciples approached Jesus. We asked
him privately, “Why were we (exc) not able to expel the demon?” 20-21 He answered
us, “It is because you did not believe very much in God’s power. Think about this:
Mustard seeds are very small, but in this area they grow and produce large [MET]
plants. Similarly, if your faith grows until you truly believe that God will do what you
ask him to, you will be able to do anything [LIT]! You could even say to this hill, ‘Move
from here to there!’ and it would go where you told it to go.”
Jesus again predicted his death and resurrection.
Matthew 17:22-23
22 When we disciples had gathered together in Galilee district, Jesus said to us, “I,
the one who came from heaven, will soon be handed over {Someone will soon hand
me, the one who came from heaven, over} to the authorities [SYN]. 23 They will kill
me. But God will cause me to become alive again on the third day after I am killed.”
When we heard that, we became very sad.
Jesus arranged for a miracle so that Peter could pay the Temple tax.
Matthew 17:24-27
24 When we came to Capernaum city, the men who collect taxes for the Temple
approached Peter and said to him, “Your teacher pays the Temple tax, does he not?”
25 He answered them, “Yes, he does pay it.” When we came into the house where Jesus
was saying, before Peter began to talk about paying taxes, Jesus said to him, “Simon,
from whom do you think rulers collect revenue or taxes? Do they collect taxes from
the citizens of their own country, or from citizens of countries they have conquered?”
26 Peter answered him, “From citizens of other countries.” Then Jesus said to him, “So
citizens of their own country do not need to pay taxes. 27 But even though the Temple
is mine, pay the tax for us so that the Temple tax collectors will not become angry with
us. In order to get the money to pay it, go to the lake. Cast your fish line and hook,
and take the first fish that you catch. When you open its mouth, you will find a silver
coin that is worth enough to pay the tax for you and me. Take that coin and give it to
the Temple tax collectors.”MATTHEW 18:1
1382
MATTHEW 18:14
18
Jesus showed that being great in God’s sight means being as humble as a child.
Matthew 18:1-5
1 About that time we disciples approached Jesus and said, “Who among us will be
the most important when God [MTY/EUP] makes you king?” 2 Jesus called a child to
come, and he placed that child in our midst. 3 He said, “Think about this: If you (pl)
do not change the way you(pl) think and become as humble as little children, you (pl)
will surely not go to the place where God [MTY/EUP] rules. 4 The people who become
as humble as this child or any child is, will be the most important people among those
over whom God rules. 5 Also, when those who, because they love me, welcome a child
like this one, God considers that they are welcoming me.”
Jesus taught that we need to take severe measures to keep us from sinning when we
are tempted.
Matthew 18:6-9
6 “If you cause someone who believes in me to sin, even if it is someone who is
socially unimportant like this little child, God will severely punish you. If a heavy
stone were fastened around your neck and you were thrown into the deep waters
of the sea, people would consider that you had been severely punished. But God will
punish you more severely than that if you cause someone to sin 7 It will be terrible for
those [MTY] who cause others to stop believing in me. God will punish them eternally.
It is inevitable that there will be those who cause others to stop believing in me. But
it will be horrible for everyone who does that. 8 So, if you are wanting to use one of
your hands or feet to sin, stop using that hand or foot! Even if you have to cut it off to
avoid sinning, do it [MET]! It is good that you not sin and go where you will live with
God eternally, even though while you are still here on earth you are maimed or lame
and do not have a hand or a foot. But it is not good that you continue to have your
two hands and two feet and do [MTY] the sinful things you want to, and as a result,
you are thrown into hell, where there is eternal fire burning. 9 If what you see you
makes you want to sin, stop looking at those things! Even if you have to gouge out one
of your eyes and throw it away to avoid sinning, do it [HYP]! It is good that you not
sin and go where you will live with God eternally, even though while you are still here
on earth you have only one eye. But it is not good that you continue to have your
two eyes and do the sinful things you want to, and as a result, you are thrown {God
throws you} into hell where there is eternal fire burning.”
Jesus taught that God is deeply concerned if even one person goes astray from him.
Matthew 18:10-14
10-11 “Make an effort that you (pl) do not despise even one of these children. I tell
you (pl) truly that since the angels live in heaven in the presence of my Father, they
will report to him if you mistreat the children.* 12 What do you (pl) think you would do
in the following situation? If you had 100 sheep and one of them got lost, you would
surely leave the 99 sheep that are on the hill and go and search for the lost one
[RHQ], would you not? 13 If you found it, I affirm to you (pl) that you would rejoice
very much. You would be happy that 99 sheep did not stray away, but you would
rejoice even more because you had found the sheep that had strayed away. 14 In the
same way that shepherds do not want one of their sheep to stray away, so God, your
Father in heaven, does not want even one of these children to go to hell.”
* 18:10-11 Some Greek manuscripts add verse 11, ‘For the Son of Man came to seek the lost’.MATTHEW 18:15
1383
MATTHEW 18:31
Jesus taught about what we should do if someone sins against us and about agreeing
when we pray.
Matthew 18:15-20
15 “If a fellow believer sins against you, go to him, and when you two are alone,
reprove him for sinning against you. If that person listens to you and feels sorry that
he has sinned against you, you will have restored your friendship with that person.
16 If that person will not listen to you nor feel sorry that he has sinned against you, go
get one or two other people who will listen to what you both have to say. Have them
go with you so that what is written {Moses wrote} in the Scriptures might happen:
‘When one person accuses another in some matter, it should be confirmed by at least
two or three people {at least two or three people should confirm it} before that person
can be declared guilty {before they declare that person guilty}.’ 17 If the one who has
sinned against you will not listen to them or does not feel sorry that he has sinned
against you, tell that to the congregation so that they can rebuke him. If that person
will not listen to the congregation or feel sorry that he has sinned against you, exclude
him from being a member of your congregation, just like you would exclude pagans, tax
collectors, and others who do not believe in God and sin greatly. 18 Keep this in mind:
Whatever you decide on earth about punishing or not punishing a member of your
congregation is what has also been decided by God in heaven {what God in heaven
has also decided}. 19 Also note this: If at least two of you who live here on earth agree
together about something you ask God for [DOU], God, my Father who is in heaven,
will give you what you ask for. 20 This is true, because wherever at least two or three
of you assemble because you believe in me [MTY], I am spiritually present with you.
I will hear what you ask for and I will ask God to do it for you.”
Jesus told a parable to illustrate the need for forgiving others.
Matthew 18:21-35
21 Then Peter approached Jesus and said to him, “How many times must I forgive
a fellow believer who keeps on sinning against me? If he keeps asking me to forgive
him, must I forgive him as many as seven times?” 22 Jesus said to him, “I tell you
that the number of times you must forgive someone is not just up to seven, but you
must ◄forgive him 77 times/never stop forgiving him►. 23 In order to illustrate why
you should do this, I will tell you a story in which God [MTY/EUP], who cares for the
people whose lives he rules over, is compared {I compare God, who cares for the
people whose lives he rules over} to a king and his officials. That king told some
of his servants that he wanted his officials to pay what they owed him. 24 So those
officials were brought to the king to settle their accounts with him. One of the officials
who were brought owed the king several million dollars. 25 But because he did not
have enough money to pay what he owed, the king demanded that he, his wife, his
children and all he possessed be sold to someone else, and that the king be repaid
with {receive} the money that was paid for them. 26 Then that official, knowing that
he did not have the money to pay that huge debt, fell on his knees in front of the king
and begged him saying, ‘Be patient with me, and I will pay you all of it, eventually.’
27 The king, knowing that the official could never pay all that huge debt, felt sorry for
him. So he canceled his debt and released him. 28 Then this official went to another
one of the king’s officials who owed him a bit less than a year’s wages. He grabbed
him by the throat, started choking him, and said to him, ‘Pay back what you owe me!’
29 That official fell on his knees and begged him saying, ‘Be patient with me, and I
will pay you all of it, eventually.’ 30 But this official kept refusing to cancel that small
debt that the man owed him. Instead, he caused that official to be put in prison and
to stay there until he could pay back all the money that he owed him. 31 When theMATTHEW 18:32
1384
MATTHEW 19:12
other officials of the king learned that this had happened, they felt very distressed.
So they went to the king and reported in detail what had happened. 32 Then the king
summoned the official who had owed him several million dollars. He said to him, ‘You
wicked servant! I canceled that huge debt that you owed me because you begged me
to do so 33 You should have been merciful and canceled your fellow official’s debt, just
like I was merciful to you and canceled your debt [RHQ]!’ 34 The king was very angry.
He handed this official over to some jailers who would torture him severely until he
paid all of the debt that he owed.” 35 Then Jesus continued by saying, “That is what
my Father in heaven will do to you if you do not feel merciful and sincerely forgive a
fellow believer who sins against you.”
19
Jesus taught them God’s view of divorce, and about abstaining from marriage to
give more time to serve God.
Matthew 19:1-12
1 After Jesus had said that, he took us and left Galilee district and went to the part
of Judea district that is located on the east side of the Jordan River. 2 Large crowds
followed him there, and he healed the sick among them.
3 Some Pharisees approached Jesus and said to him, “Does our Jewish law permit a
man to divorce his wife for any reason whatever?” They asked that in order to be able
to criticize Jesus, whether he answered “Yes” or “No.” 4 Jesus said to them, “Because
you have read [RHQ] the Scriptures, you should know that at the time God first created
people, ‘he made one man, and he made one woman to be that man’s wife.’ 5 That
explains why God said, ‘When a man and woman marry, they should no longer live
with their fathers and mothers. Instead, the two of them shall live together, and they
shall become so closely united that they are like one person [MET].’ 6 Consequently,
although they functioned as two separate people before, they now become as if they
were one person [MET]. Since that is true, a man must not separate from his wife
whom God has joined to him, because it is God’s plan for them to remain together.”
7 The Pharisees then said to him, “If that is true, why did Moses command that
a man who wanted to divorce his wife should give her a paper stating his reason
for divorcing her, and then send her away?” 8 He said to them, “It was because your
ancestors stubbornly wanted their own way that Moses allowed them to divorce their
wives, and you are no different from them. But when God first [MTY] created a man
and a woman, he did not intend for them to separate. 9 I am telling you emphatically
that because God considers that a marriage lasts until either the husband or the wife
dies, he considers that any man who divorces his wife and marries another woman
is committing adultery, unless his first wife has committed adultery.” 10 We disciples
said to him, “If that is true, it is better for men never to marry!” 11 Then he said to
us, “Not every man is able to accept this teaching. Only the men whom God enables
to accept it are able to do so. 12 There are men who do not marry because they are
not able to have sexual relations because they have been sexually defective ever since
they were born. There are other men who do not marry because they are unable to
have sexual relations because they have been castrated {other men have made them
that way}. There are other men who decide not to marry [MET] in order that they
can serve God better and spend more time telling people about how God [MTY/EUP]
wants to rule people’s lives. You who are able to understand what I have said about
marriage should accept it and obey it.”MATTHEW 19:13
1385
MATTHEW 19:29
Jesus rebuked the disciples for trying to prevent children from coming to him.
Matthew 19:13-15
13 Then some children were brought {some people brought their children} to Jesus
in order that he might lay his hands on them and pray for them. But we disciples
scolded the people for bringing their children to Jesus because we thought that Jesus
did not want to take the time to be with children. 14 But when Jesus saw us scolding
them, he said to us, “Let the children come to me! Do not stop them! It is people who
are humble and trusting like they are, who can experience God’s rule in their lives.”
15 Jesus then laid his hands on the children and asked God to bless them. Then he left
there.
A rich young man went away sad because Jesus told him to sell all his possessions.
Matthew 19:16-22
16 As Jesus was walking along, a young man approached him and said to him,
“Teacher, what good deeds must I do in order to live with God eternally?” 17 Jesus said
to him, “◄Consider what you are implying about who I am when you ask me about
what is good./Do you realize what you are implying about who I am when you ask me
about that which is good?► [RHQ] Only one being is good and really knows what is
good. That being is God. But in order to answer your question about desiring to live
with God eternally, I will say to you, ‘Keep the commandments that God gave Moses’.”
18 The man asked Jesus, “Which commandments must I keep?” Jesus answered him,
“Do not murder anyone, do not commit adultery, do not steal things, do not testify
falsely, 19 honor your father and your mother, and love people you come in contact
with as much as you love yourself.” 20 Thinking that he might not be able to live with
God eternally even though he had kept those commandments, the young man said to
Jesus, “I have always obeyed all those commandments. What else must I do in order
to live with God eternally?” 21 Jesus said to him, “If you desire to be all that God
intends you to be, go home, sell everything that you have and give the money to poor
people. The result will be that you will have spiritual riches in heaven. Then come and
be my disciple!” 22 When the young man heard those words, he went away feeling
sad, because he was very rich and did not want to give away everything he owned.
Jesus taught how difficult it is for rich people to let God rule their lives, but there
are rewards for those who leave family and possessions for his sake.
Matthew 19:23-30
23 Then Jesus said to us disciples, “Keep this in mind: It is very difficult for rich
people to decide to let God [MTY/EUP] rule their lives. 24 Note this also: It is impossible
for a camel to go through the eye of a needle. It is almost as difficult [HYP] for rich
people to decide to let God rule their lives.” 25 When we disciples heard this, we were
astounded. We thought that rich people were the ones whom God blesses the most. So
we said to him, “◄If that is so, it does not seem likely that anyone will be saved!/Who
then will God will save?►” [RHQ] 26 When Jesus heard us say that, he looked intently
at us, and then he said to us, “Yes, it is impossible for people to save themselves.
But God can save them, because God is able to do anything!” 27 Then Peter said to
him, “You know that we (exc) have left everything behind and we have become your
disciples. So what benefit will we get for doing that?” 28 Jesus said to us, “Keep this
in mind: You will get many benefits. When God makes the new earth and when I, the
one who came from heaven, sit on my magnificent throne, those of you who have
accompanied me will each sit on a throne, and you will judge the people of the twelve
tribes of Israel. 29 God will reward those who, because of being my disciples, have
left behind a house or plot of ground, their brothers, their sisters, their father, their
mother, their children, or any other family [MTY] members. God will give them 100MATTHEW 19:30
1386
MATTHEW 20:18
times as many benefits as they have given up. And they will live with God eternally.
30 But many people who consider themselves to be important now will be unimportant
at that future time, and many people who consider themselves to be unimportant now
will be important at that future time.”
20
Jesus told a parable to illustrate how God will reward those who serve him.
Matthew 20:1-16
1 “In order to illustrate how God rewards people, I will compare the way God [MTY/
EUP] rules his people with what the owner of an estate did. Early in the morning the
owner of the estate went to the market where people who wanted work gathered. He
went there to hire laborers to work in his vineyard. 2 He promised the men whom
he hired that he would pay them the standard wage for working one day. Then he
sent them to his vineyards. 3 At nine o’clock that same morning he went back to the
market. There he saw more men who did not have work. 4 He said to them, ‘Go to my
vineyard as other men have done, and work there. I will pay you whatever is a just
wage.’ So they also went to his vineyard and began to work. 5 At noon and at three
o’clock he again went to the market and found other laborers whom he promised to
pay a fair wage. 6 At five o’clock he went to the market again and saw other men
standing there who were not working. He said to them, ‘Why are you standing here
all day and not working?’ 7 They said to him, ‘Because no one has hired us.’ He said
to them, ‘I will hire you. Go to my vineyard as other men have done, and work there.’
So they went.
8 When evening came, the owner of the vineyard said to his manager, ‘Tell the
men to come so that you can give them their wages. First, pay the men who started
working last, and pay the men last who started working first.’ 9 The manager paid the
standard daily wage to each of the men who did not start working until five o’clock
in the afternoon. 10 When the men who had begun working early in the morning
went to get their wages, they thought that they would receive more than the standard
wage. But they also received only the standard wage. 11 So they complained to the
owner of the vineyard because they thought their payment was unfair. 12 They said
to him, ‘You are not being fair! The men who started working after all of the rest of
us started worked for only one hour! You have paid them the same wage as you paid
us! But we worked hard all day [IDM], including working in the hottest part of the
day!’ 13 The owner of the vineyard said to one of those who complained, ‘Friend, I did
not treat you unfairly. You agreed with me to work the whole day for the standard
wage [RHQ]. 14 Stop complaining to me! Take your wage and go! I desire to give the
same wage that I gave you to the men who began working after all of you had begun
working. 15 I certainly have a right to spend my money as I desire [RHQ], including
paying those laborers what I desire to pay them. ◄You should not be envious about
my being generous!/Are you angry [MET] because I am generous?► [RHQ]’ ” 16 Then
Jesus said to us, “Similarly, God will reward well some people who seem to be less
important now, and he will not reward some people who seem to be more important
now.”
For the third time Jesus predicted his death and resurrection.
Matthew 20:17-19
17 When Jesus was walking on the road up to Jerusalem, along with us twelve
disciples, he took us to a place by ourselves in order that he could talk to us privately.
Then he said to us, 18 “Listen carefully! We are now going up to Jerusalem. While
we are there, someone will enable the chief priests and the men who teach the JewishMATTHEW 20:19
1387
MATTHEW 21:3
laws to seize me, the one who came from heaven, and they will put me on trial. They
will condemn me and say that I should be killed {the authorities should kill me}.
19 Then they will put me in the hands of non-Jews so that they can make fun of me,
whip me, and kill me by nailing me to a cross. But on the third day after that, God
will cause me to live again.”
Jesus taught that greatness in God’s sight means humbly serving others as Jesus did.
Matthew 20:20-28
20 Then the mother of James and John brought her two sons to Jesus. She bowed
down before Jesus and asked him to do her a favor. 21 Jesus said to her, “What do
you want me to do for you?” She said to him, “Permit these two sons of mine to sit
next to you (OR, Permit these two sons of mine to sit next to you at your right side
and at your left side) and rule with you [MTY] when you become king.” 22 Jesus said
to her and her sons, “You do not understand what you are asking for. Can you suffer
like I am about to suffer [IDM]?” James and John answered him, “Yes, we are able to
do that.” 23 Then Jesus said to them, “Yes, you will suffer as I will suffer [IDM]. But I
am not the one who chooses the ones who will sit next to me and rule with me. God,
my Father, will give those places [MTY] to the ones whom he appoints.”
24 When we ten other disciples heard what James and John had requested, we became
angry with them because we also wanted to rule with Jesus in the highest positions.
25 So Jesus called all of us together and said to us, “You know that those who rule
the non-Jews enjoy showing them that they are powerful. Their chief rulers enjoy
commanding the people under them. 26 You should not be like them. On the contrary,
everyone among you who wants God to consider him great must become like a servant
for the rest of you. 27 And everyone among you who wants God to consider him to
be the most important must become like a slave for the rest of you. 28 You should
imitate me. Even though I am the one who came from heaven, I did not come to be
served {in order that people would serve me}. On the contrary, I came in order to
serve others and to [IDM] allow myself to be killed {other people to kill me}, so that
my dying would be like a payment to rescue many people from being punished for their
sins.” [MTY]
Jesus healed two blind men.
Matthew 20:29-34
29 As we were leaving Jericho city, a large crowd of people followed us. 30 As we
walked along, we saw two blind men sitting alongside the road. When they heard
that Jesus was passing by, they yelled to him, “Lord, Descendant of King David, you
are the Messiah Take pity on us!” 31 People in the crowd scolded them and told them
to be quiet. But the blind men yelled even louder, “Lord, Descendant of King David,
you are the Messiah Have pity on us!” 32 Jesus stopped and called them to come to
him. Then he said to them, “What do you want me to do for you?” 33 They said to
him, “Lord, heal our eyes [IDM] so that we can see!” 34 Jesus felt sorry for them and
touched their eyes. Immediately they were able to see, and they went with Jesus.
21
Jesus entered Jerusalem humbly on a donkey, but with great acclaim by the crowd.
Matthew 21:1-11
1-2 As we approached Jerusalem, we came near Bethphage village, near Olive Tree
Hill. Jesus said to two of his disciples, “Go to the village just ahead of us. As soon as
you enter it, you will see a donkey and her foal that are {someone has} tied up. Untie
them and bring them here to me. 3 If anyone says anything to you about your doingMATTHEW 21:4-5
1388
MATTHEW 21:20
that, tell him, ‘The Lord needs them.’ He will then allow you to lead them away.”
4-5 When all this happened, what was written by a prophet {what a prophet wrote
about} was fulfilled {happened}. The prophet wrote, “Tell the people who live in
Jerusalem [SYN], ‘Look! Your king is coming to you! He will come humbly. He will
show that he is humble, because he will be riding on a colt, the offspring of a donkey.’ ”
6 So the two disciples went and did what Jesus told them to do. 7 They brought the
donkey and its colt to Jesus. They placed their cloaks on them to make something for
him to sit on. Then Jesus mounted the colt and sat on the cloaks. 8 Then a large crowd
spread some of their clothing on the road, and other people cut off branches from
palm trees and spread them on the road. They did those things to decorate the road in
order to honor Jesus. 9 The crowds that walked in front of him and those who walked
behind him were shouting things like, “Praise the Messiah, the descendant of King
David!” “May the Lord God bless this one who comes as God’s representative and
with God’s authority [MTY].” “Praise God, who is in the highest heaven!” 10 As Jesus
entered Jerusalem, a crowd of people [MTY] from all over the city became excited
and were saying, “Why are they honoring this man like that?” 11 The crowd that was
already following him said, “This is Jesus, the prophet from Nazareth in Galilee!”
Jesus chased buyers and sellers from the temple, and he rebuked the Jewish leaders
for objecting to children praising him.
Matthew 21:12-17
12 Then Jesus went into the Temple courtyard and chased out all of those who
were buying and selling things there. He also overturned the tables of those who
were giving Temple tax money in exchange for Roman coins, and he overturned the
seats of those who were selling pigeons for sacrifices. 13 Then he said to them, “It is
{◄Jeremiah/A prophet► has} written in the Scriptures that God said, ‘I want my house
to be called a place where people pray’, but you bandits have made it [MET] your
hideout!”
14 After that, many blind people and lame people came to Jesus in the temple in
order that he would heal them, and he healed them. 15 The high priests and the men
who taught the people the Jewish laws saw the wonderful deeds that Jesus did. They
also saw and heard the children shouting in the Temple, “We praise the Messiah, the
descendant of King David!” The religious leaders were indignant because they did not
believe that Jesus was the Messiah. 16 They thought that Jesus should not be allowing
the children to say that, so they asked him, “How can you tolerate this [RHQ]? Do you
hear what these children are shouting?” Then Jesus said to them, “Yes, I hear them,
but if you remembered what you have read in the Scriptures about children praising
me, you would know that God is pleased [RHQ] with them. The psalmist wrote, saying
to God, ‘You have taught infants and other children to praise you perfectly.’ ”
17 Then Jesus left the city. We disciples went with him to Bethany town, and we slept
there that night.
Jesus taught the disciples a lesson from what happened to a fig tree.
Matthew 21:18-22
18 Early the next morning, when we were returning to the city, Jesus was hungry.
19 He saw a fig tree near the road. So he went over to it to pick some figs to eat. But
when he got close, he saw that there were no figs on the tree. There were only leaves
on it. So to illustrate how God would punish the nation of Israel, he said to the fig tree,
“May you never again produce figs!” As a result, the fig tree withered that night.
20 The next day when we disciples saw what had happened to the tree, we marveled,
and we said to Jesus, “◄It is astonishing that the fig tree withered so quickly!/How isMATTHEW 21:21
1389
MATTHEW 21:33
it that the fig tree dried up so quickly?►” [RHQ] 21 Jesus said to us, “Think about this:
If you believe that God has power to do what you ask him to and you do not doubt
that, you will be able to do things like what I have done to this fig tree. You will even
be able to do marvelous deeds like saying to a nearby hill, ‘Uproot yourself and throw
yourself into the sea’, and it will happen! 22 In addition to that, whenever you ask
God for something when you pray to him, if you believe that he will give it to you, you
will receive it from him.”
Jesus refused to state the basis for his authority, because the Jewish leaders refused
to admit where John the Baptizer’s authority came from.
Matthew 21:23-27
23 After that, Jesus went into the Temple courtyard. While he was teaching the
people, the chief priests and the elders of the Jewish Council approached him. They
asked, “By what authority are you doing these things? Who authorized you to do
what you did here yesterday [DOU]?” 24 Jesus said to them, “I also will ask you a
question, and if you answer me, I will tell you who authorized me to do these things.
25 Where did John the Baptizer get his authority to baptize those who came to him? Did
he get it from God or from people? [MTY/EUP]” The chief priests and elders debated
among themselves about what they should answer. They said to each other, “If we
say, ‘It was [MTY/EUP] from God’, he will say to us, ‘Then ◄you should have believed
his message!/why did you not believe John’s message?► [RHQ]’ 26 If we say, ‘It was
from people’, we are afraid that the crowd will react violently, because all the people
believe that John was a prophet sent by God.” 27 So they answered Jesus, “We do
not know where John got his authority.” Then he said to them, “Because you did not
answer my question, I will not tell you who authorized me to do the things I did here
yesterday.”
Jesus rebuked the religious leaders and said that it is more likely that God would
accept notorious sinners than that he would accept them.
Matthew 21:28-32
28 Then Jesus said to the chief priests and elders, “Tell me [RHQ] what you think
about what I am about to tell you. There was a man who had two sons. He went to
his older son and said, ‘My son, go and work in my vineyard today!’ 29 But the son
said to his father, ‘I do not want to go and work in your vineyard today!’ But later
he changed his mind, and he went to the vineyard and worked. 30 Then the father
approached his younger son and said what he had said to his older son. That son
said, ‘Sir, I will go and work in the vineyard today.’ But he did not go there. 31 So
which of the man’s two sons did what their father desired?” They answered, “The
older son.” Jesus explained to them what that parable meant by saying, “Think about
this: It is more likely that other people, including tax collectors and prostitutes, whom
you think are very sinful, will enter where God rules, than it is that you Jewish leaders
will enter. 32 I say this to you because, even though John the Baptizer explained to
you how to live righteously, you did not believe his message. But tax collectors and
prostitutes believed his message, and they turned away from their sinful behavior. In
contrast, you, even though you saw what they did, refused to turn away from your
sinful behavior, and you did not believe John’s message.”
Jesus told a parable about the Jewish religious leaders rejecting him as Messiah.
Matthew 21:33-46
33 “Listen to another parable that I will tell you. There was a landowner who planted
a vineyard. He built a fence around it. He dug a hole in the ground inside the fence.
He placed in the hole a stone tank to collect the juice that would be pressed out ofMATTHEW 21:34
1390
MATTHEW 22:4
the grapes. He also built a tower inside that fence that someone would sit in to guard
that vineyard. He arranged for some men to care for the vineyard and to give him
some of the grapes in return. Then he went away to another country. 34 When it
was time to harvest the grapes, the landowner sent some of his servants to the men
who were taking care of the vineyard to get his share of the grapes that the vineyard
had produced. 35 But the renters seized the servants. They beat one of them, they
killed another one, and killed another one of them by throwing stones at him. 36 So
the landowner sent more servants than he had sent the first time. The renters treated
those servants the same way that they had treated the other servants. 37 Later, knowing
this, the landowner sent his son to the renters to get his share of the grapes. When he
sent him, he said to himself, ‘They will certainly respect my son and give him some
of the grapes.’ 38 But when the renters saw his son arriving, they said to each other,
‘This is the man who will inherit this vineyard! Let’s kill him and divide the property
among ourselves.’ 39 So they grabbed him, dragged him outside the vineyard, and
killed him. 40 Now I ask you, when the landowner returns to his vineyard, what do
you think he will do to those renters?” 41 The chief priests and elders replied, “He will
thoroughly destroy those wicked renters! Then he will rent the vineyard to others.
They will give him his share of the grapes when they are ripe.” 42 Jesus said to them,
“That is right, so you need to think carefully about these words which you have read
[RHQ] in the Scriptures:
The builders rejected a certain stone. But others put that same stone in its proper
place, and it has become the most important stone of the building [MET]. The
Lord has done this, and we marvel as we look at it.
43 So, because you reject me, I am going to tell you this: God will no longer let you
Jews be the people over whom he rules. Instead, he will let non-Jews be the people
over whom he rules, and they will do [IDM] what he asks them to do. 44 The important
stone in the building represents me, the Messiah, and those who reject me are like people
who fall on this stone. Anyone who falls on this stone will be broken into pieces {This
cornerstone will break into pieces anyone who falls on it}, and it will crush anyone
on whom it falls.”
45 When the chief priests and the elders who were Pharisees heard this parable,
they realized that he was accusing them because they did not believe that he was the
Messiah. 46 They wanted to seize him, but they did not do so because they were afraid
of what the crowds would do if they did that, because the crowds considered that Jesus
was a prophet.
22
Jesus told a parable about a wedding feast to illustrate what will happen to people
who do not accept him as the Messiah.
Matthew 22:1-14
1 Then Jesus told the Jewish leaders other parables in order to illustrate what will
happen to the people who do not accept him as the King God promised to send. This
is one of those parables: 2 “God [MTY/EUP] is like a king [SIM] who told his servants
that they should make a wedding feast for his son. 3 When the feast was ready, the
king sent his servants to tell the people who had been {whom he had} invited that
it was time for them to come to the wedding feast. The servants did that. But the
people who had been invited did not want to come. 4 So he sent other servants to
again tell the people whom he had invited that they should come to the feast. He said
to those servants, ‘Say to the people whom I invited to come to the feast, “The king
says that he has prepared the food. The oxen and the fattened calves have beenMATTHEW 22:5
1391
MATTHEW 22:22
butchered and cooked. Everything is ready. It is time now for you to come to the
wedding feast!’ ” ’ 5 But when the servants told them that, they disregarded what the
servants said. Some of them went to their own fields. Others went to their places of
business. 6 The rest of them seized the king’s servants, mistreated them, and killed
them. 7 When the king heard what had happened, he became furious. He commanded
his soldiers to go and kill those murderers and burn their cities. 8 After his soldiers
had done that, the king said to his other servants, ‘I have prepared the wedding feast,
but the people who were {whom I} invited do not deserve to come to it because they
did not consider it an honor to have been invited. 9 So, go to the intersections of the
main streets. Tell whomever you find that they should come to the wedding feast.’
10 So the servants went there, and they gathered everyone they saw who wanted to
come to the feast. They gathered both people that were considered to be evil and those
that were considered to be good. They brought them into the hall where the wedding
feast took place. The hall was filled with people. 11 But when the king went into the
hall to see the guests who were there, he saw someone who was not wearing clothes
that had been provided for the guests to wear at a wedding feast. 12 The king said to
him, ‘Friend, ◄you should never have entered this hall, because you are not wearing
the clothes that guests wear at wedding feasts!/how did you enter this hall, because
you are not wearing the clothes that are appropriate for guests to wear at a wedding
feast?► [RHQ]’ The man did not say anything, because he did not know what to say.
13 Then the king said to his attendants, ‘Tie this person’s feet and hands and throw
him outside where there is total darkness. People who are there cry out because they
are suffering and they gnash their teeth because of their severe pain.’ ” 14 Then Jesus
said, “The point of this story is that God has invited many to come to him, but only a
few people are the ones whom he has chosen to be there.”
Jesus taught his critics that they needed to give to God and to the government what
they each required.
Matthew 22:15-22
15 After Jesus said that, the Pharisees met together in order to plan how they could
cause him to say something that would enable them to accuse him. 16 They sent to
him some of their disciples, who thought that the Israelites should pay only the tax that
the Jewish authorities required them to pay. They also sent some members of the party
that supported Herod. The members of that party thought that the Israelites should pay
only the tax that the Roman government required them to pay. Those who were sent
came and said to Jesus, “Teacher, we know that you are truthful and that you teach
the truth about what God wants us to do. We also know that you do not change what
you teach because of what someone says about you, even if it is an important person
who does not like what you [IDM] teach. 17 So tell us what you think [RHQ] about
this matter: Is it right that we pay taxes to the Roman government [MTY], or not?”
18 But Jesus knew that what they really wanted to do was evil. They were wanting
him to say something that would get him in trouble with either the Jewish authorities or
the Roman authorities. So he said to them, “You are ◄hypocrites/pretending to ask a
legitimate question►, but you are just wanting [RHQ] me to say something for which
you can accuse me. 19 Show me one of the coins with which people pay the Roman
tax.” So they showed him a coin called a denarius. 20 He said to them, “Whose picture
is on this coin? And whose name is on it?” 21 They answered, “It has the picture and
name of Caesar, the head of the Roman government.” Then he said to them, “Okay,
give to the government what they require, and give to God what he requires.” 22 When
those men heard Jesus say that, they marveled that his answer did not enable anyone
to accuse him. Then they left Jesus.MATTHEW 22:23
1392
MATTHEW 22:40
Jesus showed from the Scriptures that the spirits of God’s people are alive after
death.
Matthew 22:23-33
23 During that same day, some Sadducees came to Jesus. They are a Jewish sect who
do not believe that people will become alive again after they die. They wanted to
ask Jesus a question. 24 In order to discredit the idea that dead people will live again,
they said to him, “Teacher, Moses wrote in the Scriptures, ‘If a man dies who did not
have any children, his brother must marry the dead man’s widow in order that she
can have a child by him. The child will be considered the descendant of the man who
died, and in that way the dead man will have descendants.’ 25 Well, there were seven
boys in a family living near us. The oldest one married someone. He and his wife did
not have any children, and he died. So the second brother married the widow. But
he also died without having a child. 26 The same thing happened to the third brother,
and also to the other four brothers, who one by one married this same woman. 27 Last
of all, the widow also died. 28 So, at the time when people are raised from the dead,
which of the seven brothers do you think will be her husband? Keep in mind that
they had all been married to her.” 29 Jesus replied to them, “You are certainly wrong
in what you are thinking. You do not know what is written in the Scriptures. You
also do not know that God has the power to make people alive again. 30 The fact is
that the woman will not be the wife of any of them, because after God causes all dead
people to live again, no one will be married. Instead, people will be like the angels
in heaven. They do not marry. 31 But as for dead people becoming alive again, God
said something about that. ◄I’m sure you have read it./Have you not read it?► [RHQ]
Long after Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob had died, God said to Moses, 32 ‘I am the God
whom Abraham worships and the God whom Isaac worships and the God whom Jacob
worships.’ It is not dead people who worship God. It is living people who worship
him. Abraham, Isaac and Jacob died long before Moses lived, but God said that they
were still worshipping him, so we know their spirits were still alive!”
33 When the crowds of people heard Jesus teach that, they were amazed.
Jesus told his critics that the greatest commandments are to love God and to love
others.
Matthew 22:34-40
34 But when the Pharisees heard that Jesus had answered the Sadducees in such a
way that the Sadducees could not think of anything that they might say to respond to
him, the Pharisees gathered together to plan what they would say to him. Then they
approached him. 35 One of them was a man who had studied well the laws that God
gave Moses. He wanted to see if Jesus could answer his question well or if he would say
something wrong. He asked him, 36 “Teacher, which commandment in the laws that
God gave Moses is the most important?” 37 Jesus quoted the Scriptures as he replied,
“ ‘You must love the Lord your God with all [IDM] your ◄inner being/heart►. Show
that you love him in all that you desire, in all that you feel, and in all that you think.’
38 That is the most important commandment in the laws that God gave Moses. 39 The
next most important commandment that everyone must surely obey is: ‘You must
love the people you come in contact with as much as you love yourself.’ 40 These two
commandments are the basis of every law that Moses wrote in the Scriptures and also
of all that the prophets wrote.”
Jesus showed that the Messiah must be greater than King David, and not just his
descendant.
Matthew 22:41-46MATTHEW 22:41
1393
MATTHEW 23:13-14
41 While the Pharisees were still gathered together near Jesus,
he asked them,
Whose descendant is he?” They said
to him, “He is the descendant of King David.” 43 Jesus said to them, “If the Messiah is
King David’s descendant, then ◄David should not have called him ‘Lord’ when David
was saying what the Holy Spirit prompted him to say./Why did David call the Messiah
‘Lord’ when David was speaking what the Holy Spirit prompted him to say?► [RHQ]
44 David wrote this in the Scriptures about the Messiah: ‘God said to my Lord, “Sit
here beside me on my right, the place of greatest honor you [MTY]. Sit here while I
completely defeat your enemies [MTY].” ’ 45 So, since King David called the Messiah
‘my Lord’, ◄the Messiah cannot be just someone descended from David!/how can he
be only the descendant of King David?► [RHQ] He must be much greater than David!”
46 No one who heard what Jesus said was able to think of even one word to say to him
in response. And after that, no one else ever dared to ask him another question to try
to trap him.
42 “What do you think about the Messiah?
23
Jesus warned the people against the hypocritical behavior of the religious leaders.
Matthew 23:1-12
1 Then Jesus said to the crowd and to us his disciples, 2 “Moses was the renowned
teacher who taught the people the laws that God gave him [MTY]. Now, the Pharisees
and the men who teach our Jewish laws have made themselves the ones who interpret
those laws [IDM]. 3 Consequently, you should do whatever they tell you that you
must do. But do not do what they do, because they themselves do not do what they
tell you that you must do. 4 They require you to obey many rules that are difficult to
obey. But they themselves do not help anyone obey those rules. It is as if they are
tying up loads that are hard to carry and putting them on your shoulders [MET] for
you to carry. But they themselves do not desire to help anyone obey those laws. They
are like people who do not want to lift even the slightest load that they could lift [MET]
5 with one finger. Whatever they do, they do it to be seen by other people {so that
other people will see them doing that}. For example, they make extra wide the tiny
boxes containing portions of Scripture that they wear on their arms. They enlarge
the tassels on their robes, to make others think that they are pious. 6 They want people
to honor them. For example, at dinner parties they sit in the seats where the most
important people sit. In the places of worship they want to sit in the seats where the
most honored people sit. 7 Also, they want people to greet them respectfully in the
marketplaces and to honor them by calling them ‘Teacher’. 8 But you who are my
disciples should not allow people to address you honorably as ‘Rabbi’, which means
‘teacher’. I am the only one who is really your teacher, which means that you are all
equal, like brothers and sisters, and none of you should act superior to another, as the
Pharisees do. 9 Do not honor anyone on earth by addressing him as ‘Father’, because
God, your Father in heaven, is the only spiritual father of all of you. 10 Do not allow
people to call you ‘Instructors’, because I, the Messiah, am the one instructor who
teaches all of you. 11 In contrast, everyone among you who wants God to consider
them to be important must serve others as servants do. 12 God will humble those who
exalt themselves. And he will exalt those who humble themselves.”
Jesus warned the religious leaders about preventing people from letting God rule
their lives.
Matthew 23:13-14
13-14 Then Jesus said to the religious leaders, “You men who teach the Jewish laws
and you Pharisees are hypocrites! There will be terrible punishment for you, becauseMATTHEW 23:15
1394
MATTHEW 23:24
by teaching what is false, you prevent people [MTY/HYP] who are thinking about letting
God rule their lives from doing that [MET]. What you are doing is like closing a gate
[MET] so that people who are wanting to enter a city cannot go in. As for you, you
do not let God rule your lives. Neither do you allow other people to let God rule their
lives. What you do is like not going into a house yourselves, and not allowing others
to enter it either [MET].”
Jesus also warned the religious leaders about zealously encouraging others to believe
what they teach.
Matthew 23:15
15 “You are hypocrites, you men who teach the Jewish laws and you Pharisees! Your
punishment will be terrible, because you exert yourselves very much to get even one
person to believe what you teach. For instance, you travel across seas and lands to
distant places in order to do that. And as a result, when one person believes what you
teach, you make that person much more deserving to go to hell than you yourselves
deserve to.”
Jesus rebuked the religious leaders about their silly ideas about supporting their
promises with oaths.
Matthew 23:16-22
16 “You Jewish leaders, your punishment will be terrible! You are like people who are
blind [MET] who are trying to lead others. You say, ‘In the case of those who promise
to do something and then ask the Temple to affirm what they have promised, it means
nothing if they do not do what they have promised. But if they ask the gold that is
in the Temple to affirm what they have promised, they must do what they promised.’
17 You are fools, and you are like people who are blind [MET]! The gold that is in the
Temple is important, but the Temple is even more important [RHQ], because it is the
Temple that the gold is in that sets the gold apart for a special use for God. 18 Also
you say, ‘In the case of those who promise to do something and then ask the altar
to affirm what they have promised, it means nothing if they do not do what they have
promised. But if they ask the gift that they have put on the altar to support what they
have promised, they must do what they promised.’ 19 You are like people who are blind
[MET]. The gift that is offered on the altar is important, but the altar is even more
important [RHQ] because it is the altar on which the offering is offered that sets it
apart for a special use for God. 20 So, those who promise to do something, and then
ask the altar to affirm what they have promised are asking everything on the altar to
support what they promised. 21 Those who promise to do something, and then ask
the Temple to affirm what they promised, are asking that God, to whom the Temple
belongs, will affirm what they have promised. 22 Those who promise to do something
and then ask heaven to affirm what they promised are asking the throne of God and
God, who sits on that throne, to affirm what they promised.”
Jesus also rebuked the religious leaders about paying attention to unimportant laws
and at the same time ignoring important ones.
Matthew 23:23-24
23 “You men who teach the Jewish laws and you Pharisees, your punishment will
be terrible! You are hypocrites because, even though you give to God a tenth of the
herbs you produce, such as mint, dill, and cummin, you do not obey God’s laws that
are more important. For example, you do not act justly toward others, you do not act
mercifully toward people, and you are not trustworthy. It is good to give a tenth of
your herbs to God, but you should also obey these other more important laws. 24 You
leaders are like blind people who are trying to lead others. According to your laws
you say that touching gnats and camels makes you unacceptable to God. What you areMATTHEW 23:25
1395
MATTHEW 23:37
doing is like straining a gnat out of a jar of water so that you do not swallow it and
thereby become unacceptable to God, and at the same time swallowing a camel with
the water [MET]!”
Jesus also rebuked the religious leaders about being greedy and selfish.
Matthew 23:25-26
25 “You men who teach people the Jewish laws and you Pharisees, your punishment
will be terrible! You are hypocrites! You are greedy and selfish, but you make
yourselves appear holy. You are like cups and plates that have been cleaned on the
outside, but on the inside they are very filthy. 26 You blind Pharisees! First you must
stop being greedy and selfish. Then you will be able to do what is righteous. That will
be like cleaning the inside of a cup first. Then when you clean [MET] the outside of
the cup, the cup will truly be clean.”
Jesus rebuked the religious leaders for being hypocrites and pretending to be
righteous.
Matthew 23:27-28
27 “You men who teach the Jewish laws and you Pharisees, your punishment will
be terrible! You are hypocrites! You are like tombs [SIM] that are painted white so
that people can see them and avoid touching them. The outside surfaces are beautiful,
but inside they are full of dead people’s bones and filth. 28 You are like those tombs.
When people look at you, they think that you are righteous, but in your ◄inner beings/
hearts► you are hypocrites and you disobey God’s commands.”
Jesus accused the religious leaders of being guilty of killing all the prophets.
Matthew 23:29-36
29 “You men who teach the Jewish laws and you Pharisees are hypocrites! Your
punishment will be terrible! You rebuild the tombs of the prophets whom others killed
long ago. You decorate the monuments that honor righteous people. 30 You say, ‘If we
had lived when our ancestors [MET] lived, we would not have helped [MET] those who
killed [MTY] the prophets.’ 31 Thus you recognize that you should honor the prophets,
but you disregard the word of God that other men whom God has sent teach you. In
that way you testify against yourselves that you are descendants and disciples [MET]
of those who killed the prophets. 32 You are as ready to murder people as [MET] your
ancestors were! 33 You people are so wicked You are as dangerous as poisonous snakes
[DOU, MET]! ◄You foolishly think that you will escape being punished in hell!/Do you
foolishly think that you will escape when God punishes wicked people in hell?► [RHQ]
34 Take note that this is why I will send prophets, wise men, and other men who
will teach you my message. You will kill some of them by nailing them to crosses,
and you will kill some in other ways. You will whip some of them in the places
where you worship, and you will chase them from city to city. 35 As a result, God will
consider that you are guilty for killing [SYN] all the righteous people, including killing
[MTY] Adam’s son Abel, who was a righteous man [SYN], and Zechariah, the son of
Barachiah, whom you are guilty of killing in the holy place between the Temple and
the altar, and for killing all the prophets who lived between the times that those two
men lived. 36 Think about this: You people who have observed my ministry, it is you
whom God will punish for killing all those prophets!”
Jesus expressed his sorrow about what would happen to Jerusalem.
Matthew 23:37-39
37 “O people of Jerusalem [MTY, APO], you killed the prophets who lived long ago,
and you killed others whom God sent to you. You killed them by throwing stones at
them [DOU]! Many times I wanted to gather you together to protect you, like a henMATTHEW 23:38
1396
MATTHEW 24:16
gathers her young chicks under her wings [MET]. But you did not want me to do that.
38 So listen to this: Your city [SYN] will soon become an uninhabited place. 39 Keep
this in mind: You will see me again only when I return, and you say about me, ‘God
is truly pleased with this man who comes with God’s authority [MTY].’ ”
24
Jesus told his disciples that Jerusalem would be destroyed.
Matthew 24:1-2
1 Jesus left the Temple courtyard. As he was walking along, we disciples came to
him to ask him to note how beautiful the Temple buildings were. 2 He said to us,
“These buildings that you are looking at [RHQ] are wonderful, but I want to tell you
something about them. They will soon be completely destroyed {Foreign invaders will
completely destroy them}. Every stone in these buildings will be thrown down {they
will throw down every stone in these buildings}. Not one stone will be left {They will
not leave one stone} on top of another stone.”
Jesus told his disciples about the distressing things that would happen before his
return.
Matthew 24:3-14
3 Later, as Jesus was sitting alone on the slope of Olive Tree Hill, we disciples went
to him and asked him, “When will this happen to the buildings of the Temple? Also,
tell us what will happen to indicate that you are about to come again, and to indicate
that this world is ending?”
4 Jesus replied, “All that I will say is, be sure that no one deceives you about what
will happen 5 Many people will come and say ◄that I sent them/that they have my
authority► [MTY]. They will say, ‘I am the Messiah’, and they will deceive many
people. 6 You will hear about wars that are close and wars that are far away, but
do not let that trouble you. Keep in mind that God has said that those things must
happen. But when they happen, it will not mean that the end of the world has come!
7 Groups in various countries will fight each other, and various governments will also
fight against each other. There will be famines and earthquakes in various places.
8 These things will happen first. Then there will be other things that will happen
before I return. What will happen will be like the first pains of childbirth MET].
9 At that time people who oppose you will take you to the authorities, who will
mistreat you and kill you. You will be hated by people who live in all nations [PRS]
{People who live in all nations [PRS] will hate you} because you believe in me [MTY].
10 Also, many people will stop believing in me because of the way they will suffer. They
will betray each other and will hate each other. 11 Many will come saying that they are
prophets, but they will be lying, and they will deceive many people. 12 Because there
will be more and more people who will disobey God’s laws [PRS], many people will no
longer [MET] love their fellow believers [PRS]. 13 But all those who keep on believing
in me to the end of their lives will be saved. 14 Furthermore, the good message about
my ruling over people’s lives will be preached in every part of the world, in order
that people of all ethnic groups may hear it. Then the end of the world will come.”
Jesus told his disciples about the suffering that would come when Jerusalem was
about to be destroyed.
Matthew 24:15-22
15 “But before the world ends, the disgusting person who will defile the holy Temple
and cause people to abandon it will stand in the Temple. Daniel the prophet spoke and
wrote about that long ago. May everyone who reads this pay attention to the following
warning from me: 16 When you see that happen in the Temple, those of you who are inMATTHEW 24:17
1397
MATTHEW 24:33
Judea district must flee to the higher hills! 17 Those who are outside their houses must
not go back into their houses to get things before they flee. 18 Those who are working
in a field should not turn back to get their outer clothing before they flee. 19 I feel very
sorry for women who will be pregnant and women who will be nursing their babies
in those days, because it will be very difficult for them to run away 20 Pray that you will
not have to flee ◄in the winter/in the rainy season► when it will be hard to travel.
People who think that God never allows anyone to do any work on our day of rest will
not help you as you flee, so pray also that you will not have to flee on such a day,
21 because people will suffer very severely when those things happen. People have
never suffered that severely since God created the world until now, and no one will
ever suffer like that again. 22 If God had not decided to shorten that time [MTY] when
people will suffer so much, everyone [LIT] would die. But he has decided to shorten it
because he is concerned about the people whom he has chosen.”
Jesus warned his disciples not to believe false reports about his return, because
everyone will see him when he comes.
Matthew 24:23-28
23-24 “At that time people will appear who will falsely say that they are the Messiah
or that they are prophets. They will perform many kinds ◄of miracles/of things that
ordinary people cannot do►, in order to deceive people. They will even try to see
if it is possible to deceive you people whom God has chosen. So, at that time, if
someone says to you, ‘Look, here is the Messiah!’ or if someone says, ‘Over there is
the Messiah!’ do not believe it! 25 Do not forget that I have warned you about all this
before it happens. 26 So if someone says to you, ‘Look, the Messiah is in the desolate
area!’ do not go there. Likewise, if someone says to you, ‘Look, he is in a secret room!’
do not believe that person, 27 because just like lightning flashes from the east to the
west and people everywhere can see it [SIM], when I, the one who came from heaven,
return again, everyone will see me. 28 When I return, it will be as obvious to everyone
as the fact that wherever you see vultures gathering, you know that there will be
an animal carcass [MET] there. (OR, Just like the vultures gather together wherever
there is an animal carcass, God will punish sinful people wherever they are.)”
Jesus told his disciples what will happen at the time of his return.
Matthew 24:29-31
29 “Immediately after many people have suffered during those days, the universe
will become dark. The sun will become dark. The moon will not shine. The stars
will fall from the sky. And the powerful objects in the sky will be shaken. (OR, And
the spiritual beings in space will be deposed.) 30 After that, something will be seen
{people will observe something} in the sky that indicates that I, the one who came from
heaven, am returning to the earth. Then unbelieving people from all ethnic groups of
the earth will mourn because they will be afraid of God punishing them. They will
see me, the one who came from heaven, coming on the clouds with power and great
glory as I return to the earth. 31 I will send my angels to the earth from everywhere in
the heavens. They will be blowing trumpets loudly. Then from throughout the whole
earth [DOU] they will gather the people whom I have chosen.”
Jesus told his disciples how to know when the time of his return was near.
Matthew 24:32-35
32 “Now I want you to learn something from this parable about how fig trees grow.
In this area, when the buds of a fig tree become tender and its leaves begin to sprout,
you know that summer is near. 33 Similarly, when you see all these things that I have
just described happening, you will know that the time for me to return is very closeMATTHEW 24:34
1398
MATTHEW 25:1
[MET]. 34 Keep this in mind: All of these events will happen before all the people who
have observed the things that I have done have died. 35 You can be certain that these
things that I have told you about will happen. You can be more certain of that than
you can be certain that the earth and sky [LIT] will continue to exist.”
Jesus told his disciples to be ready because they do not know the time of his return.
Matthew 24:36-44
36 “But neither I, nor any other person, nor any angel in heaven, knows either the
day or the hour when the things that I have told you about will happen. Only God, my
Father, knows. 37-39 It will be like what happened when Noah lived. Until the flood
came, the people did not know that anything bad would happen to them. Before the
flood waters covered the earth, the people were eating and drinking as usual. Some
men were marrying women and some parents were giving their daughters to men to
marry them. They were doing all this until the day that Noah and his family entered
the big boat. And then the flood came and drowned all those who were not in the
boat. Similarly, the unbelieving people will not know when I, the one who came from
heaven, will return, and they will not be expecting me. 40 When I return, I will not
take all people up to heaven. I will take only those who trust in me. For example, two
people will be in the fields. One of them will be taken {I will take one of them} up
to heaven and the other person will be left {and I will leave the other person} here
to be punished. 41 Similarly, two women will be at the mill grinding grain. One of
them will be taken up to heaven and the other will be left. 42 So, because you do not
know what day I, your Lord, will return to the earth, you need to be ready for me
to return at any time. 43 You know that if the owners of a house knew at what time
in the night thieves would come, they would be awake and prevent the thieves from
breaking into their houses. Similarly, I will come just like unexpectedly as a thief. 44 So
you need to be ready for my return, because I, the one who came from heaven, will
return to the earth at a time when you do not expect me to come.”
Jesus told a parable to warn his disciples not to act wickedly, thinking that he would
not return soon.
Matthew 24:45-51
45 “Think about what every faithful and wise servant is like [RHQ]. The house owner
appoints one servant to supervise the other servants. He tells him to give them food
at the proper times. Then he leaves on a long trip. 46 If that servant is doing that
work when the house owner returns, the house owner will be very pleased with
him. 47 Think about this: The house owner will appoint that one servant to be the
supervisor of all his possessions. 48 But a wicked servant might say to himself, ‘The
owner has been away for a long time, so he probably will not return soon and find out
what I am doing.’ 49 So he will begin to beat the other servants and eat and get drunk.
50 Then the house owner will come back at a time when the servant does not expect
him [DOU]. 51 He will punish that servant severely [HYP], (OR, cut that servant into
two pieces) and he will put him where ◄the hypocrites/the ones who only pretended
to be good► are put. In that place the people cry and grind their teeth because they
suffer very much.”
25
Jesus taught in a parable that his disciples should always be ready for his return.
Matthew 25:1-13
1 Jesus continued by saying, “I will tell you something else about the time when I return
from heaven as king [MET]. What will happen to many people who say that they know
me will be like what happened to ten virgins who took their lanterns and went toMATTHEW 25:2
1399
MATTHEW 25:25
the place where they would meet a bridegroom and go to his wedding celebration.
2 Five of the virgins were foolish and five of them were wise. 3 The virgins who were
foolish took their lanterns, but they did not take any extra olive oil for the lantern.
4 But the virgins who were wise took oil in their flasks as well as in their lanterns.
5 The bridegroom was delayed, and it became late at night. So all the virgins became
sleepy and fell asleep. 6 In the middle of the night someone woke them up by shouting,
‘Hey! The bridegroom is arriving! Go outside and meet him!’ 7 So all the virgins got
up and trimmed their lantern wicks so that they would burn properly. 8 The foolish
virgins said to the wise ones, ‘Give us some of your olive oil, because our lanterns are
about to go out!’ 9 The wise virgins replied, ‘No, because there might not be enough
oil for our lanterns and for yours. Go to a store and buy some for yourselves!’ 10 But
while the foolish virgins were going to buy some oil, the bridegroom arrived. So the
wise virgins, who were ready, went with the bridegroom to the wedding hall where the
bride was waiting. Then the door was closed {someone closed the door of that hall}.
11 Later, the rest of the virgins came to the hall and they called to the bridegroom, ‘Sir,
open the door for us!’ 12 But he said to them, ‘The truth is that I do not know you,
so I will not open the door for you!’ ” 13 Then Jesus continued by saying, “So, in order
that this will not happen to you, keep expecting that I will return, because you do not
know when [MTY] it will be.”
Jesus told a parable to teach his disciples about making good use of what God has
given them.
Matthew 25:14-30
14 “When I return from heaven as king, I will deal with those who say that they have
been serving me like a man who was about to go on a long journey dealt with his
servants. He called them together and gave them each some of his wealth to invest
and gain more money for him. 15 He gave them money according to their ability to take
care of it. For example, he gave one servant 5,000 dollars, he gave another servant
2,000 dollars, and he gave another servant 1,000 dollars. Then he left on his journey.
16 The servant who had received 5,000 dollars went immediately and used that money
to gain 5,000 dollars more. 17 Similarly, the servant who had received 2,000 dollars
gained two thousand dollars more. 18 But the servant who had received one thousand
dollars went and dug a hole in the ground and hid the money there to keep it safe.
19 After a long time the servants’ boss returned. He called them together to find out
what they had done with his money. 20 The servant who had received 5,000 dollars
brought two bags, each containing 5,000 dollars. He said, ‘Boss, you gave me 5,000
dollars to take care of. Look, I have gained 5,000 more!’ 21 His boss replied, ‘You are a
very good and faithful servant! You have done very well! You have faithfully handled
a small amount of money, so I will put you in charge of a lot of things. Come and be
happy with me!’
22 The servant who had received 2,000 dollars also came and said, ‘Boss, you gave me
2,000 dollars to take care of. Look, I have gained 2,000 more!’ 23 His boss replied, ‘You
are a very good and faithful servant! You have done very well! You have faithfully
handled a small amount of money, so I will put you in charge of a lot of things. Come
and be happy with me!’
24 Then the servant who had received 1,000 dollars came. He said, ‘Boss, I was
afraid of you. I knew that you are a man who does not do foolish things with his
money. You even take from others money that does not really belong to you, like a
farmer who harvests grain from another man’s field where he did not even plant the
seeds. 25 So because I was afraid of what you would do to me if I did not make a profit
from my business, I went out and hid your 1,000 dollars in the ground to keep it safe.MATTHEW 25:26
1400
MATTHEW 25:43
Here, this is the money that belongs to you!’ 26 His boss replied, ‘You wicked, lazy
servant! ◄You knew that I take from others money that does not really belong to me,
like a farmer who harvests grain from another man’s field where I did not even plant
the seeds!/Did you not know that I take from others money that does not really belong
to me, like a farmer who harvests grain from another man’s field where I did not even
plant the seeds?► [RHQ] 27 So then, you should have put my money on deposit in a
bank, so that when I returned I would get it back with the interest it earned!’ 28 Then
the boss said to his other servants, ‘Take the 1,000 dollars from him, and give it to
the servant who has the 10,000 dollars! 29 To those who use well what they have
received, God will give more, and they will have plenty. But from those who do not
use well what they have received, even what they already have will be taken away.
30 Furthermore, throw that worthless servant outside, into the darkness, where he
will be with those who are wailing and gnashing their teeth because they are in much
pain.’ ”
Jesus told a parable about how he will judge between those who have shown kindness
to others and those who have not.
Matthew 25:31-46
31 “When I, the one who came from heaven, come again, I will be very radiant and
bring all my angels with me. Then I will sit as a king on my wonderful throne to
judge people. 32 People from all nations [MTY] will be gathered in front of me {The
angels will gather in front of me people from all nations}. Then I will separate them,
one from another, as a shepherd separates his sheep from his goats. 33 I will put the
righteous people on my right and the unrighteous ones on my left, as a shepherd puts
sheep on one side and goats on the other side.
34 Then I will say to those on my right, ‘You people who have been blessed by my
Father {whom my Father has blessed}, come! From the time he created the world, he
has been preparing to allow you to receive the blessings that he will give to all those
who let him rule their lives. Now is the time for you to receive those blessings 35 They
belong to you, because you gave me something to eat when I was hungry. (OR, They
belong to you. It is as though you gave me something to eat when I was hungry.) You
gave me something to drink when I was thirsty. When I was a stranger in your town,
you invited me to stay in your houses. 36 When I needed clothes [MTY], you gave me
some. When I was sick, you took care of me. When I was in prison, you came to visit
me.’
37 Then the righteous people will reply, ‘Lord, when were you hungry and we
saw you and gave you something to eat? When were you thirsty and we gave you
something to drink? 38 When were you a stranger in our town and we invited you
to stay in our houses? When did you need clothes and we gave you some? 39 When
were you sick or in prison and we went to visit you?’ We do not remember doing any
of these things for you.
40 I will reply, ‘The truth is that whatever you did for any one of your fellow
believers, even an unimportant one, it was as though you did it for me.’
41 Then I will say to those on my left, ‘You people who have been cursed by God
{whom God has cursed}, leave me! Go into the eternal fire that God has prepared
for ◄the devil/Satan► and his angels! 42 It is right for you to go there, because you
did not give me anything to eat when I was hungry. You did not give me anything
to drink when I was thirsty. 43 You did not invite me into your homes when I was a
stranger in your town. You did not give me any clothes when I needed them [MTY].
You did not take care of me when I was sick or in prison.’MATTHEW 25:44
1401
MATTHEW 26:16
44 They will answer,
‘Lord, when were you hungry or thirsty or a stranger or
needing clothes or sick or in prison, and we did not help you?’
45 I will reply, ‘The truth is that whenever you did not do anything to help any one
of my people, even if they were unimportant people, it was as though you did not do
anything to help me.’
46 Then those people on my left will go away to the place where they will be punished
{God will punish them} eternally, but the righteous people will go to where they will
live forever with God.”
26
Jesus told his disciples of his coming arrest. The Jewish leaders planned how to seize
Jesus.
Matthew 26:1-5
1 When Jesus had finished saying all those things, he said to us disciples, 2 “You
know that two days from now we will celebrate the Passover festival. At that time I,
the one who came from heaven, will be handed over to {they will put me, the one
who came from heaven, into the hands of} those who will nail me to a cross.”
3 At the same time the chief priests and the Jewish elders gathered in the home of
the high priest, whose name was Caiaphas. 4 There they plotted how they could seize
Jesus in some deceitful way so that they could have him executed. 5 But they said,
“We must not do it during the Passover festival, because if we do it then, the people
might riot.”
Jesus commended a woman for showing her appreciation of him.
Matthew 26:6-13
6 While Jesus and we were in Bethany village in the home of Simon, whom Jesus had
healed of leprosy, 7 a woman came to him. She was carrying a stone jar containing
very expensive perfume. To show how much she appreciated Jesus, she poured the
perfume on his head as he was eating. 8 When we disciples saw that, some of us were
angry. One of us said, “◄It is terrible that this perfume was wasted!/Why was this
perfume wasted?► [RHQ] 9 We could have sold it and gotten a lot of money for it!
Then the money could have been given {we could have given the money} to poor
people.” 10 Jesus knew what we were saying. So he said to us, “◄You should not be
bothering this woman!/Why are you bothering this woman?► [RHQ] She has done a
beautiful thing to me. 11 Keep in mind that you will always have poor people among
you, so you can help them whenever you want to. But I will not always be with you,
so it is good for her to show now that she appreciates me! 12 When she poured this
perfume on my body, it was as if she knew that I am going to die soon. And it is as
if she has anointed my body for being buried. 13 I will tell you this: Wherever this
good message about me is preached {people preach this good message about me}
throughout the world, those who preach it will tell what this woman has done, and
as a result people will always remember her.”
Judas agreed to betray Jesus for 30 silver coins.
Matthew 26:14-16
14 Then Judas Iscariot (OR, Judas, the man from Kerioth Town), even though he was
one of us twelve disciples, went to the chief priests. 15 He asked them, “If I enable
you to seize Jesus, how much money are you willing to give me?” They agreed to give
him 30 silver coins. So they counted out the coins and gave them to him. 16 From that
time Judas watched for an opportunity to enable them to seize Jesus.MATTHEW 26:17
1402
MATTHEW 26:35
Two disciples prepared the Passover meal. During the meal, Jesus said that Judas
would betray him.
Matthew 26:17-25
17 On the first day of the week-long festival ◄when we Jews ate bread which had
no yeast in it/of Unleavened Bread►, we disciples went to Jesus and asked, “Where
do you want us to prepare the meal for the Passover celebration so that we can eat it
with you?” 18 In reply, he gave instructions to two disciples about where they should
go. He said to them, “Go into the city to a man with whom I have previously arranged
this. Tell him that the teacher says, ‘The time [MTY] that I told you about is near. I
am going to celebrate the Passover meal with my disciples at your house, and I have
sent these two to prepare the meal.’ ” 19 So the two disciples did as Jesus told them.
They went and prepared the Passover meal in that man’s house.
20 When it was evening, Jesus was eating the meal with us twelve disciples. 21 While
we were eating, he said to us, “Listen carefully to this: One of you is going to enable
my enemies to seize me.” 22 We were very sad. We began to say to him, one after
the other, “Lord, ◄it is surely not I!/I’m not the one, am I?► [RHQ]” 23 He replied,
“The one who will enable my enemies to seize me is one of you who is dipping bread
[MTY] into the sauce in the dish along with me. 24 It is certain that I, the one who
came from heaven, will die, because that is what has been written {the prophets have
written} about me. But there will be terrible punishment for the man who enables
my enemies to seize me! It would be better for that man if he had never been born!”
25 Then Judas, the one who was going to betray him, said, “Teacher, ◄surely it is not
I!/I’m not the one, am I?► [RHQ]” Jesus replied, “Yes, you are the one.”
Jesus gave the disciples the bread and wine to symbolize his coming death.
Matthew 26:26-30
26 While we were eating, Jesus took a small loaf of bread and thanked God for it.
He broke it into pieces and gave it to us disciples, and said, “Take this bread and eat
it. It represents my body.” 27 Later he took a cup of wine and thanked God for it. Then
he gave it to us, saying, “Drink some of the wine in this cup, all of you. 28 The wine
in this cup represents my blood, which will soon flow from my body. With my blood
I will sign the new agreement that God is making to forgive the sins of many people.
29 Note this carefully: I will not drink wine in this way any more until the time when
I drink it with you with a new meaning. That will happen when my Father enables
me to begin to rule as king.”
30 After we sang a hymn, we started out towards Olive Tree Hill.
Jesus prophesied that Peter would deny three times that he knew Jesus.
Matthew 26:31-35
31 On the way, Jesus told us, “This night all of you will desert me because of what
will happen to me! This is certain to happen because these words that God said are
written in the Scriptures: ‘I will cause the shepherd to be killed, and all the sheep
will be scattered {scatter}.’ 32 But after I have died and become alive again, I will go
ahead of you to Galilee district and meet you there.” 33 Peter replied, “Perhaps all the
other disciples will desert you when they see what happens to you, but I certainly will
never leave you!” 34 Jesus replied to him, “The truth is that this very night, before
the rooster crows, you will say three times that you do not know me!” 35 Peter said
to him, “Even if they kill me while I am defending you, I will never say that I do not
know you!” All the rest of us disciples also said the same thing.MATTHEW 26:36
1403
MATTHEW 26:56
While the disciples slept, Jesus prayed that God would spare him from the coming
suffering.
Matthew 26:36-46
36 Then Jesus went with us to a place that is called {that people call} Gethsemane.
There he said to most of us, “Stay here while I go over there and pray.” 37 He took
Peter, James, and John with him. He became extremely distressed. 38 Then he said
to them, “I [SYN] am very sorrowful, so much so that I feel as if I were about to die!
Remain here and stay awake with me!” 39 After going a little further, he threw himself
face down on the ground. He prayed, “My Father, if it is possible [MTY], do not make
me have to endure the suffering that is coming now. But do not do as I want. Instead,
do as you want!” 40 Then he returned to the three disciples and saw that they were
sleeping. He woke Peter and said to him, “◄I am disappointed that you men fell asleep
and were not able to stay awake with me for just a short time!/Why were you men
not able to stay awake with me for just one hour?► [RHQ] 41 You must keep alert and
pray so that you can resist when you are tempted {something tempts you}. You want
to do what I tell you, but you [SYN] are not strong enough to actually do it.”
42 He went away a second time. He prayed, “My Father, if it is necessary for me to
suffer [LIT], may what you want happen!”
43 When he returned to the three disciples, he saw that they were asleep again. They
could not keep their eyes open [IDM]. 44 So he left them and went away again. He
prayed the third time, saying the same thing that he had prayed before. 45 Then he
returned to us disciples. He woke us up and said to us, “◄I am disappointed that you
are still sleeping and resting!/Why are you still sleeping and resting?► [RHQ] Look
Someone is about to enable sinful men to seize me, the one who came from heaven!
46 Get up! Let’s go to meet them Here comes the one who is enabling them to seize
me!”
After Judas enabled men to seize Jesus, Jesus ridiculed them, but the disciples fled.
Matthew 26:47-56
47 While Jesus was still speaking, Judas arrived. Even though he was one of us twelve
disciples, he came to enable Jesus’ enemies to seize him. A large crowd carrying swords
and clubs was with him. They had been sent by the chief priests and elders {the chief
priests and Jewish elders had sent them}. 48 Judas had previously arranged to give
them a signal, saying, “The man whom I will kiss is the one you want. Seize him!”
49 He immediately went to Jesus and said, “Greetings, Teacher!” Then he kissed Jesus
on the neck/cheek. 50 Jesus replied, “Friend, is it to kiss me that you are here?” (OR,
“Do what you have come for!”) Then the men who came with Judas stepped forward
and seized Jesus. 51 Suddenly, one of the men who was with Jesus pulled his sword
out of its sheath. He struck the servant of the high priest to kill him, but only cut off
his ear. 52 Jesus said to him, “Put your sword back in its sheath! All those who try to
kill others with a sword will themselves be killed with a sword! 53 Do you think that
[RHQ] if I asked my Father, he would not immediately send more than ◄twelve armies
of/72,000► angels to help me? 54 But if I did that, what the prophets have written in
the Scriptures about what will happen to the Messiah would not be fulfilled {happen}
[RHQ].”
55 At that time Jesus said to the crowd that was seizing him, “◄It is ridiculous that
you have come here to seize me with swords and clubs, as if I were a bandit!/Have
you come here to seize me with swords and clubs, as if I were a bandit?► [RHQ] Day
after day I sat in the Temple courtyard, teaching the people. Why did you not arrest
me then? 56 But all this is happening to fulfill what the prophets have written in the
Scriptures about me.” Then all of us disciples deserted Jesus and ran away.MATTHEW 26:57
1404
MATTHEW 26:75
Jesus was put on trial before the Jewish Council.
Matthew 26:57-68
57 The men who had seized Jesus took him to the house where Caiaphas, the high
priest, lived. The men who taught the Jewish laws and the Jewish elders had already
gathered there. 58 Peter followed Jesus at a distance. He came to the high priest’s
courtyard. He entered the courtyard and sat down with the guards to see what would
happen.
59 The chief priests and the rest of the Jewish Council were trying to find people
who would tell lies about Jesus so that they could convince the Roman authorities to
execute him. 60 But even though many people spoke lies about him, they did not
find anyone who said anything that was useful. Finally two men came forward 61 and
said, “This man said, ‘I am able to destroy God’s Temple and to rebuild it within three
days.’ ” 62 Then the high priest stood up and said to Jesus, “Are you not going to reply?
What do you say about these things that they are saying to accuse you?” 63 But Jesus
remained silent. Then the high priest said to him, “I command you to tell us the truth,
knowing that the all-powerful God is listening to you: Are you the Messiah, ◄the Son
of God/the man who is also God►?” 64 Jesus replied, “Yes, it is as you say. But I will
also say this to all of you: Some day you will see me, the one who came from heaven,
sitting beside [MTY] Almighty God, and ruling. You will also see me coming on the
clouds from heaven!”
65 Then the high priest tore his outer garment. That was the custom to show that he
was shocked to hear Jesus say that he was equal to God. Then he said, “This man has
insulted God! He claims to be equal with God! ◄We certainly do not need anyone
else to testify against this man!/Why should we seek any more people who will testify
against this man?► [RHQ] You heard what he said! 66 What have you decided?”
The Jewish leaders replied, “According to our laws, he is guilty and deserves to be
executed!” 67 Then some of them spat in his face. Others struck him with their fists.
Others, after they blindfolded him, slapped him 68 and said, “Since you claim that [IRO]
you are the Messiah, tell us who hit you!”
Peter denied three times that he knew Jesus.
Matthew 26:69-75
69 Peter was sitting outside in the courtyard. A servant girl came up to him and
looked at him. She said, “You also were with Jesus, that man from Galilee district!”
70 But while everyone there was listening, he denied it. He said, “I do not know what
you are talking about!” 71 Then he went out to the gateway of the courtyard. Another
servant girl saw him and said to the people who were standing nearby, “This man
was with Jesus, the man from Nazareth.” 72 But Peter again denied it. He said, “May
God punish me if I am lying! I tell you, I do not even know that man!” 73 After a
little while, one of the people who were standing there approached Peter and said
to him, “It is certain that you are one of those who were with that man. We can tell
from your accent that you are from Galilee.” 74 Then Peter began to proclaim loudly
that God should curse him if he was lying. He asked God in heaven to witness that
he was telling the truth and said, “I do not know that man!” Immediately a rooster
crowed. 75 Then Peter remembered the words that Jesus had spoken to him, “Before
the rooster crows, you will say three times that you do not know me.” And Peter
went out of the courtyard, crying because he was very sad about what he had done.MATTHEW 27:1
1405
MATTHEW 27:19
27
The Jewish religious leaders took Jesus to the Roman governor.
Matthew 27:1-2
1 Very early the next morning all the chief priests and Jewish elders decided how
to arrange for the Romans to execute Jesus. 2 They tied his hands and took him to
Pilate, the Roman governor.
After Judas returned the money and hanged himself, the Jewish leaders bought a
field with the money, in fulfillment of prophecy.
Matthew 27:3-10
3 When Judas, the one who had ◄betrayed/enabled Jesus’ enemies to seize► him,
realized that they had decided to have Jesus executed, he was very sorry about what
he had done. He took the 30 coins back to the chief priests and elders. 4 He said, “I
have sinned. I have ◄betrayed/enabled you to seize► a man who ◄is innocent/has
not done anything wrong►.” They replied, “◄That means nothing to us!/What does
that mean to us?► [RHQ] That is your problem!” 5 So Judas took the money and threw
it inside the Temple. Then he went away and hanged himself.
6 Later the high priests found the coins. They picked them up and said, “This is
money that we paid to have a man killed [MTY], and our law does not allow such
money to be put {us to put such money} into the Temple treasury.” 7 So they decided
to use that money to buy the field where clay was dug for making pots {men dug
ground for making pots}. They made that field a place where they buried strangers
who died in Jerusalem. 8 That is why that place is still called {why they still call that
place} ‘The field of blood’. 9 By buying that field, they fulfilled these words that the
prophet Jeremiah wrote long ago:
They took the 30 silver coins; That was what the leaders of Israel decided that he
was worth; 10 and with that money they bought the field where clay was dug for
potters. They did that as the Lord had commanded me.
Jesus was put on trial before the governor.
Matthew 27:11-26
11 Jesus stood in front of Pilate, the governor. The governor asked Jesus, “Do you
claim to be the king of the Jews?” Jesus replied, “It is as you have just said.”
12 When he was accused by the chief priests and elders {When the chief priests
and elders accused him} about various things, he did not answer. 13 So Pilate said
to him, “You hear how many things they are saying to accuse you; are you not going
to reply?” 14 But even though he was not guilty, Jesus did not say anything. He did
not reply to any of the things about which they were accusing him. As a result, the
governor was very surprised.
15 It was the governor’s custom each year during the Passover celebration to release
one person who was in prison. He released whichever prisoner the people wanted.
16 At that time there was in Jerusalem a well-known prisoner whose name was
Barabbas. 17 So when the crowd gathered, Pilate asked them, “Which prisoner would
you like me to release for you: Barabbas, or Jesus, whom some of you claim to be the
Messiah?” 18 He asked that question because he realized that the chief priests wanted
to have Jesus executed. They had brought Jesus to him only because they were jealous
of Jesus. And Pilate thought that the crowd would prefer that he release Jesus.
19 While Pilate was sitting on the platform where he made judicial decisions, his wife
sent him this message: “Early this morning I had a bad dream because of that man.
So do not condemn that righteous man!”MATTHEW 27:20
1406
MATTHEW 27:40
20 But the chief priests and elders persuaded the crowd to ask Pilate to release
Barabbas, and to order that Jesus be executed {that his soldiers execute Jesus}. 21 So
when the governor asked them, “Which of the two men do you want me to release for
you?” They replied, “Barabbas!” 22 Pilate, very astonished, asked, “So what shall I do
with Jesus who some of you say is the Messiah?” They all answered, “Command that
he be crucified! {Command your soldiers ◄to crucify him/to nail him to a cross►}!”
23 Pilate replied, “Why? What crime has he committed?” But they shouted even
louder, “Have him crucified {Command that your soldiers crucify him}!”
24 Pilate realized that he was accomplishing nothing. He saw that instead, the people
were starting to riot. So he took a basin of water and washed his hands as the crowd
was watching. He said, “By washing my hands I am showing you that if this man
dies [MTY], it is your fault, not mine!” 25 And all the people answered, “The guilt for
causing him to die [MTY] will be on us, and it will be on our children, too!” 26 Then
he ordered the soldiers to release Barabbas for them. But he ordered that his soldiers
flog Jesus. And then he turned Jesus over to the soldiers for them ◄to nail Jesus to a
cross/to crucify him►.
The soldiers made fun of Jesus before taking him to be crucified.
Matthew 27:27-31
27 Then the governor’s soldiers took Jesus into the government headquarters. The
whole ◄cohort/group of soldiers► gathered around him. 28 They pulled off his clothes,
and pretending he was a king, they put a purple robe on him. 29 They took some
branches with thorns and wove them to make a crown and put it on his head. They
put in his right hand a reed like a staff that a king would hold. Then they knelt in
front of him and made fun of him, saying, “Hooray for the king of the Jews [IRO]!”
30 They kept spitting on him. They took the staff and kept striking him on the head
with it. 31 When they had finished ridiculing him, they pulled off the robe and put
his own clothes on him. Then they led him away to the place where they would nail
him to a cross.
Jesus was crucified, along with two bandits.
Matthew 27:32-44
32 After Jesus carried his cross a short distance, the soldiers saw a man named Simon,
who was from Cyrene city. They forced him to carry the cross for Jesus. 33 They came
to a place called Golgotha. That name means ‘the place like a skull’. 34 When they got
there, they mixed with wine something that tasted very bitter. They gave it to Jesus
to drink so that he would not feel so much pain when they nailed him on the cross. But
when he tasted it, he refused to drink it. Some soldiers took his clothes. 35 Then they
nailed him to the cross. Afterwards, they divided his clothes among themselves by
gambling with something like dice to decide which piece of clothing each one would
get. 36 Then the soldiers sat down there to guard him, to prevent anyone from trying
to rescue him. 37 They fastened to the cross above Jesus’ head a sign on which had
been {they had} written why they were nailing him to the cross. But all it said was,
‘This is Jesus, the King of the Jews’. 38 Two bandits were also nailed {They also nailed
two bandits} on crosses. One was nailed to a cross on the right side of Jesus and one
to a cross on the left side. 39 The people who were passing by insulted him by shaking
their heads as if he were an evil man. 40 They said, “You said you would destroy the
Temple, and then you would build it again within three days! So if you could do that,
you should be able to save yourself! If you are the man who is also God (OR, If you
are the Son of God), come down from the cross!”MATTHEW 27:41
1407
MATTHEW 27:64
41 Similarly, the chief priests, the men who taught the Jewish laws and the elders
made fun of him. Various ones of them said things like, 42 “He claims that he saved
others [IRO] from their sicknesses, but he cannot help himself!” “He says that he is
[IRO] the King of Israel. So he should come down from the cross. Then we would
believe him!” 43 “He says that he trusts in God, and that he is the man who is also
God. So if God is pleased with him, God should rescue him now!” 44 And the two
bandits who had been crucified with him also insulted him, saying similar things.
When Jesus died at about three o’clock, several unusual events occurred.
Matthew 27:45-56
45 At noon it became dark over the whole land. It stayed dark until three o’clock
in the afternoon. 46 At about three o’clock Jesus shouted loudly, “Eli, Eli, lama
sabachthani?” That means, ‘My God, my God, why have you deserted me?’ 47 When
some of the people standing there heard the word ‘Eli’, misunderstanding it, they
said, “He is calling for the prophet Elijah!” 48 Immediately one of them ran and got a
sponge. He filled it with sour wine. Then he put the sponge on the tip of a reed and
held it up in order that Jesus could suck out the wine that was in it. 49 But the other
people there said, “Wait! Let’s see if Elijah comes to save him!” 50 Then after Jesus
shouted out loudly again, he died, giving his spirit over to God. 51 At that moment
the heavy thick curtain that closed off the most holy place in the Temple split into two
pieces from top to bottom. That signified that ordinary people could now go into the
presence of God. The earth shook, and some large rocks split open. 52 Some tombs
opened up, and the bodies of many godly people who had died became alive again.
53 They came out of the tombs, and after Jesus became alive again, they went into
Jerusalem and appeared to many people there.
54 The officer who supervised the soldiers who nailed Jesus to the cross was standing
nearby. His soldiers who had been on guard so that no one would rescue Jesus were
also there. When they felt the earthquake and saw all the other things that happened,
they were terrified. They exclaimed, “Truly he was both man and God! (OR, a Son of
God).”
55 Many women were there, watching from a distance. They were women who had
accompanied Jesus from Galilee district in order to provide the things he needed.
56 Among these women were Mary from Magdala town, another Mary who was the
mother of James and Joseph, and the mother of James and John.
Jesus was buried.
Matthew 27:57-61
57 When it was almost evening, a rich man named Joseph came there. He was from
Arimathea town. He also was a disciple of Jesus. 58 He then went to Pilate and asked
Pilate to allow him to take the body of Jesus and bury it. Pilate ordered that he be
allowed to {his soldiers let Joseph} take the body. 59 So Joseph and others took the
body and wrapped it in a clean white cloth. 60 Then they placed it in Joseph’s own
new tomb that had been dug out of the rock cliff. They rolled a huge circular flat
stone in front of the entrance to the tomb. Then they left. 61 Mary from Magdala and
the other Mary were sitting there opposite the tomb, watching.
The religious leaders arranged for Jesus’ tomb to be sealed and guarded.
Matthew 27:62-66
62 The next day was Saturday, the Jewish day of rest. The chief priests and some of
the Pharisees went to Pilate. 63 They said, “Sir, we remember that while that deceiver
was still alive, he said, ‘Three days after I die I will become alive again.’ 64 So we ask
you to order that the tomb be guarded {that soldiers guard the tomb} for three days.MATTHEW 27:65
1408
MATTHEW 28:18
If you do not do that, his disciples may come and steal the body. Then they will tell
people that he has risen from the dead. If they deceive people by saying that, it will
be worse than the way he deceived people before by saying that he was the Messiah.”
65 Pilate replied, “You can take some soldiers. Go to the tomb and make it as secure as
you know how.” 66 So they went and made the tomb secure by fastening a cord from
the stone that was in front of the entrance to the rock cliff on each side and sealing it.
They also left some soldiers there to guard the tomb.
28
After an angel appeared to several women and showed them the tomb was empty,
Jesus appeared to them.
Matthew 28:1-10
1 After ◄the Sabbath/the Jewish day of rest► ended, on Sunday morning at dawn,
Mary from Magdala and the other Mary went to look at the tomb. 2 Suddenly
there was a strong earthquake. At the same time an angel from God came down
from heaven. He went to the tomb and rolled the stone away from the entrance so
that everyone could see that the tomb was empty. Then he sat on the stone. 3 His
appearance was as bright [SIM] as lightning, and his clothes were as white as snow.
4 The guards shook because they were very afraid. Then they became completely
motionless, as though they were dead.
5 The angel said to the two women, “You should not be afraid! I know that you
are looking for Jesus, who was {whom they} ◄nailed to a cross/crucified►. 6 He is
not here! God has ◄caused him to be alive again/raised him from the dead►, just like
Jesus told you would happen! Come and see the place where his body lay! 7 Then go
quickly and tell his disciples, ‘He has risen from the dead! He will go ahead of you
to Galilee district. You will see him there.’ Pay attention to what I have told you!”
8 So the women left the tomb quickly. They were afraid, but they were also very
joyful. They ran to tell us disciples what had happened. 9 Suddenly, as they were
running, Jesus appeared to them. He said, “Greetings!” The women came close to
him. They knelt down and clasped his feet and worshipped him. 10 Then Jesus said
to them, “Do not be afraid! Go and tell ◄all my disciples/all those who have been
accompanying me► that they should go to Galilee. They will see me there.”
What the guards were told to tell people about why Jesus’ body was gone.
Matthew 28:11-15
11 While the women were going, some of the soldiers who had been guarding
the tomb went into the city. They reported to the chief priests everything that had
happened. 12 So the chief priests and Jewish elders met together. They made a plan
to explain why the tomb was empty. They gave the soldiers a lot of money as a bribe.
13 They said, “Tell people, ‘His disciples came during the night and stole his body
while we were sleeping.’ 14 If the governor hears [MTY] about this, we ourselves will
make sure that he does not get angry and punish you. So you will not have to worry.”
15 So the soldiers took the money and did as they were told {as the chief priests and
elders told them}. And this story has been told {People have told this story} among
the Jews to the very day that I am writing this.
Jesus appeared to the apostles in Galilee and gave them final instructions.
Matthew 28:16-20
16 Later we eleven disciples went to Galilee district. We went to the mountain where
Jesus had told us to go. 17 We saw him there and worshipped him. But some of us
doubted that it was really Jesus, and that he had become alive again. 18 Then JesusMATTHEW 28:19
1409
MATTHEW 28:20
came close to us and said, “My Father has given me all authority over everything and
everyone in heaven and on earth. 19 So go, and using my authority, teach my message
to people of all ethnic groups so that they may become my disciples. Baptize them to
be under the authority of [MTY] my Father, and of me, his Son, and of the Holy Spirit.
20 Teach them to obey everything that I have commanded you. And remember that
by the Spirit I will be with you always, until the end of this age.”MARK 1:1-2
1410
MARK 1:13
This book is the Gospel that Mark wrote. We call this
book
Mark
Mark 1:1-8
The good message about Jesus the Messiah, the Son of God, began when John, the
Baptizer, as was prophesied long ago, announced the coming of Jesus.
1-2 ◄This is/I want to tell you► the good message about Jesus Christ, the Son of God
(OR, the man who was also God). What I want to tell you begins just like the prophet
Isaiah said it would begin, when he wrote these words that God said to Jesus:
Listen! I am sending my messenger ahead of you. He will prepare people for
your coming. 3 He will call out to people who pass by where he is in the desolate
area, “As people improve and straighten out pathways before an important official
arrives [MET], make yourselves ready [DOU] in order that you will be prepared when
the Lord comes.”
4 The messenger that Isaiah predicted was John. People called him ‘The Baptizer’. In
the desolate area near the Jordan River he kept telling people, “If you want God to
forgive you for having sinned, you must turn away from your sinful behavior before
you ask me to baptize you.” 5 A great number [HYP] of people who lived in Jerusalem
city and elsewhere in the Judea district were going out to where John was. There,
after hearing John’s message, they responded by confessing the sinful things that they
had done. Then they were being baptized by John {John was baptizing them} in the
Jordan River. 6 John wore rough clothes made of camel’s hair. And as the prophet
Elijah had done, he wore a leather belt around his waist; and what he ate was only
grasshoppers and honey that he found in that desolate area. 7 He was preaching, “Very
shortly a man will come who is very great. I am nothing compared to him. Because
he is so superior to me, I am not even worthy to serve him like a slave by stooping
down and untying his sandals. 8 I used only water when I baptized you because you
said that you wanted to change your lives, but he will put his Holy Spirit within you
to truly change your lives.”
God showed Jesus to be the Son of God by God’s Spirit descending upon him; by
Himself, God the Father, declaring it; by Satan testing him; and by the angels taking
care of him.
Mark 1:9-13
9 During that time when John was preaching, Jesus came from Nazareth town, which
is in Galilee district. He went to where John was preaching and he was baptized by
John {John baptized him} in the Jordan River. 10 Immediately after Jesus came up out
of the water, he saw heaven opened up and he saw the Spirit of God descending on
himself. He came in the form of a dove. 11 And God [MTY] spoke to him from heaven
saying, “You are my Son, whom I love dearly. I am very pleased with you.” 12 ◄Then/
Right away► the Spirit of God sent Jesus into the desolate area. 13 He was there for 40
days. During that time, he was tempted by Satan {Satan tempted him}. There were
wild animals there also. But angels took care of him.
After John was arrested, Jesus came and preached the good message that came from
God.
Mark 1:14-15MARK 1:14
1411
MARK 1:31
14 Later, after John was put in prison {after soldiers put John in prison} because
he had rebuked the governor Herod Antipas for his sins, Jesus went to Galilee district.
There he was preaching the good message that came from God. 15 He was repeatedly
saying, “Now is the time when God will begin to rule people’s lives in a new way. So
turn away from your sinful behavior! Believe the good message in order ◄to belong
to him/to become those whose lives he will rule►!”
Jesus showed his authority when he summoned four men, and they immediately went
with him.
Mark 1:16-20
16 One day, while Jesus was walking along by Galilee Lake, he saw two men, Simon
and Simon’s younger brother, Andrew. They were casting their fishing net into the
lake. They earned money by catching and selling fish. 17 Then Jesus said to them, “Just
like you have been gathering fish, come with me and I will teach you how to gather
people to become my disciples” [MET]. 18 Immediately they abandoned the work that
they were doing with their nets, and they went with him. 19 After they had gone on a
little further, Jesus saw two other men, James and James’ younger brother, John. They
were the sons of a man named Zebedee. They were both in a boat mending fishing
nets. 20 As soon as Jesus saw them, he told them that they should leave their work and
to come with him. So they left their father, who remained in the boat with the hired
servants, and they went away with Jesus.
People were amazed as a result of Jesus expelling a demon from a man.
Mark 1:21-28
21 Later Jesus and those disciples arrived at Capernaum town. On the next ◄Sabbath/
Jewish rest day►, after Jesus had entered ◄the synagogue/the Jewish meeting place►,
he began teaching the people who had gathered there. 22 They were continually
amazed at the way he taught. He did not just teach what others had taught, like
the men who teach the Jewish laws did. They habitually just repeated what other
people had taught. Instead, he taught with his own authority. 23 Suddenly, while he
was teaching, a man appeared in their worship place who had an evil spirit in him,
and he shouted, 24 “Jesus, from Nazareth town, since we evil spirits have nothing in
common with you, ◄do not interfere with us!/what do you want with us evil spirits?►
[RHQ] ◄Do not destroy us now!/Have you come to destroy us now?► [RHQ] I know
who you are. I know that you are the holy one who has come from God!” 25 Jesus
rebuked the evil spirit, saying, “Be quiet! And come out of the man!” 26 The evil spirit
shook the man hard. He screamed loudly, and then he came out of the man and left.
27 All the people who were there were amazed. As a result, they discussed this among
themselves, exclaiming, “◄This is amazing!/What is this?► [RHQ] Not only does he
teach in a new and authoritative way, but also the evil spirits obey him when he
commands them!” 28 The people very soon told many others throughout the whole
Galilee district what Jesus had done.
Jesus healed Simon’s mother-in-law.
Mark 1:29-31
29 After they left ◄the synagogue/ the Jewish meeting place►, Jesus, Simon and
Andrew, along with James and John went directly to Simon and Andrew’s house.
30 Simon’s mother-in-law was lying in bed because she had a high fever. Right away
someone told Jesus about her being sick. 31 He went to her, and helped her up by
taking hold of her hand. She recovered at once from the fever, and then she got up
and served them some food.MARK 1:32
1412
MARK 2:2
Jesus healed many people and expelled many evil spirits from people.
Mark 1:32-34
32 That evening, after the sun had gone down and restrictions about travel on the
Sabbath/on the Jewish rest day► were ended, some people brought to Jesus many
people who were sick and others whose lives evil spirits were controlling. 33 It seemed
as though everyone [HYP, MTY] who lived in the town was gathered at the doorway
of Simon’s house. 34 Jesus healed many people who were ill with various diseases. He
also expelled many demons from people. He did not allow the demons to tell people
about him, because they knew that he had come from God, and for various reasons he
did not want everyone to know that yet.
Jesus traveled throughout Galilee, preaching and expelling evil spirits from people.
Mark 1:35-39
35 Jesus got up very early the next morning while it was still dark. He left the house
and went away from the town to a place where there were no people. Then he prayed
there. 36 Simon and his companions searched for him. When they found him, wanting
him to go back to town to help other people, they said to him, 37 “Come back to the town
with us, because many [HYP] people in Capernaum are looking for you!” 38 He said
to them, “No, let’s go on to the neighboring towns in order that I can preach there
also, because the reason that I came into the world was to preach to people in many
places!” 39 So they went throughout Galilee district. As they did so, each ◄Sabbath/
Jewish rest day► he preached in ◄synagogues/Jewish meeting places►. He was also
expelling evil spirits from people.
Jesus cured a leper and arranged for him to be able to associate with people again.
Mark 1:40-45
40 One day a man who had a bad skin disease called leprosy came to Jesus. He knelt
down in front of Jesus and then he pleaded with him saying, “Please heal me, because
I know you are able to heal me if you want to!” 41 Jesus felt very sorry for him.
So he ignored the religious laws about coming close to people who had that disease.
He reached out his hand and touched the man. Then he said to him, “Since I am
willing to heal you, be healed {I heal you} now!” 42 Immediately the man was healed!
He was no longer a leper! 43 Jesus spoke sternly to him before he sent him away.
44 What Jesus said was, “Go to a local priest and show yourself to him in order that he
may examine you and verify that you are healed. Then, after the priest tells the local
people, they will know that you have been healed, and you will be able to associate
with them again. Make sure that you do not tell others about what happened Then
go to Jerusalem and take to the priest what Moses commanded that people who have
been healed from leprosy should offer, in order that he may offer it as a sacrifice to
God.” 45 The man went and presented himself to the priest. But then he began to tell
many people about how Jesus had healed him [DOU]. As a result, Jesus was no longer
able to enter any town publicly because the crowds would surround him. Instead, he
remained outside the towns in places where no people lived. But people kept coming
to him from all over that region.
2
By healing a paralyzed man Jesus demonstrated his authority to forgive sins as well
as to heal.
Mark 2:1-12
1 Jesus and his disciples returned to Capernaum town. A few days later, because
it was {people} heard that Jesus was in his house, 2 many people gathered there.
As a result, after the people filled the house, there was no longer space to stand inMARK 2:3
1413
MARK 2:17
the house or outside around the doorway. Jesus preached God’s message to them.
3 Some people came to the house bringing to Jesus a man who was paralyzed. He
was carried by four men {Four men carried him} on a sleeping pad. 4 They were
not able to bring the man to Jesus because there was a crowd there. So they went
up the steps to the flat roof and removed some of the tiles above where Jesus was.
Then, after they made a big hole in the roof, they lowered by ropes the sleeping pad
on which the paralyzed man lay. They lowered it through the hole, down in front of
Jesus. 5 After Jesus perceived that the men believed that he could heal this man, he
said to the paralyzed man, “My friend, I forgive your sins!” 6 There were some men
who taught the Jewish laws sitting there. They started thinking like this: 7 “◄Who
does this man think he is, talking like that/This man shouldn’t talk like that!► [RHQ]?
◄He is insulting God!/Does he think he is God?► [RHQ] ◄No person can forgive sins!/
Who can forgive sins?► [RHQ] Only God can forgive sins!” 8 Jesus sensed that they
were deliberating like that within themselves. So he said to them, “◄You should not
question within yourselves whether I have the right to forgive this man’s sins!/Why
do you question whether I have the right to forgive this man’s sins?► [RHQ] 9 It is not
risky [RHQ] for someone to tell the man who is paralyzed, ‘Your sins are forgiven {I
forgive your sins},’ because no one can prove that it has happened. But no one would
say to him, ‘Get up, pick up your stretcher, and then walk away’, unless he really had
the power to heal him, because people can easily see whether it happens or not. 10 So I
will do something in order that you may know that God has authorized me, the one
who came from heaven, to forgive sins on earth as well as to heal people.” Then
he said to the paralyzed man, 11 “To you I say, ‘Get up! Pick up your sleeping pad!
And then go home!’ ” 12 * The man stood up immediately! He picked up the sleeping
pad, and then he went away, while all the people there were watching. They were all
amazed, and they praised God and said, “We have never before seen anything like
what happened just now!”
Jesus invited Levi to be his disciple and refuted those who objected to his associating
with such people.
Mark 2:13-17
13 Jesus left Capernaum town again and walked with his disciples alongside Galilee
lake. A large crowd came to him. Then he taught them. 14 As he walked on further, he
saw a man named Levi, whose other name was Matthew, and whose father’s name
was Alpheus. He was sitting in his office where he collected taxes for the Roman
government. Jesus said to him, “Come with me and become my disciple!” So he got up
and went with Jesus.
15 Later, Jesus was eating a meal in Levi’s house. Many men who collected taxes
and other people who were considered to be sinning regularly were eating with Jesus
and his disciples. This was not surprising, for there were many people like this who
were going everywhere with Jesus. 16 The men who taught the Jewish laws who were
there and who were members of the Pharisee sect saw that Jesus was eating with
men who collected taxes and others who were considered {whom they considered}
to be sinners. So they said to his disciples, “◄It is disgusting that he eats with such
disgusting men as those who collect taxes, and with other sinners!/Why is it that he
eats with such disgusting men as those who collect taxes, and with other sinners?►”
[RHQ] 17 After Jesus heard what they were saying, he said to the men who taught the
Jewish laws, “People who consider that they are well do not seek a doctor. On the
contrary, it is those who are sick who seek a doctor [MET]!” This he said to indicate
that it was those who knew that they had sinned who were coming to him in order that
* 2:12 COL 5:1MARK 2:18
1414
MARK 2:26
he might help them spiritually. And he said, “I did not come to invite people who think
that [IRO] they are righteous to come to me and turn from their sinful behavior. On
the contrary, I came from heaven to invite people who know that they are sinners, in
order that they might turn from their sins and come to me.”
Jesus told them it was inappropriate for his disciples to show sorrow by fasting
while he was with them, and that requiring people to perform rituals like fasting was
inconsistent with the new way of life he was bringing.
Mark 2:18-22
18 The disciples of John the Baptizer and some men who belonged to the Pharisee
sect used to abstain from food to show that they wanted to please God. One day, some
people came to Jesus and asked him critically, “The disciples of John and the Pharisees
◄fast/abstain from food► from time to time, but your disciples do not. We think they
should abstain from food also. What do you say about that [RHQ]?” 19 Jesus wanted
them to understand that it was not appropriate for his disciples to show sorrow by
abstaining from food while he was still with them. So he said to them, “When a man
is marrying a woman, his friends will certainly not abstain from food while he is still
with them, will they [RHQ]? No. During the time that he is with them, they will not
abstain from food because they are happy together. 20 But some day, he will be taken
away {his enemies will take him away} from them. Then, in those days, they will
abstain from food, because they will be sad.”
21 Jesus wanted to show that those who desire to live in accordance with his new
message should not try to continue to obey the old religious traditions like fasting.
So he also said to them, “People do not sew a patch of unshrunken cloth on an old
garment in order to mend a hole. If they did that, when they washed the garment, the
patch would shrink and the new piece of cloth would tear off more of the old cloth. As
a result, the hole would become bigger! 22 Similarly, people do not put newly squeezed
grape juice into old skin bags to store it. If they did that, that juice will burst the skin
bags because they would not stretch when the wine ferments and expands. As a result
both the wine and the skin bags would be ruined! On the contrary, people must put
new wine into new skin bags!” [MET]
When the Pharisees complained about Jesus’ disciples plucking grain on the Sabbath
day, Jesus replied that there was Scriptural precedent for ignoring religious laws if there
was a physical need, and that he is the one to decide what people should do on the
Sabbath.
Mark 2:23-28
23 On one ◄Sabbath/Jewish day of rest► Jesus was walking through some grain
fields with his disciples. As they were walking along through the grain fields, the
disciples were plucking some of the heads of grain. They rubbed them in their hands
to remove the chaff, and were eating the grain. The laws of Moses permitted people
to do that if they were hungry. 24 Some of the Pharisees saw them doing what they
considered to be work. So they said to him, “Look! ◄They should not be doing on
our ◄Sabbath day/day of rest► work that our laws forbid!/Why are they doing on
our ◄Sabbath day/day of rest► work that our laws forbid?► [RHQ]” 25 Jesus wanted
to show them that the record in the Scriptures indicated that God permitted people to
disobey certain religious laws when they needed food. So he said to them, “It is written
in the Scriptures what our revered ancestor, King David, did when he needed food, and
both he and the men with him were hungry. You have read about that, but ◄you do
not think about what it implies./why do you not think about what it implies?► [RHQ]
26 During the time Abiathar was high priest, David entered the big tent where people
worshipped God and asked for some bread. The high priest gave him some of the loavesMARK 2:27
1415
MARK 3:12
of bread. That bread was the bread he had presented to God. It was permitted in
one of Moses’ laws that only the priests could eat that bread! But David ate some
of it. Then he also gave some of it to the men who were with him. But God did not
consider that was wrong!” 27 Jesus said to them further, “God established ◄the day of
rest/the Sabbath day► to help people! He did not create people to obey rules about
◄the Sabbath/the day of rest►! 28 And think about this: I am the one who came from
heaven. So I have the authority to determine what is right for my disciples to do ◄on
the Sabbath/on the Jewish rest day►!”
3
After Jesus healed a man with a withered arm on the Sabbath, Jewish leaders began
to plan to kill him.
Mark 3:1-6
1 On another ◄Sabbath/Jewish day of rest►, Jesus entered ◄the synagogue/the Jewish
meeting place► again. There was a man there whose hand was shriveled. 2 Some men
of the Pharisee sect watched him carefully in order to see whether he would heal the
man ◄on the Sabbath/on the Jewish rest day►. They did this in order that if he healed
the man, they would accuse him of disobeying their Jewish laws, because he worked
◄on the Sabbath/on the Jewish rest day►. 3 Jesus said to the man whose hand was
shriveled, “Stand up here in front of everyone!” So the man stood up. 4 Then Jesus
said to the Pharisees, “Do the laws that God gave Moses permit people to do good ◄on
the Sabbath/on the Jewish rest day►, or do they permit people to do evil? Specifically,
do his laws permit us to save a person’s life ◄on the Sabbath/on the Jewish rest
day►, or do they permit us to let him die by refusing to help him?” But they did not
reply. 5 He looked around at them angrily. He was very distressed that they were
stubbornly not wanting to help the man. So he said to the man, “Reach out your
hand!” When the man reached out his withered hand, his hand became all right
again! 6 Then the Pharisees decided to get rid of Jesus. So after they left the meeting
house, they immediately met with some of the Jews who supported Herod Antipas,
who ruled Galilee district. Together they planned how they could kill Jesus.
Many people came from various areas to hear Jesus, because he had healed many.
Mark 3:7-12
7 Jesus and his disciples left that town and went to an area further along Galilee
Lake in order to get away from the people. But a great crowd of people followed him.
They were people who came from Galilee district, 8 from Jerusalem city, from other
towns of Judea district, from Idumea district, from the region on the east side of the
Jordan River, and from the region around Tyre and Sidon cities. This great crowd of
people came to him because they heard about what he was doing. 9-10 Because he had
healed many people, many other people who had various illnesses pushed forward
in order that by touching him they would come well. So he told his disciples that they
should get a small boat ready for him to get in and teach from it. He wanted to do this
in order that the crowd would not crush him when they pushed forward to touch him.
11 Whenever the evil spirits saw Jesus, they caused the people whom they controlled to
fall down in front of Jesus in recognition of Jesus’ power. Then they exclaimed, “You
are ◄the Son of God/the man who is also God►!” 12 He commanded the evil spirits
strongly that they should not tell anyone who he was.
Jesus appointed the twelve apostles.
Mark 3:13-19MARK 3:13
1416
MARK 3:33
13 Jesus went with many other people up into the hills.
After he picked out from
among them the men whom he wanted to accompany him, they came close to him.
14 He appointed twelve men in order that they might be with him and in order that he
might send them out to preach. He called them apostles. 15 He also gave them power
in order that they might expel evil spirits from people. 16 These were the twelve men
he appointed: Simon, to whom he gave the new name Peter; his younger brother
Andrew; 17 James, the son of Zebedee, and John, the younger brother of James, to both
of whom he added the new name, ‘Men who are like Thunder’. because of their fiery
zeal; 18 Philip; Bartholomew; Levi, whose other name was Matthew; Thomas; another
James, the son of Alphaeus; Thaddeus; another Simon, who was a member of the party
that wanted to overthrow the Roman government; 19 and Judas Iscariot (OR, Judas, the
man from Kerioth Town). He was the one who later ◄betrayed Jesus/helped Jesus’
enemies seize him►.
Jesus explained why their claim that he was expelling evil spirits by Satan’s power
was ridiculous, and that such a claim was an unforgivable sin.
Mark 3:20-30
20 Jesus along with his disciples went to the house where he was staying in
Capernaum. Again a crowd gathered where he was. There were many people crowding
around him, so that he and his disciples had no time when they could eat or when
they could do anything else. 21 After his relatives heard about this, they went to take
him home with them because ◄some people/they► were saying that he was insane.
22 Around that time some men who taught the Jewish laws came down from
Jerusalem city. They heard that Jesus was expelling demons. So they were telling
people, “Beelzebub, who rules the evil spirits, controls him. He is the one who enables
this man to expel evil spirits from people!” 23 Jesus summoned those men. Then
he spoke to them in parables to enable them to realize that Satan would not oppose
his own evil spirits. He also wanted them to realize that by expelling evil spirits, he
was demonstrating that he was much more powerful than Satan. So he said, “◄It is
ridiculous to suggest that Satan would expel his own evil spirits!/Why would Satan
expel his own evil spirits?► [RHQ] 24 If people who live in the same country are fighting
one another, they will cease to be a single group under one ruler. 25 And if people
who live in the same house fight each other, they will certainly not remain as one
family. 26 Similarly, if Satan and his evil spirits were fighting one another, instead of
remaining strong, he would become powerless. 27 Contrary to what you say about me,
someone can enter the house of a strong man like Satan and carry off his possessions
only if he first ties up the strong man. Then and only then will he be able to steal the
things in that man’s house.” 28 Jesus also said, “Consider this carefully! People may
sin in many ways and they may speak evilly about God, but if they then are sorry and
ask God to forgive them, God will forgive them for doing that. 29 But if anyone speaks
evil words about what the Holy Spirit does, God will never forgive that. That person’s
guilt will remain with him forever.”
30 Jesus told them that because they refused to admit that the Holy Spirit was helping
him to expel demons. Instead, they were saying, “An evil spirit is controlling him!”
Jesus told them that those who obey God are as dear to him as his close relatives.
Mark 3:31-35
31 Jesus’ mother and younger siblings arrived. While they stood outside, they sent
someone inside in order to call him outside. 32 A crowd was sitting around Jesus. One
of them said to him, “Listen/Hey, your mother and your younger brothers and sisters
are outside, and they are wanting ◄to see/to talk with► you!” 33 Jesus replied to them,MARK 3:34
1417
MARK 4:17
“◄I will tell you something about my mother and my brothers./Do you know whom I
consider to be like my mother and my brothers?►” [RHQ] 34 After he looked around
at the disciples who were sitting around him in a circle, he said, “Look here! I love
these men as much as I love my mother and my brothers. 35 Those who habitually do
what God wants are as dear to me [MET] as my brother, my sister, or my mother!”
4
Jesus taught the crowds by parables about the various ways that people who hear
his message react.
Mark 4:1-25
1 Another time Jesus began to teach people alongside Lake Galilee. As he was doing
that, a very large crowd gathered around him. Because people were jostling him, he
got into a boat in the lake so that he could speak to the crowd better. Then he sat
in it and began to teach the crowd from the boat. At the same time, the crowd was
on the shore close to the lake. 2 Then he taught them many parables. While he was
teaching them, he told them this: 3 “Consider well the meaning of this illustration: A
man/farmer went out to his field to sow some seeds. 4 As he was scattering them over
the soil, some of the seeds fell on the path. Then some birds came and ate those seeds.
5 Other seeds fell on ground where there was not much soil on top of rock. Very soon
the seeds sprouted because the sun warmed the moist soil quickly where it was not
deep. 6 But after the sun shone on those young plants, they became scorched. Then
they withered because they did not have deep roots. 7 As the farmer sowed, other
seeds fell on ground that contained roots of thorny plants. The seeds grew, but the
thorny plants also grew up and crowded out the good plants. So the plants produced
no grain. 8 But as the farmer sowed, other seeds fell on good soil. As a result, they
sprouted, they grew well, and then they produced plenty of grain. Some plants bore
30 grains. Some bore 60 grains. Some bore 100 grains.” 9 Then Jesus said, “If you
want to understand this [MTY], you should consider carefully what I have just said.”
10 Later, when only the twelve disciples and a few other people were with him,
they asked him about the parables. 11 He said to them, “People have not understood
before the new message about how God wants to rule people’s lives. It is to you that
this is being made known {that I am making this known}. But I tell about this only
◄in parables/figuratively► to those who have not yet invited God to rule their lives.
12 As a result it is true what a prophet has written,
Although they see what I do, they do not perceive what it means [DOU]. Although
they hear what I say, they do not understand what it means [DOU]. So they do
not ◄repent/turn away from their sinful behavior► in order that they would be
forgiven {God would forgive them}.”
13 He also said to them, “◄I am disappointed that you do not understand this
illustration!/Can you not understand this illustration?► [RHQ] If you do not understand
this, ◄you will certainly not understand any of the other illustrations!/how will you
understand any of the other illustrations?► [RHQ] Nevertheless, I will explain it to
you. 14 In the illustration that I told you, the man who sows seeds represents someone
who declares God’s message [DOU]. 15 Some people are like the path on which some of
the seeds fell. When they hear the message, Satan comes at once and causes them to
forget what they have heard. 16 Some people are like the ground where the soil was not
very deep over rock. When they hear God’s message, they immediately accept it with
joy. 17 But, because the message does not penetrate deeply [MET] into their hearts/inner
beings, they believe it for only a short time. They are like the plants that did not have
deep roots. When others treat such people badly or cause them to suffer because theyMARK 4:18
1418
MARK 4:34
believe, those people who are suffering soon stop believing God’s message. 18 Some
people are like the soil that had roots of thorny weeds in it. Although those people
hear God’s message, 19 they desire to be rich, and they desire to own many other
things. So they worry only about material things. The result is that they forget God’s
message and they do not do the things that God wants them to do. 20 But some people
are like the good soil. They hear God’s message and they accept it and they believe it.
Then they do the things that God wants them to do. They are like the good plants that
produced 30, 60 or 100 grains.”
21 He also told them another parable, saying, “◄People certainly do not light an oil
lamp and then bring it in the house in order that it may be put {someone may put
it} under a container or under a bed./Would anyone light an oil lamp and then bring
it in the house in order that it may be put {someone may put it} under a container
or under a bed?► [RHQ] ◄No, they light it in order that it may be put {someone may
put it} in a place where it lights the house./Wouldn’t they light it in order that it may
be put {someone may put it} in a place where it lights the house?► [RHQ] 22 Similarly,
there are some parts of God’s message that people do not know. But he intends that
people will understand all the things that they do not know now. 23 If you want to
understand this, you should consider carefully what you have just heard.”
24 Then he said to them, “Consider carefully what you hear me say to you, for God
will let you understand to the same degree that you consider what I say. He will let you
understand even more than that. 25 Those who consider what I say and understand
it, God will enable them to understand more. But those who do not consider carefully
what I say, they will forget even what they already know.”
Jesus told them two parables to show them how the number of people who will
submit to God’s rule over their lives will greatly increase.
Mark 4:26-34
26 Jesus also said, “God has the power to change people who let him rule their
lives. I will illustrate how that can happen [MET]. A man planted seeds in the ground.
27 Afterwards he slept each night and rose each day without worrying about the seeds.
During that time the seeds sprouted and grew in a way that he did not understand,
because by itself the soil caused the plants to grow and produce grain. 28 First the stalks
appeared. Then the heads appeared. Then the full kernels in the heads appeared. 29 As
soon as the grain was ripe he sent people [MTY] to harvest it because it was time to
harvest the grain.”
30 Jesus told them another parable. He said, “I will tell you [RHQ] how the number
of people whose lives God rules in a new way will continue to grow (OR, each continue
to have more and more influence in this world). I hope [RHQ] that this illustration
will show this to you. 31 You know what happens to mustard seeds when we plant
them. Though mustard seeds are among the smallest of seeds, here in Israel they
become large plants. 32 After they are planted, they grow up and become larger than
the other garden plants. They put out big branches so that birds are able to make
nests in their shade.”
33 Jesus used many such illustrations when he talked to the people about God. If
they were able to understand some, he kept telling them more. 34 He always used
parables when he spoke to them. But he explained all the illustrations to his own
disciples when he was alone with them.
While Jesus and his disciples crossed the lake in a boat and while Jesus slept, a storm
arose, so the disciples woke him and he calmed the storm.
Mark 4:35-41MARK 4:35
1419
MARK 5:16
35 On that same day, when the sun was setting, Jesus said to his disciples, “Let’s cross
over to the opposite side of Lake Galilee in the boat.” 36 So they left the crowd, got
in the boat where Jesus already was, and left. Other people went with them in other
boats. 37 A strong wind came up and the waves started coming into the boat! The
boat was soon nearly full of water! 38 Jesus was in the back part of the boat. He was
sleeping, with his head on a cushion. So they woke him up and said to him, “Teacher!
◄You ought to be concerned that we are about to die!/Are you not concerned that we
are about to die?► [RHQ]” 39 So Jesus got up and rebuked the wind. Then he said to
the lake, “Be quiet! Be still! [DOU]” The wind immediately stopped blowing and then
the lake became very calm. 40 He said to the disciples, “◄I am disappointed that you
are afraid like that!/Why are you afraid like that?► [RHQ] Do you not yet believe that
I can protect you?” 41 They were very awestruck. They said to one another, “Not only
do the demons obey this man, but even the wind and the waves obey him! “◄What
kind of man is he?/This man is not like ordinary people!► [RHQ]”
5
Jesus expelled evil spirits from a Gerasene man and then allowed them to enter a
herd of pigs, which then ran down a hill and drowned. As a result, the local people
asked Jesus to leave the area.
Mark 5:1-20
1 Jesus and his disciples arrived on the east side of Lake Galilee. They landed near
where the Gerasene people lived. 2 There was a man in that region whom evil spirits
controlled. 3 Because that man was violent and people were afraid of him, they had tied
him up many times. As he grew more violent, no one was able to tie him up any longer,
not even with chains, 4 because the chains would be broken by him {he would break
the chains} whenever he was bound {they bound him} with them. The iron shackles
would also be smashed by him {He would also smash the iron shackles} whenever
they were fastened {they fastened them} on his feet. 5 He lived in one of the caves
where they bury dead people. During both night and day he would scream among the
caves and in the hills. He would also cut himself with sharp stones. That day he came
out of the caves. 6 As Jesus and his disciples got out of the boat, that man saw Jesus
from a distance. He immediately ran to Jesus, and then he knelt before him. 7-8 Jesus
said to the evil spirit, “You evil spirit, come out of this man!” But the demon did not
leave quickly. It shouted very loudly, “Jesus, I know that you are the ◄Son of/man who
is also► God, so ◄we have nothing in common./what do we have in common?► [IDM,
RHQ] So leave me alone I ask you to promise, knowing God is listening, that you will
not torture me now!” 9 So, in order to expel the demon more easily, Jesus asked him,
“What is your name?” He replied, “My name is Crowd/Mob because there are many
of us evil spirits in this man.” 10 Then the evil spirits fervently kept begging Jesus
that he not send them out of the region. 11 At the same time, a large herd of pigs was
◄grazing/rooting for food► nearby on the hillside. 12 So the evil spirits pleaded with
Jesus, “Allow us to go to the pigs in order that we might enter them!” 13 He permitted
them to do that. So the evil spirits left the man and entered the pigs. The herd, which
numbered about 2,000, rushed down the cliff into the lake, and drowned in the lake.
14 The men who had been tending the pigs ran and reported in the town and the
countryside what had happened. Many people went to see what had happened. 15 They
came to the place where Jesus was. Then they saw the man whom evil spirits had
previously controlled. He was sitting there with clothes on and mentally sound. As
a result, they became afraid because they thought that Jesus might destroy more of
their property. (OR, they realized that Jesus must be very powerful.) 16 The people whoMARK 5:17
1420
MARK 5:37-38
had seen what had happened described what had happened to the man whom the
evil spirits previously controlled. They also described what had happened to the pigs.
17 Then the people pleaded with Jesus to leave their region.
18 As Jesus got in the boat in order to leave, the man whom the evil spirits previously
controlled begged Jesus, “Please let me go with you!” 19 But Jesus did not let him go
with him. On the contrary, he said to him, “Go home to your family and tell them how
much the Lord God has done for you, and tell them how God was kind to you.” 20 So
the man left and traveled around the Ten Towns district. He told people how much
Jesus had done for him. All the people who heard what the man said were amazed.
Jesus cured a woman who had been suffering from hemorrhaging, and brought
Jairus’ daughter back to life.
Mark 5:21-43
21 Jesus and his disciples went in a boat back around Lake Galilee to where they were
before. When they arrived at the shore of the lake, a large crowd gathered around
Jesus. 22 One of the men who presided over a ◄synagogue/Jewish meeting place►,
whose name was Jairus, came there. When he saw Jesus, he prostrated himself at his
feet. 23 Then he pleaded with Jesus earnestly, “My twelve-year old daughter is sick
and nearly dead! Please come to my house and place your hands on her in order that
she will be healed {to heal her}, so that she will not die!” 24 So Jesus and the disciples
went with him.
A large crowd followed Jesus and many pushed close to him. 25 There was a woman
in the crowd who had vaginal bleeding [EUP] every day for twelve years. 26 She had
suffered much while many doctors treated her. But although she had spent all her
money to pay the doctors, she had not been helped {they had not helped her}. Instead,
she had become worse [EUP]. 27 After she heard that Jesus healed people, she came to
where he was and pushed in the crowd close behind Jesus. 28 She did that because she
was thinking, “If I touch him or even if I touch his clothes, I will be healed {his power
will heal me}.” So she touched Jesus’ clothes. 29 At once her bleeding stopped. At
the same time, she sensed that she had been cured of {that he had cured} her illness.
30 Jesus also immediately sensed that his power had healed someone. So he turned
around in the crowd and asked, “Who touched my clothes?” 31 One of his disciples
replied, “You can see that many people are crowding close to you! Probably many
people touched you! So ◄why do you ask ‘Who touched me?’/We are surprised that
you ask ‘Who touched me?’ [RHQ]►” 32 But Jesus kept looking around in order to see
the one who had done it. 33 The woman was very afraid and trembling. She thought
that Jesus might be angry because she had violated the law that women who had such
a sickness should not touch other people. But she knew that Jesus had healed her. So
she prostrated herself before him. Then she told him truthfully about what she had
done. 34 He said to her, “◄Ma’am/Young lady►, because you have believed that I could
heal you, I have healed you. You may go home with peace in your heart/inner being,
because I promise that you will not be sick this way any more.”
35 While Jesus was still speaking to that woman, some people arrived who had come
from Jairus’ house. They said to Jairus, “Your daughter has now died. So ◄it is useless
that you bother the teacher any longer by urging him to go to your house!/why do you
bother the teacher any longer by urging him to go to your house?► [RHQ]” 36 But when
Jesus heard what these men said, he said to Jairus, “Do not think that the situation
is hopeless! Just keep believing that she will live!” 37-38 Then he allowed only his
three closest disciples, Peter, James, and John, to go with him to Jairus’ house. He did
not allow any other people to go with him. After they arrived near the house, Jesus
saw that the people there were in turmoil. They were weeping and wailing [DOU]MARK 5:39
1421
MARK 6:10
loudly. 39 He entered the house and then he said to them, knowing that he was going
to cause her to live again, “◄Do not make such a disturbance!/Why are you making
such a disturbance?► [RHQ] Stop crying, for the child is not dead! On the contrary,
she is only sleeping [HYP, EUP]!” 40 The people laughed at him, because they knew
that she was dead. But he sent all the other people outside the house. Then he took
the child’s father and mother and the three disciples who were with him. He went
into the room where the child was lying. 41 He took hold of the child’s hand and said
to her in her own language, “Talitha, Koum!” That means, “Little girl, get up!” 42 At
once the girl got up and walked around. (It was not surprising that she could walk,
because she was twelve years old.) When this happened, all who were present were
very astonished. 43 Jesus ordered them strictly, “Do not tell anyone about what I have
done!” Afterwards he told them that something to eat should be brought to the girl
{that they should bring the girl something to eat}.
6
Jesus taught in the synagogue, and the people who heard him were amazed and
offended.
Mark 6:1-6a
1 Jesus left Capernaum city and went to his hometown, Nazareth. His disciples went
with him. 2 ◄On the Sabbath/On the Jewish rest day►, he entered the Jewish worship
house and taught the people. Many who were listening to him were astonished. But
some were saying, “This man is just an ordinary person like we are! So ◄we cannot
believe that this man is able to teach us about these things and that he has been
made very wise {that God has made him very wise} and that he is performing such
miracles!/how is it that [RHQ] this man is able to teach us about these things and
that he has been made very wise {that God has made him very wise} and that he is
performing such miracles?► [RHQ] 3 ◄We know that he is just an ordinary carpenter!/
Isn’t he just an ordinary carpenter [RHQ]?► We know him and his family! We know
Mary his mother! ◄We know his younger brothers James, Joses, Judas and Simon!/Are
not his younger brothers James, Joses, Judas and Simon?► [RHQ] And ◄his younger
sisters also live here in this town!/do not his younger sisters also live here in this
town?► [RHQ]” So they despised him. 4 Jesus knew that they refused to believe in him.
So he said to them, “It is certainly true that people honor me and other prophets in
other places, but not in our hometowns! Even our relatives and the people who live
in our own houses do not honor us!”
5 So, although he healed a few sick people there by touching them, he decided not
to perform many other miracles in Nazareth because the people there did not believe
that he was the Messiah. 6 He was amazed that they did not believe in him.
Jesus began to send out his disciples two-by-two and gave them power and
instructions.
Mark 6:6b-13
Jesus and his disciples went from town to town in that region teaching the people.
7 One day he summoned the twelve disciples, and then he told them that he was going
to send them out two-by-two to teach people in various towns. He gave them power to
expel evil spirits from people. 8-9 He also instructed them to wear sandals and to take
along a walking stick when they were traveling. He told them not to take food, nor
a bag in which travelers carry supplies, nor any money for their journey. He also did
not allow them to take extra clothing. He wanted the people who heard their message
to give them what they needed. 10 He also instructed them, “After you enter a town,
if someone invites you to stay in his house, go into his house. Eat and sleep in thatMARK 6:11
1422
MARK 6:28
same home until you leave that town. 11 Wherever the people do not welcome you
and wherever the people do not listen to you, shake off the dust from your feet as
you leave that place. By doing that, you will warn them that God will punish them for
rejecting your message.” 12 So after the disciples went out to various towns, they were
preaching that people should stop their sinful behavior. 13 They were also expelling
many evil spirits from people, and they were anointing many sick people with olive
oil and healing them.
King Herod heard about Jesus and wondered if he was John the Baptizer, come back
after King Herod had ordered John to be executed due to the insistence of his wife,
Herodias.
Mark 6:14-29
14 King Herod Antipas heard about what Jesus was doing, because many people
were talking about it. Some people were saying about Jesus, “He must be John the
Baptizer! He has come back to life! That is why he has God’s power to perform
these miracles!” 15 Others were saying about Jesus, “He is the former prophet Elijah,
whom God promised to send back again.” Others were saying about Jesus, “No, he
is a different prophet, like one of the other prophets who lived long ago.” 16 Having
heard what the people were saying, King Herod Antipas himself repeatedly said, “The
man performing those miracles must be John! I commanded my soldiers to cut off his
head, but he has come back to life again to get revenge for my killing him!” 17 The
reason King Herod concluded that John wanted revenge is as follows: Some time before
this, Herod married Herodias, while she was still the wife of his younger brother,
Philip. 18 John kept telling Herod, “God’s law does not permit you to marry the wife
of your brother while he is still alive.” Then, because Herodias urged him to put John
in prison, Herod himself sent soldiers to John. They seized John and put him in prison.
19 But because Herodias wanted to get further revenge on John, she wanted someone
to execute him. But she could not do that because while John was in prison, Herod
kept John safe from her. 20 Herod did this because he respected/feared John, because
he knew that he was a righteous and holy man. The king did not know what he
should do, but he liked to listen to him. 21 But Herodias was able to have someone
execute John when they honored/celebrated the day when Herod was born. On that
day, he invited the most important government officials, the most important army
leaders, and the most important men in Galilee district in order that they might eat
and celebrate with him. 22 While they were eating, Herodias’ daughter came into the
room and danced, and that pleased King Herod and his guests. So the king said to
her, “Ask me for whatever you desire and I will give it to you!” 23 He said to her,
“Whatever you ask, I will give it to you! I will give you up to half of what I own
and rule, if you ask for it. May God punish me if I do not do what I have promised!”
24 The girl immediately left the room and went to her mother. She told her what the
king had said, and asked her, “What shall I ask for?” Her mother replied, “Ask the
king to give you the head of John the Baptizer!” 25 The girl quickly entered the room
again. She went to the king and she requested, “I want you to command someone
to cut off the head of John the Baptizer and give it to me at once on a platter, so that
my mother can know he is dead!” 26 The king became very distressed when he heard
what she asked for, because he knew John was a very righteous man (OR, because
he now knew that he should not have made that promise to her). But he could not
refuse what she requested because he had promised that he would give her anything
she asked for, and because his guests had heard him promise that. 27 So the king at
once ordered the man who executes prisoners to go and cut off John’s head and bring
it to the girl. That man went to the prison and cut off John’s head. 28 He put it on aMARK 6:29
1423
MARK 6:48
platter, brought it back, and gave it to the girl. The girl took it to her mother. 29 After
John’s disciples heard what happened, they went to the prison and took John’s body
and then they buried it in a burial cave.
The apostles returned to Jesus to report what they had done. Then they all went off
to a lonely place, but many people followed them.
Mark 6:30-34
30 The twelve apostles returned to Jesus from the places to which they had gone. They
reported to him what they had done and what they had taught to people. 31 He said
to them, “Come with me to a place where no people are living, in order that we can
be alone and rest a little while!” He said this because many people were continually
coming to them and going away again, with the result that Jesus and his disciples did
not have time to eat or do anything else. 32 So they went away by themselves in a boat
to a place where no people were living. 33 But many people saw them leaving. They
also recognized that they were Jesus and the disciples, and they saw where they were
going. So they ran ahead on land from all the nearby towns to the place where Jesus
and his disciples were going. They actually arrived there before Jesus and the disciples.
34 As Jesus and his disciples got out of the boat, Jesus saw this large crowd. He felt
sorry for them because they were confused, like sheep that do not have a shepherd.
So he taught them many things.
When it became late in the afternoon the people became hungry and there was no
place to obtain food; as a result, Jesus miraculously provided food for them.
Mark 6:35-44
35 Late in the afternoon, the disciples came to him and said, “This is a place where
no people live and it is very late. 36 So send the people away in order that they may
go to the surrounding farms and villages in order that they can buy for themselves
something to eat!” 37 But he replied, “No, you yourselves give them something to eat!”
They replied, “◄We could not buy enough bread to feed this crowd, even if we had
as much money as a man earns by working 200 days!/How could we buy enough
bread to feed this mob, even if we had as much money as a man earns by working
200 days?►” [RHQ] 38 But he replied to them, “How many loaves of bread do you
have? Go and find out!” They went and found out and then they told him, “We have
only five flat loaves and two cooked fish!” 39 He instructed the disciples to tell all the
people to sit down on the green grass. 40 So the people sat in groups. There were
50 people in some groups and 100 people in other groups. 41 Jesus took the five flat
loaves and the two fish. He looked up towards heaven and thanked God for them.
Then he broke the loaves and fish into pieces and kept giving them to the disciples in
order that they would distribute them to the people. 42 Everyone ate this food until
they all had enough to eat! 43 The disciples then collected twelve baskets full of pieces
of bread and of the fish that were left over. 44 There were approximately 5,000 men
who ate the bread and fish. They did not even count the women and children.
Jesus sent his disciples ahead of him to Bethsaida by boat while he stayed to pray.
Later he saw that they were in difficulty due to a wind blowing against them, so he went
to them, walking on the water.
Mark 6:45-52
45 Right away Jesus told his disciples to get into the boat and then go ahead of him
to Bethsaida town, which was further around Lake Galilee. He stayed and dismissed
the many people who were there. 46 After he said goodbye to the people, he went up
into the hills in order to pray. 47 When it was evening, the disciples’ boat was in the
middle of the lake and Jesus was by himself on the land. 48 He saw that the wind wasMARK 6:49
1424
MARK 7:7
blowing against them as they rowed. As a result, they were having great difficulty.
He approached them early in the morning, when it was still dark, by walking on the
water. He intended to walk by them. 49 They saw him walking on the water, but
they thought that he was a ghost. They screamed 50 because they all were terrified
when they saw him. But he talked to them. He said to them, “Be calm! Do not be
afraid, because it is I!” 51 He got into the boat and sat down with them and the wind
immediately stopped blowing. They were completely amazed about what he had done.
52 Although they had seen Jesus multiply the bread and the fish, they did not understand
from that how powerful he was, as they should have. They did not think clearly about
it.
As soon as Jesus and his disciples reached land and disembarked, people began to
come to Jesus, bringing sick people in order that he might heal them, and he healed all
who touched him.
Mark 6:53-56
53 After they went further around Lake Galilee in a boat, they came to the shore at
Gennesaret town. Then they tied up the boat there. 54 As soon as they got out of the
boat, the people there recognized Jesus. 55 So they ran throughout the whole district
in order to tell others that Jesus was there. Then the people placed those who were
sick on stretchers and carried them to any place where they heard people say that
Jesus was. 56 In whatever village, town or other place where he entered, they would
bring to the marketplaces those who were sick. Then the sick people would beg Jesus
to let them touch him or even the edge of his clothes in order that Jesus might heal
them. All those who touched him or his robe were healed.
7
Some Pharisees and scribes criticized Jesus about his disciples disobeying the
traditions of the elders. Jesus replied, showing that their attitudes and practices were
mistaken.
Mark 7:1-23
1 One day some Pharisees and some men who teach the Jewish laws gathered around
Jesus. They had come from Jerusalem to investigate him. 2-4 The Pharisees and all of
the other Jews strictly observe the traditions that their ancestors taught. For example,
they refuse to eat until they first wash their hands with a special ritual, especially
after they return from buying things in the marketplace. They think that God will be
angry with them if they do not do that, because some person or thing unacceptable to
God might have touched ◄them/the things they bought►. There are many other such
traditions that they accept and try to obey. Specifically, they wash in a special way
their cups, pots, kettles, containers, and beds in order that using these things will not
make God reject them.
5 That day, those Pharisees and men who taught the Jewish laws saw that some of
his disciples were eating food with hands that they had not washed using the special
ritual. So they questioned Jesus, saying, “Your disciples disobey the traditions of our
ancestors! ◄You should not let them eat food if they have not washed their hands
using our special ritual!/Why do you let them eat food if they have not washed their
hands using our special ritual?► [RHQ]” 6 Jesus said to them, “Isaiah rebuked your
ancestors, and his words describe very well you people who only pretend to be good!
He wrote these words that God said:
These people speak as if they honor me, but they [SYN] really do not think about
honoring me at all. 7 It is useless for them to worship me, because they teach
only what people have commanded as if I myself had commanded them.MARK 7:8
1425
MARK 7:28
8 You, like your ancestors, refuse to do what God has commanded. Instead, you
follow only the traditions that ◄others/your ancestors► have taught.” 9 Jesus also said
to them, “You think [IRO] that you are clever in refusing to do what God commanded
just so that you can obey your own traditions! 10 For example, our ancestor Moses
wrote God’s command, ‘Honor your fathers and your mothers’. He also wrote,
‘The authorities must execute a person who speaks evil about his father or mother.’
11-12 But you teach people that it is all right that people no longer must help their
parents. You teach people that it is all right if people give their things to God instead of
giving them to their parents. You allow them to say to their parents, ‘What I was going
to give to you to provide for you, I have now promised to give to God. So I cannot any
longer help you!’ As a result, you are actually telling people that they no longer have
to help their parents! 13 And, by doing that, you disregard what God commanded!
You teach your own traditions to others and tell them strongly that they should obey
them And you do many other things like that.”
14 Then Jesus again summoned the crowd to come closer. Then he said to them
figuratively, “All of you people listen to me! Try to understand [DOU] what I am
about to tell you. 15-16 Nothing that people eat causes God to consider them to be
unacceptable. On the contrary, it is that which comes from people’s ◄inner beings/
hearts► that causes God to reject them.”
17 After Jesus had left the crowd and then entered a house with the disciples,
they asked him about the parable that he had just spoken. 18 He replied, “◄I am
disappointed that you also do not understand what it means!/ Why can you not
understand what it means?► [RHQ] ◄You ought to understand that nothing that
enters us from outside can cause God to consider us unacceptable to him./Can you not
understand that nothing that enters us from outside of us can cause God to consider
us unacceptable to him?► [RHQ] 19 Instead of entering and ruining our minds/souls, it
goes into our stomachs, and afterwards the refuse passes out of our bodies.” By saying
this, Jesus was declaring that people can eat any food without causing God to reject
them. 20 He also said, “It is the thoughts and actions that come from within people
that cause God to consider them unacceptable to him. 21 Specifically, it is people’s
innermost being that causes them to think things that are evil; they act immorally,
they steal things, they commit murder. 22 They commit adultery, they are greedy,
they act maliciously, they deceive people. They act indecently, they envy people, they
speak evil about others, they are proud, and they act foolishly. 23 People think these
thoughts and then they do these evil actions, and that is what causes God to consider
them unacceptable to him.”
Jesus went to the region around Tyre to be away from people, but they learned of it,
and a woman came to ask him to expel an evil spirit from her daughter.
Mark 7:24-30
24 After Jesus and his disciples left Galilee district, they went to the region around
Tyre. While he stayed at a certain house, he desired that no one know it, but people
soon found out that he was there. 25 A certain woman, whose daughter had an evil
spirit within her, heard about Jesus. At once she came to him and prostrated herself
at his feet. 26 This woman was not a Jew. Her ancestors came from Greece country,
but she was born in the region around Phoenicia town in Syria district. She pleaded
with Jesus that he expel the evil spirit from her daughter. 27 But he wanted to see
how strongly she believed in him. So, suggesting that he should help the Jews first and
not the non-Jews whom some Jews called dogs [MET], he spoke to her saying, “First
let the children eat all they want, because it is not good for someone to take the food
the mother has prepared for the children and then throw it to the little dogs.” 28 ButMARK 7:29
1426
MARK 8:8
to show that she believed that non-Jews could also receive help from God [MET], she
replied to him, “Sir, what you say is correct, but even the little dogs, which lie under
the table, eat the crumbs that the children drop.” 29 Jesus said to her, “Because of
what you have said, you have shown me that you believe in what I can do for you. So
I will help you. Now you may go home, because I have caused the evil spirit to leave
your daughter.” 30 The woman returned to her house and saw that her child was
lying quietly on the bed and that the evil spirit had left.
When Jesus went back to Lake Galilee, some people brought a deaf-mute man to
Jesus and asked him to heal the man, which he did.
Mark 7:31-37
31 Jesus and his disciples left the region around Tyre city and went north through
Sidon city, then toward the east through the district of the Ten Towns, and then south
to the towns near Lake Galilee. 32 There, people brought to him a man who was deaf
and who could hardly talk. They begged Jesus to lay his hands on him in order to heal
him. 33 So Jesus took him away from the crowd in order that the two of them could
be alone. Then he put one of his fingers into each of the man’s ears. After he spat
on his fingers, he touched the man’s tongue with his fingers. 34 Then he looked up
toward heaven, he sighed because he was concerned for the man, and then in his own
language he said to the man’s ears, “Ephphatha”, which means, “Be opened {Open
up}!”. 35 At once the man could hear plainly [MTY]. He also began to speak clearly
because what was causing him to be unable to speak was healed {Jesus healed what
was causing him to be unable to speak}. 36 Jesus told ◄the people/his friends► not to
tell anyone what he had done. But, although he ordered them and others repeatedly
not to tell anyone about it, they kept talking about it very much. 37 People who heard
about it were utterly amazed and were saying enthusiastically, “Everything he has
done is wonderful! Besides doing other amazing things, he enables deaf people to
hear! And he enables those who cannot speak to speak!”
8
Again Jesus provided food miraculously for a great crowd who gathered to hear him
and became hungry.
Mark 8:1-10
1 During those days, a large crowd of people gathered again. After they had been
there a couple days, they had no food to eat. So Jesus summoned the disciples to
come closer and then he said to them, 2 “This is the third day that these people have
been with me, and they have nothing left to eat, so now I feel very sorry for them.
3 Furthermore, if I send them home while they are still hungry, some of them will
faint on the way home, because some of them have come from far away.” 4 Knowing
that he was suggesting that they give the people something to eat, one of his disciples
replied, “◄We cannot possibly find food to satisfy this crowd, here in this place where
no people live!/How can we find food to satisfy this crowd, here in this place where no
people live?►” [RHQ] 5 Jesus asked them, “How many loaves of bread do you have?”
They replied, “We have seven flat loaves.” 6 Jesus commanded the crowd, “Sit down
on the ground!” After they sat down, he took the seven loaves, he thanked God for
them, he broke them into pieces and started giving them to his disciples in order that
they might distribute them to the people. 7 They found that they also had a few small
dried fish. So after he thanked God for these, he told the disciples, “Distribute these
also.” After they distributed the bread and fish to the crowd, 8 the people ate this food
and they had plenty to satisfy them. The disciples collected the pieces of food thatMARK 8:9
1427
MARK 8:25
were left over. They filled seven large baskets full of those pieces. 9 They estimated
that there were about 4,000 people who ate on that day. 10 Then Jesus dismissed the
crowd. Immediately after that, he got into the boat along with his disciples, and they
went around Lake Galilee to Dalmanutha district.
Jesus rebuked those who insisted on him performing more miracles, and rebuked the
disciples when they worried about not having enough food with them.
Mark 8:11-21
11 In those days some Pharisees came to Jesus. They asked him to perform a miracle
that would show that God had sent him. They wanted to find a way by which they could
convince the people to reject him. So they started to argue with him. 12 Jesus sighed
quietly to himself, and then he said, “I am disgusted that [RHQ], even though you
people have seen how I have healed people, you keep asking me to perform miracles!
Note this: Such a miracle will certainly not be shown {I will certainly not show such
a miracle} just for you people!” 13 Then he left them.
He got into the boat again, along with his disciples, and they went further around
Lake Galilee. 14 The disciples had forgotten to bring along enough food. Specifically,
they had only one flat loaf of bread with them in the boat. 15 As they were going, Jesus
warned them against the attitudes the Pharisees and Herod Antipas had, attitudes that
were having a bad effect on other people. He did this by telling them a parable. He
said, “Be careful! Beware of the yeast of the Pharisees and the yeast of Herod!”
16 The disciples misunderstood him. So they said to one another, “He must have said
that because we have no bread.” 17 Jesus knew what they were discussing among
themselves. So he said to them, “◄I am disappointed that you are discussing about
your not having enough bread!/Why are you discussing about your not having enough
bread?► [RHQ] ◄You should understand by now that I can provide miraculously for
you if you need food!/Why do you not yet perceive or understand that I can provide
miraculously for you if you need food?► [RHQ] ◄You are not thinking!/Why are you
not thinking?► [RHQ] 18 ◄I am also disappointed that, although you have eyes, you
do not understand what you see!/Why is it that, although you have eyes, you do not
understand what you see?► [RHQ] You have ears, but you do not understand what I
say [RHQ]!” Then he asked, “Do you not remember what happened 19 when I broke
only five loaves and fed the 5.000 people [RHQ]? Not only was everyone satisfied, but
there was food left over How many baskets full of pieces of bread that were left over
did you collect?” They replied, “We collected twelve baskets full.” 20 Then he asked,
“When I broke the seven loaves in order to feed the 4,000 people, again when everyone
had plenty to eat, how many large baskets of pieces of bread that were left over did
you collect?” They replied, “We collected seven large baskets full.” 21 Then he kept
saying to them, “◄I am disappointed that you do not understand yet that you should
never worry that you do not have enough food!/Why do you not understand yet that
you should never worry that you do not have enough food?►” [RHQ]
Jesus healed a blind man.
Mark 8:22-26
22 They arrived in the boat at Bethsaida town. People brought to Jesus a blind man
and earnestly requested that Jesus touch him in order to heal him. 23 Jesus took the
hand of the blind man, led him outside the town, he put his saliva on the man’s eyes,
he put his hands on the man, and then he asked him, “Do you see anything?” 24 The
man looked up and then he said, “Yes, I see people! They are walking around, but I
cannot see them clearly. They look like trees!” 25 Then Jesus again touched the eyes
of the blind man. The man looked intently and at that moment he was completelyMARK 8:26
1428
MARK 8:38
healed! He could see everything clearly. 26 Jesus said to him, “Do not go into the
town! First go straight home and tell the people there about what I did!” Then he sent
the man to his home.
On the way to the villages near the city of Caesarea Philippi, Jesus asked his disciples
what people were saying about who he was and, then, what they thought.
Mark 8:27-30
27 Jesus and the disciples left Bethsaida town and went to the villages near Caesarea
Philippi town. On the way he questioned them, “Who do people say that I really am?”
28 They replied, “Some people say that you are John the Baptizer, who has come back
to life again. Others say that you are the prophet Elijah who has returned from heaven
as God promised. And others say that you are one of the other former prophets who
has come back to life again.” 29 He asked them, “What about you? Who do you say
that I am?” Peter replied to him, “We believe that you are the Messiah!” 30 Then Jesus
warned them strongly that they should not tell anyone yet that he was the Messiah.
Jesus spoke plainly to his disciples about his coming death and resurrection.
Mark 8:31-33
31 Then Jesus began to teach them, “Even though I am the one who came from
heaven, it is necessary that I suffer very much. It is also necessary that I be rejected
by the elders, the chief priests, and the men who teach the Jewish laws {that the
elders, the chief priests, and the men who teach the Jewish laws reject me}, and that
I be killed {they kill me}. But on the third day after I am killed I will become alive
again.” 32 He said this to them clearly. But Peter took Jesus aside and then, because
he assumed that the Messiah would never die, he started to rebuke Jesus for talking
about dying. 33 Jesus turned around and looked at his disciples. Then he rebuked
Peter, saying, “Stop thinking like that! Satan is causing you to talk like that! Instead of
wanting what God wants me to do, you are wanting me to do only what most people
would want me to do.”
Jesus explained to the crowd and his disciples what is required if anyone wants to
be Jesus’ disciple.
Mark 8:34—9:1
34 Then he summoned the crowd along with his disciples so that they might listen
to him. He told them, “If any one of you wants to be my disciple, you must not do
only what you yourself want to do. Specifically, you must be willing to allow people
to hurt you and to disgrace you. That is what they do to criminals who are forced to
carry crosses [MET] to the places where they will be crucified. That is what anyone
who wants to be my disciple must do. 35 You must do that, because those who try
to save their lives by denying that they belong to me when people want to kill them
for believing in me will not live eternally, but those who are killed because of being
my disciples and because of telling others my good message will live forever with me.
36 People might get everything they want in this world, but ◄they are really gaining
nothing if they do not get eternal life because they do not become my disciples!/what
will they gain if they do not get eternal life because they do not become my disciples?►
[RHQ] 37 ◄Think carefully about the fact that there is absolutely nothing that people
can give to God that would enable them to gain eternal life!/Is there anything that a
person can give to God in order to gain eternal life?► [RHQ] 38 And think about this:
Those who refuse to say that they belong to me and who reject what I say in these
days when many people have turned away from God and are very sinful, I, the one
who came from heaven, will also refuse to say that they belong to me when I come
back with the holy angels and have the glorious brightness that my Father has!”MARK 9:1
1429
MARK 9:16
9
1 He also said to his disciples, “Listen carefully! Some of you who are here now will
see God ruling powerfully in many ways. You will see it before you die!”
Jesus took Peter, James and John up a high mountain where his appearance changed,
and Moses and Elijah appeared and talked to Jesus.
Mark 9:2-8
2 A week later Jesus took Peter, James and James’ younger brother John and led them
up a high mountain. While they were alone up there, he appeared very different to
them. 3 His clothes became dazzling white. They were whiter than anyone on earth
could make them by bleaching them. 4 Two prophets who had lived long ago, Moses
and Elijah, appeared to them. Then the two of them began talking with Jesus. 5 After
a short time, Peter interrupted by exclaiming, “Teacher, it is wonderful to be here!
So allow us to make three shelters. One will be for you, one will be for Moses, and
one will be for Elijah!” 6 He said this because he wanted to say something, but he did
not know what to say, because he and the other two disciples were very awestruck.
7 Then a shining cloud appeared that covered them. God [EUP] spoke to them from
the cloud saying, “This is my Son. I love him. Therefore, listen to him!” 8 When the
three disciples looked around, they saw that suddenly Jesus was alone with them, and
that there was no longer anyone else there.
Jesus told them that the one like Elijah has already come and been evilly treated, but
that the Messiah would also be evilly treated.
Mark 9:9-13
9 While they were coming down the mountain, Jesus told them that they should not
tell anyone yet what had just happened to him. He said, “You may tell them after
I, the one who came from heaven, ◄rise from the dead/become alive again► after I
die.” 10 So they did not tell others about it for a long time. But they discussed among
themselves what it meant when he said that he would ◄rise from the dead/become
alive again► after he died.
11 The three disciples had just seen Elijah, but Elijah had not done anything to prepare
people to accept Jesus. So they asked Jesus, “The men who teach the Jewish laws say
that Elijah must come back to the earth before the Messiah comes to earth. But you
have been here a long time and Elijah came just today. So is what they are teaching
wrong?” 12-13 Jesus wanted them to know that John the Baptizer was the one who
represented Elijah. So he answered them, “It is true that God promised to send Elijah
to come first so that people would be ready when I came. Elijah’s representative has
already come, and our leaders treated him very badly, just like they wanted to do,
just like it was prophesied {the prophets prophesied} long ago. But, ◄I also want you
to consider what is written {what the prophets wrote} in the Scriptures about me, the
one who came from heaven./why have you not thought about what is written {what
the prophets wrote} about me, the one who came from heaven?► [RHQ] It is written
{They wrote} that I would suffer much and that I would be rejected {that many people
would reject me}.”
Jesus expelled an evil spirit and later explained to the disciples why they had failed
to do that.
Mark 9:14-29
14 Jesus and those three disciples returned to where the other disciples were. They
saw a large crowd around the other disciples and some men who taught the Jewish
laws arguing with them. 15 As soon as the crowd saw Jesus, they were very surprised
to see him come. So they ran to him and greeted him. 16 He asked them, “What areMARK 9:17
1430
MARK 9:35
you arguing about?” 17 A man in the crowd answered him, “Teacher, I brought my
son here in order that you would heal him. There is an evil spirit in him that makes
him unable to talk. 18 Whenever the spirit attacks him, it throws him down. He foams
at the mouth, he grinds his teeth together, and he becomes stiff. I asked your disciples
to expel the spirit, but they were not able to do it.” 19 Jesus replied by saying to those
people, “◄I am very disappointed that although you have observed how I help people,
you do not believe that you are able to do anything!/Why is it that although you have
observed how I help people, you do not believe that you are able to do anything?►
[RHQ] ◄I have been with you a long time, and you still cannot do what I do!/How long
do I have to be with you before you can do what I do?► [RHQ] Bring the boy to me!”
20 So they brought the boy to Jesus. As soon as the evil spirit saw Jesus, it shook the
boy severely, and the boy fell on the ground. He rolled around, and he foamed at the
mouth. 21 Jesus asked the boy’s father, “How long has he been like this?” He replied,
“This started to happen when he was a child. 22 The spirit does not only do this, but he
also often throws him into the fire or into the water in order to kill him. But, pity us
and help us, if you can!” 23 Jesus exclaimed to him, “Do not say [RHQ] ‘If you can’, for
God/I can do anything for people who believe in him/me!” 24 Immediately the child’s
father shouted, “I believe that you can help me, but I do not believe strongly. Help me
to believe more strongly!” 25 Because Jesus wanted to heal the boy before the crowd
got bigger, he rebuked the evil spirit, saying, “You evil spirit, you who are causing
this boy to be deaf and unable to talk! I command you to come out of him and never
enter him again!” 26 The evil spirit shouted, it shook the boy violently, and then it left
the boy. The boy did not move. He seemed like a dead body. So many of the people
there said, “He is dead!” 27 However, Jesus took him by the hand and helped him
get up. Then the boy stood up. He was healed! 28 Later, when Jesus and his disciples
were alone in a house, one of them asked him, “Why were we not able to expel the
evil spirit?” 29 He said to them, “You can expel this kind of evil spirit only by your
praying that God will give you the power to do it. There is no other way that you can
expel them.”
Jesus was teaching his disciples that he would be handed over to other men, killed,
and become alive again; but they did not understand what he was saying.
Mark 9:30-32
30 After Jesus and his disciples left that district, they traveled through Galilee district.
Jesus did not want anyone else to know that he was in their area; he did not want
31 anyone to interrupt him as he taught his disciples. He was telling them, “Some day
my enemies [SYN] will seize [MTY] me, the one who came from heaven, and I will be
handed over to other men. Those men will kill me. But on the third day after I am
killed {after they kill me}, I will become alive again!” 32 But they did not understand
what he was telling them. Also, they were afraid to ask him about what he had said.
Jesus taught his disciples by illustration about what kind of person God considers
important.
Mark 9:33-37
33 Jesus and his disciples returned to Capernaum town. When they were in the
house, he asked them, “What were you discussing while we were traveling on the
road?” 34 But they did not reply. They were ashamed to reply because, while they were
traveling, they had been arguing with each other about which one of them would
be the most important when Jesus became king. 35 He sat down, he summoned the
twelve disciples to come close to him, and then he said to them, “If anyone wants God
to consider him to be the most important person of all, he must consider himself toMARK 9:36
1431
MARK 9:50
be the least important person of all, and he must serve everyone else.” 36 Then he
took a child and placed him among them. He took the child in his arms and then he
said to them, 37 “Those who, because they love me, welcome a child like this one, God
considers that they are welcoming me. So it is as though they are also welcoming
God, who sent me.”
Jesus taught his disciples about who is for him and who is against him.
Mark 9:38-41
38 John said to Jesus, “Teacher, we saw someone who was expelling demons,
◄claiming he had authority from you to do that/while telling people that you have
told him to do it►. So we told him to stop doing it because he was not one of us
disciples.” 39 Jesus said, “Do not tell him not to do that! For no one will speak evilly
about me just after he performs a miracle while saying that I have told him to do it.
40 Furthermore, those who are not opposing us are trying to achieve the same goals
that we are. 41 Also think about this: Those who belong to me who help you in any
way, even if they just give you a cup of water to drink because you follow me, the
Messiah, will certainly be rewarded by God!”
Jesus taught his disciples about sin and its result.
Mark 9:42-48
42 Jesus also said, “But if you cause someone who believes in me to sin, God will
severely punish you, even if that person is socially unimportant like this little child. If
someone tied a heavy stone around your neck and you were thrown {and threw you}
into the sea, you would consider that was a severe punishment. But God will punish
you more severely than that if you cause a person who believes in me to sin. 43-44 So,
if you are wanting to use one of [MTY, PRS] your hands to sin, stop using your hand!
Even if you have to cut your hand off and throw it away to avoid sinning, do it [HYP]!
It is good that you not sin and that you live eternally, even though you lack one of
your hands while you are here on earth. But it is not good that you sin and as a result
God throws your whole body into hell. There the fires never go out! 45-46 If you are
wanting to use one of [PRS] your feet to sin, stop using your foot! Even if you have
to cut off your foot to avoid sinning, do it [HYP]! It is good that you not sin and live
eternally, even though you lack one of your feet while you are here on earth. But it is
not good that you sin and go to hell. 47 If because of what you see [MTY, PRS] you are
tempted to sin, stop looking at those things! Even if you have to gouge out your eye
and throw it away [HYP] to avoid sinning, do it! It is good that you not sin and live
eternally, even though you lack one of your eyes while you are here on earth. But it is
not good that you sin and, as a result, God puts your whole body in hell. 48 In that
place people suffer forever and the fires are never put out {never go out}.”
Jesus taught that we must endure trials to remain useful to God.
Mark 9:49-50
49 “You must endure difficulties in order that God will be pleased with you. Your
difficulties are like a fire that makes things pure [MET]. Your enduring is also like [MET]
salt being put on {people putting salt on their} sacrifices to make them pure. 50 Salt is
useful to put on food, but you cannot [RHQ] make salt to taste salty again if it becomes
flavorless [MET]. Similarly, you must remain useful to God, because no one can make
you useful to God again if you become useless. You must also live peacefully with each
other.”MARK 10:1
1432
MARK 10:18
10
Some Pharisees asked him if the law permitted a man to divorce his wife. Jesus
answered and supported his answer from Scripture.
Mark 10:1-12
1 Jesus left ◄that place/Capernaum► with his disciples, and they went through Judea
district and on across to the east side of the Jordan River. When crowds gathered
around him again, he taught them again, as he customarily did. 2 While he was
teaching them, some Pharisees approached him and asked him, “Does our Jewish law
permit a man to divorce his wife?” They asked that in order to be able to criticize
him whether he answered “yes” or “no”. 3 He answered them, “What did Moses
command your ancestors about a man divorcing his wife?” 4 One of them replied,
“Moses permitted that a man may write on paper his reason for divorcing his wife,
give this paper to her, and then send her away.” 5 Jesus said to them, “It was because
your ancestors stubbornly wanted just what they desired that Moses wrote that law
for your ancestors, and you are just like them! 6 Remember that he also wrote that,
when God first created people, he made one man, and one woman to become that
man’s wife. 7 That explains why God said, ‘When a man and woman marry, they
should no longer live with their fathers and mothers after they marry. 8 Instead, the
two of them shall live together, and they shall become so closely united [MET] that they
are like one person.’ Therefore, although the people who marry were two separate
persons before, God regards them as one person now, so he wants them to remain
married. 9 Because that is true, a man must not separate from his wife whom God has
joined to him, because God’s plan is for them to remain together!”
10 When Jesus and his disciples were alone in a house, they asked him again about
this. 11 He said to them, “God considers that a marriage lasts until either the husband
or the wife dies, so he considers that any man who divorces his wife and marries
another woman is committing adultery, even if he divorces his first wife. 12 God also
considers a woman who divorces her first husband to be committing adultery if she
marries another man.”
Jesus became indignant when he saw his disciples scolding people for bringing
children for him to bless them.
Mark 10:13-16
13 One day, some people were bringing children to Jesus in order that he would
touch and bless them. But the disciples scolded those people because they thought
that Jesus ◄did not want to be bothered spending time with/was not concerned about►
children. 14 When Jesus saw that, he became angry. He said to the disciples, “Allow
the children to come to me! Do not forbid them [DOU]! It is people who are humble
and trust as they do who can experience ◄God’s rule in their lives/God taking care of
them► [MET]. 15 Note this: Those who do not trustingly allow God to direct their lives,
as children do, will not enter the place where God rules.” 16 Then he embraced the
children. He also put his hands on them and asked God to bless them.
After a man asked Jesus what he should do in order to live eternally, Jesus told him
to sell all his possessions, which astonished the disciples.
Mark 10:17-31
17 As Jesus was starting to travel again with his disciples, a young man ran up to
him. He knelt before Jesus and then he asked him, “Good teacher, what must I do
to have eternal life/in order to live with God eternally?” 18 Jesus said to him, “◄You
should consider carefully what you are implying (OR, that you are implying that I
am God) by calling me good, because only God is good!/Do you realize what you areMARK 10:19
1433
MARK 10:34
implying (OR, that you are implying that I am God) by calling me good, because only
God is good?► [RHQ] No other person is good 19 But to answer your question, you
know the commandments of Moses, which will cause you to live eternally if you obey
them perfectly. He commanded things such as ‘do not murder anyone, do not commit
adultery, do not steal, do not ◄testify falsely/lie►, do not cheat anyone, and honor
your father and mother’.” 20 The man said to him, “Teacher, I have obeyed all those
commandments ever since I was young. So is ◄that enough/there something else that
I have not done►?” 21 Jesus looked at him and loved him. He said to him, “There is
one thing that you have not yet done. You must go home, sell all that you possess,
and then give the money to poor people. As a result, you will be spiritually rich in
heaven. After you have done what I have told you, come with me and be my disciple!”
22 The man became disappointed when he heard that. He went away sad, because he
was very rich and he did not want to give away everything. 23 Jesus looked around at
the people. Then he exclaimed to his disciples, “It is very difficult for people who are
wealthy to decide to let God rule their lives!” 24 The disciples were surprised at what
he said. They thought that God favored the rich people, so if God did not save them, he
would not save anyone. So Jesus replied again to them, “My dear friends, it is very
difficult for anyone to decide to let God rule his life. 25 It is impossible for a camel to
go through the eye of a needle. It is almost as difficult [HYP] for rich people to decide
to let God rule their lives.” 26 The disciples were very astonished. So they said to
each other, “If that is so, ◄it will be unlikely that anyone will be saved {that God will
save anyone}!/will God save anyone?► [RHQ]” 27 Jesus looked at them and then he
said, “Yes, it is impossible for people to save themselves! But God certainly can save
them, because God can do anything!” 28 Peter exclaimed, “You know that we have left
behind everything and we have become your disciples. So, ◄what about us/will God
<accept us/reward us>►?” 29 Jesus replied, “I want you to know this: Those who have
left their houses, their brothers, their sisters, their father, their mother, their children,
or their plots of ground, to be my disciples and to proclaim the good news, 30 will
receive in this life 100 times as much as they left behind. That will include houses and
people as dear as brothers and sisters and mothers and children, and plots of ground.
Furthermore, although people will persecute them here on earth because they believe
in me, in the future age they will ◄have eternal life/live with God eternally►. 31 But I
warn you all: Many of you who now consider yourselves to be very important will be
unimportant at that future time, and many of you who now consider yourselves to be
unimportant will be very important at that future time!”
As they were traveling toward Jerusalem, Jesus took the disciples aside and began
to tell them again about what was going to happen to him.
Mark 10:32-34
32 Some days later as they continued to travel, Jesus and his disciples were walking
on the road that leads up to Jerusalem city. Jesus was walking ahead of them. The
disciples/apostles were astonished that he was going to where there were many people
who opposed him, and the other people who were with them were afraid about what
would happen to him in Jerusalem. Along the way he took the twelve disciples to a place
by themselves. Then he began to tell them again about what was going to happen to
him, saying, 33 “Listen carefully! We are going up to Jerusalem. There the chief priests
and the men who teach the Jewish laws will be enabled {someone will help the chief
priests and those who teach our Jewish laws} to seize me. Then they will declare that
I must die, even though I am the one who came from heaven. Then they will take me
to the Roman authorities. 34 Those men will ridicule me. They will spit on me. TheyMARK 10:35
1434
MARK 10:52
will ◄scourge me/whip me with a leaded whip.► Then they will kill me. But on the
third day after that, I will become alive again!”
After James and John requested to sit on the right and left of Jesus when he rules,
Jesus told them what will happen and how they should act.
Mark 10:35-45
35 Along the way, James and John, who were the two sons of Zebedee, approached
Jesus and they said to him, “Teacher, please do for us what we will ask you to do!”
36 He said to them, “What do you want me to do for you?” 37 They said to him, “When
you rule gloriously, let us rule with you. Let one of us sit at your right side and one
sit at your left side.” 38 But Jesus said to them, “You do not understand what you are
asking for.” Then he asked them, “Can you endure suffering [MTY] like I am about to
suffer? Can you endure being killed [MTY] as I will be killed {people killing you as
they will kill me}?” 39 They said to him, “Yes, we are able to do that!” Then Jesus said
to them, “It is true that you will endure suffering [MTY] like I will suffer, and you will
endure being killed as I will be killed {people killing you as they will kill me}. 40 But
I am not the one who chooses the ones who will sit next to me and rule with me. God
will give those places to the ones he appoints.”
41 The other ten disciples later heard about what James and John had requested. As
a result, they were angry with them because they also wanted to rule with Jesus in the
highest positions. 42 Then, after Jesus called them all together, he said to them, “You
know that those who rule the non-Jews enjoy showing that they are powerful. You
also know that officials enjoy commanding others. 43 But do not be like them! On
the contrary, all those among you who want God to consider them great must become
like servants to the rest of you. 44 Furthermore, if anyone among you wants God to
consider him to be the most important, he must act like a servant for the rest of you.
45 You should imitate me. Even though I am the one who has come from heaven, I did
not come to be served {for others to serve me}. On the contrary, I came in order to
serve others and to allow others to kill me, in order that my dying for people would
be like a payment to rescue many people from being punished {God punishing them}
for their sins.”
After a blind man called out and asked Jesus to have mercy on him, Jesus healed
him.
Mark 10:46-52
46 On the way to Jerusalem, Jesus and the disciples came to Jericho town. Afterwards,
while they were leaving Jericho along with a great crowd, a blind man who habitually
begged for money was sitting beside the road. His name was Bartimaeus and his
father’s name was Timaeus. 47 When he heard people say that Jesus from Nazareth
was passing by, he shouted, “Jesus! You who are the Messiah descended from King
David, ◄be merciful to/help► me!” 48 Many people rebuked him and told him that
he should be quiet. But he shouted even more, “You who are the Messiah descended
from King David, ◄be merciful to/help► me!” 49 Jesus stopped and said, “Call him to
come over here!” They summoned the blind man, saying, “Jesus is calling you! So
cheer up and get up and come!” 50 He threw aside his cloak as he jumped up, and
he came to Jesus. 51 Jesus asked him, “What do you want me to do for you?” The
blind man said to him, “Sir, I want to be able to see again!” 52 Jesus said to him, “I
am healing you because you believed in me. So you may go home!” He could see
immediately. And he went with Jesus along the road.MARK 11:1
1435
MARK 11:18
11
They brought a young donkey to Jesus; then Jesus mounted it and rode to Jerusalem
with people shouting and praising him as they went along.
Mark 11:1-11
1 When they came near to Jerusalem, they came to Bethphage and Bethany villages
near Olive Tree Hill. Then Jesus summoned two of his disciples. 2 He said to them,
“Go to that village just ahead of you. As soon as you enter it, you will see a donkey
that no one has ever ridden, that has been tied {people have tied} up. Untie it, and
then bring it to me. 3 If anyone says to you, ‘Why are you doing that?’, say, ‘Jesus, our
Lord, needs to use it. He will send it back here with someone as soon as he no longer
needs it.’ ” 4 So the two disciples went and they found the young donkey. It was tied
close to the door of a house, which was beside the street. Then they untied it. 5 Some
of the people who were there said to them, “Why are you untying the donkey?” 6 They
told them what Jesus had said. So the people permitted them to take the donkey.
7 They brought the donkey to Jesus. The disciples put some of their clothes on it in
order to make something for him to sit on. 8 Many people spread their cloaks on the
road to honor him as a king. Others, in order to honor him, spread along the road
branches that they cut from palm trees in the fields beside the road. 9 The people
who were going in front of him and behind him were all shouting things like, “Praise
God!” “May God bless this one who comes ◄with his authority/as his representative►
[MTY].” 10 “May you be blessed {May God bless you} when you rule like our ancestor
King David ruled!” “Praise God who is in the highest heaven!”
11 He entered Jerusalem with them, and then he went into the Temple courtyard.
After he looked around at everything there, he left the city because it was already late
in the afternoon. He returned to Bethany with the twelve disciples and slept there.
Jesus cursed a fig tree as a sign of what would happen to the people of Israel.
Mark 11:12-14
12 The next day, as Jesus and his disciples were leaving Bethany, Jesus was hungry.
13 He saw from a distance a fig tree with all its leaves, so he went to it to see if he
could find any figs on it. But when he came to it, he found only leaves on it. This was
because it was not yet time when normal fig trees have ripe figs. 14 But to illustrate
how God would punish the nation of Israel, he said to the tree, “No one shall ever eat
from you again because you will no longer bear figs.” The disciples heard what he
said.
Jesus expelled those who were buying and selling goods in the Temple, and taught
that the Temple was to be a place of prayer. These actions angered the priests and
scribes who, then, looked for a way to kill Jesus.
Mark 11:15-19
15 Jesus and his disciples went back to Jerusalem. He entered the Temple courtyard.
He saw people who were selling and buying animals for sacrifices. They were spoiling
the place of worship. He chased those people from the Temple courtyard. He also
overturned the tables of those who were giving Temple tax money in exchange
for Roman coins. He overturned the seats of the men who were selling doves for
sacrifices, 16 and he would not allow anyone who was carrying anything to sell to go
through the Temple area. 17 Then as he taught those people, he said to them, “It is
written {One of the prophets wrote} in the Scriptures that God said, ‘I want my house to
be called {people to call my house} a house where people from all nations may pray’,
but you bandits have made it like a cave where you can hide! ◄You know that!/Do you
not know that?► [RHQ]” 18 The chief priests and the men who taught the Jewish lawsMARK 11:19
1436
MARK 11:33
later heard about what he had done. So they planned how they might kill him, but
they knew that it would be difficult, because they realized that the crowd was amazed
at what he was teaching and they feared that the people would soon decide that Jesus
had more authority over the Temple than they did (OR, feared what the people would
do if they tried to arrest Jesus). 19 That evening, Jesus and his disciples left the city and
again slept in Bethany.
When Jesus and his disciples passed the fig tree that Jesus had cursed, they saw that
it had withered. Jesus used this as an illustration for trusting that God would answer
prayer.
Mark 11:20-25
20 The next morning, while they were going along the road toward Jerusalem,
they saw that the fig tree that Jesus had cursed had withered completely. 21 Peter
remembered what Jesus had said to the fig tree and he exclaimed to Jesus, “Teacher,
look! The fig tree that you cursed has withered!” 22 Jesus replied, “You should not be
surprised that God did what I asked! You must trust that God will do whatever you ask
him to do! 23 Also note this: If anyone says to this hill, ‘Be raised up {Rise up} and
then be thrown {throw yourself} into the lake!’ and if he does not doubt that what
he asks for will happen, that is, if he believes that what he asks for will happen, God
will do it for him. 24 So I tell you, whenever you ask God for something when you
pray, believe that you will receive it, and, if you do, God will do it for you. 25-26 Now,
I tell you this also: Whenever you are praying, if you have a grudge against people
because they have harmed you, forgive them, in order that your Father in heaven will
likewise forgive your sins.”
The chief priests, scribes and elders asked Jesus by what authority he was doing
these things. He, then, asked them a question that they would not answer; so he did
not answer theirs.
Mark 11:27-33
27 Jesus and his disciples arrived in the Temple courtyard in Jerusalem again. While
Jesus was walking there, a group consisting of chief priests, some men who taught the
Jewish laws, and elders came to him and they said to him, 28 “By what authority
are you doing these things? Who authorized you to do things like those you did here
yesterday?” 29 Jesus said to them, “I will ask you one question. If you answer me, I will
tell you who authorized me to do those things. 30 Did God [MTY] or people authorize
John to baptize those who came to him?” 31 They debated among themselves as to
what they should answer. They said to each other, “If we say that it was God who
authorized him, he will say to us, ‘Therefore, ◄you should have believed what John
said!/why did you not believe what John said?► [RHQ]’ 32 On the other hand, if we
say that it was people who authorized John, then what will happen to us?” They were
afraid to say that about where John got his authority, because they knew that the people
would be very angry with them. They knew that all the people truly believed that John
was a prophet whom God had sent. 33 So they answered Jesus, “We do not know
where John got his authority.” Then Jesus said to them, “Because you did not answer
my question, I will not tell you who authorized me to do those things here yesterday.”
12
After Jesus told the Jewish leaders a parable, they realized that he was accusing
them of wanting to kill him, but they feared how the people would react if they arrested
Jesus.
Mark 12:1-12MARK 12:1
1437
MARK 12:17
1 Then Jesus told those Jewish leaders a parable.
He wanted to show what God
would do to those who rejected the former prophets and himself. He said, “A certain
man planted a vineyard. He built a fence around it in order to protect it. He made a
stone tank to collect the juice that they would press out of the grapes. He also built a
tower for someone to sit in to guard his vineyard. Then he leased the vineyard to some
men to care for it and to give him some of the grapes in return. Then he went away
to another country. 2 When the time came to harvest the grapes, he sent a servant
to the men who were taking care of the vineyard in order to receive from them his
share of the grapes that the vineyard had produced. 3 But after the servant arrived,
they grabbed him and beat him, and they did not give him any fruit. Then they sent
him away. 4 Later the one who owned the vineyard sent another servant to them.
But they beat that one on his head, and they insulted him. 5 Later he sent another
servant. That man they killed. They mistreated many other servants whom he sent.
Some they beat and some they killed. 6 The man still had one other person with him.
It was his son. He loved him very much. So, finally he sent his son to them because
he thought that they would respect him and give him some of the grapes. 7 But when
they saw his son coming, those men who were looking after the vineyard said to each
other, ‘Look! Here comes the man who will some day inherit the vineyard! So let’s
kill him in order that this vineyard will be ours!’ 8 They seized him and killed him.
Then they threw his body outside the vineyard. 9 So ◄do you know what the man
who owns the vineyard will do?/I will tell you what the man who owns the vineyard
will do [RHQ]►. He will come, and he will kill those evil men who were taking care
of his vineyard. Then he will arrange for other people to take care of it. 10 Now think
carefully about these words, which you have read in the Scriptures:
The men who were building the building rejected one stone. But others put that
same stone in its proper place, and it has become the most important stone in the
building [MET]! 11 The Lord has done this, and we marvel as we look at it.”
12 Then the Jewish leaders realized that he was accusing them when he told this
story about what those wicked people did. So they wanted to seize him. But they were
afraid of what the crowds would do if they did that. So they left him and went away.
Jesus foiled the Jewish leaders’ attempt to trap him by their question of whether they
should pay taxes to the Roman government.
Mark 12:13-17
13 The Jewish leaders sent to Jesus some Pharisees who thought that the Jews should
pay only the tax that their own Jewish authorities required people to pay. They also sent
some members of the party that supported Herod Antipas and the Roman government.
They wanted to make Jesus say something wrong that would make one of those groups
very angry with him. 14 After they arrived, they said to him deceivingly, “Teacher, we
know that you teach the truth. We also know that you are not concerned about what
people say about you, even if an important person does not like what you say. Instead,
you teach truthfully what God wants us to do. So tell us what you think about this
matter: Is it right that we pay taxes to the Roman government, or not [MTY]? Should
we pay the taxes, or should we not pay them?” 15 Jesus knew that they did not really
want to know what God wanted them to do. So he said to them, “◄I know that you
are just trying to make me say something wrong for which you can arrest me./Why
are you just trying to make me say something wrong for which you can arrest me?►
[RHQ] But I will answer your question anyway. Bring me a coin so that I might ask you
something after I look at it.” 16 After they brought him a coin, he asked them, “Whose
picture is on this coin? And whose name is on it?” They replied, “It is a picture and
the name of Caesar, the man who rules the Roman government.” 17 Then Jesus said toMARK 12:18
1438
MARK 12:33
them, “That is correct, so give to the government [MTY] what they require, and give
to God what he requires.” They were frustrated at his answer but amazed at what he
said, because they were not able to accuse him of anything because of what he said.
Jesus showed from Scripture that the Sadducees were wrong in ridiculing the idea
of life after death.
Mark 12:18-27
18 Men who belong to the Sadducee sect deny that people become alive again after
they die. In order to discredit Jesus by ridiculing the idea that people will live again,
some of them came to him and asked him, 19 “Teacher, Moses wrote for us Jews that
if a man who has no children dies, his brother should marry the dead man’s widow.
Then if those two bear children, everyone will consider that those children are the
children of the man who died, and in that way the dead man will continue to have
descendants. 20 So here is an example. There were seven boys in one family. The
oldest one married a woman, but he and his wife did not bear any children. Then he
later died. 21 The second brother followed this law and married that woman and he,
too, did not bear any children. Then he later died. The third brother did like his other
brothers did. But he also did not bear any children, and later died. 22 Eventually all
seven brothers married that woman, one by one, but they had no children, and one
by one they died. Afterwards the woman died, too. 23 Therefore, if it were true what
some people say, that people will become alive again after they die, whose wife do you
think that woman will be when people become alive again? ◄Keep in mind that she
was married to all seven brothers!/She was married to all seven brothers, so how can
anyone decide [RHQ]?►” 24 Jesus replied to them, “You are certainly wrong [RHQ].
You do not know what they have written in the Scriptures about this. You also do not
understand God’s power to make people alive again. 25 That woman will not be the wife
of any of them, because when people have become alive again, instead of men having
wives and women having husbands, they will be like the angels in heaven, who do
not marry. 26 But as to people becoming alive again after they die, in the book that
Moses wrote, he said something about people who have died that I am sure that you
have read [RHQ]. When Moses was looking at the bush that was burning, God said to
him, ‘I am the God whom Abraham worships and the God whom Isaac worships and
the God whom Jacob worships.’ 27 It is not dead people who worship God. It is living
people who worship him. Abraham, Isaac and Jacob died long before Moses lived, but
God said that they were still worshipping him, so we know their spirits were still alive!
So your claim that dead people do not become alive again is very wrong.”
Jesus commended a scribe who accepted Jesus’ assessment of the two greatest
commandments, after which they asked Jesus no more questions to trap him.
Mark 12:28-34
28 A man who taught the Jewish laws heard their discussion.
He knew that
Jesus answered the question well. So he stepped forward and asked Jesus, “Which
commandment is the most important?” 29 Jesus answered, “The most important
commandment is this: ‘Listen, you people of Israel! You must worship the Lord,
our God, our only Lord. 30 You must show that you love him in all the ways that
you live Show it in all that you want and feel, in all that you think, and in all that
you do!’ 31 The next most important commandment is: ‘You must love people you
come in contact with as much as you love yourself.’ No other commandment is more
important than these two!” 32 The man said to Jesus, “Teacher, you have answered
well. You correctly said that he is the only God and that there is no other God we
must worship/obey. 33 You have also said correctly that we ◄should/must show thatMARK 12:34
1439
MARK 12:43-44
we► love God by all that we are, by all that we think, and by the way that we live.
And you have said correctly that we must love ◄people with whom we come in
contact/others► as much as we love ourselves. And you have also implied that doing
these things pleases God more than offering/giving animals to him or burning other
sacrifices.” 34 Jesus realized that this man had answered wisely. So he said to him,
“I perceive that you will soon decide to let God rule your life.” After that, the Jewish
leaders were afraid to ask him any more questions like that to try to trap him.
Jesus showed from Scripture that the Messiah must be David’s Lord as well as his
descendant.
Mark 12:35-37
35 Later, while he was teaching in the Temple courtyard, Jesus said to the people,
“These men who teach the Jewish laws, ◄they must be wrong when they say that the
Messiah is merely a descendant of King David!/why do they say that the Messiah is
merely a descendant of King David?► [RHQ] 36 The Holy Spirit caused David himself
to say about the Messiah,
God said to my Lord, ‘Sit here beside me at the place where I will highly honor you!
Sit here while I completely defeat your enemies! [MTY]’
37 Therefore, because David himself calls the Messiah ‘my Lord,’ ◄the Messiah
cannot be just a man who descended from King David!/how can the Messiah be just a
man who descended from King David?► [RHQ] He must be much greater than David”!
Many people listened to him gladly as he taught those things.
Jesus warned them about the scribes’ hypocritical actions.
Mark 12:38-40
38 While Jesus was teaching the people, he said to them, “Beware that you do not act
like the men who teach our Jewish laws. They like people to honor them, so they put
on long robes and walk around in order to show people how important they are. They
also like people to greet them respectfully in the marketplaces. 39 They like to sit in
the most important seats in our ◄synagogue/Jewish meeting place►. At festivals, they
like to sit in the seats where the most honored people sit. 40 They ◄swindle/take for
themselves► the houses and property of widows by cheating them. Then they pretend
that they are good by praying long prayers publicly. God will certainly punish them
severely!”
Jesus told them that a poor widow’s tiny sacrificial offering was worth more in God’s
sight than large amounts of money from rich people.
Mark 12:41-44
41 Later, Jesus sat down in the Temple courtyard opposite the boxes in which people
put offerings. As he was sitting there, he watched as all the people put money in
the box. Many rich people put in large amounts of money. 42 Then a poor widow
came along and put in two small copper coins, which had a very small value. 43-44 He
gathered his disciples around him and said to them, “The truth is that these other
people have a lot of money, but they gave only a small part of it. But this woman, who
is very poor, has put in all the money that she had to pay for the things she needs.
So God considers that this poor widow has put more money into the box than all the
other people!”
13
Jesus prophesied that the Temple would be completely destroyed.
Mark 13:1-2MARK 13:1
1440
MARK 13:16
1 While Jesus was leaving the Temple area, one of his disciples said to him, “Teacher,
look at how marvelous these huge stones in the walls are and how wonderful these
buildings are!” 2 Jesus said to him, “Yes, these buildings that you are looking at
[RHQ] are wonderful, but I want to tell you something about them. They will soon
be destroyed {Foreign invaders will destroy them} completely, with the result that no
stone here in this Temple area will be left on top of another stone.”
Jesus taught his disciples about the events that will precede his coming again.
Mark 13:3-37
3 After they arrived on Olive Tree Hill across the valley from the Temple, Jesus sat
down. When Peter, James, John, and Andrew were alone with him, they asked him,
4 “Tell us, when will that happen to the buildings of the Temple? Tell us what will
happen that will show us that all these things that God has planned are about to be
finished {that God is about to finish all these things that he has planned}.” 5 Jesus
replied to them, “I cannot give you a simple answer to your questions. All I will say
is, beware that no one deceives you concerning what will happen! 6 Many people
will come and say ◄that I sent them/that they have my authority► [MTY]. They will
say, ‘I am the Messiah!’ They will deceive many people. 7 Whenever people tell you
about wars that are close or wars that are far away, do not be troubled. God has said
that those things must happen. But when they do happen, do not think that God will
finish all that he has planned at that time! 8 Groups who live in various countries will
fight each other, and various governments will fight each other. There will also be
big earthquakes in various places; and there will be famines. Yet, when these things
happen, people will have only just begun to suffer. The first things that they suffer will
be like the first pains a woman suffers who is about to bear a child. They will suffer
much more after that.
9 Be ready for what people will do to you at that time. Because you believe in me, they
will arrest you and put you on trial before the religious councils. ◄In the synagogues/
In the Jewish meeting places►, you will be beaten {others will beat you}. You will
be put {People will put you} on trial in the presence of high government authorities.
As a result, you will be able to tell them about me. 10 My good message must be
proclaimed {You must proclaim my good message} to people in all people-groups
before God finishes all that he has planned. 11 And when people arrest you in order
to prosecute you because you believe in me, do not worry before that happens about
what you will say. Instead, say what God puts into your mind at that time. Then it will
not be just you who will be speaking. It will be the Holy Spirit who will be speaking
through you. 12 Other evil things will happen: People who do not believe in me will
◄betray/help others seize► their brothers and sisters in order that the government
can execute them. Parents will betray their children, and children will betray their
parents so that the government will kill their parents. 13 In general, you will be hated
by most [HYP] people {most [HYP] people will hate you} because you believe in me.
But all you who continue to trust in me strongly until your life is finished will be saved
{God will save all you who continue to trust in me strongly until your life ends}.
14 During that time the disgusting thing/person that the prophet Daniel described
will enter the Temple. It/He will defile the Temple when he enters it and will cause
people to abandon it. When you see it/him standing there where it/he should not be,
you should run away quickly (May everyone who is reading this pay attention to this
warning from Jesus!) At that time those people who are in Judea district must flee
to higher hills. 15 Those people who are outside their houses must not enter their
houses in order to get anything before they run away. 16 Those who are working in
a field must not return to their houses in order to get additional clothes before theyMARK 13:17
1441
MARK 14:1
flee. 17 But I feel very sorry for women who will be pregnant and women who will be
nursing their babies in those days, because it will be very difficult for them to run away
18-19 In those days people will suffer very severely. People have never suffered like
that since the time when God first created the world until now; and people will not
suffer that way again. So pray that this painful time will not happen in ◄winter/the
rainy season►, when it will be hard to travel. 20 If the Lord God had not decided that he
would shorten that time when people suffer so much, everyone would die. But he has
decided to shorten that time because he is concerned about you people whom he has
chosen [DOU]. 21-22 At that time people who will falsely say that they are Messiahs and
prophets will appear. Then they will perform many kinds ◄of miracles/of things that
ordinary people cannot do► [DOU]. They will even try to deceive you people whom
God has chosen, but they will not be able to do that. So at that time if someone says
to you, ‘Look, here is the Messiah!’ or if someone says, ‘Look, he is over there!’ do
not believe it! 23 Be alert! Remember that I have warned you about all this before it
happens.
24 After the time when people suffer like that, the sun will become dark, the moon
will not shine, 25 the stars will fall from the sky, and all things in the sky will be shaken
{God will cause all things in the sky to shake}. 26 Then people will see me, the one who
came from heaven, coming through the clouds powerfully and gloriously. 27 Then I
will send out my angels in order that they gather together the people whom God has
chosen from everywhere, and that includes all the most remote places on earth [IDM,
DOU].
28 Now I want you to learn something from this parable about the way fig trees
grow. In this area, when their buds become tender and their leaves begin to sprout,
you know that summer is near. 29 Similarly, when you see what I have just described
happening, you yourselves will know that it is very near the time for me to return
[MTY]. It will be as though I am already at the door [HEN]. 30 Keep this in mind: You
have observed the things that I have done and said, but all of those events that I have
just told you about will happen before all of you will die. 31 You can be certain that
these things that I have prophesied will happen. You can be more certain of that than
you can be certain that the earth and what is in the sky will stay in place. 32 But
no one knows the exact time when I will return. The angels in heaven also do not
know. Even I do not know. Only my Father knows. 33 So be ready, like people who
are waiting for an important man to come, because you do not know when that time
will come when all these events will happen! 34 When a man who wants to travel to a
distant place is about to leave his house, he tells his servants that they should manage
the house. He tells each one what he should do. Then he tells the doorkeeper to be
ready for his return. 35 That man must always be ready, because he does not know
whether his master will return in the evening, at midnight, when the rooster crows,
or at dawn. Similarly, you also must always be ready, because you do not know when
I will return. 36 May it not happen that when I come suddenly, I will find that you are
not ready! 37 These words that I am saying to you disciples I am saying to everyone
who believes in me: Always be ready!” That is what Jesus warned his disciples.
14
The Jewish leaders planned how they could arrest Jesus without starting a riot.
Mark 14:1-2
1 It was only two days before the people ◄celebrated/started to celebrate► for one
week the festival which they called Passover. During those days they also celebrated
the festival of ◄Unleavened Bread/eating bread that had no yeast in it►. The chiefMARK 14:2
1442
MARK 14:17
priests and the men who taught the Jewish laws were planning how they could seize
Jesus secretly. They wanted to accuse him in front of the Roman authorities so that
they would execute him. 2 But they were saying to one another, “We must not do it
during the celebration, because, if we do it then, the people will be very angry with us
and riot!”
Jesus commended a woman who extravagantly anointed Jesus in anticipation of his
death. The chief priests agreed to pay Judas if he would help them seize Jesus.
Mark 14:3-11
3 Jesus was at Bethany town in the house of Simon, whom Jesus had healed from
leprosy. While they were eating, a woman came to him. She was carrying a stone jar
that contained expensive fragrant perfume called nard. She opened the jar and then
she poured the perfume on Jesus’ head. 4 One of the people who were present became
angry and said to the others, “◄It is terrible that she wasted that perfume!/Why did
she waste that perfume?► [RHQ] 5 It could have been sold {We could have sold it}
for ◄a huge amount of money/an amount of money for which a person works for a
year►, and then the money could have been given {we could have given the money}
to poor people!” So he rebuked her. 6 But Jesus said, “Stop scolding her! She has done
to me what I consider to be very appropriate/delightful. So ◄you should not bother
her!/why do you bother her?► [RHQ] 7 You will always have poor people among you.
So you can help them whenever you want to. But I will not be here among you much
longer. So it is good for her to show now that she appreciates me. 8 It is appropriate that
she has done what she was able to do. It is as if she knew that I was going to die soon
and has anointed my body for their burying it. 9 I will tell you this: Wherever the
good message about me is preached {people preach the good message} throughout
the world, what she has done will be told {people will tell others what she has done
to me}, and as a result people will remember her.”
10 Then Judas Iscariot (OR, Judas, the man from Kerioth Town) went to the chief
priests in order to talk to them about helping them to seize Jesus. He did that even
though he was one of the twelve disciples 11 When they heard what he was willing to
do for them, they were very happy. They promised that they would give him a large
amount of money for doing that. Judas agreed, so they gave him the money. As a result,
he began watching for an opportunity ◄to betray Jesus/to enable Jesus’ enemies to
seize him►.
Two disciples followed Jesus’ instructions and prepared the Passover meal.
Mark 14:12-17
12 Two days later, when they killed the lambs for the festival at the beginning of
the week when people ate bread that had no yeast in it, Jesus’ disciples said to him,
“Where do you want us to go and prepare the meal for the Passover celebration in
order that you can eat it with us?” 13 So he chose two of his disciples to prepare
everything. He said to them, “Go into Jerusalem city. A man will meet you, who will
be carrying a large jar full of water. Follow him. 14 When he enters a house, say to the
man who owns the house, ‘Our teacher wants us to prepare the meal of the Passover
celebration so that he can eat it with us his disciples. ◄Please show us the room that
he arranged with you about./Where is the room that he arranged with you about?►
[RHQ]’ 15 He will show you a large room that is on the upper floor of the house. It will
be furnished and ready for us to eat a meal in it. Then prepare the meal there for
us.” 16 So the two disciples left. They went into the city and found everything to be
just like he had told them. They prepared the meal for the Passover celebration, and
then returned to Jesus and the other disciples. 17 When it was evening, Jesus arrived
at that house with the twelve disciples.MARK 14:18
1443
MARK 14:37
During the Passover meal, Jesus prophesied that one disciple would betray him, and
he gave them the bread and wine which he said represented his body and blood which
would be sacrificed.
Mark 14:18-26
18 As they were all sitting there and eating, Jesus said, “Listen carefully to this: One
of you will enable my enemies to seize me. Specifically, it is one of you who will do
this in spite of the fact that he is eating with me right now!” 19 The disciples became
very sad and they said to him one by one, “Surely ◄it is not I!/I am not the one, am
I?► [RHQ]” 20 Then he said to them, “It is one of you twelve disciples, the one who is
dipping bread into the sauce in the dish along with me. 21 It is certain that I, the one
who came from heaven, will die, because that is what has been {what the prophets
have} written about me. But there will be terrible punishment for the man by whom
I will be betrayed {who will ◄betray me/help my enemies to seize me►}! In fact, it
would be better for that man if he had never been born!”
22 While they were eating, he took a flat loaf of bread and thanked God for it. Then
he broke it into pieces and gave it to them and said to them, “This bread represents
[MET] my body. Take it and eat it.” 23 Afterwards, he took a cup that contained wine
and thanked God for it. Then he gave it to them, and then, as they all drank from it,
24 he said to them, “This wine represents [MET] my blood, which is about to be shed
{which is about to flow from my body} when my enemies kill me. With this blood I
will sign the agreement that God has made to forgive the sins of many people. 25 I
want you to know this: I will not drink any more wine in this way until the time
when I drink it with a new meaning when I begin to rule as a king.” 26 After they
sang a hymn, they went out toward Olive Tree Hill.
Jesus predicted that Peter would deny three times that he knew Jesus.
Mark 14:27-31
27 While they were on their way, Jesus said to them, “It has been {The prophets have}
written in the Scriptures that God said about me, ‘I will kill the shepherd and his sheep
will scatter.’ Those words will come true. When they are about to capture me, all of
you will leave me and run away. 28 But after I have been made {God has made me}
alive again, I will go ahead of you to Galilee district and meet you there.” 29 Then
Peter said to him, “Perhaps all the other disciples will leave you, but not I! I will not
leave you!” 30 Then Jesus said to him, “The truth is that this very night, before the
rooster crows a second time, you yourself will deny three times that you know me!”
31 But Peter replied strongly, “Even if they kill me as I defend you, I will never deny
that I know you!” And all the other disciples said the same thing.
While the disciples slept, Jesus prayed that God would spare him from the coming
suffering.
Mark 14:32-42
32 On the way, Jesus and the disciples came to the place that people call Gethsemane.
Then he said to some/eight of his disciples, “Stay here while I pray!” 33 Then he took
Peter, James, and John with him. He became extremely distressed, and he said to
them, 34 “I [SYN] am very sorrowful. It is as if I were about to die. You men remain
here and stay awake!” 35 He went a bit further and threw himself on the ground.
Then he prayed that if it were possible, he would not have to suffer [MTY]. 36 He said,
“O my Father, because you are able to do everything, rescue me so that I do not have
to suffer now [MTY]! But do not do what I want. Instead, do what you want!” 37 Then
he returned and found his disciples sleeping. He woke them up and said, “Simon! ◄I
am disappointed that you fell asleep and that you were not able to stay awake for just
a short time!/Why is it that you fell asleep and that you were not able to stay awakeMARK 14:38
1444
MARK 14:58
for just one hour?► [RHQ]” 38 And he said to them, “You want to do what I say, but you
are not strong enough [MTY] to actually do it. So keep awake and pray in order that
you can resist when something like this tempts you!” 39 Then he went away again and
prayed again what he prayed before. 40 When he returned, he found that they were
sleeping again because they were so sleepy that they could not keep their eyes open.
Because they were ashamed, they did not know what to say to him when he awakened
them. 41 Then he went and prayed again. He returned a third time; and he found them
sleeping again. He woke all of them and said to them, “◄I am disappointed that you
are sleeping again!/Why are you sleeping again?► [RHQ] You have slept enough. The
time for me to suffer is about to begin. Look! Someone is about to enable sinful men
to seize me, the one who came from heaven. 42 So get up! Let’s go toward him Look!
Here comes the one who is enabling them to seize me!”
Judas betrayed Jesus.
Mark 14:43-49
43 While he was still speaking, Judas arrived. Even though he was one of Jesus’
twelve disciples, he came to enable Jesus’ enemies to seize him. A crowd who
carried swords and clubs was with him. The leaders of the Jewish Council had sent
them. 44 Judas, who was ◄betraying Jesus/helping Jesus’ enemies to seize him►, had
previously told this crowd, “The man whom I kiss is the one whom you want. When
I kiss him, seize him and lead him away while you guard him carefully.” 45 So, when
Judas arrived, he immediately went to Jesus and said, “My teacher!” Then he kissed
Jesus on his neck/cheek. 46 Then the crowd seized Jesus. 47 But one of the disciples who
was standing nearby drew his short sword. He struck the servant of the high priest
with it to kill him, but he only cut off his ear. 48-49 Jesus said to them, “◄It is ridiculous
that you come here to seize me with swords and clubs, as if I were a bandit!/Have
you come here to seize me with swords and clubs, as if I were a bandit [RHQ]?► Day
after day I was with you in the Temple courtyard teaching the people Why did you
not seize me then? But this is happening in order that what the prophets have written
in the Scriptures about me may be fulfilled {may happen}.”
Mark ran away.
Mark 14:50-52
50 All the disciples at once left him and ran away. 51 At that time, ◄a young man/I►
was following Jesus. He/I was wearing only a linen cloth around his/my body. The
crowd seized him/me. 52 But, as he/I pulled away from them, he/I left behind the linen
cloth in their hands, and then he/I ran away naked.
After witnesses accusing Jesus contradicted each other, Jesus said that he was the
man who was also God, the Messiah, after which they decided that Jesus must die.
Mark 14:53-65
53 The men who had seized Jesus led him away to the house where the supreme
priest lived. All of the Jewish Council were gathering there. 54 Peter followed Jesus
at a distance. He went into the courtyard of the house where the supreme priest
lived, and sat there with the men who guarded the house of the supreme priest. He
was warming himself beside a fire. 55 The chief priests and all the rest of the Jewish
council had already tried to find people who would tell lies about Jesus in order that
they could convince the Roman authorities to execute him. But they did not succeed,
56 because, although many people spoke lies about him, they contradicted each other.
57 Finally, some stood up and accused him falsely by saying, 58 “We heard him when
he said, ‘I will destroy this Temple that was built by men, and then within three days
I will build another temple ◄without help from anyone else/that human hands willMARK 14:59
1445
MARK 15:5
not build►.’ ” 59 But, what some of these men said also did not agree with what others
of them said.
60 Then the supreme priest himself stood up in front of them and said to Jesus,
“Are you not going to reply? What do you say about all the things that they are
saying in order to accuse you?” 61 But Jesus was silent and did not reply [DOU].
Then the supreme priest tried again. He asked him, “Are you the Messiah? Do you
say that you are ◄the Son of God/the man who is also God►?” 62 Jesus said, “I am.
Furthermore, you will see me, the one who came from heaven, ruling beside God,
who is completely powerful. You will also see me coming down through the clouds
in the sky!” 63 In response to Jesus’ words, the supreme priest tore his outer garment.
That was their custom to show that he was shocked that Jesus had said that he was
equal to God. Then he said, “We certainly do not [RHQ] need any more people who
will testify against this man, 64 because you have heard what he said against God! He
claimed to be equal with God Therefore, what have you decided?” They all said that
Jesus was guilty and deserved ◄to be executed/that they should kill him►. 65 Then
some of them began spitting on Jesus. They put a blindfold on him, and then they
began striking him and saying to him, “If you are a prophet, tell us who hit you!” And
those who were guarding Jesus struck him with their hands.
As Jesus predicted, Peter denied three times that he knew Jesus.
Mark 14:66-72
66 While Peter was outside in the courtyard of the supreme priest’s house, one of
the girls who worked for the supreme priest came near him. 67 When she saw Peter
warming himself beside the fire, she looked at him closely. Then she said, “You also
were with Jesus, that man from Nazareth town!” 68 But he denied it by saying, “I
do not know or understand [DOU] what you are talking about!” Then he went away
from there to the gate of the courtyard. 69 The servant girl saw him there and said to
the people who were standing nearby, “This man is one of those who have been with
that man they arrested.” 70 But he denied it again. After a little while, one of those
who were standing there said to Peter again, “The way you speak shows that you also
are from Galilee district. So it is certain that you are one of those who accompanied
Jesus!” 71 But he began to exclaim, “I do not know the man that you are talking
about! Because God knows that I am speaking truthfully, may he punish me if I am
lying!” 72 Immediately the rooster crowed a second time. Then Peter remembered
what Jesus had said to him before, “Before the rooster crows a second time, you will
deny three times that you know me.” When he realized that he had denied it three
times, he started crying.
15
In the governor Pilate’s presence Jesus refused to answer accusations against him.
Mark 15:1-5
1 Very early in the morning the chief priests met together with the rest of the Jewish
council, in order to decide how to accuse Jesus before the Roman governor. Their guards
tied Jesus’ hands again. They took him to the house of Pilate, the governor, and they
started to accuse him, saying “Jesus is claiming that he is a king!!” 2 Pilate asked Jesus,
“Do you claim to be the king of the Jews?” Jesus answered him, “You yourself have
said so.” 3 Then the chief priests claimed that Jesus had done many bad things. 4 So
Pilate asked him again, “Don’t you have anything to say? Listen to how many bad
things they are saying that you have done!” 5 But even though Jesus was not guilty, he
did not say anything more. The result was that Pilate was very much surprised.MARK 15:6
1446
MARK 15:24
At the crowd’s insistence, Pilate released a criminal, and gave orders that Jesus
should be crucified.
Mark 15:6-15
6 It was the governor’s custom each year during the Passover celebration to release
one person who was in prison. He customarily released whichever prisoner the people
requested. 7 At that time there was a man called Barabbas who had been {whom the
soldiers had} put in prison with some other men. Those men had murdered some
soldiers when they rebelled against the Roman government. 8 A crowd approached
Pilate and asked him to release someone, just like he customarily did for them during
the Passover celebration. 9 Pilate answered them, “Would you like me to release for
you the man whom you Jewish people say is your king?” 10 He asked this because he
realized what the chief priests were wanting to do. They were accusing Jesus because
they were jealous of him because many people were becoming his disciples. 11 But the
chief priests urged the crowd to request that Pilate release Barabbas for them instead
of Jesus. 12 Pilate said to them again, “If I release Barabbas, what do you want me to do
with the man whom some of you Jews say is your king?” 13 Then they shouted again,
“Command that your soldiers crucify him!” 14 Then Pilate said to them, “Why? What
crime has he committed?” But they shouted even louder, “Command your soldiers to
crucify him!” 15 So, because Pilate wanted to please the crowd, he released Barabbas
for them. Then, after his soldiers had whipped Jesus with leather straps into which
they had fastened metal pieces, Pilate told the soldiers to take him away in order that
he would be crucified {they would crucify him}.
The soldiers ridiculed Jesus as being a king.
Mark 15:16-20
16 The soldiers took Jesus into the courtyard of the palace where Pilate lived. That
place was the government headquarters. Then they summoned the whole ◄cohort/
group of soldiers► who were on duty there. 17 After the soldiers gathered together,
they put a purple robe on Jesus. Then they placed on his head a crown that they
made from branches of thornbushes. They did those things in order to ridicule him by
pretending that he was a king. 18 Then they greeted him like they would greet a king,
in order to ridicule him, saying, “Hooray for the King who rules the Jews!” 19 They
repeatedly struck his head with a reed and spat on him. By kneeling down, they
pretended to honor him. 20 When they had finished ridiculing him, they pulled off the
purple robe. They put his own clothes on him, and then they led him outside of the
city in order to nail him to a cross.
After they crucified Jesus the soldiers gambled for his clothing.
Mark 15:21-24
21 After Jesus carried his cross a short distance, a man named Simon from Cyrene
city came along. He was the father of Alexander and Rufus. He was passing by while
he was returning home from outside the city. The soldiers compelled Simon to carry
the cross for Jesus. 22 They brought them both to a place that they call Golgotha. That
name means, ‘a place like a skull’. 23 Then they tried to give Jesus wine that was {that
they} mixed with medicine called myrrh. They wanted him to drink it so that he would
not feel so much pain when they crucified him. But he did not drink it. 24 Some of the
soldiers took his clothes. Then they nailed him to a cross. Afterwards, they divided
his clothes among themselves by gambling with something like dice. They did this in
order to determine which piece of clothing each one would get.MARK 15:25
1447
MARK 15:42-43
People passing by, as well as the Jewish leaders and two criminals crucified with
Jesus, insulted him.
Mark 15:25-32
25 It was nine o’clock in the morning when they crucified him. 26 They attached
to the cross above Jesus’ head a sign on which it had been written {someone had
written} the reason why they were nailing him to the cross. But all that it said was,
“The King of the Jews.” 27-28 They also nailed to crosses two men who were bandits.
They nailed one to a cross at the right side of Jesus and one to a cross at the left side
of Jesus. 29 The people who were passing by insulted him by shaking their heads as if
here were an evil man. They said, “Aha! You said that you would destroy the Temple
and then you would build it again within three days. 30 If you could do that, then
rescue yourself by coming down from the cross!” 31 The chief priests, along with the
men who taught the Jewish laws, also wanted to make fun of Jesus. So they said to
each other, “He claims to have saved others from their sicknesses [IRO] but he cannot
save himself! 32 He said, ‘I am the Messiah, I am the King who rules the people of
Israel.’ If his words are true, he should come down now from the cross! Then we will
believe him!” The two men who were crucified beside him also insulted him.
As several women who had accompanied Jesus watched, he died, after which the
Temple curtain split into two parts, and the Roman officer pronounced that Jesus was
the Son of God.
Mark 15:33-41
33 At noon the whole land became dark, and it stayed dark until three o’clock in the
afternoon. 34 At three o’clock Jesus shouted loudly, “Eloi, Eloi, lama sabachthani?”
That means, “My God, my God, why have you deserted me?” 35 When some of the
people who were standing there heard the word ‘Eloi’, misunderstanding it, they said,
“Listen! He is calling for the prophet Elijah!” 36 One of them ran and filled a sponge
with sour wine. He placed it on the tip of a reed, and then he held it up for Jesus to
suck out the wine that was in it. While he was doing that, someone said, “Wait! Let’s
see whether Elijah will come to take him down from the cross!” 37 And then, after
Jesus shouted loudly, he stopped breathing and died. 38 At that moment the heavy
thick curtain that closed off the most holy place in the Temple split into two pieces
from top to bottom. That showed that ordinary people could now go into the presence
of God. 39 The officer who supervised the soldiers who nailed Jesus to the cross was
standing in front of Jesus. When he saw how Jesus died, he exclaimed, “Truly, this
man was the man who was also God!” 40-41 There were also some women there,
watching these events from a distance. They had accompanied Jesus when he was in
Galilee district, and they had provided what he needed. They had come with him to
Jerusalem. Among those women was Mary from Magdala town. There was another
Mary, who was the mother of the younger James and of Joses. There was also Salome.
Several women watched as Joseph and others buried Jesus’ body in a cave after
getting permission from Pilate.
Mark 15:42-47
42-43 When evening was near, a man named Joseph from Arimathea town came there.
He was a member of the Jewish council, one whom everyone respected. He was also
one of those who had been waiting expectantly for the time when God would send his
king to begin to rule. He knew that, according to Jewish law, people’s bodies had to be
buried {someone had to bury people’s bodies} on the day they died. He also realized that
it was the day when people prepared things for ◄the Jewish day of rest/the Sabbath►,
and that the Sabbath would start when the sun set. So he became courageous and went
to Pilate and asked Pilate to permit him to take the body of Jesus down from the crossMARK 15:44
1448
MARK 16:14
and bury it immediately. 44 Pilate was surprised when he heard that Jesus was already
dead. So he summoned the officer who was in charge of the soldiers who crucified
Jesus, and he asked him if Jesus had already died. 45 When the officer told Pilate that
Jesus was dead, Pilate allowed Joseph to take away the body. 46 After Joseph bought a
linen cloth, he and others took Jesus’ body down from the cross. They wrapped it in
the linen cloth and laid it in a tomb that previously had been dug out of the rock cliff.
Then they rolled a huge flat stone in front of the entrance to the tomb. 47 Mary from
Magdala and Mary the mother of Joses were watching where Jesus’ body was placed
{where they placed Jesus’ body}.
16
Two days later several women were astonished to find Jesus’ tomb empty.
Mark 16:1-8
1 On Saturday evening when ◄the Sabbath/the Jewish day of rest► had ended, Mary
from Magdala, Mary the mother of the younger James, and Salome bought fragrant
ointment. The Jews had a custom of anointing bodies before they buried them, and
the women wanted to follow this custom. 2 So very early on Sunday, just after the sun
rose, they took the fragrant ointment and started toward the tomb. 3 While they were
going there, they were saying to each other, “Who will roll away for us the stone that
blocks the entrance of the tomb?” 4 After they arrived, they looked up and saw that
the stone had already been rolled away {that someone had already rolled away the
stone}. They were surprised because it would have been difficult to move such a huge
stone. 5 They entered the tomb and saw an angel who looked like a young man. He
was sitting at the right side of the cave. He was wearing a shining white robe. As a
result, they were astonished. 6 The young man said to them, “Do not be astonished!
I know that you are looking for Jesus, the man from Nazareth, who was nailed to a
cross {whom they nailed to a cross}. But he has become alive again! He is not here!
Look! Here is the place where they placed his body. 7 But, instead of remaining here,
go and tell his disciples. Particularly be sure that you tell Peter. Tell them, ‘Jesus is
going ahead of you to Galilee district, and you will see him there, just like he told you
previously’!” 8 The women went outside and ran from the tomb. They were trembling
because they were afraid, and they were astonished. But they did not say anything to
anyone about this while they were going, because they were afraid.
Jesus rebuked the disciples for not believing the reports of his being alive again.
Mark 16:9-14
9 [When Jesus became alive again early on Sunday morning, he appeared first to
Mary from Magdala town. She was the woman from whom he had previously expelled
seven evil spirits. 10 She went to those who had been with Jesus, while they were
mourning and crying. She told them what she had seen. 11 But when she told them
that Jesus was alive again and that she had seen him, they refused to believe it.
12 Later that day, Jesus appeared to two of his disciples while they were walking from
Jerusalem to their homes in the surrounding area. But they did not recognize him
quickly because he looked very different. 13 After they recognized him, those two went
back to Jerusalem. They told his other followers what had happened, but they did not
believe it. 14 Later he appeared to the eleven apostles while they were eating. He
rebuked them because they had stubbornly refused to believe the reports of those
who saw him after he had become alive again.MARK 16:15
1449
MARK 16:20
Miracles began to happen after Jesus instructed his disciples to preach the gospel
everywhere and he told them that miracles would accompany their ministry.
Mark 16:15-20
15 Later he said to them, “Go into the whole world and preach the good message to
everyone! 16 Everyone who believes your message and who is baptized will be saved
{God will save}. But everyone who does not believe it will be condemned {God will
condemn}. 17 Those who believe my good message will perform miracles. Specifically,
by my power they will expel evil spirits. They will speak in languages that they have
not learned. 18 If they pick up snakes accidentally or if they drink any poisonous liquid
accidentally, they will not be hurt. Whenever they put their hands on sick people in
order that God will heal them, those sick people will become well.”
19 After the Lord Jesus had said this to the disciples, he was taken {God took him}
up into heaven. Then he sat down on his throne beside God to rule with him. 20 As
for the disciples, they went out from Jerusalem, and then they preached everywhere.
Wherever they went, the Lord enabled them to perform miracles. By doing that, he
showed people that God’s message is true.LUKE 1:1-2
1450
LUKE 1:19
This book is the Gospel that Luke wrote. We call this book
Luke
Luke 1:1-4
Luke told Theophilus why he was writing about all that Jesus did.
1-2 My noble friend Theophilus, many people saw the things that Jesus did while he
was with us, from the time when he started [MTY] his ministry. They served God by
teaching people the message about the Lord Jesus. Many of those who heard what
they taught wrote down for us accounts of the things that Jesus did from the time
when he began his ministry. 3 I myself have studied these accounts carefully. So I
decided that it would be good for me also to write for you (sg) an accurate account
of these matters. 4 I want you to know the truth about what you have been taught
{what others have taught you}.
An angel told Zechariah that his wife Elizabeth would bear a son, John.
Luke 1:5-25
5 When King Herod the Great ruled Judea district, there was a Jewish priest named
Zechariah. He belonged to the group of priests called the Abijah group. He and
his wife Elizabeth were both descended from the first priest of Israel, Aaron. 6 God
considered that both of them were righteous, because they constantly completely
obeyed everything that God had commanded. 7 But they had no children, because
Elizabeth had been unable to bear children. Furthermore, she and her husband
were very old.
8 One day Zechariah’s group was doing their work in the Temple in Jerusalem, and
he was serving as a priest in God’s presence. 9 Following their custom, the other
priests chose him by lot to enter the Lord’s temple and burn incense. 10 While he was
burning the incense, many people were outside in the courtyard, praying. 11 Then
an angel whom God had sent appeared to him. The angel was standing at the right
side of the place where the priests burned incense. 12 When Zechariah saw the angel,
he was startled and became very afraid. 13 But the angel said to him, “Zechariah,
do not be afraid! When you (sg) prayed asking God for a son (OR, that God would
send the Messiah), God heard what you prayed. So your wife Elizabeth shall bear a
son. You must name him John. 14 He will cause you to be very happy, and many
other people will also be happy because he is born. 15 God will consider him to be
very important. He must never drink wine or any other alcoholic drink, in order
that he will be completely dedicated to God. He will be controlled by the Holy Spirit
{The Holy Spirit will control him} from before he is born. 16 He will persuade many
people in Israel to turn away from their sins and please the Lord their God. 17 As God’s
Spirit enables him to preach powerfully as the prophet Elijah did, he will precede the
Messiah. He will cause parents [SYN] to act peacefully toward their children again.
He will cause many people who do not obey God to hear and obey the wise things that
righteous people tell them. He will do this in order to help many people to be ready
when the Lord comes.”
18 Then Zechariah said to the angel, “I am very old, and my wife is also so old that
she cannot bear a child. So ◄I cannot believe that what you (sg) said will happen!/how
can I believe that what you (sg) said will happen?► [RHQ]”
19 Then the angel said to him, “I am God’s chief angel, Gabriel! I do what God tells
me, because I constantly am in God’s presence! I was sent {He sent me} to tell you (sg)LUKE 1:20
1451
LUKE 1:43
something good that is going to happen to you. 20 What I have told you will certainly
happen at the time God decides, but you did not believe what I told you. So now God
will make you will be unable to talk until the day your son is born”!
21 While Zechariah and the angel were talking, the people in the courtyard were
waiting for Zechariah to come out. They wondered, “Why is he staying in the Temple
for such a long time?” 22 When Zechariah came out, he was not able to speak to
the people. Because he could not talk, he made motions with his hands to try to
convey what had happened. Then they realized that he had seen ◄a vision from God/
something that God showed him► while he was in the Temple.
23 When Zechariah’s time to work as a priest in the Temple was finished, he left
Jerusalem and returned to his home.
24 Some time later his wife Elizabeth became pregnant [EUP]. She did not leave their
house for five months, because she knew that people would laugh at her if she told them
that she was pregnant. 25 But she thought, “God has enabled me to become pregnant.
He has pitied me and I will no longer be ashamed because I have no children!”
An angel told a virgin named Mary that she would bear a son, to be named Jesus.
Luke 1:26-38
26 When Elizabeth had been pregnant [EUP] for almost six months, the angel Gabriel
was sent by God {God sent the angel Gabriel} again. 27 This time he went to Nazareth
town in Galilee district, to a virgin whose name was Mary. It had been {Her parents
had} promised that she would marry a man named Joseph, who was descended from
King David. 28 The angel greeted her and said, “◄The Lord/God► is with you (sg) and
you will be greatly blessed {has decided to greatly bless you}!” 29 But Mary was very
confused when she heard that. She wondered what the angel meant by these words.
30 Then the angel said to her, “Mary, God is very pleased with you (sg), so do not be
afraid. 31 You will become pregnant and bear a son, and you must name him Jesus.
32 He will become great. He will be called {People will call him} ◄the Son of God/the
man who is also God►. God, the Lord, will make him a king [MTY] as his ancestor
King David was. 33 He will be the King of the Jews, the descendants [MTY] of your
ancestor Jacob, forever. He will rule as king forever!”
34 Then Mary said to the angel, “I am a virgin, so how can I have a baby?” 35 The
angel replied, “The Holy Spirit will come to you; the power of God [MTY/EUP] will
overshadow you and enable you to become pregnant. So the child you will bear will
be completely set apart {give himself completely} to obey God, and he will be called
{people will say that he is} ◄the Son of God/the man who is also God►. 36 I also
need to tell you something else. Your cousin Elizabeth is very old, and it was thought
{people said} that she could not bear any children. But she has been pregnant [EUP]
for almost six months, and will bear a son! 37 You should not be surprised at that,
because God can do everything!” 38 Then Mary said, “All right, I want to serve ◄the
Lord/God►, so may what you (sg) have said about me come true!” Then the angel left
her.
Mary visited Elizabeth.
Luke 1:39-45
39 Very soon after that, Mary got ready and went quickly to a town in the highlands
of Judea district where Zechariah lived. 40 She entered his house and greeted his
wife Elizabeth. 41 As soon as Elizabeth heard Mary greet her, the baby moved inside
Elizabeth’s womb. The Holy Spirit took complete control of Elizabeth, 42 and she said
loudly to Mary, “God has blessed you more than he has blessed any other woman,
and he has blessed the child you will bear! 43 ◄I am not worthy that God would allowLUKE 1:44
1452
LUKE 1:66
you to visit me!/Why is God allowing you to visit me?► [RHQ] You will be the mother
of my Lord! 44 I realize this because as soon as I heard you greet me, the baby inside
my womb moved because he was so happy that you had come. 45 God is pleased with
you because you believed that what ◄the Lord/God► told you would come true.”
Mary praised God.
Luke 1:46-56
46 Then Mary praised God by saying/singing:
“, how I [SYN] praise ◄the Lord/God►!
47 I am happy because God is the one who saves me.
48 I was only his lowly servant girl, but he did not forget me.
So from now on, everyone will say that God was pleased with me,
49 because they will hear about the things that God [MTY], the mighty one, has done
for me.
He [MTY] is awesome!
50 He acts mercifully toward all those who respect him.
51 He shows people that he [MTY] is very powerful. He scatters those who think
proudly.
52 He does not let mighty kings rule [MTY] any more, but he honors people who are
oppressed (OR, humble).
53 He gives good things to eat to those who are hungry, but he sends away the rich
people without giving them anything.
54-55 He promised to Abraham and all our other ancestors who descended from him
that he would act mercifully toward them forever.
And now he has remembered what he promised.
So he has helped me and all the other people of [MTY] Israel who serve him.”
56 Mary stayed with Elizabeth for about three months. Then she returned to her
home.
What happened when John was born.
Luke 1:57-66
57 When it was time for Elizabeth to give birth to her child, she bore a son.
58 Her neighbors and relatives heard how ◄the Lord/God► had greatly blessed her
by enabling her to bear a child, so they were happy along with Elizabeth. 59 Seven
days later they gathered together for the ceremony for circumcising the baby to show
that he belonged to God. They wanted to give the baby the same name as his father,
Zechariah. 60 But his mother said, “No, his name will not be Zechariah. His name will
be John!” 61 So they said to her, “John is not the name of any of your (dl) relatives, so
you(dl) should not give him that name!” 62 Then they made motions with their hands
to Zechariah, for him to indicate what name he wanted to be given {to give} to his
son. 63 So he signaled that they should give him a tablet to write on. When they gave
him one, he wrote on it, “His name is John.” All those who were there were surprised!
64 Immediately Zechariah was able to speak again [MTY], and he praised God. 65 All
their neighbors were amazed/awestruck! They told other people who lived all over
the highlands of Judea about what had happened. 66 Everyone who heard about it
kept thinking about it. They were saying, “We wonder what will this child do for God
when he grows up [RHQ]!” They wondered that because from what had happened they
were sure that God would be helping that child [SYN] in a powerful way.
Zechariah praised God and predicted what his son would do.
Luke 1:67-80LUKE 1:67
1453
LUKE 2:5
67 After Zechariah’s son was born, Zechariah was completely directed by the Holy
Spirit {the Holy Spirit completely directed Zechariah} as he spoke these words
that came from God:
68 “Praise the Lord, the God whom we(inc) people of Israel worship,
because he has come to set us, his people, free from our enemies.
69 He is sending us someone who will powerfully [MTY] save us,
someone who is descended from [MTY] King David,
who served God well.
70 Long ago God caused his prophets to say that he would do that.
71 He will rescue us from our enemies,
and he will save us from the power of all those who hate us.
72 He will do this because he has not forgotten what he promised our ancestors;
he made an agreement that he would act mercifully to us, their descendants.
73 That is what he strongly promised our ancestor Abraham that he would do.
74 God told him that we would be rescued {he would rescue us} from the power of
our enemies,
that he would enable us to serve him without being afraid,
75 that he would cause us to be completely dedicated to him,
and enable us to live righteously all of our lives.”
76 Then Zechariah said this to his little son:
“My child, you will be called {people will say that you are} a prophet
whom God [MTY/EUP] has sent;
you will begin your work before ◄the Lord/Messiah► comes;
you will prepare people so that they will be ready for him.
(OR, you will begin your work before the Messiah comes).
77 You will tell God’s people how he will forgive them and save them from being
punished for their sins.
78 Our God will do that because he is very kind to us.
Just like a new day begins when the sun rises [MET],
God will do that new thing for us when the Messiah comes to us from heaven.
79 People who do not know God [MET] are like those who sit in the darkness.
They are afraid [MTY] that they will soon die.
But when the Messiah tells us God’s message,
it will be like causing such people to see a bright light.
He will guide us [SYN] so that we will be living peacefully.”
80 Later, Zechariah’s son grew up and became spiritually strong. Then he lived in
a desolate region until he began to preach to the Israeli people.
2
Jesus was born in Bethlehem.
Luke 2:1-7
1 About that time the Emperor Augustus commanded that ◄his officials must write
down the names/a census be taken► of all the people who lived in countries controlled
by the Roman government {that the Roman government controlled}, so that the
government could collect taxes from them. 2 That was the first time that they ◄wrote
down the names/took a census► in Syria province, which included Judea district. They
did this while Quirinius was the governor of the province. 3 Every person had to go
to the town where his most famous ancestor had lived, so that the officials could write
down their names. 4 So, because Joseph was a descendant of King David, he went up
from Nazareth, the town in Galilee district where he lived, to the town of Bethlehem
in Judea district. That was the town where King David grew up. 5 Joseph went withLUKE 2:6-7
1454
LUKE 2:24
Mary, who was considered {whom people considered} to be his wife, who was now
pregnant. They went so that they could put his name and Mary’s name in the record
book. 6-7 When they arrived in Bethlehem, there was no place for them to stay in the
house where travelers stay. So they stayed in a cattle shed. When the time for Mary
to give birth arrived, she gave birth to her first son there. She wrapped him in strips
of cloth and placed him in a trough where people put food for the animals.
Responding to the angel’s announcement, shepherds went to see Jesus.
Luke 2:8-20
8 That night, there were some shepherds who were taking care of their sheep as
usual in the fields near Bethlehem. 9 An angel from God appeared to them. A great
light ◄from the Lord/from God► shone on them and around them. So they became
very afraid. 10 But the angel said to them, “Do not be afraid! I have come to tell you
good news, which will make you very happy! This message is for everyone to hear.
11 The message is that today a baby has been born in Bethlehem, the town where King
David grew up. That baby will eventually save you from the guilt of your sins! He is
the Messiah, your Lord! 12 I will tell you how you will recognize him (OR, how you
will know that what I say is true): In Bethlehem you will find a baby who has been
wrapped {whose mother has wrapped him} in strips of cloth and placed in a trough
where people put food for the animals.”
13 Suddenly a large group of angels from heaven appeared and joined the other
angel. They all praised God, singing/saying, 14 “May all the angels in the highest
heaven praise God! And on the earth may the people to whom God has shown his
favor have peace with him!”
15 After the angels left them and returned to heaven, the shepherds said to each
other, “Let’s go to Bethlehem to see this wonderful thing that has happened, which
◄the Lord/God► has told us about!” 16 So they went quickly. They found the place
where Mary and Joseph were staying, and they saw the baby lying in the trough where
people put food for the animals. 17 Then they told Mary and Joseph and others what
had been told them {what the angel had told them} about this child. 18 Everyone
who heard what was said by the shepherds {what the shepherds said} to them was
amazed. 19 But Mary did not talk to others about what the angels said; she just kept
thinking very much about it. 20 The shepherds returned to their sheep. They kept
praising God very much for all the things that they had heard and seen, because
everything happened exactly like the angels told them.
They circumcised Jesus and presented him to the Lord.
Luke 2:21-24
21 Seven days later, when the priests circumcised the baby, his parents named him
Jesus. That was the name that they were told by the angel {the angel told them} to
give him before Mary became pregnant.
22-23 It had been written by Moses {Moses had written} long ago in a law that God
gave him, that when a woman gave birth to her first son, the parents had to take
him to the Temple in Jerusalem in order that they might dedicate him ◄to the Lord/to
God►. So when the time came for them to do those rituals so that God would consider
them pure again, Mary and Joseph took Jesus there. 24 God had commanded in his
laws that if the first child of a couple was a boy, his parents should offer as a sacrifice
to God two turtledoves or two young pigeons. So Joseph and Mary gave the priest two
birds so he could offer them.
Simeon prophesied about what Jesus would do.
Luke 2:25-35LUKE 2:25
1455
LUKE 2:47
25 At that time there was an old man in Jerusalem whose name was Simeon.
He
habitually did what was pleasing to God and he obeyed God’s laws. The Holy Spirit
was directing him as he was waiting for God [MTY] to encourage the Israeli people
by sending the Messiah. 26 It was previously revealed by the Holy Spirit {The Holy
Spirit previously revealed} to him that he would see God’s promised Messiah before
he died. 27 When Joseph and Mary brought their baby Jesus to the Temple in order
to perform the rituals that God had commanded in his laws, the Spirit led Simeon to
enter the Temple courtyard, and revealed to him that Jesus was the Messiah. 28 So he
took Jesus up in his arms and praised God, saying,
29-32 Lord, you promised me that I would see the one [MTY] who would enable
you to save people of all people-groups from the guilt of their sins. He will be [MET]
like a light that will reveal your truth to non-Jews, and he will cause people to think
highly of your people, the Israeli people. Since I [SYN] have now seen this one that
you promised to send, now let me die peacefully.
33 His parents marveled about what Simeon said about Jesus. Then Simeon blessed
them, and said to Mary, 34 “Note what I say: God has determined that because of this
child, many Israeli people will turn away from God, and many others will turn to God
[MET]. Although he will be like a sign [MET] to warn people, many people will oppose
him. 35 As a result, the evil thoughts of many people will be made evident {he will
reveal the evil thoughts of many people}. Furthermore, the cruel things that they will
do to him [MET] will be like a sword that will pierce your ◄soul/inner being►.”
Anna praised God for Jesus and told others about him.
Luke 2:36-38
36 There was also in the Temple courtyard a very old woman named Anna. She was
a prophetess. Her father Phanuel was a member of the tribe of Asher. After she had
been married seven years, her husband died. 37 After that, she lived until she was 84
years old, and she was still a widow. She stayed in the Temple area all the time, night
and day, worshipping God. She often ◄abstained from food/fasted► as she prayed.
38 While Joseph and Mary and the baby were still in the Temple, Anna came to them.
She thanked God for the baby. Then she spoke about Jesus to many people who were
expecting God to send the Messiah [MTY] to set the people of [MTY] Jerusalem free
from their enemies.
Jesus grew up in Nazareth.
Luke 2:39-40
39 After Joseph and Mary had finished performing the rituals that ◄the Lord/God►
required the parents of a first son to perform, they returned to their own town,
Nazareth, in Galilee district. 40 As Jesus grew up, he became strong and very wise,
and God was very pleased with him.
What Jesus did in the Temple when he was a boy.
Luke 2:41-52
41 Every year Jesus’ parents went to Jerusalem to celebrate the Passover festival.
42 So when Jesus was twelve years old, they went up to Jerusalem as they always did.
43 When the celebration ended, his parents started to return home, but Jesus stayed
in Jerusalem. His parents did not realize that Jesus stayed there. 44 They thought
that he was with the other people who were traveling with them. They walked all
day. Then they started to look for him among their relatives and friends. 45 They did
not find him, so they returned to Jerusalem to search for him. 46 Two days later, they
found him. He was in the Temple courtyard, sitting with the Jewish religious teachers.
He was listening to what they said, and he was asking them questions. 47 EveryoneLUKE 2:48
1456
LUKE 3:8
who heard what he said was amazed at how much he understood and how well he
answered the questions that the teachers asked. 48 When his parents saw him, they
were very surprised. His mother said to him, “My son, why have you done this to
us? Your father and I have been very worried as we (exc) have been searching for
you!” 49 He said to them, speaking about the Temple being God his Father’s house, “◄I
am surprised that you (dl) did not know where to find me!/Why did you not know
where to find me?► [RHQ] ◄You (dl) should have known that it was necessary for me
to be in my Father’s house!/Did you not know that it was necessary for me to be in
my Father’s house?► [RHQ]” 50 But they did not understand the meaning of what he
said to them. 51 Then he returned with them down to Nazareth. He always obeyed
them. But his mother kept thinking about all those things.
52 As the years passed, Jesus continued to become wiser and he grew taller. God
and people continued to approve of him more and more.
3
s1 The beginning of John the Baptizer’s ministry
1 When the Emperor Tiberius had been ruling the Roman Empire for 15 years, and
while Pontius Pilate was the governor of Judea district, and Herod Antipas was ruling
Galilee district, and his brother Philip was ruling Iturea and Trachonitis districts, and
Lysanius was ruling Abilene district, 2 and while Annas and Caiaphas were the high
priests in Jerusalem, God gave messages to Zechariah’s son John while he was living
in the desolate region. 3 So John went all over the area close to the Jordan River. He
kept telling people, “If you want God to forgive you for your sins, you must ◄repent/
turn away from your sinful behavior► before you ask me to baptize you!”
4 John was the one who fulfilled these words that had been written by the prophet
Isaiah {that the prophet Isaiah had written} on a scroll long ago:
In a desolate area, someone [SYN] will be heard shouting to the people who pass
by,
“Prepare yourselves to receive the Lord when he comes!
Make yourselves ready so that you will be prepared when he comes,
just like people straighten out the road [MET] for an important official [MET, DOU]!
5 Just like people level off all the places where the land rises and just like they fill
all the ravines,
and just like people make the road straight wherever it is crooked,
and just like people make smooth the bumps in the road,
similarly you need to remove all the obstacles which prevent God from blessing
you!
6 Then people [SYN] everywhere will understand how God can save [MTY]
people.”
7 Although large groups of people came to John to be baptized {in order that he
would baptize them}, he knew that many of them were not sincere. So he kept saying to
them, “You people are evil [MET] like poisonous snakes! I warn you that God will some
day punish [MTY] everyone who sins. And ◄do not think that you can escape from his
punishing [MTY] you if you do not turn from your sinful behavior!/did someone tell you
that you can escape from his punishing [MTY] you if you do not turn from your sinful
behavior?► [RHQ] (OR, Who told you that you could escape God’s punishment?) 8 Do
what is appropriate for people who have truly turned from their sinful behavior! God
promised to give Abraham many descendants. In order to fulfill that promise, God does
not need you! I tell you that he can change these stones to make them descendants of
Abraham! So do not begin to say to yourselves, ‘We (exc) are descendants of Abraham,LUKE 3:9
1457
LUKE 3:27
so God will not punish us, even though we have sinned!’ 9 God is ready to punish you
if you do not turn away from your sinful behavior, just like a man [MET] lays his axe at
the roots of a fruit tree to chop it down and throw it into the fire if it does not produce
good fruit [MET].”
10 Then various ones in the crowd asked John, “What shall we (exc) do to escape
God punishing us (OR), to show that we have repented?” 11 He answered them, “If
any of you has two shirts, you should give one of them to someone who has no shirt.
If any of you has plenty of food, you should give some to those who have no food.”
12 Some tax collectors came and asked to be baptized (asked him to baptize them}.
They asked him, “Teacher, what shall we (exc) do to please God?” 13 He said to them,
“Do not take from the people any more money than the Roman government tells you
to take!” 14 Some soldiers asked him, “What about us? What should we (exc) do to
please God?” He said to them, “Do not say to anyone, ‘If you(sg) do not give me some
money, I will hurt you,’ and do not take people to court and falsely accuse them of
doing something wrong! And be content with your wages.”
15 People were expecting that the Messiah would come soon. Because of that, many
of them wondered about John. Some of them asked him if he was the Messiah. 16 John
replied to them all, “No, I am not. I used only water when I baptized you. But the
Messiah will soon come! He is far greater than I am. He is so great that I am not
worthy to be like his slave and untie his sandals [MET] like a slave would do! He
will put his Holy Spirit within [MTY] you to truly change your lives, and he will judge
others of you and punish you in the fire [MET] in hell. 17 He is like a man [MET] who
wants to clear away the grain on the ground where it has been threshed {they have
threshed it}. That man uses a huge fork to throw the grain into the air to separate the
wheat from the chaff [MET], and then he cleans up the threshing area. Similarly, God
will separate righteous people from the evil people, like a man who gathers the wheat
into his storage area, and then he will burn those who are like chaff with a fire ◄that
will never be put out/that will burn forever►.”
18 John kept telling people many things to urge them to turn to God, as he told them
the good message from God. 19 He also rebuked the ruler of the district, Herod Antipas.
He rebuked him for marrying Herodias, his brother’s wife, while his brother was still
alive, and for doing many other evil things. 20 But Herod had his soldiers put John in
prison. That was another evil thing he did.
John baptized Jesus.
Luke 3:21-22
21 But before John was put in prison, when many people were being baptized {when
he was baptizing many people}, after Jesus was baptized {he baptized Jesus} and Jesus
was praying, the sky opened. 22 Then the Holy Spirit, resembling a dove, descended
upon Jesus. And God [SYN/EUP] spoke to Jesus from heaven, saying, “You (sg) are my
Son, whom I love dearly. I am very pleased with you!”
The list of Jesus’ ancestors.
Luke 3:23-38
23 When Jesus began his work for God, he was about 30 years old. It was {People}
thought that he was the son of Joseph. Joseph was the son of Heli. 24 Heli was the
son of Matthat. Matthat was the son of Levi. Levi was the son of Melchi. Melchi was
the son of Jannai. Jannai was the son of Joseph. 25 Joseph was the son of Mattathias.
Mattathias was the son of Amos. Amos was the son of Nahum. Nahum was the son of
Esli. Esli was the son of Naggai. 26 Naggai was the son of Maath. Maath was the son of
Mattathias. Mattathias was the son of Semein. Semein was the son of Josech. Josech
was the son of Joda. 27 Joda was the son of Joanan. Joanan was the son of Rhesa.LUKE 3:28
1458
LUKE 4:12
Rhesa was the son of Zerubbabel. Zerubbabel was the son of Shealtiel. Shealtiel was
the son of Neri. 28 Neri was the son of Melchi. Melchi was the son of Addi. Addi was
the son of Cosam. Cosam was the son of Elmadam. Elmadam was the son of Er. 29 Er
was the son of Joshua. Joshua was the son of Eliezer. Eliezer was the son of Jorim.
Jorim was the son of Matthat. Matthat was the son of Levi. 30 Levi was the son of
Simeon. Simeon was the son of Judah. Judah was the son of Joseph. Joseph was the
son of Jonam. Jonam was the son of Eliakim. 31 Eliakim was the son of Melea. Melea
was the son of Menna. Menna was the son of Mattatha. Mattatha was the son of
Nathan. Nathan was the son of David. 32 David was the son of Jesse. Jesse was the
son of Obed. Obed was the son of Boaz. Boaz was the son of Sala. Sala was the son of
Nahshon. 33 Nahshon was the son of Amminadab. Amminadab was the son of Admin.
Admin was the son of Arni. Arni was the son of Hezron. Hezron was the son of Perez.
Perez was the son of Judah. 34 Judah was the son of Jacob. Jacob was the son of Isaac.
Isaac was the son of Abraham. Abraham was the son of Terah. Terah was the son of
Nahor. 35 Nahor was the son of Serug. Serug was the son of Reu. Reu was the son of
Peleg. Peleg was the son of Eber. Eber was the son of Shelah. 36 Shelah was the son of
Cainan. Cainan was the son of Arphaxad. Arphaxad was the son of Shem. Shem was
the son of Noah. Noah was the son of Lamech. 37 Lamech was the son of Methuselah.
Methuselah was the son of Enoch. Enoch was the son of Jared. Jared was the son of
Mahalalel. Mahalalel was the son of Cainan. 38 Cainan was the son of Enos. Enos was
the son of Seth. Seth was the son of Adam. Adam was the man God created.
4
Luke 4:1-13
Jesus refused to do the things that Satan suggested to him.
1 As Jesus left the Jordan River valley, the Holy Spirit was completely controlling
him. 2 For 40 days the Spirit led him around in the desolate area. During that time
Jesus was being tempted by the devil {the devil was tempting him}, and Jesus did not
eat anything. When that time ended, he was very hungry. 3 Then the devil said to
Jesus, “Because you claim that you ◄have a relationship with God as a son has with
his father [MET]/are the man who is both God and man►, prove it by telling these
stones to become bread so that you can eat them!” 4 Jesus replied, “No, I will not
change stones into bread, because it is written {Moses wrote} in the Scriptures that
eating food sustains people physically, but it does not sustain them spiritually. They
also need food for their spirits.” 5 Then the devil took him on top of a high mountain
and showed him in an instant all the nations in the world. 6 Then he said to Jesus, “I
will give you the authority to rule all these areas and will make you famous. I can do
this because God has permitted me to control these areas, and I can allow anyone I
desire to rule them! 7 So if you worship me, I will let you rule them all!” 8 But Jesus
replied, “No, I will not worship you, because it is written {the Psalmist wrote} in the
Scriptures, ‘It is the Lord, your God, whom you must worship, and you must serve
only him!’ ”
9 Then the devil took Jesus to Jerusalem. He set him on the highest part of the
Temple and said to him, “Because you claim that you ◄have a relationship with God
as a son has with his father [MET]/are the man who is both God and man►, prove it by
jumping down from here. 10 You will not be hurt, because it is written {the Psalmist
wrote} in the Scriptures, ‘God will command his angels to protect you (sg). 11 They
will lift you up with their hands when you are falling, so that you will not get hurt.
You will not even strike your foot on a stone.’ ” 12 But Jesus replied, “No, I will not do
that, because it is written {Moses wrote} in the Scriptures: ‘Do not try to test the LordLUKE 4:13
1459
LUKE 4:28
your God to see if he will prevent something bad from happening to you when you do
something foolish’.”
13 Then, after the devil had finished trying to tempt Jesus in many ways, he left him.
He wanted to try to tempt him later at an appropriate time.
Jesus began his work in Galilee district.
Luke 4:14-15
14 As the Spirit empowered him, Jesus returned to Galilee district. People throughout
all that region heard about what he was doing. 15 He taught people in their
◄synagogues/meeting places►. As a result, he was praised by everyone {everyone
praised him}.
The people of Jesus’ hometown tried to kill him after he rebuked them for rejecting
him.
Luke 4:16-30
16 Then Jesus went to Nazareth, the town where he grew up. ◄On the Sabbath/On
the Jewish rest day► he went ◄to the synagogue/to the Jewish meeting place►, as
he usually did. He stood up to indicate that he wanted to read Scriptures to them.
17 A scroll containing the words that the prophet Isaiah had written was given to
him {Someone gave to him a scroll containing the words that the prophet Isaiah had
written}. He opened the scroll and found the place from which he wanted to read.
He read these words:
18 The Spirit ◄of the Lord/of God► is upon me.
He has appointed [MTY] me to declare God’s good news to the poor.
He has sent me here to proclaim that God will deliver those whom Satan has captured,
and
he will enable me to enable those who are blind to see.
He will enable me to free people who have been oppressed {whom others have
oppressed}.
19 And he sent me to declare that now is the time when ◄the Lord/God► will act
favorably toward people.
20 Then he rolled up the scroll and gave it back to the attendant, and sat down
to teach the people. Everyone in the synagogue was looking intently [MTY] at him.
21 He said to them, “Today as you have been hearing [MTY] me speak, I am beginning
to fulfill this Scripture passage.” 22 At first everyone there spoke well about him,
and they were amazed at the charming words that he spoke. But then some of them
said, “◄He is only Joseph’s son!/Isn’t he only Joseph’s son?► [RHQ] So ◄it is useless
for us(exc) to listen to what he says!/why should we(exc) listen to what he says?►
[RHQ]” 23 He said to them, “Surely some of you will quote to me the proverb that
says, ‘Doctor, heal yourself!’ What you will mean is, ‘People told us that you did
miracles in Capernaum town, but we(exc) do not know if those reports are true. So
do miracles here in your own hometown, too!’ ” 24 Then he said, “It is certainly true
that people do not accept the message of a prophet when he speaks in his hometown,
just like you(pl) are not accepting my message now. 25 But think about this: There
were many widows in Israel during the time when the prophet Elijah lived. During
that time, because of there being no rain [MTY] for three years and six months, there
was a great famine throughout the country. 26 But God did not send Elijah to help
any of those Jewish widows. God sent him to Zarepath town near Sidon city, to help
a non-Jewish widow. 27 There were also many Jewish lepers in Israel during the time
when the prophet Elisha lived. But Elisha did not heal any of them. He healed only
Naaman, a non-Jewish man from Syria.” 28 When all the people in the synagogue
heard him say that, they were very angry, because they realized that he was inferringLUKE 4:29
1460
LUKE 4:44
that he similarly would help non-Jewish people instead of helping Jews (OR, that they
also were not worthy of receiving God’s help). 29 So they all got up and shoved him
out of the town. They took him to the top of the hill outside their town in order to
throw him off the cliff and kill him. 30 But he simply walked through their midst and
went away.
Jesus expelled an evil spirit.
Luke 4:31-37
31 One day Jesus went with his disciples down to Capernaum, a town in Galilee
district. On the next ◄Sabbath/Jewish day of rest► (OR, Each ◄Sabbath/Jewish day of
rest►), he taught the people ◄in the synagogue/in the Jewish meeting place►. 32 They
were continually amazed at what he was teaching, because he spoke ◄with authority/
as people speak who have the right to command others what to do►. 33 That day,
(OR, On one of those Jewish days of rest,) there was a man in the synagogue who
was controlled by an evil spirit. That man shouted very loudly, 34 “Hey! Jesus, from
Nazareth! We(exc) evil spirits have nothing in common with you, so ◄do not interfere
with us now!/why should you interfere with us now?► [RHQ] ◄Do not destroy us now!/
Have you come to destroy us now?► [RHQ] I know who you are. You are the Holy
One who has come from God!” 35 Jesus rebuked the evil spirit, saying, “Be quiet! And
come out of the man!” The demon threw the man down on the ground in the midst
of the people. But without harming the man, the demon left him. 36 The people
were all amazed. They said to each other, “◄What he says to the demons has great
power!/What kind of teaching is this?► [RHQ] He speaks to them like he knows that
they must obey him, and as a result they leave people!” 37 The people were telling
everyone in every village in the surrounding region what Jesus had done.
Jesus healed Simon’s mother-in-law and many others.
Luke 4:38-41
38 Jesus and his disciples left ◄the synagogue/the Jewish meeting place► and entered
Simon’s house. Simon’s mother-in-law was sick and had a high fever. So others in
Simon’s family (OR, the disciples) asked Jesus to heal her. 39 So he bent over her and
commanded the fever to leave her. At once she became well! She got up and served
them some food.
40 When the sun was setting that day, and the restriction about not traveling ◄on
the Sabbath/on the Jewish rest day► was ended, many people [HYP] whose friends or
relatives were sick or who had various diseases brought them to Jesus. He put his
hands on them and healed all of them. 41 He also was expelling demons from many
people. As the demons left those people, they shouted to Jesus, “You are ◄the Son of
God/the one who is God and man►!” But he rebuked those demons and would not
allow them to tell people about him, because they knew that he was the Messiah, and
for various reasons he did not want everyone to know that yet.
Jesus told them that he had to preach in other towns.
Luke 4:42-44
42 Early the next morning Jesus left that house and went to an uninhabited place to
pray. Many people searched for him, and when they found him they kept urging him
not to leave them. 43 But he said to them, “I must tell people in other towns also the
good message about how God wants to rule [MET] their lives, because that is what I
was sent {God sent me} to do.” 44 So he kept preaching in ◄the synagogues/Jewish
worship places► in various towns in Judea province.LUKE 5:1
1461
LUKE 5:17
5
Jesus chose some fishermen to be his disciples.
Luke 5:1-11
1 One day while many people were crowding around him to hear the message from
God, Jesus was standing on the shore of Gennesaret Lake, which is also called Lake
Galilee. 2 He saw two fishing boats at the edge of the lake. The fishermen had gone
out of the boats and were washing their fishing nets on the shore. One of the boats
belonged to Simon. 3 Jesus got in that boat and asked Simon to push the boat a little
bit away from the shore so that he could speak to the crowd more easily. Jesus sat in
the boat and taught the people who were on the shore. 4 After he finished speaking
to them, he said to Simon, “Push the boat out to where the water is deep. Then let
your nets down into the water to catch some fish!” 5 Simon replied, “Master, we (exc)
worked hard all night but we did not catch any fish. But because you (sg) tell me to
do it, I will let down the nets.” 6 When Peter and the men with him had done that,
they caught so many fish that their nets were breaking. 7 They motioned to their
partners in the other boat to come and help them. So they came and filled both the
boats with fish from the net. The result was that the boats were so full that they began
to sink. 8-9 Simon and all the men who were with him were amazed at how many
fish they had taken. James and John, the two sons of Zebedee, who were Simon’s
partners, were among those who were amazed. When Simon, whose other name was
Peter, saw the fish, feeling ashamed to be in the presence of someone who obviously had
God’s power, he prostrated himself before Jesus and said, “Lord, you should go away
from me, because I am a sinful man!” 10 But Jesus said to Simon, “Do not be afraid!
Up until now you(sg) have been gathering fish [MET], but from now on you will gather
people to become my disciples.” 11 So after they brought the boats to the shore, they
left their business [HYP] in the hands of others and went with Jesus.
Jesus healed a leper and enabled him to associate with people again.
Luke 5:12-16
12 While Jesus was in one of the cities there in the district of Galilee, there was
a man there who was very severely affected by leprosy. When he saw Jesus, he
prostrated himself before him and, wanting Jesus to heal him, pleaded with him,
“Lord/Sir, please heal me, because you are able to heal me if you are willing to!”
13 Then Jesus, disregarding the religious law that forbade people to come close to lepers,
reached out his hand and touched the man. He said, “I am willing to heal you; and
I heal you now!” Immediately the man was healed. He was no longer a leper [PRS]!
14 Then Jesus told him, “Make sure that you do not report your healing immediately.
First, go to a priest in Jerusalem and show yourself to him so that he can examine you
and verify that you no longer have leprosy. After the priest tells the local people, they
will know that you have been healed, and you will be able to associate with them again.
Also take to the priest the offering that Moses commanded that people who have been
healed from leprosy should offer.” 15 But many people heard the man’s report of what
Jesus had done. The result was that large crowds came to Jesus to hear his message
and to be healed of their sicknesses {so that he would heal their sicknesses}. 16 But
he often would go away from them to the desolate area and pray.
By healing a paralyzed man Jesus showed that he had authority to forgive sins, too.
Luke 5:17-26
17 One day when Jesus was teaching, some men from the Pharisee sect were sitting
there. Some of them were men who taught the Jewish laws. They had come from
many [HYP] villages in Galilee district and also from Jerusalem and from other villagesLUKE 5:18
1462
LUKE 5:34
in Judea district. At that time while God was giving Jesus power to heal people,
18 several men brought on a sleeping pad a man who was paralyzed. They wanted
to bring him into the house and lay him in front of Jesus. 19 But there was no way
to do that because of the large crowd of people, so they went up the steps onto the
roof. They tied ropes onto the sleeping pad and, after removing some of the tiles on
the roof, they lowered the man on the sleeping pad. They lowered him through the
opening into the midst of the crowd in front of Jesus. 20 When Jesus perceived that
they believed that he could heal the man, he said to him, “My friend, I forgive your
sins!” 21 The men who taught the Jewish laws and the rest of the Pharisees began to
think within themselves, “Who does this man think he is, saying that? He is insulting
God! ◄Nobody can forgive sins!/What person can forgive sins?► [RHQ] Only God can
do that!” 22 Jesus perceived what they were thinking. So he said to them, “◄You
should not think that way about what I said!/Why do you question within yourselves
about what I said?► [RHQ] Consider this: 23 It would not be risky for someone to say
to this man, ‘I forgive your sins,’ because no one could see whether or not his sins
were really forgiven. But no one [RHQ], without having the power to heal, would say to
him, ‘Get up and walk!’ because people could easily see whether he was healed or not.
24 But as a result of my healing this man you (pl) will know that God has authorized
me, the one who came from heaven, to forgive the sins of people while I am on the
earth, as well as to heal people.” Then he said to the man who was paralyzed, “To
you I say, ‘Get up, pick up your sleeping pad, and go home!’ ” 25 Immediately the man
was healed. He stood up in front of them. He picked up the sleeping pad on which he
had been lying, and went home, praising God. 26 All the people there were amazed!
They praised God and were completely awestruck. They kept saying, “We (inc) have
seen wonderful things today!”
Jesus answered criticism about associating with sinful people.
Luke 5:27-32
27 Then Jesus left the town and saw a man who collected taxes for the Roman
government. His name was Levi. He was sitting in the booth where he collected
the taxes. Jesus said to him, “Come with me and become my disciple!” 28 So Levi left
his work [HYP] and went with Jesus.
29 Afterwards, Levi prepared a big feast in his own house for Jesus and his disciples.
There was a large group of tax collectors and others eating together with them. 30 The
men who were there who taught the Jewish laws, ones who belonged to the Pharisee
sect, complained to Jesus’ disciples, saying, “◄It is disgusting that you are eating with
tax collectors and others who we(exc) consider to be sinners!/Why are you eating with
tax collectors and others who we(exc) consider to be sinners?►” [RHQ] 31 Then, to
indicate that it was those who knew that they had sinned who were coming to him for
help, Jesus said to them, “It is people who are sick who need a doctor, not those who
are well [MET]. 32 Similarly, I did not come from heaven to invite those who think they
are righteous to come to me. On the contrary, I came to invite those who know that
they are sinners to turn from their sinful behavior and come to me.”
Jesus explained that people could not follow both their old customs and his new
teaching.
Luke 5:33-39
33 Those Jewish leaders said to Jesus, “The disciples of John the Baptizer often abstain
from food to show that they want to please God, and the disciples of the Pharisees do
that, too. But your disciples keep on eating and drinking! Why do not they fast like
the others?” 34 To show them that it was not appropriate for his disciples to be sadLUKE 5:35
1463
LUKE 6:9
and abstain from food while he was still with them [MET], Jesus said to them, “When
◄the bridegroom/man who is getting married► is with his friends at the time of the
wedding, you certainly do not make his friends abstain from food, do you [RHQ]? No,
you do not do that. 35 But some day he will be taken away {his enemies will take him
away} from them. Then, at that time, his friends will abstain from food, because they
will be sad.”
36 Then Jesus told them two parables to show them that those who desire to live
according to God’s new message should not be forced to obey the old religious traditions
like ◄fasting/abstaining from food►, and that those who know only the old traditions
are not eager to accept new ones [MET]. He said, “People never tear a piece of cloth
from a new garment and attach it to an old garment to mend it. If they did that, not
only would they be ruining the new garment by tearing it, but the new piece of cloth
would not match the old garment. 37 Neither does anyone put freshly-squeezed grape
juice into old skin bags to store it. If anyone did that, the grape juice would burst the
skin bags because they would not stretch when the new wine ferments and expands.
Then the skin bags would be ruined, and the wine would also be spilled. 38 On the
contrary, new wine must be put into new wineskins.
39 Furthermore, those who have drunk only old wine are content with that. They
do not want to drink the new wine, because they say, ‘The old wine is [MET] fine!’ ”
6
Jesus explained why he had authority to decide what his disciples should do on the
Sabbath day.
Luke 6:1-11
1 One ◄Sabbath/Jewish day of rest►, while Jesus was walking through some grain
fields with his disciples, the disciples picked some of the heads of grain. They rubbed
them in their hands to separate the grains from the husks, and ate the grain. The
law of Moses permitted people to do that if they were hungry. 2 Some Pharisees who
were watching said to Jesus, “◄You should not be doing on our rest day work that our
laws forbid!/Why are you doing on our rest day work that our laws forbid?►” [RHQ]
3 Jesus wanted to show them that the record in Scriptures indicated that God permitted
people to disobey certain religious laws when they needed food. So he replied, “It is
written in the Scriptures what our revered ancestor, King David did when he and the
men with him were hungry. You have read about that, ◄but you do not think about
what it implies/so why do you not think about what it implies?► [RHQ] 4 David entered
God’s big worship tent and asked for some food. The high priest gave him the bread
that the priests had presented to God. It was permitted in one of Moses’ laws that
only the priests could eat that bread. But even though David was not a priest, he ate
some, and gave some to the men who were with him. And God did not consider that
what David did was wrong!” 5 Jesus also said to them, “I am the one who came from
heaven, so I have the authority to determine what is right for my disciples to do on
the day of rest!”
6 Another ◄Sabbath/Jewish day of rest► Jesus entered a ◄synagogue/Jewish meeting
place► and taught the people. There was a man there whose right hand was shriveled.
7 The men who taught the Jewish laws and the Pharisees who were there watched
Jesus, to see if he would heal the man ◄on the Sabbath/on the Jewish rest day►. They
did this so that, if he healed the man, they would accuse him of disobeying their laws
by working on the day of rest. 8 But Jesus knew what they were thinking. So he said
to the man with the shriveled hand, “Come and stand here in front of everyone!” So
the man got up and stood there. 9 Then Jesus said to the others, “I ask you this: DoLUKE 6:10
1464
LUKE 6:26
the laws that God gave Moses permit people to do what is good ◄on the Sabbath/on
the Jewish rest day►, or do they permit people to harm others? Do they permit us to
save a person’s life on our day of rest or to let him die [HYP] by refusing to help him?”
10 They refused to answer him. So after he looked around at them all, he said to the
man, “Stretch out your shriveled hand!” The man did that, and his hand became all
right again! 11 But the men who taught the Jewish laws and the Pharisees were very
angry, and they discussed with one another what they could do to get rid of Jesus.
Jesus chose twelve apostles.
Luke 6:12-16
12 About that time Jesus went up into the hills to pray. He prayed to God all night.
13 The next day he summoned all his disciples to come near him. From them he
chose twelve men, whom he called apostles. 14 They were Simon, to whom he gave
the new name, Peter; Andrew, Peter’s younger brother; James and his younger brother,
John; Philip; Bartholomew; 15 Matthew, whose other name was Levi; Thomas; another
James, the son of Alpheus; Simon, who belonged to the party that encouraged people
to rebel against the Roman government; 16 Judas, the son of another James; and Judas
Iscariot (OR, Judas, the man from Kerioth Town), the one who later ◄betrayed Jesus./
enabled the Jewish leaders to seize Jesus.►
Jesus taught them which people God would be pleased with and which people he
would be displeased with.
Luke 6:17-26
17 Jesus came down from the hills with his disciples and stood on a level area. There
was a very big crowd of his disciples there. There was also a large group of people
who had come from Jerusalem and from many other places in Judea district, and
from the coastal areas near Tyre and Sidon cities. 18 They came to hear Jesus talk
to them and to be healed {and for him to heal them} from their diseases. He also
healed those whom evil spirits had troubled. 19 Everyone in the crowd tried to touch
him, because he was healing everyone by his/God’s power. 20 He looked [MTY] at his
disciples and said, “God is pleased with you who know that you lack what he wants
you to have; he will allow you to be the people whose lives he rules over. 21 God is
pleased with you who sincerely desire to receive what [MTY] he wants you to have;
he will give you what you need, until you are satisfied.
God is pleased with you that grieve now because of sin. Later you will be joyful.
22 God is pleased with you when other people hate you, when they will not let you
join them, when they insult you, when they say that you are evil because you believe
in me, the one who came from heaven. 23 When that happens, rejoice! Jump up and
down because you are so happy! God will give you a great reward in heaven! When
they do these things to you, it will prove that you are God’s servants. (OR, People have
always treated God’s servants like that.) Do not forget that these people’s ancestors
did the same things to the prophets who served God faithfully!
24 But there will be terrible punishment for you that are rich; the happiness you
have received from your riches is the only happiness that you will get. 25 There will
be terrible punishment for you who think that you have all that you need now; you
will realize that these things will not make you feel satisfied.
There will be terrible punishment for you who are joyful now; you will later be
very sad. 26 When most [HYP] people speak well about you, trouble is ahead for you;
it will not prove that you are God’s servants, because your ancestors used to speak
well about those who falsely claimed that they were prophets.”LUKE 6:27
1465
LUKE 6:42
Jesus taught how we should act toward those who are not kind to us.
Luke 6:27-36
27 “But I say this to each of you disciples who are listening to what I say: Love
your enemies as well as your friends. Do good things for those who hate you! 28 Ask
God to bless those who curse you! Pray for those who mistreat you! 29 If someone
insults one of you by striking you on one of your cheeks, turn your face so that he can
strike the other cheek also. If a bandit wants to take away your (sg) coat, let him also
have your shirt. 30 Give something to everyone who asks you (sg) for something. If
someone takes away things that belong to you (sg), do not ask him to return them.
31 In whatever way you (pl) want others to act toward you, that is the way that you
should act toward them.
32 If you love only those who love you, do not expect God to praise you for doing that
[RHQ], because even sinners love those who love them. 33 If you do good things only
for those who do good things for you, do not expect God to reward you for doing that
[RHQ], because even sinners do that. 34 If you lend things or money only to those who
you expect will give something back to you, do not expect that God will reward you
[RHQ] for doing that. Even sinners lend to other sinners, because they expect them to
pay everything back. 35 Instead, love your enemies! Do good things for them! Lend to
them, and do not expect them to pay anything back! If you do that, God will give you
a big reward. And you will be acting like his children should. Remember that God
is kind to people who are not grateful and to people who are wicked, and he expects
you to be like that too. 36 Act mercifully toward others, just like your Father in heaven
acts mercifully toward you.”
Jesus taught that we should not decide how God should punish others.
Luke 6:37-42
37 “Do not say how sinfully others have acted, and then God will not say how sinfully
you have acted. Do not condemn others, and then he will not condemn you [DOU].
Forgive others for the evil things that they have done to you, and then God will forgive
you. 38 Give good things to others, and then God will give good things to you. It will
be as though [MET] God is putting things in a basket for you. He will give you a full
amount, pressed down in the basket, which he will shake so that he can put more in,
and it will spill over the sides! Remember that the way you act toward others will be
the way that God will act toward you!”
39 He also told his disciples this parable to show them that they should be like him,
and not be like the Jewish religious leaders: “◄You certainly would not expect a blind
man to lead another blind man./Would you expect a blind man to lead another blind
man?► [RHQ] If he tried to do that, ◄they would both probably fall into a hole!/
wouldn’t they both probably fall into a hole?► [RHQ] I am your teacher, and you
disciples should be like me. 40 A disciple should not expect to be better known than
his teacher. But if a student is fully trained {if someone fully trains a student}, the
student can become like his teacher [MET]. So you should be content to be like me.
41 ◄Why do you notice someone else’s small faults?/None of you should be concerned
about someone else’s small faults [MET, RHQ].► That would be like noticing a speck
in that person’s eye. But you should be concerned about your own big faults. They
are like planks in your own eye, which you do not notice. 42 ◄You (sg) should not say,
‘Friend, let me take out that speck in your eye!’ when you do not notice the log in
your own eye!/Why do you say, ‘Friend, let me take out that speck in your eye!’ when
you do not notice the log in your own eye?► [RHQ] If you do that, you are a hypocrite!
You should first stop committing your own sins. That will be like removing the plankLUKE 6:43
1466
LUKE 7:9
from your own eye. Then, as a result, you will have the spiritual insight you need to
help others get rid of the faults that are like specks in their eyes.”
Jesus taught that what people do reflects their inner thoughts.
Luke 6:43-45
43 “People are like trees [MET]. Healthy trees do not bear bad fruit (OR, bear only
good fruit), and unhealthy trees do not bear good fruit. 44 Just like you can tell if
a tree is good or bad by looking at its fruit, you can tell which people are good and
which are bad by looking at the way they conduct their lives. For example, because
thornbushes cannot produce figs, no one can pick figs from thornbushes. And since
bramble bushes cannot produce grapes, no one can pick grapes from bramble bushes.
45 Similarly, good people will conduct their lives in a good way because they think a
lot of good things, and evil people will live in an evil way because they think a lot of
evil things. The basic principle is that people speak and act according to all that they
think.”
Jesus taught why it is necessary to obey his teaching, not just listen to it.
Luke 6:46-49
46 “Because people should obey what their masters tell them, ◄it is disgraceful that
you say that I am your master but you do not do what I tell you!/why do you say that
I am your master but you do not do what I tell you?► [RHQ] 47 Some people come to
me, and hear my messages and obey them. I will tell you what they are like. 48 They
are like a man who dug deep into the ground to prepare to build his house. He made
sure that the foundation was on solid ground. Then when there was a flood, the water
tried to wash away the house. But the river could not shake the house, because it was
built {he built it} on a solid foundation. 49 But some people hear my messages but do
not obey them. They are like a man who built a house on top of the ground without
digging a foundation. When the river flooded, the house collapsed immediately and
was completely ruined. So it is important for you to obey what I teach you.”
7
Jesus healed a man without going to his house because the man’s master believed
that Jesus could do that.
Luke 7:1-10
1 After Jesus finished saying this to the people, he went with his disciples to
Capernaum town. 2 There was a Roman army officer there who had a slave whom
he thought highly of. This slave was so sick that he was about to die. 3 When the
officer heard about Jesus, he summoned some Jewish elders. He told them to go to
Jesus and ask him to come and heal his slave. 4 When they came to where Jesus was,
they earnestly asked Jesus to return with them. They said, “This officer deserves that
you (sg) do this for him, 5 because he loves us Jewish people, and he paid the money to
build a synagogue for us.” 6 So Jesus went with them. When he was near the officer’s
house, the officer decided that it was not necessary for Jesus to come to his house. So
he summoned some friends. He told them to go to Jesus and tell him this: “Lord/Sir,
do not bother to come. Because I am a non-Jew, I am not worthy for you (sg), a Jew,
to come into my house [MTY] and associate with me. 7 I did not feel worthy to come
to you, either. But please command that my servant be healed, and he will become
well! 8 I believe this because, as for me, there are people who have authority over me
and I obey them. I also have soldiers under my authority. When I say to one of them,
‘Go!’ he goes. When I say to another ‘Come!’ he comes. When I say to my slave, ‘Do
this!’ he does it. And I believe that you speak with a similar kind of authority.” 9 WhenLUKE 7:10
1467
LUKE 7:27
the officer’s friends arrived and told that to Jesus, he marveled at what the officer had
said. Then he turned and said to the crowd that was going with him, “I tell you, I
have never before found anyone who trusted in me like this non-Jewish man does. No
one from Israel, where I would expect people to believe in me, has trusted in me like
he has!” 10 When those men returned to the officer’s house, they found that the slave
was well.
Jesus caused a widow’s son to become alive again.
Luke 7:11-17
11 Soon after that, Jesus went to a town called Nain. His disciples and a large crowd
of other people went with him. 12 As they approached the town gate, the corpse of
a young man who had just died was being carried out on a stretcher {people were
carrying out on a stretcher the corpse of a young man who had just died}. His mother
was a widow, and he was her only son. A large group of people from the town were
accompanying them. 13 When the Lord saw her, he pitied her. He said to her, “Do
not cry!” 14 Then, ignoring the Jewish laws about not coming near a corpse, he came
close and touched the stretcher on which the body was lying. So the men carrying it
stood still. He said, “Young man, I say to you, get up!” 15 The man sat up and began
to talk! Jesus returned him to his mother to care for her. 16 Then everyone there was
amazed/awestruck. They praised God, saying, “A great prophet has come among us!”
They also said, “God has come to help his people!” 17 Then they reported what Jesus
had done throughout all of Judea district and other nearby areas.
Jesus taught about his ministry and the ministry of John the Baptizer.
Luke 7:18-35
18 The disciples of John the Baptizer went to the prison where John was and told him
about those things. 19 So one day John summoned two of his disciples and told them
to go to the Lord and ask him: “Are you the Messiah who the prophets prophesied
would come, or is it someone else that we should expect to come?” 20 When those
two men came to Jesus, they said, “John the Baptizer sent us to ask you (sg) this: Are
you the Messiah that we are expecting God to send, or shall we (exc) expect someone
else?” 21 At that very time Jesus was healing many people of their diseases and other
sicknesses, he was casting out evil spirits, and he was causing many blind people to
be able to see. 22 So he answered those two men, “Go back and report to John what
you have seen me doing and what you have heard me telling people. I am enabling
blind people to see. I am enabling lame people to walk. I am healing people who have
leprosy. I am enabling deaf people to hear. I am causing dead people to become alive
again, and I am telling God’s good message to poor people. 23 Also tell John that God
is pleased with those who do not stop believing in me because what I do is not what
they expect the Messiah to do.”
24 When the men whom John had sent left, Jesus began to talk to the crowd of
people about John. He said to them, “Think about what sort of person you went to
see in the desolate area when you went there to see John [RHQ]. You did not go there
to listen to a man who constantly changed the nature of his message [MET], like a reed
that is blown back and forth by the wind [RHQ]. 25 Then what kind of man did you
go there to see [RHQ]? Was he [RHQ] a man who wore expensive clothes? No! You
know very well that people who wear beautiful clothes and live in luxury are in kings’
palaces, not in the desolate areas! 26 Then what kind of person did you go to see? Did
you [RHQ] go there to see John because he was a prophet? Yes! But I will tell you that
John is more important than an ordinary prophet. 27 He is the one about whom these
words that God said to the Messiah have been written {the prophet Malachi wroteLUKE 7:28
1468
LUKE 7:46
these words} in the Scriptures: ‘Listen! I am going to send my messenger ahead of
you (sg) [SYN]. He will prepare people for your coming.’
28 I tell you that from among all the people who have ever lived, God considers that
no one is greater than John. However, God considers everyone who has let God rule
their lives [MET] to be greater than John, even if they are insignificant people.”
29 When they heard what Jesus said (OR, what John preached), all the people,
including tax collectors, whom many people despised, agreed that God’s way was right.
By being baptized by John {By letting John baptize them}, they had agreed that what
God required people to do in order to be saved was right. 30 But the Pharisees and the
men who taught the Jewish laws were not baptized by John {did not let John baptize
them} because they rejected what God wanted them to do.
31 Then Jesus also said, “Many of you people have heard what John and I have taught.
◄I will illustrate what you are like./Do you know what many of you people who have
heard what John and I have taught are like?► [RHQ] 32 You are like children who are
playing games in an open area. Some of them are calling to the others, saying, ‘We (exc)
played happy music for you on the flute, but you did not dance! Then we sang sad
funeral songs for you, but you did not cry!’ 33 Similarly, you people are dissatisfied with
both John the Baptizer and me! When John came and preached to you, he did not eat
ordinary food [SYN] or drink wine, like most people do. But you rejected him, saying,
‘A demon is controlling him!’ 34 In contrast, I, the one who came from heaven, eat
the same food and drink wine as others do. But you reject me, saying, ‘Look! This man
eats too much food and drinks too much wine, and he associates with tax collectors
and other sinners!’ 35 But those who are truly God’s children [PRS] realize that what
John and I do is truly wise.”
Jesus told why he appreciated the sinful woman pouring perfume on his feet.
Luke 7:36-50
36 One day one of the Pharisees named Simon invited Jesus to eat a meal with him.
So Jesus went to the man’s house and reclined to eat. 37 There was a woman in that
city who many people knew had been a prostitute [EUP]. She heard that Jesus was
eating in the Pharisee’s house. So she went there, taking a stone jar that contained
perfume. 38 As the people there were reclining to eat, the woman stood behind Jesus,
at his feet. As she was crying because she was sorry for her sins, her tears fell on Jesus’
feet. Then she wiped his feet with her hair, and kissed his feet, and anointed them
with the perfume. 39 When the Pharisee who had invited Jesus saw that, he thought,
“Prophets know about other people’s lives, so if Jesus were a prophet, he would have
known who this woman is who is touching him, and what kind of a person she is. He
would have known that she is a prostitute! [EUP]” 40 Jesus said to him, “Simon, there
is something I want to tell you (sg).” He replied, “Teacher, what is it?” 41 Jesus replied,
“Two people owed some money to a man who earned money by lending it to others.
One owed him 500 silver coins, and the other owed him 50 silver coins. 42 Neither of
them was able to pay back what he owed, so the man very kindly said that they did
not have to pay back anything. So, which of those two men will love that man more?”
43 Simon replied, “I think that the one who owed the most money and did not have
to pay it back will love him more.” Jesus said to him, “That is correct.” 44 Then he
turned toward the woman, and said to Simon, “◄Think about what this woman has
done!/Do you (sg) see what this woman has done?► [RHQ] When I entered your house,
you did not follow our custom of welcoming guests by giving me any water to wash
my feet, but this woman has wet my feet with her tears and then wiped them with
her hair! 45 You did not follow our custom of greeting by kissing me, but since I came
in, this woman has not stopped kissing my feet! 46 You did not follow our custom ofLUKE 7:47
1469
LUKE 8:13
welcoming guests by anointing my head with olive oil, but she has anointed my feet
with fragrant perfume. 47 So I will tell you that even though this woman has sinned
very much, she has been forgiven {I have forgiven her}. By what she has done she
has shown that she loves me very much. But a person who has sinned just a little
bit, but whom I have forgiven, will love me just a little bit.” 48 Then he said to the
woman, “You have been forgiven {I have forgiven you} for your sins.” 49 Then those
who were eating with him said among themselves, “◄This man must think that he is
God!/Who does this man think that he is [RHQ]►, saying that he can forgive people
for their sins?” 50 But Jesus said to the woman, “Because you have trusted [PRS] in
me, God has saved you from the guilt of your sins. May God give you inner peace as
you go!”
8
The list of women who helped Jesus.
Luke 8:1-3
1 Soon after that, Jesus went, along with his twelve disciples, through various cities
and villages. As they went, he was telling people the good message about how God
wants ◄to have complete control/to rule► [MET] over their lives. 2 Some women from
whom he had expelled evil spirits and healed of diseases also went with him. These
included Mary, the woman from Magdala village, from whom he had expelled seven
evil spirits; 3 Joanna, the wife of Chuza, who was one of King Herod Antipas’ officials;
Susanna; and many others. They were providing some of their own funds to help
Jesus and his disciples.
The story about four different kinds of soil.
Luke 8:4-8
4 A large crowd of people came to Jesus from many towns. Then he told them this
parable: 5 “A man went out to his field to sow some seeds. As he was scattering them
over the soil, some of the seeds fell on the path. Then people walked on those seeds,
and birds ate them. 6 Some of the seeds fell on rock on which there was a thin layer
of moist soil. As soon as the seeds grew, the plants dried up because they had no
moisture. 7 Some of the seeds fell on ground that contained roots of thorny weeds. The
thorny weeds grew together with the young plants, and they crowded out those plants.
8 But some of the seeds fell on good soil and grew well. Each seed later produced 100
grains.” Then Jesus called out to them, “If you want to understand [MTY] this, you
must consider carefully what I have just said!”
Jesus explained that the story represented different ways people respond to his
teaching.
Luke 8:9-15
9 Jesus’ disciples later asked him about the meaning of the parable he had just told.
10 He said, “God is revealing to you what he did not reveal before, about how he
wants to rule [MET] over people’s lives. But when I am telling other people about
these things, I tell them only in parables. The result will be like a prophet predicted
long ago:
They will see what I am doing, but will not perceive what it means. They will hear
what I am saying, but will not understand it.
11 So this is the meaning of that parable: The seeds represent God’s message. 12 Some
people are like the path on which some of the seeds fell. When these people hear God’s
message, the devil comes and causes them to forget what they have heard. As a result,
they do not believe it, and will not be saved {God will not save them}. 13 Some peopleLUKE 8:14
1470
LUKE 8:28-29
are like the soil with rock underneath. When they hear God’s message, they accept it
joyfully. But because it does not penetrate deeply [MET] into their inner beings, they
believe it for only a short time. They are like the plants that did not have deep roots.
When difficult things happen to them, they stop believing God’s message. 14 Some
people are like the soil that had roots of thorny weeds in it. They are people who
accept God’s message, but later on they worry about things, and try to become rich,
and enjoy things that give them a lot of pleasure. So they do not become spiritually
mature. 15 But some people are like the good soil. They hear God’s message and accept
it. They become good, honest people, and they continue doing things that please God
[MET].”
Jesus explained the need to make his truth clear to others.
Luke 8:16-18
16 “After people light a lamp, they do not cover it with a basket or put it under a
bed. Instead, they put it on a lampstand, so that those who enter their house can see
things from its light [MET]. Similarly, you must tell God’s truth to others so that they
can know what I can do for them. 17 God wants to make clear all of his truth that
was not evident previously. He intends that all of the truth that he had not revealed
before be told openly {that his people openly tell others all of the truth that he has
not revealed before}. 18 So listen carefully to what I tell you, because God will enable
those who accept my truth to understand even more. But God will cause those who
do not accept my truth to not understand even the little that they think they have
understood.”
Jesus told them that some people are as dear to him as his own relatives.
Luke 8:19-21
19 One day Jesus’ mother and his younger brothers came to see him, but they could
not get near him because there was a large crowd around him in the house. 20 Someone
told him, “Your mother and your younger brothers are standing outside, wanting to
see you.” 21 He replied, “Those who hear God’s message and obey it are as dear to
me [MET] as my mother and my brothers.”
Jesus calmed a storm.
Luke 8:22-25
22 One day Jesus got into a boat with his disciples. He said to them, “Let’s go around
to the other side of the lake.” So they started to go. 23 As they were sailing, he fell
asleep. A big windstorm struck the lake. Soon the boat was filling with water, and
they were in danger. 24 Jesus’ disciples woke him up. They said to him, “Master!
Master! We (inc) are going to drown!” He got up and rebuked the wind and told the
waves to be calm. The wind immediately stopped blowing and the waves calmed
down. The lake became calm. 25 He said to them, “◄I am disappointed that you did
not trust me to help you!/Why did you not trust me to help you?►” [RHQ] They were
afraid. They were also amazed. They said to each other, “◄What kind of man is this?/
This man is not like ordinary men!► [RHQ] He not only commands people, but when
he commands the wind and the water, they also obey him!”
Jesus expelled many demons from a man.
Luke 8:26-39
26 Jesus and his disciples arrived at the region near Gerasa, a town which was on
the eastern side of Lake Galilee. 27 There was a man in that region in whom demons
lived. He was from the town of Gerasa. (OR, In that area there was a man from that
town whom demons controlled.) For a long time he had not worn clothes. He did not
live in a house. Instead, he lived in burial caves. 28-29 Many times demons attackedLUKE 8:30
1471
LUKE 8:47
him. He was guarded {People tried to guard him} so that he would not injure others.
Chains were fastened {They fastened chains} on his hands and shackles on his feet,
but he would break the chains and shackles. Then he would be sent away by the
demons {the demons would send him away} to some desolate area.
When Jesus stepped out of the boat onto the shore, the man saw him. He ran to
Jesus and prostrated himself before him. Then Jesus commanded, “You evil spirit,
come out of that man!” But it did not leave immediately. Instead, it caused the man to
shout very loudly, “Jesus, Son of the great God in heaven, since we (inc) have nothing
in common, leave me alone [RHQ]! I beg you, do not torture me now!” 30 In order to
expel the demon more easily, Jesus asked the demon, “What is your (sg) name?” He
replied, “My name is Crowd/Mob.” He said that because many demons had entered
that man. 31 The demons kept begging Jesus that he would not command them to go
into the deep place where God punishes demons. 32 There was a large herd of pigs
◄grazing/rooting for food► on the hillside. The demons begged Jesus that he allow
them to enter the pigs. So he did. 33 The demons left the man and entered the pigs.
Then the herd of pigs rushed down the steep bank into the lake and drowned.
34 When the men who were taking care of the pigs saw what happened, they ran!
They told people inside the town and outside the town what had happened. 35 So
people went out to see what had happened. When they came to where Jesus was, they
saw that the man from whom Jesus had expelled the demons was sitting at the feet
of Jesus, listening to him. He had clothes on, and his mind was normal again. Then
those people became afraid because they thought that Jesus would destroy more of
their property (OR, because they realized that he must be very powerful). 36 The people
who had seen what happened told those who had just arrived how Jesus had healed
the man whom demons were controlling before. 37 Then those people and many other
people [HYP] from the area near Gerasa asked Jesus to leave their area. They were
very afraid of what else Jesus would do to them. So Jesus and the disciples got into the
boat to go back across the lake. 38 The man from whom he had expelled the demons
begged him saying, “Please, let me go with you!” But Jesus refused. Instead, he said
to him, 39 “No, go home and tell people how much God has done for you!” Then he
sent him away. So the man went away and told people throughout the nearby town
how much Jesus had done for him.
Jesus caused a young girl to become alive again, and healed a woman who had been
bleeding for years.
Luke 8:40-56
40 When Jesus and the disciples returned to Capernaum, a crowd of people who had
been waiting for him welcomed him. 41 Just then a man named Jairus, who was one
of the leaders ◄of the synagogue/of the Jewish meeting place► there, came near and
prostrated himself at Jesus’ feet. He pleaded with Jesus, “Please come to my house
and heal my daughter, 42 my only daughter, who is about twelve years old, because
she is dying!”
As Jesus went with him, many people crowded close to Jesus. 43 Then a woman came
near. She had been suffering from constant vaginal [EUP] bleeding for twelve years,
but she could not be healed by anyone {no one could heal her}. 44 She came behind
Jesus and touched the edge of his robe in order to be healed. At once her bleeding
stopped. 45 Jesus said, “Who touched me?” When everyone said that they had not
touched him, Peter said, “Lord, there is a large crowd of people around you (sg) and
crowding against you, so any one of them might have touched you!” 46 But Jesus said, “I
know that someone deliberately touched me, because my power has healed someone
who touched me.” 47 When the woman realized that she could not prevent Jesus (OR,LUKE 8:48
1472
LUKE 9:9
people) from knowing that she was healed, her body began to shake. She was afraid
that because she had disobeyed the law that a woman with such a condition should
not touch others, Jesus might scold her for doing that. She prostrated herself before
Jesus. As the other people were listening, she told why she had touched him and how
she had been healed immediately. 48 Jesus said to her, “◄Ma’am/My dear woman►,
because you believed [PRS] that I could heal you, I have healed you. Go from here,
and may you experience God’s peace within you.”
49 While he was still talking to her, a man from Jairus’ house came and said to
Jairus, “Your daughter has died. So ◄it is useless that you bother the teacher any
longer by urging him to go to your house!/why do you bother the teacher any longer
by urging him to go to your house?► [RHQ]” 50 But when Jesus heard that, he said to
Jairus, “Do not think that there is nothing more that can be done. Just believe that
I can help her. If you(sg) do that, she will live again.” 51 When they arrived outside
Jairus’ house, Jesus allowed only Peter, John, James, and the girl’s mother and father
to go in Jairus’ house with him. 52 All the people there were crying and beating their
chests to show that they were sad. But, knowing that he would cause the girl to live
again, he said to them, “Stop crying! She is not dead! She is just sleeping [MET]!”
53 The people laughed at him, because they knew that the girl was dead. 54 But Jesus
took hold of her hand and called to her, saying, “Child, get up!” 55 At once her spirit
returned to her body and she got up. Jesus immediately said, “Give her something
to eat!” 56 Her parents were amazed, but Jesus told them not to tell anyone else yet
what had happened.
9
Jesus sent out his apostles to teach and heal people.
Luke 9:1-6
1 One day Jesus summoned his twelve apostles, and gave them power to expel all
kinds of demons and to heal people with diseases. He gave them authority to do that.
2 Before he sent them out to heal people and to tell people what it meant to let God
◄rule/have complete control over► their lives, 3 he said to them, “Do not take things
for your journey. Do not take a walking stick or a traveler’s bag or food or money. Do
not take ◄an extra shirt/extra clothes►. 4 Whenever you enter some house to lodge
there, stay in that house until you leave that town. 5 In towns where the people do
not welcome you, you should not continue to stay there. Just leave those towns. And
as you leave, shake off the dust from your feet. Do that to warn them that God will
punish them for rejecting your message.” 6 Then they left and traveled through many
villages. Everywhere they went, they told people God’s good message and healed sick
people.
Herod was uncertain about who was doing these miracles.
Luke 9:7-11
7 Herod Antipas, the ruler of that district, heard about the things that Jesus and
his disciples were doing. He had previously commanded his soldiers to execute John
the Baptizer, so now he was perplexed, because some people were saying that John
had become alive again and was doing those miracles. 8 Others were saying that
the prophet Elijah had appeared again as had been prophesied. Others were saying
that one of the other former prophets had become alive again and was doing those
miracles. 9 But Herod said, “It cannot be John who is doing these things, because I
commanded my soldiers to cut off his head. So who is this man that I am hearing
these things about?” And he kept wanting to see Jesus.LUKE 9:10
1473
LUKE 9:26
10 When the apostles returned from traveling to various towns, they told Jesus the
things that they had done. Then he took them and they went by themselves by boat
to a town called Bethsaida. 11 But when the crowds of people who had been with Jesus
found out about that, they followed him on land. When they got to where he was, he
welcomed them. He taught them about how God is going to some day ◄rule as king/
have complete control over people’s lives►. He also healed the sick people.
Jesus fed over 5,000 people miraculously.
Luke 9:12-17
12 Late in the afternoon Jesus’ twelve apostles came to him and said, “This is a
place where nobody lives, so dismiss the people so that they can go to the surrounding
villages and other places where they can get some food and find places to stay!” 13 But
he said to them, “No, you yourselves give them something to eat!” They replied, “We
(exc) have only five small loaves and two cooked fish. Are you (sg) going to give us
the money to go somewhere and buy food for all these people?” 14 There were about
5,000 men there. He replied to the disciples, “No, just tell the people to sit down. Tell
them to sit in groups, with about 50 people in each group.” 15 After they told the
people that, they all sat down. 16 Then he took the five small loaves and the two fish.
He looked up towards heaven and thanked God for them. Then he broke them into
pieces and gave them to the disciples so that they would distribute them to the crowd.
17 All the people in the crowd ate until they all had enough to eat. Then the disciples
collected twelve baskets full of the broken pieces that were left over!
After Peter expressed his belief that Jesus is the Messiah, Jesus predicted his own
death and resurrection.
Luke 9:18-27
18 One day Jesus was praying in a place where only the disciples were with him.
He asked them, “The crowds of people, who do they say that I really am?” 19 They
replied, “Some people say that you are John the Baptizer, who has come back to life
again. Others say that you are the prophet Elijah, who has returned from heaven as
God promised. Others say that you are one of the other prophets who lived long ago,
who has come back to life again.” 20 He asked them, “What about you (pl)? Who
do you say that I am?” Peter replied, “You (sg) are the Messiah, who has come from
God.” 21 Then Jesus warned them strongly not to tell that to anyone yet. 22 Then he
said, “Even though I am the one who came from heaven, it is necessary that I suffer
very much. It is also necessary that I be rejected by the elders and the chief priests
and the men who teach the Jewish laws {that the Jewish elders and the chief priests
and the men who teach the Jewish laws will reject me}. It is necessary that I be killed
{that people will kill me}. Then on the third day after that, I will become alive again.”
23 Then he said to all of them, “If any one of you wants to be my disciple, you must
not do only what you yourself desire to do. Specifically, you must be willing each day
[MET] to let others hurt you and disgrace you. That is like what is done to criminals
who are forced to carry [MET] crosses to the place where they will be executed. That is
what anyone who wants to be my disciple must do. 24 You must do that, because those
who try to save their lives by denying that they belong to me when people want to kill
them for believing in me will not live eternally, but those who are killed because of
being my disciples will live forever with me. 25 People might get everything that they
want in this world, but ◄they are really gaining nothing if they do not get eternal life
by becoming my disciples!/are they really gaining anything if they do not get eternal
life by becoming my disciples?► [RHQ] 26 Those who reject my message and refuse to
say that they belong to me, I, the one who came from heaven, will also refuse to sayLUKE 9:27
1474
LUKE 9:45
that they belong to me when I come back with the holy angels, and have the glorious
brightness that my Father has. 27 But listen carefully! Some of you (pl) who are here
now will see God ruling [MET] in many powerful ways. You will see it before you die!”
Jesus talked with Moses and Elijah.
Luke 9:28-36
28 About a week after Jesus said those things, he took Peter, James, and James’
brother John and led them up a mountain so that he could pray there. 29 As he
was praying, his face appeared very different to them. His clothes became as bright
as lightning. 30-31 Suddenly, two men appeared who had the brightness of heaven
surrounding them. They were prophets who had lived long ago, Moses and Elijah.
They started talking with Jesus about how he would accomplish what God had planned
when he died [EUP] very soon in Jerusalem. 32 Peter and the other disciples who were
with him were sound asleep. When they woke up, they saw Jesus’ brightness. They
also saw the two men standing with him. 33 As Moses and Elijah were starting to
leave Jesus, Peter said to him, “Master, it is wonderful for us to be here! Allow us to
make three shelters, one for you, one for Moses, and one for Elijah!” But he really
did not realize what he was talking about. 34 As he was saying that, a bright cloud
appeared and covered them all. The disciples were afraid as the cloud surrounded
them. 35 God [MTY/EUP] spoke to them from the cloud, saying, “This is my Son. He is
the one whom I have chosen to do a great work for me. So you must listen to him!”
36 After God [MTY/EUP] finished saying that, the three disciples saw that only Jesus
was there. They did not tell anyone what they had seen until much later.
Jesus expelled a demon from a boy.
Luke 9:37-43a
37 The next day, after they had come down from the mountain, a large crowd of
people met Jesus. 38 Then a man from the crowd exclaimed, “Teacher, I plead with you,
do something to help my son! He is my only child! 39 At various times an evil spirit
suddenly seizes him and causes him to scream. The evil spirit shakes him violently
and causes him to foam at the mouth. It does not leave until my child is completely
exhausted. 40 I pleaded with your disciples who were here for them to expel the evil
spirit, but they were not able to do it!” 41 Jesus replied by saying to everyone who had
gathered there, “You who have seen how I help people do not believe that you can do
anything. What you think is perverted! How long must I be with you before you are
able to do what I do [RHQ]? How long must I endure your lack of faith?” Then he said
to the boy’s father, “Bring your (sg) son here to me!” 42 While they were bringing the
boy to Jesus, the demon attacked the boy, threw him to the ground, and shook him
severely. But Jesus rebuked the evil spirit and healed the boy. Then he returned him
to his father’s care. 43 All the people there were amazed at the great power of God.
Jesus predicted his arrest.
Luke 9:43b-45
While they were all amazed at all the miracles Jesus was doing, he said to his
disciples, 44 “Think carefully [MTY] about what I am about to tell you: Even though I
am the one who came from heaven, I will soon be handed over to the authorities
(OR, my enemies) {someone is about to enable [MTY] my enemies to seize me}.”
45 But the disciples did not understand what he was saying; God prevented them
from understanding it, so that they would not know yet what he meant. And they
were afraid to ask him about what he had said.
Jesus told his disciples who is really great in God’s sight.
Luke 9:46-48LUKE 9:46
1475
LUKE 9:62
46 The disciples began to argue among themselves about which one of them would
be the greatest when Jesus became king. 47 But Jesus perceived what they were
thinking. So he brought a young child to his side. 48 He said to the disciples, “Those
who, because they love me, (OR, because they want to behave like me) welcome a little
child ◄like this one/as I would► [MTY], God considers that [MET] they are welcoming
me. And those who welcome me, God considers that [MET] they are welcoming him,
the one who sent me. Remember that those among you who think of themselves as
being very unimportant will be the ones whom God considers to be great.”
Jesus told them not to forbid others from expelling demons.
Luke 9:49-50
49 John replied to Jesus, “Master, we (exc) saw a man who was expelling demons,
claiming that he had authority from you [MTY] to do that. So we told him to stop
doing it, because he is not one of us disciples.” 50 But Jesus said to him and the other
disciples, “Do not tell him not to do that! Remember that those who are not opposing
you are trying to achieve the same goals that you are!”
People in a Samaritan town refused to welcome Jesus.
Luke 9:51-56
51 When it was almost time for God to take Jesus up to heaven, he firmly resolved to
go to Jerusalem. 52 He sent some messengers to go ahead of him, and they entered a
village in Samaria district to prepare for him [SYN] to go there. 53 But the Samaritans
did not like the Jews because of their insisting that it was necessary to go to Jerusalem
to worship God. So, because Jesus had firmly resolved to go to Jerusalem, they would
not let him come to their village. 54 When two of his disciples, James and John, heard
about that, they said, “Lord, do you (sg) want us (exc) to pray that God will send fire
down from heaven, as the prophet Elijah did long ago, and destroy those people?”
55 But Jesus turned and rebuked them for saying that. 56 So they went to a different
village.
Jesus told three people what it would cost them if they became his disciples.
Luke 9:57-62
57 As Jesus and the disciples were walking along the road, one man said to him, “I
will go with you (sg) wherever you go!” 58 In order that the man might know what he
could expect if he went with Jesus, Jesus said to him, “Foxes have holes in the ground
in which to live, and birds have nests, but even though I am the one who came from
heaven, I do not have a home where I can sleep!” 59 Jesus told another man, “Come
with me!” But the man said, “Lord/Sir, let me go home first. After my father dies I
will bury him, and then I will come with you.” 60 But Jesus said to him, “God considers
that those who do not have eternal life are dead [MET]. Let those people do the work
of burying people who die. As for you, go and tell people about how God wants ◄to
rule/to have complete control over► people’s lives!” 61 Someone else said, “Lord, I will
come with you and be your disciple, but first let me go home to say goodbye to my
relatives.” 62 Jesus said to him, “Anyone who is plowing his field should not look back
to see what he has done. He must look forward to what is ahead. Similarly, anyone
who continues to be concerned about his family and other things he has left behind is
not fit to serve me and tell others about how God wants to rule [MTY] people’s lives.”
10
Jesus instructed 72 other disciples before sending them out.
Luke 10:1-12LUKE 10:1
1476
LUKE 10:16
1 After that, the Lord Jesus appointed 72 other people.
He prepared to send them
out, two-by-two, to every town and village where he [SYN] intended to go. 2 He said
to them, “The people who are ready to receive my message are like a field of [MET]
grain that is ready for people to harvest {to be harvested}. But there are not many
people to bring them to God. So pray and ask the Lord God to send more workers who
will gather people together and teach them my message, just like a landowner sends
workers into his fields to gather the harvest. 3 Start going; but remember that I am
sending you (pl) out to tell my message to people who will try to get rid of you. You will
be like lambs among wolves. 4 Do not take along any money in a purse. Do not take a
traveler’s bag. Do not take extra sandals. Do not spend a lot of time greeting people
along the way. 5 Whenever you enter a house to lodge there, first say to those people,
‘May God give inner peace to you people [MTY] in this house!’ 6 If people who live
there are ◄desiring to have/worthy of receiving► God’s peace, they will experience
the inner peace that you are offering them. If people who live there are not desiring
to have God’s peace, you will experience God’s inner peace, but they will not. 7 If they
welcome you, stay in that same house until you leave that village. Do not move around
from one house to another. Eat and drink whatever they provide for you. A worker
deserves to get pay [MET] from the people for whom he works, so you deserve to receive
food and a place to stay from the people to whom you go. 8 Whenever you enter a town
and the people there welcome you, eat what is provided {what they provide} for you.
9 Heal the people there who are sick. Tell them, ‘It is almost time for God to send his
king to rule [MET] your lives.’ 10 But if you enter a town whose people do not welcome
you, go into its main streets and say, 11 ‘Because you have refused to hear our message,
we(exc) will not only leave, we will also shake off the dust of your town that clings to
our sandals, to warn you that God will reject/punish you. But we want you to know
that it is almost the time when God will start to rule!’ 12 I will tell you this: On the
[MTY] final day when God judges everyone, he will punish the wicked people [MTY]
who long ago lived in Sodom, the city that he destroyed because its people were so
wicked. But he will punish even more severely the people [MTY] of any town whose
people refused to hear your message!”
Jesus warned the unbelievers in three towns.
Luke 10:13-16
13 “There will be terrible punishment for you people who live in [MTY] Chorazin and
Bethsaida cities. I did great miracles in your cities to show God’s power, but you did not
turn from your sinful behavior. If the miracles that I performed in your cities had been
done in Tyre and Sidon cities, the wicked people who lived there would have long ago
shown that they were sorry for their sins by sitting on the ground wearing coarse cloth
and putting ashes on their heads. 14 But they did not have the opportunity that you
have, so when God punishes people, he will punish the wicked people who lived in Tyre
and Sidon, but he will punish you more severely because you did not pay attention
to my message. 15 I also have something to say to you people who live in Capernaum
city. ◄Do not think that you will be honored {that God will honor you} in heaven!/Do
you think that you will be honored {that God will honor you} in heaven?► [RHQ] That
will not happen! On the contrary, after you die, God will send you down to the place
where sinful people will be punished forever!”
16 Jesus also said to the disciples, “God will consider that those who listen to your
message are listening to me, and that those who reject your message are rejecting me.
And he will consider that those who reject me are rejecting God, the one who sent
me.”LUKE 10:17
1477
LUKE 10:32
Jesus commented on their ministry after the 72 returned.
Luke 10:17-24
17 The 72 people whom Jesus appointed went and did as he told them to. When they
returned, they were very joyful. They said, “Lord, people did what we(exc) told them
to do! Demons also obeyed us when by your (sg) authority [MTY] we commanded them
to leave people!” 18 Jesus replied, “When those demons were obeying you, because God
had enabled you to defeat them, it was as though [MET] I saw Satan fall from heaven
as suddenly and quickly as lightning strikes. 19 Listen! I have given you authority so
that if you oppose evil spirits [MET] they will not hurt you. I have given you authority
to defeat our enemy, Satan. Nothing shall hurt you. 20 But although you can rejoice
that evil spirits obey you, you should rejoice more that your names have been written
{that God has written your names} in heaven, because you will be with God forever.”
21 At that time the Holy Spirit caused Jesus to be very happy. He said, “Father, you
(sg) rule over everything in heaven and on the earth! Some people think that they
are wise because they are well-educated. But I thank you that you have prevented
them from knowing these things. Instead, you have revealed them to people who
accept your truth as readily [MET] as little children do. Yes, Father, you have done that
because it seemed good to you to do so.” 22 Jesus also said to the 72 disciples, “God, my
Father, has revealed to me all I need to know and the power I need for my work. Only
my Father knows who I really am. Furthermore, only I and those people to whom I
wish to reveal him know what God my Father is like.”
23 Then when Jesus’ disciples were alone with him, he turned toward them and
said, “God is pleased with you [SYN] who have seen the things that I have done! 24 I
want you to know that many prophets and kings who lived long ago desired to see
the things that you are seeing me do, but these things did not happen then. They
longed to hear the things that you have been hearing me say, but these things were
not revealed to them then.”
Jesus taught that we must show our love to everyone, even ones we do not like to
associate with.
Luke 10:25-37
25 One day as Jesus was teaching people, a man was there who had studied carefully
the laws that God gave Moses. He wanted to ask Jesus a difficult question. So he stood
up and asked, “Teacher, what shall I do in order to live with God forever?” 26 Jesus
said to him, “You (sg) have read [RHQ] what Moses has written in the laws that God
gave him. What did Moses write about living forever?” 27 The man replied, “He wrote
that we (inc) must love the Lord our God. We must show that by what we feel and by
what we do and by what we think. He also wrote that we must love people that we
come in contact with as much as we love ourselves.” 28 Jesus replied, “You (sg) have
answered your question correctly. If you do all that continually, you will live with God
forever.”
29 But the man wanted to defend the way he acted toward people that he came
in contact with (OR, to defend why he had asked a question that Jesus answered so
simply). So he said to Jesus, “Which people that I come in contact with should I love?”
30 Jesus replied by telling him this illustration: “A Jewish man was once going down
along the road from Jerusalem to Jericho. Bandits attacked him. They took away
most of the man’s clothes and everything else that he had, and they beat him until he
was almost dead. Then they left him. 31 It happened that a Jewish priest was going
along that road. When he saw that man, instead of helping him, he passed by on the
other side of the road. 32 Similarly, a man who worked in the temple in Jerusalem
came to that place and saw the man. But he also passed by on the other side of theLUKE 10:33
1478
LUKE 11:9
road. 33 Then a man from Samaria province came along that road to where the man
was lying. People from Samaria despise Jews. But when he saw that man, he pitied
him. 34 He went over to him and put some olive oil and wine on his wounds to help
heal them. He wound strips of cloth around the wounds. He placed the man on his
own donkey and took him to an inn and took care of him. 35 The next morning he
gave two silver coins to the innkeeper and said, ‘Take care of this man. If you (sg)
spend more than this amount to care for him, I will pay you back when I return.’ ”
36 Then Jesus said, “Three people saw the man whom bandits attacked. Which one of
them acted in a loving way toward that man?” 37 The man who studied the Scriptures
replied, “The one who acted mercifully toward him.” Jesus said to him, “You (sg) go
and act like that toward everyone whom you can help!”
Jesus rebuked Martha for being too concerned about household chores.
Luke 10:38-42
38 As Jesus and his disciples continued to travel, they entered a village near
Jerusalem. A woman whose name was Martha invited them to come to her house.
39 Her younger sister, whose name was Mary, sat near Jesus. She was listening to
what he was teaching. 40 But Martha was very much concerned about preparing a
meal. She went to Jesus and said, “Lord, ◄you do not seem to care that my sister has
left me to prepare everything by myself!/do you not care that my sister has left me to
prepare everything by myself?► [RHQ] Tell her that she should help me!” 41 But the
Lord replied, “Martha, Martha, you (sg) are very worried about many things. 42 But
only one thing is truly necessary, and that is, to listen to what I am teaching. Mary has
decided to do that, and that is better than worrying. The blessing that she is receiving
from listening to me will not be taken away from her {No one will take away from
her the blessing that she is receiving from listening to me}.”
11
Jesus taught his disciples about prayer.
Luke 11:1-13
1 One day Jesus was somewhere praying. When he finished praying, one of his
disciples said to him, “Lord, teach us what to say when we (exc) pray, as John the
Baptizer taught his disciples!” 2 He said to them, “When you pray, say things like
this: ‘Father, we want you (sg) [MTY] to be honored/revered. We want people to let
you(sg) [MTY, MET] rule over their lives. 3 Give us (exc) each day the food [SYN] that
we need. 4 Forgive us for the wrong things that we have done, because we forgive
people for the wrong things that they do to us. Do not let us do wrong things when
we are tempted {someone or something tempts us}.’ ”
5 Then he said to them, “Suppose that one of you goes to the house of a friend at
midnight. Suppose that you (sg) stand outside and call out to him, ‘My friend, please
lend me three buns! 6 Another friend of mine who is traveling has just arrived at my
house, but I have no food ready to give to him!’ 7 Suppose that he answers you from
inside his house, ‘Do not bother me! The door has been locked {We(exc) have locked
the door} and all my family are in bed. So I cannot get up and give you (sg) anything!’
8 I will tell you that even if he does not want to get up and give you any food, to avoid
being ashamed for not helping you because you are his friend (OR, if without being
ashamed you continue asking him to do that), he certainly will get up and give you
whatever you need. 9 So I tell you this: Keep asking God for what you need. If you do
that, he will give it to you (pl). Confidently keep expecting God to give you the things
that you need, and he will give them to you [MET]. It will be like looking for what youLUKE 11:10
1479
LUKE 11:27
need and finding it. Keep on praying urgently to God. Then God will answer you. It
will be like knocking on a door so that God will open the way for you to get what you
pray for. 10 Remember that God will give things to everyone who continues to ask him
for them. He will give things to whoever confidently keeps asking. He will open the
way for people to get the things that they keep urgently praying for. 11 If one of you had
a son who asked you (sg) for a fish to eat, ◄you (sg) certainly would not give him a
poisonous snake instead!/would you give him a poisonous snake instead?► [RHQ] 12 If
he asked you for an egg, ◄you (sg) certainly would not give him a scorpion!/would
you give him a scorpion?► [RHQ] 13 Even though you people are evil, you know how
to give good things to your children. So your Father in heaven will certainly give good
things to those who ask him, including giving the Holy Spirit, who is the best gift.”
Jesus taught people various things about demons.
Luke 11:14-28
14 One day there was a man there who, because a demon controlled him [MTY], was
unable to speak. After Jesus expelled the demon, the man began to talk. Most of the
people there were amazed. 15 But some of them said, “It is Beelzebub, the ruler of the
demons, who enables this man to expel demons!” 16 Other people there asked Jesus to
perform a miracle to prove ◄he was the Messiah/that he had come from God► [MTY/
EUP]. They wanted to trap him into not being able to perform a miracle or into doing
something ridiculous. 17 But Jesus knew what they were thinking. So he said to them,
“If the people in one nation fight against each other, their nation will be destroyed
{they will destroy their nation}. If the people in [MTY] one house are divided, they
will cease to remain as one family. 18 Similarly, if Satan and his demons were fighting
against each other, ◄his rule over them would certainly not last!/how would his rule
over them last?► [RHQ] I say this because you are saying that I am expelling demons
by the power of the ruler of his own demons 19 Furthermore, if it is true that Satan
enables me to expel demons, is it also true that your disciples who expel demons do
so by Satan’s power [RHQ]? No, that is not true. So they will show that you are not
thinking logically. 20 But because it is by the power [MTY] of God that I expel demons,
I am showing you that the power of God to [MET] rule people’s lives has come to you.”
21 Then, to show that by expelling evil spirits he was making it clear that he was
much more powerful than Satan, Jesus said [MET], “When a strong man who has
many weapons guards his own house, no one can steal the things in his house. 22 But
when someone else who is stronger attacks that man and subdues him, he is able to
take away the weapons in which the man trusted. Then he can take from that man’s
house anything he wants to. 23 No one can be neutral. Those who do not help me are
opposing me, and those who do not gather people to become my disciples are causing
those people to go away from me.”
24 Then Jesus said this: “Sometimes when an evil spirit leaves someone, it wanders
around in desolate areas seeking someone in whom it can rest. If it does not find
anyone, it says to itself, ‘I will return to the person in whom I used to live!’ 25 So
it goes back and finds that the Spirit of God is not in control of that person’s life.
The person’s life is like a house that has been {that someone has} swept clean and
everything put {put everything} in order, but a house that is empty. 26 Then this evil
spirit goes and gets seven other spirits that are even more evil than it is. They all
enter that person and begin living there. So, although that person’s condition was
bad before, it became much worse.”
27 When Jesus said that, a woman who was listening called out to him, “God is
pleased with the woman who gave birth to you (sg) and let you nurse at her breasts!”LUKE 11:28
1480
LUKE 11:40
28 But he replied, “God is much more pleased with those who hear his message and
obey it!”
Jesus rebuked the people for wanting more miracles.
Luke 11:29-36
29 When the group of people around Jesus got larger, he said, “Many of you people
who have been observing my ministry are evil. You want me to perform a miracle to
prove that I have come from God, but the only miracle that I will perform for you is
one like happened to Jonah. 30 After Jonah was inside a huge fish for three days, God
performed a miracle to restore Jonah. Jonah then went and testified about that to the
people in Nineveh city. God will perform a similar miracle for me, the one who came
from heaven. When you people have seen that miracle, you will believe my message.
31 Long ago the queen from Sheba, far south of Israel, traveled a long distance to hear
Solomon speak many wise things. But now I, a man who is much greater and wiser
than Solomon, am here, but you have not listened to what I have told you. Therefore,
at the time when God judges all people, the queen from Sheba will stand there, along
with you people, and will condemn you. 32 The people who lived in Nineveh city
turned from their sinful ways when Jonah preached to them. But now I, who am
greater than Jonah, have come and preached to you, but you have not turned from
your sinful ways. Therefore, at the time when God judges all people, the people who
lived in Nineveh will stand there with you and condemn you.”
33 Then, to show them that they did not need more miracles, but that they needed only
to understand better what he had already told them, he said to them [MET], “People
who light a lamp do not then hide it, or put it under a basket. Instead, they put it on a
lampstand so that those who enter their house can see things from its light. Similarly,
I have not concealed God’s truth. I have revealed it to you. 34 Your eyes [MET] are like
a lamp for your body, because they enable you to see things. If your eyes are healthy,
you are able to see everything well [MET]. Similarly, if you(sg) accept my teaching,
you will be able to know all that God wants you to know. But if your eyes are bad,
you are not able to see anything. It is like being in darkness [MET]. And similarly,
if you(pl) do not accept what I teach, you will not be able to know all the things that
God wants you to know. 35 Therefore, you(pl) do not need to see more miracles. You
need to think carefully about what I have already told you, so that the things that you
have heard from others do not cause you to remain in spiritual darkness [MET]. 36 If
you live completely according to God’s truth, you will be able to know everything that
God wants you to know. It will be like being in a room with a lamp shining brightly,
enabling you to see everything clearly.”
Jesus rebuked the Jewish leaders for only pretending to be good.
Luke 11:37-54; Matthew 23:1-36; Mark 12:38-40
37 While Jesus finished saying those things, a Pharisee invited him to eat a meal
with him. So Jesus went to his house and ate with him. 38 The Pharisee was surprised
when he saw that Jesus did not follow the Pharisees’ ritual by washing his hands
before eating. The Pharisees washed their hands in a certain way to be cleansed from
anything that might have contaminated them. They were afraid that God might reject
them if they had touched something unacceptable to God. 39 The Lord Jesus said to him,
“You Pharisees are concerned about things that are outside your bodies, not with what
is in your ◄inner beings/hearts► [MET]. You wash the outside of cups and dishes before
you eat because you think that doing that will make you acceptable to God, but within
yourselves you are very greedy and wicked. 40 You foolish people! God is concerned
about things that are outside our bodies, but ◄he is certainly also concerned aboutLUKE 11:41
1481
LUKE 12:2
our inner beings!/isn’t he also concerned about our hearts?► [RHQ] 41 Give money
to those who are poor. Give according to what you know within your ◄inner beings/
heart► that you should give. Then you will be surprised to realize that you will be
acceptable to God without having to perform all those rituals about washing.
42 But there will be terrible punishment for you Pharisees! You give to God a tenth
of all you produce, even the various herbs that you grow, but you do not remember
that you must act justly toward others and love God! It is good to give a tenth of
your income to God, but you ought to do these other things also! 43 There will be
terrible punishment for you Pharisees, because you like to sit in the best seats in
our worship places so that people will think highly of you, and you like people to
greet you respectfully in the marketplaces. 44 There will be terrible punishment for
you, because you are like ground where there is no marker to indicate that there
is a grave underneath. People walk there, but they cannot see what is rotten down
below [MET]! Similarly, people who see you do not realize how polluted you are within
yourselves.”
45 One of those who taught the Jewish laws replied, “Teacher, by saying this you (sg)
are criticizing us also!” 46 Jesus said, “It will be terrible also for you who teach the
Jewish laws! You require people to obey many rules that are difficult to obey [MET].
That is like making them carry heavy burdens on their backs. But you yourselves do
not obey the laws that you require others to obey. (OR, you do not do anything to help
others to obey the laws.) 47 There will be terrible punishment for you! You decorate
the tombs of the prophets whom your ancestors killed, but you do not live according
to what the prophets taught. 48 So you are declaring that you approve of what your
ancestors did. They killed the prophets, and you are not honoring the prophets! You
just decorate their tombs! 49 So God, who is very wise [PRS], said, ‘I will send prophets
and apostles to you Jews. You will kill some of them and cause some of them to suffer
greatly. 50 As a result, I will consider that many of you people who have observed
my Son’s ministry will be guilty [MTY] of murder, as if you had killed all the prophets
that other people have killed, from the time I created the world, 51 starting from
Adam’s son Cain killing his brother Abel and continuing until they killed the prophet
Zechariah in the holy place between the altar and the temple.’ Yes, what I am saying is
true [MTY]. God will punish you people who have observed my ministry, you people
whom he considers to be guilty [MTY] for killing all those prophets! 52 There will
be terrible punishment for you men who teach the Jewish laws, because you have
not let people know God’s truth [MET]! It is as though you are taking away a key to
a house. You are not going into the house yourselves, and you are not letting other
people enter it, either.”
53 After Jesus finished saying those things, he left there. Then the men who taught
the Jewish laws and the Pharisees began to act in a very hostile way toward him.
They tried to make him say what he thought about many things. 54 They kept waiting
for him to say something wrong for which they could accuse him.
12
Jesus warned the people not to be like the Pharisees.
Luke 12:1-3
1 While they were doing that, many thousands of people gathered around Jesus.
There were so many that they were stepping on each other. Then Jesus said to
his disciples, “Beware of becoming hypocrites like the Pharisees. Their evil influence
[MET] spreads to others like yeast spreads its influence in dough. 2 People will not be
able to continue concealing the things that they or other people try to conceal now.LUKE 12:3
1482
LUKE 12:20
God will some day cause the things that are hidden now to be known {everyone to
know the things that they hide now}. 3 All the things that you say in the dark secretly,
some day will be heard {people will hear them} in the daylight. The things you
have whispered [SYN] privately among yourselves in your rooms will be proclaimed
{people will proclaim them} publicly.”
Jesus told them not to be afraid to tell others of their faith in him.
Luke 12:4-12
4 “My friends, listen carefully. Do not be afraid of people who are able to kill you,
but after they kill you, there is nothing more that they can do to hurt you. 5 But I will
warn you about the one that you should truly be afraid of. You should be afraid of
God, because he not only has the power to cause people to die, he has the power to
throw them into hell afterward! Yes, he is truly the one that you should be afraid of!
6 Think about the sparrows. They are worth so little that you can [RHQ] buy five of
them for only two small coins. But not one of them is ever forgotten by God {God
never forgets one of them}! 7 You are worth more to God than many sparrows. So do
not be afraid of what people can do to you! God even knows how many hairs there are
on each of your heads, so that if you(sg) lose one hair, he knows about it. So nothing
bad can happen to you without his knowing it.
8 I want to tell you also that if people, without being afraid, are willing to tell others
that they are my disciples, I, the one who came from heaven, will acknowledge before
God that they are my disciples. I will do that while God’s angels listen. 9 But if people
are afraid to say in front of others that they are my disciples, I will say, while God’s
angels listen, that they are not my disciples. 10 I will tell you also that God is willing
to forgive people who say bad things about me, the one who came from heaven, but
he will not forgive anyone who says evil things about what the Holy Spirit does. 11 So
when people ask you in Jewish worship houses and in the presence of rulers and
other authorities about your trusting in me, do not worry about how you will answer
them when they accuse you. Do not worry about what you should say, 12 because the
Holy Spirit will tell you at that very time what you should say.”
Jesus warned them about being greedy.
Luke 12:13-21
13 Then one of the people in the crowd said to Jesus, “Teacher, tell my older brother
to divide my father’s property and give me the part that belongs to me!” 14 But Jesus
replied to him, “Man, ◄no one appointed me in order that I would settle matters
when people are disputing about property!/did anyone appoint me in order that I
would settle matters when people are disputing about property?► [RHQ]” 15 Then he
said to the whole crowd, “Guard yourselves very carefully, in order that you do not
desire other people’s things in any way! No one can make his life secure by obtaining
many possessions.”
16 Then Jesus told the people this illustration: “There was a certain rich man whose
crops grew very well. 17 So he said to himself, ‘I do not know what to do, because I do
not have any place big enough to store all my crops!’ 18 Then he thought to himself, ‘I
know what I will do! I will tear down my grain bins and build larger ones! Then I will
store all my wheat and other goods in the big new bins. 19 Then I will say to myself
[SYN], “Now I have plenty of goods stored up. They will last for many years. So now
I will take life easy. I will eat and drink all that I want to and be happy for a long
time!” ’ 20 But God said to him, ‘You foolish man! Tonight you will die! ◄Then all the
goods you have saved up for yourself will belong to someone else, not to you!/Do you
think that you will benefit from all that you have stored up for yourself?► [RHQ]’ ”LUKE 12:21
1483
LUKE 12:37
21 Then Jesus ended this illustration by saying, “That is what will happen to those
who store up goods just for themselves, but who do not value the things that God
considers valuable.”
Jesus told his disciples not to worry about the things that they need.
Luke 12:22-34
22 Then Jesus said to his disciples, “So I want to tell you this: Do not worry about
things you need in order to live. Do not worry about whether you will have enough
food to eat or enough clothes to wear. 23 It is important to have sufficient food and
clothing, but ◄the way you conduct your lives is more important./is not the way you
conduct your lives more important?► [RHQ] 24 Think about the birds: They do not
plant seeds, and they do not harvest crops. They do not have rooms or buildings in
which to store crops. But God provides food for them. And you are certainly much
more valuable than birds. So God will certainly provide what you need! 25 ◄There is
not a one of you who can add a little bit to how long he lives by worrying about it!/
Is there any of you who can add a little bit to how long he lives by worrying about
it?► [RHQ] 26 Worrying is a small thing to do. So since you cannot add to your life,
◄you certainly should not worry about other things that you need to have in order
to live!/why do you worry about other things that you need to have in order to live?►
[RHQ] 27 Think about the way that flowers grow in the fields. They do not work to
earn money, and they do not make their own clothes. But I tell you that even though
King Solomon, who lived long ago, wore very beautiful clothes, his clothes were not as
beautiful as one of those flowers. 28 God makes the flowers beautiful, but they grow
in the fields for only a short time. Then they are cut at the same time that the grass
is cut, and thrown into an oven to be burned to make heat for baking bread. So they
really are not worth very much. But you are very precious to God, and he will care for
you much more than he cares for the grass by filling it with beautiful flowers. So he will
certainly provide clothes for you, who live much longer than the grass. Why [RHQ] do
you trust him so little? 29 Do not always be concerned about having enough to eat and
drink, and do not be worrying about those things. 30 The people who do not know
God are always worried about such things. But your Father in heaven knows that
you need those things, so you should not worry about them. 31 Instead, be concerned
about letting God completely direct your life. Then he will also give you enough of
the things you need.
32 You who are my disciples are like a small flock of sheep, and I am like your
shepherd. So you should not be afraid. Your Father in heaven wants to let you rule
with him in heaven. 33 So now sell the things that you own. Give the money that you get
for those things to poor people. If you do that, it will be as though you are providing for
yourselves purses that will not wear out, and God will give you a treasure in heaven
that will always be safe. There, no thief can come near to steal it, and no termite can
destroy it. 34 Remember that the things that you think are the most valuable are the
things that you will be constantly concerned about.”
Jesus told them that they should be ready for his return.
Luke 12:35-48
35 “Be always ready for doing God’s work [MET], like people who have put on their
work clothes and are ready during the day, with their lamps burning all night. 36 Be
ready for me to return [MET], like servants who are waiting for their master to return
after being at a wedding feast for several days. They are waiting to open the door for
him and start working for him again as soon as he arrives and knocks at the door.
37 If those servants are awake when he returns, he will be very pleased with them. ILUKE 12:38
1484
LUKE 12:53
will tell you this: He will put on the kind of clothes that servants wear and tell them
to sit down, and he will serve them a meal. 38 Even if he comes between midnight
and sunrise, if he finds that his servants are awake and ready for him, he will be
very pleased with them. 39 But you must also remember this: If owners of a house
knew what time a thief was coming, they would stay awake and would not allow their
house to be broken into and their goods to be stolen {the thief to break into the house
and steal their goods}. 40 Similarly, you must be ready for me to return, because I, the
one who came from heaven, will come again at a time when you do not expect me to
come.”
41 Peter said, “Lord, are you (sg) speaking this illustration only for us or for everyone
else also?” 42 The Lord replied, “I am saying it for you and for anyone else [MET, RHQ]
who is like a faithful and wise manager in his master’s house. His master appoints
him to supervise affairs in his house and to give all the other servants their food at the
proper time. Then he leaves on a long trip. 43 If the servant is doing that work when
his master returns, his master will be very pleased with him. 44 I tell you this: His
master will appoint him to supervise all of his affairs permanently. 45 But that servant
might think to himself, ‘My master has been away for a long time, so he probably will
not return soon and find out what I am doing.’ Then he might start to beat the other
servants, both male and female ones. He might also start to eat a lot of food and get
drunk. 46 If he does that, and if his master returns on a day when the servant does
not expect him, then his master will ◄cut him into two pieces/punish him severely►
[HYP] and put him in the place where he puts all those who do not serve him faithfully.
47 Every servant who knows what his master wants him to do but who does not get
himself ready and does not do what his master desires will be beaten severely {The
master will beat severely every servant who knows what his master wants him to do
but who does not get himself ready and does not do what his master desires}. 48 But
every servant who did not know what his master wanted him to do, and who did
things for which he deserved to be punished, will be beaten lightly {the master will
beat lightly every servant who did not know what his master wanted him to do and
did the things for which he deserved that his master would beat him}. God will treat
his people similarly, because he expects a lot from those people whom he has allowed
to understand a lot. People who entrust things to others’ care expect those people to
care for those things very well. Similarly, God expects a lot from those people whom
he has allowed to understand a lot. Furthermore, he expects the most from people to
whom he has given the most ability.”
Jesus warned that people would face opposition even within their own families.
Luke 12:49-53
49 “I came to earth to cause there to be trials [MET], which will purify you as fire
purifies metal (OR, to cause judgment/divisions among you). I wish that the time
when you will be purified {when God will purify you} (OR, when divisions will be
caused {to cause divisions among people}) had already begun. 50 I must soon suffer
[IDM] greatly. I am distressed, and I will continue to be distressed until my suffering
is finished. 51 Do you think that as a result of my coming to earth people will live
together peacefully? No! I must tell you, that is not what will happen! Instead, people
will be divided. 52 Because some people in one house will believe in me and some will
not, they will be divided. For example, three people in one house who do not believe
in me will oppose two who do believe, or two who do not believe in me will oppose
three who do believe. 53 A man will oppose his son, or a son will oppose his father.
A woman will oppose her daughter, or a woman will oppose her mother. A woman
will oppose her daughter-in-law, or a woman will oppose her mother-in-law.”LUKE 12:54
1485
LUKE 13:9
Jesus told the people that they needed to settle their relationship with God before it
was too late.
Luke 12:54-59
54 He also said to the crowds, “In this country, when you see a dark cloud forming in
the west, you immediately say ‘It is going to rain!’ and that is what happens. 55 In this
region, when the wind blows from the south, you say, ‘It is going to be a very hot day!’
and that is what happens. 56 You hypocrites! By observing the clouds and the wind,
you are able to discern what is happening regarding the weather. It is disgusting that
you are not able to discern what God is doing at this present time [RHQ]!
57 ◄Each of you ought to determine now what is the right thing for you to do, while
you still have time to do that!/Why cannot each of you determine what is the right
thing for you to do now while you still have time to do that?► [RHQ] 58 If you do not
do that, God will punish you [MET]. It will be like what happens when someone takes
one of you to court, saying that you (sg) have done something very bad. You should
try to settle things with him while you are still on the way to the court. If he forces
you to go to the judge, the judge will decide that you are guilty and put you into the
hands of the court officer. Then that officer will put you in prison. 59 I tell you that if
you go to prison, you will never get out, because you will never be able to pay every
bit of what the judge says you owe [MET]. Similarly, you ought to settle accounts with
God before you die, too.”
13
Jesus warned people that God would punish them if they did not turn from their
sinful lives.
Luke 13:1-5
1 Some people who were listening to Jesus at that time told him about some people
from Galilee district who had gone to Jerusalem. Pilate, the Roman governor, had
ordered soldiers to kill them [MTY] while they were offering sacrifices in the Temple
there. 2 Jesus replied to them, “Do you think that this happened to those people from
Galilee because they were more sinful than all the other people from Galilee? 3 I
assure you, that was not so! But instead of being concerned about them, you need to
remember that God will similarly punish you eternally if you do not turn away from
your sinful behavior. 4 Or, consider the 18 people who died when the tower at Siloam
outside Jerusalem fell on them. Do you think that this happened to them because they
were more sinful than all the other people who lived in Jerusalem? 5 I assure you,
that was not so! But instead, you need to realize that God will similarly punish you
eternally if you do not stop your sinful behavior!”
Jesus warned that he would punish the Jews for not showing that they appreciated
God’s blessings.
Luke 13:6-9
6 Then Jesus told them this illustration to show what God would do to the Jews, whom
he continually blessed, but who did not do things that please him: “A man planted a
fig tree on his farmland. ◄Each year/Many times► he came to it looking for figs, but
there were no figs. 7 Then he said to the gardener, ‘Look here! I have been looking for
fruit on this fig tree every year for the past three years, but there have been no figs.
Cut it down! ◄It is just using up the nutrients in the soil for nothing!/Why should it
continue using up the nutrients in the soil for nothing?► [RHQ]’ 8 But the gardener
replied to the owner, ‘Sir, leave it here for another year. I will dig around it and put
manure around it. 9 If it bears fruit next year, we (inc) will allow it to keep growing.
If it does not bear fruit next year, you (sg) can cut it down.’ ”LUKE 13:10
1486
LUKE 13:26
Jesus told a synagogue leader that he was being hypocritical regarding working on
the Sabbath.
Luke 13:10-17
10 One ◄Sabbath/Jewish day of rest►, Jesus was teaching people in one of the Jewish
meeting places. 11 There was a woman there whom an evil spirit [MTY] had crippled
for 18 years. She was always bent over; she could not stand up straight. 12 When Jesus
saw her, he called her over to him. He said to her, “Woman, I am freeing you (sg)
from your illness!” 13 He put his hands on her. Immediately she stood up straight, and
she praised God! 14 But the man in charge ◄of the synagogue/of the meeting place►
was angry because Jesus had healed her ◄on the Sabbath/on the Jewish rest day►.
He considered that healing was doing work. So he said to the people, “There are six
days each week in which our Jewish laws permit people to work. If you need healing,
those are the days to come ◄to the synagogue/to the meeting place► and be healed.
Do not come on our Jewish day of rest!” 15 Then the Lord replied to him, “You (sg)
and your fellow religious leaders are hypocrites! ◄On the Sabbath/On our Jewish day
of rest►, just like on every other day, ◄each of you unties his ox or donkey, and then
leads it from the food trough to where it can drink water./does not each of you untie
his ox or donkey, and then lead it from the food trough to where it can drink water?►
[RHQ] That is work, too! 16 This woman is more important than an animal; she is a
Jew, descended from Abraham! But Satan has kept her [MET] crippled for 18 years,
as though he had tied her up and not let her escape! So ◄it is certainly right that she
be freed {that I free her}, even if this is a Sabbath day!/was it not right that she be
freed {that I free her}, even if this is a Jewish rest day?► [RHQ]” 17 After Jesus said
that, all the people there who opposed him were ashamed. But all the other people
there were happy about all the wonderful things he was doing.
Jesus gave two illustrations about God’s rule over people’s lives.
Luke 13:18-21; Matthew 13:31-33; Mark 4:30-32
18 Then Jesus said, “◄I will tell you how the number of people who let God rule
[MET] their lives will increase./Do you know how the number of people who let God
rule [MET] their lives will increase?► [RHQ] I will tell you what I can compare it to.
19 It is like a tiny mustard seed that a man planted in his field. It grew until it became
big, like a tree. It was so big that birds built nests in its branches.”
20 Then he said, “I will tell [RHQ] you something else, to illustrate how the people
who let God rule [MET] their lives can influence their society more and more. 21 It is
like a little bit of yeast that a woman mixed with about 50 pounds of flour. That small
amount of yeast made the whole batch of dough swell up.”
Jesus warns that not all people who think that they will go to heaven will go there.
Luke 13:22-30; Matthew 7:13-14,21-23
22 Jesus continued traveling, along with his disciples, through various towns and
villages on the way to Jerusalem. As they went, he was teaching the people.
23 Someone asked him, “Lord, will there be only a few people who are saved {whom
God saves}?” He replied to them, “There will not be many, because the way to heaven
[MET] is like a narrow door. 24 Therefore, try hard to enter that narrow doorway,
because I tell you that many people will try to enter heaven by some other way, but
they will not be able to get in. 25 God is like the owner of a house. Some day he will
lock his door. Then some of you will begin to stand outside that door and knock. You
will say, ‘Lord, open the door for us!’ But he will reply, ‘No, I will not open it, because
I do not know you, and I do not know where you are from!’ 26 Then you will say,
‘◄You must have forgotten!/Surely you know us, because► [RHQ] we (exc) ate mealsLUKE 13:27
1487
LUKE 14:6
with you (sg), and you taught people in the streets of our towns’! 27 But he will say,
‘I tell you again, I do not know you, and I do not know where you are from. You are
wicked people! Get away from here!’ ” 28 Then Jesus continued, saying, “From where
God will send you, you will see Abraham and Isaac and Jacob in the distance. All the
prophets who lived long ago will also be there, in the kingdom where God is ruling.
But you will be outside, crying and grinding your teeth because you will have severe
pain! 29 Furthermore, many non-Jewish people will be inside. There will be ones who
have come from lands to the north, east, south, and west. They will be feasting in
◄that place where God is ruling/God’s kingdom►. 30 Think about this: Some people
whom others do not consider important now, God will make them very important
then, and some people whom others consider very important now, God will make to
be not important then.”
Jesus stated that it was necessary for him to die as a prophet in Jerusalem.
Luke 13:31-35; Matthew 23:37-39
31 At that very time, some Pharisees came and said to Jesus, “Leave this area,
because the ruler Herod Antipas wants to kill you (sg)!” 32 He replied to them, “Herod
is [MET] as cruel as a fox, but also as insignificant as a fox. So I do not worry about
him. But to show him that no one can harm me until it is the time and place God has
determined, go tell him this message from me: ‘Listen! I am expelling demons and
performing miracles today, and I will continue doing it for a short time. After that, I
will finish my work. 33 But I must continue my trip to Jerusalem during the coming
days, because they killed many other prophets there, and since I am also a prophet,
no other place is appropriate for people to kill me.’ ”
34 Then Jesus said, “O people of [MTY] Jerusalem [APO]! You killed the prophets who
lived long ago, and you killed others, whom God sent to you, by throwing stones at
them. Many times I wanted to gather you together to protect you [SIM] like a hen
gathers her young chicks under her wings. But you did not want me to do that. 35 So
listen to this: Your city [MTY] (OR, your temple) is going to be abandoned (OR, God
will no longer protect it). I will [MTY] also tell you this: I will enter your city only once
more. After that, you will not see me until the time when I return and you say about
me, ‘God is truly pleased with this man who comes with God’s authority [MTY]!’ ”
14
Jesus told the Jewish leaders that they were being hypocritical about not helping
people on the Sabbath.
Luke 14:1-6
1 One ◄Jewish day of rest/Sabbath day►, Jesus went to eat [SYN] at the house of an
important Pharisee. Some men who studied the Jewish laws and other Pharisees who
were there were watching him carefully to see if he would do something for which
they could accuse him. 2 Unexpectedly, there was a man in front of Jesus whose arms
and legs were swollen. 3 Jesus said to them, “Is it permitted in our(inc) Jewish laws
to heal someone ◄on our Jewish rest day/on the Sabbath►, or not?” 4 They knew that
their laws permitted it, but they thought that healing was work, which they thought
was wrong to do ◄on the Sabbath/on the Jewish rest day► (OR, they knew that their
laws permitted it, but they did not want to admit it). So they did not reply. Then Jesus
put his hands on the man and healed him. Then he told him to go home. 5 Then he
said to the rest of them, “If you had a son or an ox that fell into a well on a ◄Sabbath/
our day of rest►, would you immediately work to pull him out, or would you(sg) let
him stay there until the next day?” 6 They knew that they would immediately work toLUKE 14:7
1488
LUKE 14:24
pull him out, even on their day of rest, so they could not justly say that Jesus did wrong
by healing the man on that day. So they said nothing in reply to Jesus.
Jesus taught that we should not try to make ourselves seem important.
Luke 14:7-11
7 Jesus noticed that those people who had been {whom the Pharisee had} invited
to the meal chose to sit in the places where important people usually sit. Then he
gave this advice to them: 8 “When one of you (sg) is invited by someone {someone
invites one of you (sg)} to a wedding feast, do not sit in a place where important
people sit. Perhaps the man giving the feast has invited a man more important than
you (sg). 9 When that man comes, the man who invited both of you will come to you
(sg) and say to you, ‘Let this man take your seat!’ Then you (sg) will have to take the
most undesirable seat, and you will be ashamed. 10 Instead, when you are invited
{someone invites one of you} to a feast, go and sit in the most undesirable seat. Then
when the man who invited everyone comes, he will say to you (sg), ‘Friend, sit in
a better seat!’ Then all the people who are eating with you (sg) will see that he is
honoring you. 11 Also, remember this: God will humble those who exalt themselves.
And he will exalt those who humble themselves.”
Jesus taught that we should share with others who cannot repay us.
Luke 14:12-14
12 Jesus also said to the Pharisee who had invited him to the meal, “When you (sg)
invite people to a midday or evening meal, do not invite your friends or your family
or your other relatives or your rich neighbors. They can later invite you (sg) for a
meal. In that way they will repay you. 13 Instead, when you (sg) give a feast, invite
poor people, crippled people, lame people, or blind people. 14 They will be unable to
repay you. But God will bless you! He will repay you at the time when he causes
righteous people to become alive again.”
Jesus taught that many Jews would reject God’s invitation to come to him.
Luke 14:15-24
15 One of those who were eating with Jesus heard him say that. He said to Jesus,
“God has truly blessed us Jews who will eat with the Messiah when he starts to rule!”
16 But to show that many Jews whom God had invited would not accept God’s invitation
[MET], Jesus replied to him, “One time a man decided to prepare a large feast. He
invited many people to come. 17 When it was the day for the feast, he sent his servant
to tell those who had been {whom he had} invited, ‘Come now because everything is
ready!’ 18 But when the servant did that, all of the people whom he had invited began
to say why they did not want to come. The first man the servant went to said, ‘I have
just bought a field, and I must go and see it. Please ask your master to forgive me
for not coming!’ 19 Another person said, ‘I have just bought five pair of oxen, and
I must go to examine them. Please ask your master to forgive me for not coming!’
20 Another person said, ‘I have just been married. So I cannot come.’ 21 So the servant
returned to his master and reported what everyone had said. The owner of the house
was angry when he heard the reasons they gave for not coming. He said to his servant,
‘Go out quickly to the streets and alleys of the city and find poor and crippled and
blind and lame people, and bring them here into my house!’ 22 After the servant went
and did that, he came back and said, ‘Sir, I have done what you (sg) told me to do, but
there is still room for more people.’ 23 So his master said to him, ‘Then go outside the
city. Search for people along the highways. Search also along the narrow roads with
hedges beside them where homeless people may be staying. Strongly urge the people
in those places to come to my house. I want it to be full of people!’ ” 24 Then Jesus said,LUKE 14:25
1489
LUKE 15:6
“I tell you (pl) this: Very few of you Jewish people will enjoy my feast, even though I
invited you first to eat it with me when I become king.”
Jesus warned that it would be difficult to be his disciple.
Luke 14:25-33
25 Large groups of people were traveling with Jesus. He turned and said to them,
26 “If anyone comes to me who loves his father and mother and wife and children and
brothers and sisters more than [HYP] he loves me, he cannot be my disciple. He must
even love me more than he loves his own life! 27 People who are ready to execute a
prisoner make him carry his cross [MET] to the place where others will nail him on it.
Only those who are willing to allow others to hurt them and disgrace them like that
because of being my disciples, and who are willing to obey what I teach, can be my
disciples. 28 I will illustrate [MET]. If one of you desired to build a ◄tower/big house►,
◄you would surely first sit down and determine how much it would cost!/would you
not first sit down and determine how much it would cost?► [RHQ] Then you would
determine whether you had enough money to complete it. 29 If you did not do that,
if you laid the foundation and were not able to finish the rest of the tower, everyone
who saw it would make fun of you. 30 They would say, ‘This man started to build a
tower, but he was not able to finish it!’ 31 Or, if a king decided to send his army to
war against another king, ◄he would surely first sit down with those who advised
him./would he not first sit down with those who advised him?► [RHQ] They would
determine whether his army, which had only 10,000 soldiers, could defeat the other
army, which had 20,000 soldiers, and was about to attack his army. 32 If he decided
that his army could not defeat that army, he would send messengers to the other king
while the other army was still far away. He would tell the messengers to say to that
king, ‘What things must I do to have peace with your country?’ 33 So, similarly, if any
one of you does not first decide that you (sg) are willing to give up all that you have,
you cannot be my disciple.”
Jesus warned about losing our usefulness to God.
Luke 14:34-35
34 Jesus also said, “You are like [MET] salt, which is useful to put on food. But ◄salt
certainly cannot be made {you certainly cannot make salt} to taste salty again if it
stops tasting salty!/can salt be made {can you make salt} to taste salty again if it quits
tasting salty?► [RHQ] 35 If salt does not taste salty any more, it is not good for the soil
or even for the manure heap. People throw it away. The same thing will happen to
you if you become useless to God. If you want to understand what I just said [IDM],
you must consider carefully what you have heard!”
15
Jesus taught that God is pleased when people turn from their sinful behavior.
Luke 15:1-10
1 Many [HYP] tax collectors and others whom people considered to be habitual
sinners kept coming to Jesus to listen to him teach. 2 The Pharisees and men who
taught the Jewish laws who were there [SYN] began to grumble, saying, “This man
welcomes sinners and he also defiles himself by eating with them!” 3 So Jesus told
them this parable: 4 “Suppose that one of you had 100 sheep. If one of them were
lost, ◄you (sg) would certainly leave the 99 sheep in the pasture, and go and search for
the one lost sheep until you found it./would you not leave the 99 sheep in the pasture,
and go and search for the one lost sheep until you found it?► [RHQ] 5 When you (sg)
found it, you would put it on your shoulders and be happy. 6 When you brought itLUKE 15:7
1490
LUKE 15:28
home, you would call together your friends and neighbors and say to them, ‘Be happy
with me, because I have found my sheep that was lost!’ 7 I tell you (pl) that similarly
God will be very happy about each and every sinner who turns from doing evil. God
is not happy about 99 people who think that they are [IRO] righteous and think that
they do not need to turn from doing evil.
8 Or, suppose that a woman has ten very valuable silver coins. If she loses one
of them, ◄she will certainly light a lamp and sweep the floor and search carefully
until she finds it!/will she not light a lamp and sweep the floor and search carefully
until she finds it?► [RHQ] 9 When she finds it, she will call together her friends and
neighbors and say, ‘Be happy with me, because I have found the coin that I lost!’ 10 I
tell you that similarly the angels will be happy about even just one sinner who turns
from doing evil.”
Jesus taught the Jewish leaders that they also ought to be glad when people turn
from their sinful ways.
Luke 15:11-32
11 Then Jesus told them this parable to compare what the Pharisees and teachers
of the Jewish law thought about those who turn from their sinful behavior with what
God thinks about such people. He said, “A certain man had two sons. 12 One day the
younger son said to his father, ‘Father, I do not want to wait until you(sg) die. Give me
now the share of your property that belongs to me!’ So the man divided his property
between his two sons. 13 A few days later, the younger son sold his share. He gathered
his money and other things together and went to a country far away. There he spent
all his money foolishly in reckless/wild living. 14 After he had spent all his money,
there was a great famine throughout that country. And soon he did not have enough
food to eat. 15 So he went to one of the landowners in that area and asked for work.
The man sent him to work taking care of the pigs in his field. 16 Because he was very
hungry, he would have been glad to eat the bean pods that the pigs ate. But no one
gave him anything to eat. 17 Finally he thought clearly about what he had done. He
said to himself, ‘All of my father’s hired servants have plenty of food! They have
more [SYN] than they can eat, but here I am dying because I do not have anything to
eat [HYP]! 18 So I will leave here and go back to my father. I will say to him, “Father, I
have sinned against God [MTY, EUP] and against you (sg). 19 I am no longer worthy to
be called {of you calling me} your son. Just hire me to be like one of the other hired
servants.” ’ 20 So he left there and went back to his father’s house. But while he was
still some distance from the house, his father saw him. He pitied him. He ran to his
son and embraced him and kissed him on the cheek. 21 His son said to him, ‘Father,
I have sinned against God [MTY/EUP] and against you. I am no longer worthy to be
called {of you calling me} your son.’ 22 But his father said to his servants, ‘Go quickly
and bring to me the best robe in the house! Then put it on my son. Put a ring on
his finger to show that I am honoring him again as my son! Put sandals on his feet
to show that I do not consider him to be a slave! 23 Then bring the fat calf and kill it
and cook it. We (inc) must eat and celebrate, 24 because my son has returned! It is
as though [MET] he was dead and is alive again! It is as though he was lost and now
has been found!’ So they did that, and they all began to celebrate.
25 While all that was happening, the man’s older son was out working in the field.
When he came near to the house, he heard people playing music and dancing. 26 He
called one of the servants and asked what was happening. 27 The servant said to
him, ‘Your younger brother has come home Your father has told us to kill the fat
calf to celebrate because your brother has returned safe and healthy.’ 28 But the older
brother was angry. He refused to enter the house. So his father came out and pleadedLUKE 15:29
1491
LUKE 16:13
with him to come in. 29 But he replied to his father, ‘Listen to me! For many years I
have worked for you like a slave. I always obeyed everything you told me to do. But
you never even gave me a young goat, so that I could kill it and cook it and celebrate
with my friends. 30 But this son of yours spent all the money he got from what you
gave him. He spent it to pay for sleeping with prostitutes! Yes, now he has returned
home, but it is not fair that you have told your servants to kill the fat calf and cook
it for him!’ 31 But his father said to him, ‘My son, you have always been with me,
and all my property that I did not give to your brother has been yours. 32 But it is as
though [MET] your brother was dead and is alive again! It is as though he was lost
and now he has been found! So it is appropriate for us to be happy and celebrate!’ ”
16
Jesus taught that we should handle our money in ways that are pleasing to God.
Luke 16:1-13
1 Jesus also said to his disciples, “Once there was a rich man who had a household
manager. One day he was told {someone told him} that the manager was managing
the rich man’s money badly. 2 So he summoned his manager and said to him, ‘◄It
is terrible what they are saying about you (sg)!/Is it true what they are saying about
you (sg) [RHQ]?► Give me a written account of the funds you have been managing,
because you can no longer be my household manager!’ 3 Then the manager thought
to himself, ‘My master is going to fire me, so ◄I do not know what to do./what shall I
do [RHQ]?► I am not strong enough to work by digging ditches, and I am ashamed to
beg for money.’ 4 Suddenly he had an idea. ‘I know what I will do, so that people will
take me into their houses and provide for me after I am dismissed {after my master
dismisses me} from my work!’ 5 So one by one he summoned the people who owed his
master money. He asked the first one, ‘How much do you (sg) owe my master?’ 6 The
man replied, ‘Eight hundred gallons of olive oil.’ The manager said to him, ‘Take
your bill and sit down and quickly change it to 400 gallons!’ 7 He said to another
man, ‘How much do you owe?’ The man replied, ‘A thousand bushels of wheat.’ The
manager said to him, ‘Take your bill and change it to 800 bushels!’ He did similar
things for the others who owed his master money. 8 When his master heard what the
manager had done, he admired the dishonest manager for the clever thing he had
done. The truth is that the ungodly people in this world act more wisely toward other
people than godly people [MET] act. 9 So I tell you (pl) this: Use the money that you
have here on earth to help others so that they will become your friends. Then when
you die and you cannot take any money with you, God and his angels will welcome
you into a home in heaven that will last forever.
10 People who faithfully manage small matters will also faithfully manage important
matters. People who are dishonest in the way they handle small matters will be
dishonest in the way they handle important matters. 11 So if you have not faithfully
handled the money that God has given you here on earth, ◄he will certainly not
allow you to possess the true spiritual riches in heaven!/ would he allow you to
possess the true spiritual riches in heaven?► [RHQ] 12 And if you have not faithfully
managed things that belong to other people, ◄God will certainly not allow you to
receive treasures in heaven that would belong to you!/would God allow you to receive
treasures in heaven that would belong to you?► [RHQ] 13 No servant is able to serve
two different bosses at the same time. If he tried to do that, he would prefer one of
them more than the other one; he would be loyal to one of them and despise the
other one. Similarly, you cannot devote your life to worshipping God and worshipping
money and material goods at the same time.”LUKE 16:14
1492
LUKE 16:31
Jesus taught that God’s laws are permanent.
Luke 16:14-18
14 There were some Pharisees there. They loved to acquire money. When they heard
Jesus say that, they ridiculed him. 15 But he said to them, “You try to make other
people think that you are righteous, but God knows your ◄inner beings/hearts►. So
he will reject you. Keep in mind that many things that people think are important, God
thinks are detestable.
16 The laws that God gave Moses and what the prophets [MTY] wrote were ◄in
effect/what you needed to obey► until John the Baptizer came. Since then I have been
preaching about how God wants to rule people’s lives in a new way, and many people
are accepting that message and very eagerly asking God to control their lives. But that
does not mean that God has abolished the laws that he established previously. 17 All of
God’s laws, even those that seem insignificant, are more permanent than heaven and
earth.
18 For example, because God considers that a marriage lasts until either the husband
or the wife dies, he considers that any man who divorces his wife and marries another
woman is committing adultery. He also considers that any man who marries a woman
who has been divorced by her husband {whose husband has divorced her} is also
committing adultery.”
Jesus warned what would happen to those who did not share their possessions with
poor people.
Luke 16:19-31
19 Jesus also said [MET], “Once there was a rich man who wore expensive purple
linen garments. He ate luxuriously every day. 20 And every day a poor man whose
name was Lazarus was laid {some people also laid a poor man whose name was
Lazarus} at the gate of the rich man’s house. Lazarus’ body was covered with sores.
21 He was so hungry that he wanted to eat the scraps of food that fell from the table
where the rich man ate. Furthermore, to make things worse, dogs came and licked
his sores. 22 Eventually the poor man died. Then he was taken by the angels {the
angels took him} to start feasting next to his ancestor Abraham. The rich man also
died, and his body was buried {some people buried his body}. 23 In the place where
dead people wait for God to judge them, he was suffering great pain. He looked up
and saw Abraham far away, and he saw Lazarus sitting close to Abraham. 24 So he
shouted, ‘Father Abraham, I am suffering very much in this fire! So please pity me,
and send Lazarus here so that he can dip his finger in water and touch my tongue
to cool it!’ 25 But Abraham replied, ‘Son, remember that while you (sg) were alive
on earth you enjoyed many good things. But Lazarus was miserable. Now it is fair
that he is happy here, and you are suffering. 26 Besides that, there is a huge ravine
between you (sg) and us. So those who want to go from here to where you (sg) are,
are not able to. Furthermore, no one can cross from there to where we (exc) are.’
27 Then the rich man said, ‘If that is so, father Abraham, I ask you (sg) to send Lazarus
to my father’s house. 28 I have five brothers who live there. Tell him to warn them
to turn away from their sinful behavior so that they do not also come to this place,
where we(exc) suffer great pain!’ 29 But Abraham replied, ‘No, I will not do that,
because your brothers are able to go to the Jewish meeting places where the priests
read what Moses and the prophets wrote. They should listen to what Moses and the
prophets [MTY] wrote!’ 30 But the rich man replied, ‘No, father Abraham, that will
not be enough But if someone from those who have died goes back to them and warns
them, they will turn from their sinful behavior.’ 31 Abraham said to him, ‘No! If they
do not listen to what [MTY] Moses and the prophets [MTY] wrote, even if someoneLUKE 17:1
1493
LUKE 17:17
would become alive again and go and warn them, they would not be convinced {he
could not convince them} that they should turn from their sinful behavior.’ ”
17
Jesus warned about God punishing those who cause others to sin.
Luke 17:1-4
1 One day Jesus said to his disciples, “Things that will tempt people to sin are certain
to happen, but it will be terrible for anyone who causes them to happen! 2 Suppose
you caused one of these people who do not believe in me very strongly to sin. If a huge
stone was fastened {someone fastened a huge stone} around your neck and you were
thrown {and threw you} into the sea, you would consider that a severe punishment,
but God will punish you even more severely if you cause someone to sin! 3 Be careful
how you act. If you know about a fellow believer who sins, you (sg) should rebuke
him. If he says that he is sorry for having sinned and asks you to forgive him, forgive
him. 4 Even if he sins against you (sg) seven times in one day, if he comes to you each
time and says, ‘I am sorry for what I did’, you must continue forgiving him.”
Jesus taught them what big things they could accomplish if they had true faith.
Luke 17:5-6
5 One day the apostles said to the Lord, “Help us to trust in you (OR, in God) more
strongly!” 6 The Lord replied, “Mustard seeds are very small, but in this area they grow
and produce large [MET] plants. Similarly, if your faith grows until you truly believe
that God will do what you ask him to, you will be able to do anything. You could even
say to this mulberry tree, ‘Pull yourself out with your roots and plant yourself in the
sea!’ and it would obey you!”
Jesus taught that we should serve God faithfully without expecting to be thanked.
Luke 17:7-10
7 Jesus also said, “Suppose that one of you had a servant who was plowing your
fields or taking care of your sheep. After he comes into the house from the field, you
(sg) would not say [RHQ], ‘Sit down and eat immediately!’ 8 Instead, you would say
to him, ‘Put on your apron and prepare a meal for me! Then serve it to me so that
I can eat and drink! Afterwards you (sg) can eat and drink.’ 9 ◄You will not thank
your servant for doing the work that he had been told {you had told him} to do!/
Would you thank your servant because he did the work that he had been told {you
had told him} to do?► [RHQ] 10 Similarly, when you (pl) have done everything that
God has told you to do, you should say, ‘We (inc) are not worthy of God thanking us
{being thanked}. We are only God’s servants. We have only done the things that he
told us to do.’ ”
Jesus healed ten lepers, but only a non-Jewish one thanked him.
Luke 17:11-19
11 As Jesus and his disciples were walking along the road to Jerusalem, they were
going through the region between Samaria and Galilee districts. 12 As they entered
one village, ten lepers came near the road. Because lepers were not permitted to come
near other people, they stood at some distance 13 and called out, “Jesus, Master, pity
us and heal us!” 14 When he saw them, he said to them, “Each of you should go and
show yourself to a priest in Jerusalem so that he can see if you are healed.” As they
were going there, they were healed. 15 Then one of them, when he saw that he was
healed, turned back, praising God loudly. 16 He came to Jesus, prostrated himself at
Jesus’ feet, and thanked him. This man was a Samaritan, not a Jew. 17 Then Jesus
said, “I healed ten lepers ◄I am disappointed that the other nine did not come back!/LUKE 17:18
1494
LUKE 17:37
Where are the other nine?► [RHQ] 18 I am disappointed [RHQ] that this non-Jewish
man was the only one who returned to thank God; none of the others came back to
me!” 19 Then he said to the man, “Get up and continue on your journey. God [PRS]
has saved you and healed you (sg) because you trusted in me.”
Jesus taught that God’s rule is within our lives.
Luke 17:20-21
20 One day Jesus was asked by some Pharisees [SYN] {some Pharisees [SYN] asked
Jesus}, “When is God going to rule as king?” He replied, “God’s ruling [MET] is not
something people will be able to see with their eyes. 21 And people will not be able
to say, ‘Look! He is ruling here!’ Or ‘He is ruling over there!’ because, contrary to
what you think, God’s ruling is people’s inner beings (OR, is already happening among
you).”
Jesus told his disciples that without warning he would return and judge people.
Luke 17:22-37
22 Jesus said to his disciples, “There will be a time when you will want to see me
[MTY], the one who came from heaven, ruling powerfully. But you will not see that.
23 Some people will say to you, ‘Look, the Messiah is over there!’ or they will say ‘Look,
he is here!’ When they say that, do not believe them. Do not follow them to go see the
Messiah. 24 Because when the lightning flashes and lights up the sky from one side to
the other, everyone can see it. Similarly [SIM], at the time [MTY] when I, the one who
came from heaven, come back again, everyone will see me. 25 But before that happens,
I must suffer in many ways (OR, very much). And I will be rejected by people {people
will reject me}, even though they have observed me doing good for people. 26 But when
I, the one who came from heaven, come again, people will be doing things just like
people were doing at the time when [MTY] Noah lived. 27 At that time people ate and
drank as usual, and they got married as usual, up until the day when Noah and his
family entered the big boat. But then the flood came and destroyed all those who
were not in the boat. 28 Similarly, when Lot lived in Sodom city, people there ate and
drank as usual. They bought things and they sold things. They planted crops and
they built houses as usual. 29 But on the day that Lot and his family left Sodom, fire
and burning sulfur came down from the sky and destroyed all those who stayed in the
city. 30 Similarly, when I, the one who came from heaven, return to earth, people will
be unprepared (OR, enjoying normal life). 31 On that day, those who are outside their
houses, with all the things that they own inside the houses, must not go in to take
them away, because there will not be enough time to do that. Similarly, those who are
working in a field must not go back home to get anything; they must flee immediately.
32 Remember Lot’s wife! Because she turned back and wanted to get some of her things
from Sodom, she died immediately and became a pillar of salt. 33 Anyone who wants
to hold onto his life and his possessions will not receive eternal life. But anyone who
is willing to die for my sake will live eternally. 34 I tell you this: On the night when I
return, there will be two people sleeping in one bed. The one who believes in me will
be taken {God will take the one who believes in me} to heaven, and the other one will
be left behind and punished {and he will leave the other one behind and punish him}.
35-36 Two women will be grinding grain together; one will be taken and the other left
{God will take one and leave the other} behind.” 37 His disciples said to him, “Lord,
where will this happen?” He replied to them, “Wherever there is an animal carcass,
the vultures will gather to eat it [MET]. Similarly, wherever there are people who are
spiritually dead, God will punish them.”LUKE 18:1
1495
LUKE 18:17
18
Jesus taught about continuing to believe that God will answer prayer.
Luke 18:1-8
1 Jesus told his disciples a parable to teach them that they always ought to pray
confidently and not be discouraged if God does not immediately answer their prayers.
2 He said, “In a certain city there was a judge who did not revere God, and did not
care about people, either. 3 There was a widow in that city who kept coming to him,
saying, ‘Please decide what is just in the dispute between me and the man who is
opposing me in court!’ 4 For a long time the judge refused to help her. But later he
thought to himself, ‘I do not revere God and I do not care about people, 5 but this
widow keeps bothering me! So I will make sure that she is treated justly. If I do not
do that, she will exhaust me by continually coming to me!’ ” 6 Then the Lord Jesus
said, “Even though the judge was not a righteous man, think carefully about what he
said! 7 Similarly, ◄God will certainly show that what you have done has been right!/
will God not show that what you have done has been right?► [RHQ] He will do this
for you whom he has chosen. He will do this for you who pray earnestly to him night
and day, asking him to help you. He may delay helping you. 8 But I tell you, some day
he will show that what you did was right, and he will do it quickly. But when I, the
one who came from heaven, return to earth, ◄there may not be many people who
will still be trusting that I will vindicate them (OR, who will still be trusting in me)./
will there be many people who will still be trusting that I will vindicate them (OR, who
will still be trusting in me)?► [RHQ]”
Jesus taught about not thinking that we are better than others in God’s sight.
Luke 18:9-14
9 Jesus also told a parable to warn people who mistakenly thought that they were
doing things that made them acceptable to God. Besides, they also despised other
people. 10 He said this: “Two men went up to the Temple in Jerusalem to pray. One
was a Pharisee. The other was a tax collector. 11 The Pharisee stood and prayed
silently, ‘God, I thank you that I am not like other men. Some extort money from
others; some treat others unjustly; some commit adultery. I do not do such things.
And I am certainly not like this tax collector who cheats people! 12 Our law says that
we(exc) should ◄fast/abstain from food► once a week, but I do more than that. I fast
twice a week! I give you ten percent of all that I earn!’ 13 But the tax collector stood
far from the other people in the Temple courtyard because he felt very unworthy. He
would not even look up toward heaven. Instead, he beat on his chest to show that
he was sorry for his sin. He said, ‘God, I am a sinner; be merciful to me and forgive
me!’ ” 14 Then Jesus said, “I tell you (pl) that as the tax collector went home, the record
of his sins was erased {God erased the record of his sins}, not that of the Pharisee.
Remember this: Those who exalt themselves will be humbled {God will humble all
those who exalt themselves}, but those who humble themselves will be exalted {he
will exalt those who humble themselves}.”
Jesus taught about accepting God’s rule in our lives as easily as little children do.
Luke 18:15-17
15 One day when many people were coming to Jesus, they were also bringing small
children. They wanted him to put his hands on the children and bless them. When
the disciples saw that, they rebuked those who were bringing those children. 16 But
Jesus called the children to come to him. He said to his disciples, “Let the children
come to me! Do not stop them! It is people who are humble and trusting like they
are who can experience God ruling their lives. 17 Note this: Those who do not trustLUKE 18:18
1496
LUKE 18:38
God and allow him to direct their lives, as children do, will not enter the [MET] place
where God rules.”
Jesus taught that rich people do not easily let God rule their lives.
Luke 18:18-30; Matthew 19:16-29; Mark 10:17-30
18 A Jewish leader asked Jesus, “Good teacher, what shall I do in order to have eternal
life?” 19 Jesus said to him, “Only God is good! No one else is good! ◄So you(sg) should
consider carefully what you are implying by calling me good!/Do you realize that you
are implying that I am God by calling me good?► [RHQ]
20 But to answer your question, you (sg) know the commandments that God gave
Moses. He commanded such things as ‘do not commit adultery, do not commit murder,
do not steal, do not testify falsely about what you have seen or heard, honor your father
and mother.’ ” 21 The man said, “I have obeyed all those commandments ever since
I was young. So ◄there must be something else I have not done./is that enough?►”
22 When Jesus heard him say that, he replied to him, “There is one thing that you (sg)
have not done yet. Sell all that you own. Then give the money to poor people. The
result will be that you will have spiritual riches in heaven. Then come and be my
disciple!” 23 The man became sad when he heard that, because he was very rich and
he did not want to give everything away. 24 Jesus looked at the man as he left, and
said, “It is very difficult for those who are wealthy to decide to let God rule [MET]
their lives. 25 You would say that it is impossible for a camel to go through the eye of
a needle. It is almost as difficult [HYP] for rich people to decide to let God rule their
lives.” 26 The Jews thought that God favored rich people, so they thought that if God did
not save rich people, he would not save others, either. So one of the disciples who heard
him say that replied, “If that is so, it seems that no one will be saved {that God will not
save anyone} [RHQ]!” 27 But Jesus said, “It is impossible for people to save themselves.
But God can save them, because God can do anything!” 28 Then Peter said, “You know
that we(exc) have left everything we had and have become your disciples [RHQ]. So
what about us? (OR, So will God accept/save us?”) 29 He said to them, “Keep this
in mind: Those who have left their homes, their wives, their brothers, their parents,
their children, or any other family members, to tell others about how God wants to
rule [MET] people’s lives, 30 will receive in this life many times as much as they left.
And in the future age they will ◄live eternally with God/ have eternal life►.”
Jesus again predicted his death and resurrection.
Luke 18:31-34; Matthew 20:17-19; Mark 10:32-34
31 Jesus took the twelve disciples to a place by themselves and said to them, “Listen
carefully! We (inc) are now going up to Jerusalem. While we are there, everything
that has been written by the prophets {that the prophets have written} about me, the
one who came from heaven, will be fulfilled {will occur}. 32 I will be put into the
hands of {My enemies will hand me over to} non-Jews. The non-Jews will make fun
of me and mistreat me and spit on me. 33 They will whip me, and then they will kill
me. But on the third day after that I will become alive again.” 34 But the disciples did
not understand any of those things that he said. They were prevented {Something
prevented them} from understanding the meaning of what he was telling them.
Jesus healed a blind man.
Luke 18:35-43
35 As Jesus and his disciples came near to Jericho city, a blind man was sitting beside
the road. He was begging for money. 36 When he heard the crowd of people passing
by, he asked someone, “What is happening?” 37 They told him, “Jesus, the man from
Nazareth town, is passing by.” 38 He shouted, “Jesus, you who are descended fromLUKE 18:39
1497
LUKE 19:20
King David, the Messiah, pity me!” 39 Those who were walking at the front of the
crowd scolded the man and told him to be quiet. But he shouted more loudly, “You
who are descended from King David, the Messiah, pity me!” 40 Jesus stopped and told
people to bring the man to him. When the blind man came near, Jesus asked him,
41 “What do you (sg) want me to do for you?” He replied, “Lord, enable me to see
again!” 42 Jesus said to him, “Then see! Because you have trusted [PRS] in me, I have
healed you!” 43 Immediately he was able to see! And he went with Jesus, praising
God. And when all the people who were going with Jesus saw it, they also praised
God.
19
Zacchaeus changed his way of life after talking with Jesus.
Luke 19:1-10
1 Jesus and his disciples entered Jericho and were going through the city. 2 There
was a man there named Zacchaeus. He was a chief tax collector, who was rich. 3 He
tried to see Jesus, but he was very short, and there was a big crowd of people near
Jesus. So he was not able to see him. 4 So he ran further ahead along the road that
Jesus was walking on. He climbed a sycamore-fig tree to see Jesus. 5 When Jesus got
there, he looked up and said to him, “Zacchaeus, come down quickly, because God
wants me to go with you(sg) to your house and stay there tonight”! 6 So he came
down quickly. He took Jesus to his house and welcomed him joyfully. 7 The people
who saw Jesus go there grumbled saying, “He has gone to be the guest of a man who
is a sinner!” 8 Then Zacchaeus stood up while they were eating and said to the Lord
Jesus, “Lord, I want you (sg) to know that I am going to give half of what I own to poor
people. And as for the people whom I have cheated, I will pay them back four times
the amount I have gotten from them by cheating.” 9 Jesus said to him, “Today God
has forgiven [PRS] you and the other people in [MTY] this house, because you (sg) also
have shown that you have trusted in God as your ancestor Abraham did. 10 Remember
this: I, the one who came from heaven, came to seek and save people like you(sg) who
have gone astray from God, just like a shepherd who searches for his lost sheep.”
Jesus taught about being willing to take risks in using what he has given us.
Luke 19:11-27; Matthew 25:14-30
11 They were coming near to Jerusalem, and the people who were going with Jesus
who heard him say these things thought that as soon as he got to Jerusalem he would
become their king. 12 So he told them this parable: “A prince prepared to go to a
distant country in order that the Emperor would make him a king. He intended to
return later. 13 Before he left, he summoned ten of his servants. He gave each of them
a coin worth three months’ wages. He said to them, ‘Do business with these coins
until I return!’ Then he left. 14 But many of his fellow-citizens hated him. So after
he left they sent some messengers to tell the Emperor, ‘We (exc) do not want this
man to be our king!’ 15 But the Emperor made him king anyway. Later the new king
returned. Then he commanded that the servants to whom he had given the coins
should be summoned {that someone should summon the servants to whom he had
given the coins}. He wanted to know how much they had gained by doing business
with the coins. 16 The first man came to him and said, ‘Sir, with your one coin I have
earned ten more coins!’ 17 He said to this man, ‘You are a good servant! You have
done very well! Because you have handled faithfully a small amount of money, I will
give you authority to rule ten cities.’ 18 Then the second servant came and said, ‘Sir,
with your one coin I have earned five more coins!’ 19 He said to that servant similarly,
‘Good! I will give you authority to rule five cities.’ 20 Then another servant came. HeLUKE 19:21
1498
LUKE 19:43
said, ‘Sir, here is your coin. I wrapped it in a napkin and put it away, so that nothing
would happen to it. 21 I did that because I was afraid of what you would do to me if
the business failed. I know you are a man who does not do foolish things with your
money. You even take from others money that does not really belong to you, like a
farmer who harvests grain from another man’s field where he did not even do the
planting.’ 22 The king said to that servant, ‘You wicked servant! I will condemn you
by the very words [MTY] that you have just now spoken. ◄You know that I do not do
foolish things with my money./Did you not know that I do not do foolish things with
my money?► [RHQ] You said that I even take from others money that does not really
belong to me, like a farmer who harvests grain from another man’s field where he did
not even do the planting. 23 So ◄you should at least have given my money to money
lenders!/why did you not at least give my money to bankers?► [RHQ] Then when I
returned I could have collected that amount plus the interest it would have earned!’
24 Then the king said to those who were standing near, ‘Take the coin from him and
give it to the servant who has ten coins!’ 25 They protested, ‘But Sir, he already has
ten coins!’ 26 But the king said, ‘I tell you this: To the people who use well what they
have received, more will be given {I will give more}. But from the people who do not
use well what they have received, even what they already have will be taken away {I
will take away even what they already have}. 27 Now, as for those enemies of mine
who did not want me to rule over them, bring them here and execute them while I
am watching!’ ”
Jesus entered Jerusalem humbly, but like a king.
Luke 19:28-40; Matthew 21:1-9; Mark 11:1-10; John 12:12-15
28 After Jesus said those things, he continued on the road up to Jerusalem, going
ahead of his disciples. 29 When they got near Bethphage and Bethany villages, near
the hill that is called {that they call} Olive Tree Hill, 30 he said to two of his disciples,
“Go to the village just ahead of you. As you two enter it, you will see a young animal
that no one has ever ridden, that has been {someone has} tied up. Untie it and bring
it to me. 31 If anyone asks you, ‘Why are you untying it?’ say to him, ‘The Lord needs
it.’ ” 32 So the two disciples went to the village and found the animal, just like he had
told them. 33 As they were untying it, its owners said to them, “Why are you two
untying that young animal?” 34 They replied, “The Lord needs it.” So the owners said
that they could take it. 35 The two disciples brought the animal to Jesus. They threw
their cloaks on the animal’s back for him to sit on and helped Jesus get on it. 36 Then
as he rode along, others spread their cloaks on the road to honor him. 37 As they came
near to Jerusalem, on the road that descends from Olive Tree Hill, the whole crowd of
his disciples began to rejoice and praise God loudly for all the great miracles that they
had seen Jesus do. 38 They were saying things like, “May the Lord God bless our king
who comes representing [MTY] him!” “May there be peace between God in heaven
and us his people!” “May everyone praise God!” 39 Some of the Pharisees who were
in the crowd said to Jesus, “Teacher, rebuke your disciples for saying things like that!”
40 He replied, “I tell you this: If these people would be silent, the stones themselves
would shout to praise me!”
Jesus prophesied that Jerusalem would be destroyed.
Luke 19:41-44
41 When Jesus came near to Jerusalem and saw the city, he cried about its people.
42 He said, “My disciples know what they need to do to have peace with God; I wish
that even today the rest of you people knew it. But now you are unable to know
[MTY] it. 43 I want you to know this: Soon your enemies will come and will set upLUKE 19:44
1499
LUKE 20:13
a barricade around your city. They will surround the city and attack it on all sides.
44 They will break through the walls and destroy everything. They will smash you and
your people/children. When they finish destroying everything, there will not be one
stone left on top of another. All this will happen because you did not recognize the
time when God sent his Messiah to save you!”
Jesus expelled the merchants from the Temple courtyard, and taught there.
Luke 19:45-48
45 Jesus entered Jerusalem and went into the Temple courtyard. He saw the people
who were selling things there, 46 and he began to chase them out. He said to them, “It
has been written {A prophet wrote} in the Scriptures that God said, ‘I want my house
to be a place where people pray’; but you bandits have made it a cave where you can
hide!”
47 Each day during that week Jesus was teaching people in the Temple courtyard.
The chief priests and the men who taught the Jewish laws and other Jewish leaders
tried to find a way to kill him. 48 But they did not find any way to do it, because all
the people there listened eagerly to him and would have resisted them if they had tried
to hurt him.
20
Jesus refused to answer a question about his authority.
Luke 20:1-8
1 One day during that week, Jesus was teaching the people in the Temple courtyard
and telling them God’s good message. As he was doing that, the chief priests, the
men who taught the Jewish laws, and other Jewish elders came to him. 2 They asked
him, “Tell us, by what authority are you doing these things? Who authorized you to
do things like you did here yesterday?” 3 He replied, “I will also ask you a question.
Tell me, 4 where did John the Baptizer get his authority to baptize those who came to
him? Did he get it from God [MTY/EUP] or from people?” 5 They discussed this among
themselves. They said, “If we(inc) say, ‘It was from God [MTY/EUP],’ he will say to
us, ‘Then ◄you should have believed John’s message!/why did you not believe what
John preached?► [RHQ]’ 6 But if we say, ‘It was from people,’ the people here will kill
us by throwing stones at us, because they all believe that John was a prophet from
God.” 7 So they replied, “We (exc) do not know where John got his authority.” 8 Then
Jesus said to them, “Because you did not answer my question, I will not tell you who
authorized me to do those things here yesterday.”
Jesus told a parable about how God would punish those who reject him.
Luke 20:9-18
9 Then Jesus told the people this parable to illustrate what God would do to the Jews
who rejected the former prophets and himself: “A certain man planted a vineyard. He
rented the vineyard to some men to care for it and to give him some of the grapes in
return. Then he went to another country and stayed there several years. 10 When
the vines started producing grapes, he sent a servant to the men who were taking
care of the vineyard. He expected that they would give him some of the grapes that
the vineyard had produced. But after the servant arrived, they beat him and they did
not give him any grapes. They just sent him away. 11 Later, the owner sent another
servant. But they beat him and mistreated him also. They sent him away without
giving him any grapes. 12 Still later, the owner sent another servant. That one they
wounded and threw him out of the vineyard. 13 So the owner of the vineyard thought
to himself, ‘◄I do not know what to do!/What shall I do?► [RHQ]’ Then he had an
idea. He thought to himself, ‘I will send my son, whom I love very much. Perhaps theyLUKE 20:14
1500
LUKE 20:29
will respect him and give him my share of the grapes.’ 14 So he sent his son, but when
the men who were caring for the vineyard saw him coming, they said to each other,
‘Here comes the man who will some day inherit the vineyard. Let’s kill him so that
this vineyard will be ours!’ 15 So they dragged him outside the vineyard and they
killed him. So ◄I will tell you what the owner of the vineyard will do to them!/do you
know what the owner of the vineyard will do to them?► [RHQ] 16 He will come and
kill those men who were taking care of the vineyard. Then he will arrange for other
people to take care of it.” When the people listening to Jesus heard that, they said,
“We would not do anything like those wicked men did!” 17 But Jesus looked directly
at them and said, “You can say that, but think about the meaning of these words that
are written {which a prophet wrote} [RHQ] in the Scriptures,
The men who were building a house rejected a certain stone. But others put that
same stone in its proper place, and it has become the most important stone in
the building [MET].
18 That stone represents me, the Messiah, and those who reject me are like people
who fall on this stone. Everyone who falls on this stone will be broken to pieces {This
stone will break to pieces everyone who falls on it}, and it will crush anyone on whom
it falls.”
Jesus foiled their attempts to trap him when they asked a question about paying
taxes.
Luke 20:19-26
19 The chief priests and the men who taught the Jewish laws realized that he was
accusing them when he told the parable about what those wicked men did. So they
immediately tried to find a way to seize [MTY] him, but they did not seize him, because
they were afraid of what the people there would do if they did that. 20 So they watched
him carefully. They also hired ◄spies/secret agents► who pretended to be sincere.
But they really wanted to get him to say something for which they could accuse him.
They wanted to be able to turn him over to the authority of the governor of the
province. But they also knew that the Jews were disgusted with having to pay taxes to
the government. 21 So one of them asked Jesus, “Teacher, we (exc) know that you (sg)
speak and teach what is right. You tell the truth even if important people do not like
it. You teach truthfully what God wants us to do. 22 So tell us what you think about
this matter: Is it right that we pay taxes to the Roman government [MTY], or not?”
23 But Jesus knew that they were trying to trick him to get him into trouble, either
with the Jews, who hated to pay those taxes, or with the Roman government. So he
said to them, 24 “Show me a Roman coin. Then tell me whose picture is on it. And tell
me whose name is on it.” They showed him a coin and said, “It has the picture and
name of Caesar, the head of the Roman government.” 25 He said to them, “In that case,
give to the government [MTY] what they require, and give to God what he requires.”
26 While the people were there, the spies were unable to find fault with him for what
he said. And they were amazed at his answer. So they said nothing.
Jesus foiled their attempt to trap him with a question about the resurrection.
Luke 20:27-40
27 Some Sadducees came to Jesus. They are a Jewish sect who do not believe that
people will become alive again after they die. 28 They wanted to ask Jesus a question
in order to discredit the idea that dead people will live again. One of them said to Jesus,
“Teacher, Moses wrote for us Jews about situations where a man who has a wife but
no children. If the man dies, his brother should marry the dead man’s widow so that
she can have a child by him. People will consider that the child is the descendant of the
man who died, and in that way the dead man will have descendants. 29 Well, there wereLUKE 20:30
1501
LUKE 20:47
seven brothers in one family. The oldest one married, but he and his wife did not bear
any children. Later he died. 30 The second brother followed this law and married the
widow, but the same thing happened to him. 31 Then the third brother married her, but
the same thing happened again. All seven brothers, one by one, married that woman,
but they had no children, and one by one they died. 32 Afterwards, the woman died,
too. 33 Therefore, if it is true that there will be a time when dead people will become
alive again, whose wife do you think that woman will be then? ◄Keep in mind that
she was married to all seven brothers!/It will be impossible to decide because she was
married to all seven brothers!► [RHQ]” 34 Jesus replied to them, “Men who live here
in this world take wives, or are given wives by their parents {their parents choose
wives for them}. 35 But the men whom God considers worthy of being in heaven after
they become alive again will not be married. 36 You need to know also that they
cannot die any more, because they will be immortal [SIM] like angels. The fact that
God has caused them to be alive again will show that they are God’s children. 37 But
as for people becoming alive again after they die, Moses wrote something about that.
In the place where he wrote about the burning bush, he mentions the Lord as being
the God whom Abraham worships and the God whom Isaac worships and the God
whom Jacob worships. 38 It is not dead people who worship God. It is living people
who worship him. Abraham, Isaac and Jacob died long before Moses lived, but God
said that they were still worshipping him, so we(inc) know their spirits were still alive!
All people whose spirits are alive again after they die continue to live to honor God!”
39 Some of the men who taught the Jewish laws replied, “Teacher, you (sg) have
answered very well!” 40 After that, they no longer dared to ask him any more
questions like that to try to trap him.
Jesus showed them that the Messiah must be greater than King David.
Luke 20:41-44; Matthew 22:41-45; Mark 12:35-37
41 Then Jesus said to them, “I will show you (OR, prove to you) that people are wrong
who say that the Messiah is merely a descendant of King David! [RHQ] 42 Because
David himself wrote about the Messiah in the book of Psalms,
God said to my Lord,
Sit here beside me on my right, where I will highly honor you(sg) [MTY]. 43 Sit here
while I completely defeat your enemies.
44 King David calls the Messiah ‘my Lord’! So ◄the Messiah cannot be just someone
descended from King David!/how can the Messiah be just someone descended from
King David?► [RHQ] What I just said proves that he is much greater than David, isn’t
that right?”
Jesus warned them not to show off like the teachers of the Jewish laws did.
Luke 20:45-47; Matthew 23:1-36; Mark 12:38-40
45 While all the other people were listening, Jesus said to his disciples, 46 “Beware
that you do not act like the men who teach our Jewish laws. They like to put on
long robes and walk around to make people think that they are very important. They
also like people to greet them respectfully in the marketplaces. They like to sit in the
most important places in the Jewish meeting places. At dinner parties they like to sit
in the seats where the most honored people sit. 47 They swindle [MET] the houses
and property of widows. Then they pretend they are good, as they pray long prayers
publicly. God will certainly punish them very severely.”LUKE 21:1
1502
LUKE 21:19
21
Jesus taught that God commends people who give to him sacrificially.
Luke 21:1-4
1 Jesus looked up from where he was sitting and saw rich people putting their gifts
into the offering boxes in the Temple courtyard. 2 He also saw a poor widow putting in
two small copper coins. 3-4 He said to his disciples, “The truth is that these rich people
have a lot of money, but they gave only a small part of it. But this woman, who is
very poor, has put in all the money that she had to pay for the things she needs! So
God considers that [HYP] this poor widow has put more money into the box than all
the others.”
Jesus warned about the terrible things that will happen before he returns.
Luke 21:5-19
5 Some of Jesus’ disciples talked about the Temple. They commented about the
beautiful stones used in building the Temple and the other decorations that people had
given, decorations that were on the walls. But he said, 6 “I want to tell you something
about these things that you are looking at. They will be destroyed {Foreign invaders
will destroy these buildings} completely. Every stone in these buildings will be thrown
down {They will throw down every stone in these buildings}. Not one stone will be
left {They will not leave one stone} on top of another.”
7 Later his disciples asked him, “Teacher, when will that happen? What will happen
to the temple to indicate that the things you(sg) just told us are about to happen?” 8 He
said, “All that I will say is, be sure that you are not deceived {that they do not deceive
you} about these things! Many people will come and say ◄that I sent them/that they
have my authority► [MTY]. They will say, ‘I am the Messiah!’ They will also say ‘It
is now the time when God will begin to rule!’ Do not follow them to become their
disciples 9 Also, whenever you hear about wars and riots, do not be terrified. Keep in
mind that God has said that those things must happen. But when they happen, it will
not mean that the world will end right away!”
10 Then he said to them, “Groups in various countries will fight each other,
and various governments will also fight against each other. 11 There will be big
earthquakes, and in various places there will be famines and plagues. People will
see things that will terrify them. There will also be unusual things happening in the
sky. 12 But before all these things happen, some of you will be persecuted and arrested
{people will persecute some of you and arrest you} [MTY]. Some of you will be put
{They will put some of you} on trial in the places where you gather to worship, and
you will be thrown into prison. You will be put on trial {They will put you on trial}
in front of high government authorities because you are my [MTY] disciples. 13 That
will be a time for you to tell them about me. 14 So determine within yourselves not to
be worrying before that happens what you will say to defend yourselves, 15 because
I will make you wise [HEN] so that you will know what to say. As a result, none of
your enemies will be able to oppose what you say or ◄refute you/show that you are
wrong►. 16 And there will also be other evil things that will happen: Even your parents
and brothers and other relatives and friends who do not believe in me will ◄betray
you/help your enemies to seize you►. They will kill some of you. 17 In general, most
people will [HYP] hate you because you believe in me [MTY]. 18 But your souls will be
absolutely safe [IDM]. 19 By enduring all these things people will do to you, you will
preserve your eternal life [SYN].”
Jesus predicted that Jerusalem would be destroyed.
Luke 21:20-24LUKE 21:20
1503
LUKE 21:38
20 “But when you see that Jerusalem has been surrounded by the armies of your
enemies, you will know that it is time for this city to be completely destroyed {them
to completely destroy this city}. 21 At that time those of you who are in Judea district
must flee to the higher hills. Those who are in this city must leave quickly. Those
who are in the nearby countryside must not go back into the city to get any of their
possessions before they flee. 22 You must obey what I tell you because, in order that all
the things that are written in the Scriptures will be fulfilled, God will very severely
punish the people who stay in this city. 23 I feel very sorry for women in this city who
will be pregnant, and women who will be nursing their babies in those days, because
it will be very difficult for them to run away! I feel sorry because the people in this
land will suffer greatly [MTY] when God punishes them. 24 Many of them will be killed
{Their enemies will kill many of them} with swords. Others will be captured and
taken {They will capture others and take them} to [HYP] other countries. Non-Jewish
people will trample over Jerusalem until the time that God has determined for them
to rule the city is ended.”
Jesus told about frightening things that will happen before he returns.
Luke 21:25-28
25 “There will also be strange things that will happen to the sun, the moon, and the
stars. In many nations, people will be very frightened, and they will be anxious when
they hear the ocean roaring and see huge waves. 26 People will faint because they will
be afraid as they wait for what will happen. They will be afraid because the powerful
objects in the sky will be shaken {shake}. 27 Then they will see me, the one who came
from heaven, coming in a cloud powerfully and very gloriously. 28 So when these
things that I have just now described begin to happen, stand up straight and be brave,
because it will be close to the time when God will free you from all suffering.”
Jesus taught them how to know when his return was near.
Luke 21:29-33
29 Then Jesus told his disciples this parable: “Think about the fig tree, and all the
other trees. 30 As soon as you see their leaves beginning to sprout, you know that
summer is near. 31 Similarly, when you see these things that I have just described
happening, you will know that it is almost time for God to truly rule as king. 32 Keep
this in mind: All the things that I have just now described will happen before all the
people who have observed the things that I have done have died. 33 You can be certain
that these things that I have told you about will happen. That they will happen is more
certain than that the earth and sky will continue to exist.”
Jesus taught how to be ready for his return.
Luke 21:34-38
34 “But be on guard. Do not be getting drunk with carousing or let yourselves be
distracted by worries concerning your lives [SYN] {or let worries concerning your lives
[SYN] distract you}. If you do wrong things like those, you may be suddenly surprised
by my return [MTY], like a trap suddenly catches an animal in it. 35 You need to know
that my return will surprise everyone all over the earth. 36 So be ready at all times.
Pray that you will be able to endure without being afraid of all these difficult things
that will happen, so that you will then stand confidently before me, the one who came
from heaven.”
37 Each day during that week Jesus taught the people in the Temple courtyard in
Jerusalem. But at night he and his disciples left the city and stayed on Olive Tree Hill.
38 Early each morning many people came to the Temple courtyard to listen to him.LUKE 22:1
1504
LUKE 22:23
22
Judas agreed to put Jesus into his enemies’ hands.
Luke 22:1-6
1 It was now almost time to celebrate the festival of Unleavened Bread, which began
with the Passover festival. 2 The chief priests and the men who taught the Jewish laws
were seeking a way to kill Jesus. But they wanted to do it secretly, because they were
afraid that if they did not do it secretly, the people might riot.
3 Then even though Judas, who was called the man from Kerioth village, was one of
the twelve disciples, Satan entered him. 4 Judas went and conferred with the chief
priests and the officers of the Temple guards. He discussed with them how he could
enable them to seize Jesus. 5 They were pleased that he wanted to do that. They
offered to give him money for doing it. 6 So he agreed, and they gave him the money.
Then he tried to find an opportunity to enable them to seize Jesus when there was
no crowd around him.
Jesus arranged for his disciples to prepare the Passover meal.
Luke 22:7-13
7 Then the day during the first part of the week-long festival of Unleavened Bread
came, the day when the lambs for the Passover celebration had to be killed. 8 So
Jesus said to Peter and John, “Go and prepare the meal for the Passover celebration.”
9 They replied to him, “Where do you (sg) want us to prepare it?” 10 He said to the
two of them, “Listen carefully. When you two enter the city, a man who is carrying
a large jar of water will meet you. Follow him. When he enters a house, 11 tell the
owner of the house, ‘Our teacher says that we(exc) should ask you(sg) to please show
us the room that he arranged with you where he can eat the Passover meal with us,
his disciples [RHQ].’ 12 He will show you a large room that is on the upper floor of the
house. It will be all set up for a meal. Prepare the meal for us there.” 13 So the two
disciples went into the city. They found everything to be just like Jesus had told them.
So they prepared the meal for the Passover celebration there.
Jesus told his disciples how they should remember his death for them.
Luke 22:14-23
14 When it was time [MTY] to eat the Passover meal, Jesus came and sat down with
the twelve apostles. 15 He said to them, “I have greatly desired to eat this Passover
meal with you before I suffer and die. 16 I want you to know that I will not eat the
Passover meal again until all those whose lives God rules completely realize what it
represents.” 17 Then he took a cup of wine and thanked God for it. Then he said, “Take
this, and each of you drink some of it. 18 I want you to know that from now on I will
not drink wine until God makes me king.” 19 Then he took some bread and thanked
God for it. He broke it into pieces and gave it to them to eat. He said, “This bread
represents my body, which I am about to sacrifice for you. Keep on eating bread this
way regularly to remember what I have done for you.” 20 Similarly, after they had
eaten the meal, he took another cup of wine. He said, “The wine in [MTY] this cup
represents my blood, which will soon flow from my body when I die. With this blood
I will sign the new agreement that God is making with you. 21 But note that the one
[SYN] who will enable my enemies to seize me is eating right here with me! 22 It is
certain that I, the one who came from heaven, will die, because that is what God has
planned. But there will be terrible punishment for the man who will ◄betray me/
enable my enemies to seize me►!” 23 Then they began to ask one another, “Which of
us would do such a thing?”LUKE 22:24
1505
LUKE 22:42
Jesus taught the apostles that they should imitate him by serving each other humbly.
Luke 22:24-30
24 The apostles began to argue among themselves, saying, “Which one of us will be
the greatest when Jesus becomes king?” 25 So Jesus said to them, “The kings of the
non-Jews enjoy showing that they are powerful. Yet they give themselves the title,
‘ones who help the people.’ 26 But you should not be like them! Instead, those who
want God to consider them the greatest should act as though they were the youngest,
since the youngest are expected to serve the older ones. Whoever is a leader should be
one who serves the others. 27 Keep in mind who is the most important one [RHQ]. It
is certainly the one who just sits at the table, not [RHQ] those who serve the meal. But
I, your leader, have been an example for you by serving you while I have been among
you.
28 You are the ones who have stayed with me during all my troubles. 29 So now, just
like my Father has appointed me to rule as a king, I am appointing you 30 so that you
can sit and eat and rule [MET] with me when I become king. You will sit on thrones
to judge the people of the twelve tribes of Israel.”
Jesus predicted that Peter would say that he did not know Jesus.
Luke 22:31-34
31 “Simon, Simon, listen! Satan has asked God to let him test you, and God has
permitted him to do it. Satan wants to cause you to suffer distress (OR, distress you) so
that you will not believe/trust in me any more/longer. He wants to shake you, just like
a man shakes wheat in a sieve to sift it [MET]. 32 But I have prayed for you, Simon,
that you will not completely stop believing in me. So when you (sg) restore your
relationship with me, help your fellow apostles to trust in me more!” 33 Peter said to
him, “Lord, I am ready to go with you (sg) if they put you in prison, or even to die
with you!” 34 Jesus replied, “Peter, I want you (sg) to know that tonight, before the
rooster crows, you will say three times that you do not know me!”
Jesus warned his disciples that they would soon face opposition.
Luke 22:35-38
35 Then Jesus asked all of them, “After I sent you out to other villages, and you
went without taking any money or a traveling bag or extra sandals, you did not
lack anything, did you?” They replied, “That’s right, we(exc) did not lack anything.”
36 Then, to show them that now many people would oppose them, (OR, to show them
that they needed to be prepared to protect themselves,) he said to them, “Now things
will be different. So whoever among you has some money should take it with him.
Likewise, he should take a carrying bag. Whoever does not have a sword should sell
his coat and buy a sword. 37 Because, I now tell you, something must happen to me to
fulfill these words that a prophet wrote: ‘He was treated {They treated him} as though
he were a criminal.’ Do not forget that everything that is {that they have} written
about me in the Scriptures must be fulfilled.” 38 One of the disciples said, “Lord, look!
We (exc) have two swords!” Realizing that they did not understand the meaning of
what he said, he replied to them, “That is enough talk about swords”!
Luke 22:39-46
39 As Jesus left the city, he went, as he usually did, to Olive Tree Hill. His disciples
went with him. 40 When he came to the place where he often spent the night, he said to
them, “Pray that God will help you whenever something tempts you.” 41 Then he went
from them a distance of about 30 meters/yards. (OR, as far as someone can throw a
stone.) He knelt and prayed, 42 “My Father, if you are willing to do it, force me to have
to undergo these terrible things that are about to happen to me [MTY]. But do not doLUKE 22:43
1506
LUKE 22:64
what I want. Instead, do what you want.” 43 Then an angel from heaven appeared to
Jesus and caused him to become stronger. 44 He was greatly distressed. So he prayed
more earnestly. His sweat fell down on the ground as though it was large drops of
blood. 45 When he got up from praying, he returned to his disciples. He found that
they were sleeping. They were exhausted because they were very sorrowful. 46 He
woke them and said to them, “◄I am disappointed that you are sleeping!/Why are
you sleeping?► [RHQ] Get up! Pray that God will help you whenever you are tempted
{when something like this tempts you}!”
Jesus’ enemies captured him.
Luke 22:47-53
47 While Jesus was still speaking, a crowd came to him. Judas, even though he was
one of the twelve disciples, was leading them. He came close to Jesus and kissed him
on the cheek as if to greet him, but was really a signal to those with him which one
was Jesus. 48 Jesus said to him, “Judas, ◄I am disappointed that it is by kissing me
that you are enabling my enemies to seize me, the one who came from heaven!/is it
by kissing me as though you loved me that you are enabling my enemies to seize me,
the one who came from heaven?► [RHQ]” 49 When the disciples who were around
Jesus realized what was going to happen, they said, “Lord, shall we (exc) strike them
with our swords?” 50 One of his disciplesdrew his sword and struck the servant of the
high priest to kill him, but only cut off his right ear. 51 But Jesus said, “Do not do any
more of that!” He touched the servant’s ear and healed him. 52-53 Then Jesus said
to the chief priests, the officers of the Temple guards, and the Jewish elders who had
come to seize him, “◄It is ridiculous that you have come here with swords and clubs
to capture [MTY] me, as if I were a bandit!/Why have you come here with swords and
clubs to capture [MTY] me, as if I were a bandit?► [RHQ] Day after day I was with
you in the Temple courtyard, and you did not seize me! But this is the time [MTY]
when God is allowing you to do what you want. It is also the time [MTY] when God is
allowing Satan, who rules [MTY] in the darkness, to do what he wants.”
Peter said three times that he did not know Jesus.
Luke 22:54-62
54 They seized Jesus and led him away. They brought him to the high priest’s house.
Peter followed them at a distance. 55 They kindled a fire in the middle of the courtyard
and sat down together. Peter sat among them. 56 As the light from the fire shone on his
face, a female servant saw him and looked intently at him. She said, “This man was
also with the man whom they have arrested!” 57 But Peter denied it, saying, “Woman,
I do not know him!” 58 A little later someone else saw Peter and said, “You (sg) also
are one of those who were with the man they arrested!” But Peter said, “Man, I am
not one of them!” 59 About an hour later someone else said emphatically about Peter,
“The way that this man speaks shows that he is from Galilee district. Certainly this
man was also with the man whom they arrested, who is from Galilee!” 60 But Peter
said, “Man, I do not know what you (sg) are talking about!” Immediately, while he
was still speaking, a rooster crowed. 61 The Lord Jesus turned around and looked
right at Peter. Then Peter remembered what the Lord had said to him, “This night,
before the rooster crows, you (sg) will deny three times that you know me.” 62 And
Peter went out of the courtyard and cried very sorrowfully.
The soldiers made fun of Jesus.
Luke 22:63-65
63 The men who were guarding Jesus made fun of him and beat him. 64 They put
a blindfold on him and beat him again. Then they said to him, “Because you(sg) sayLUKE 22:65
1507
LUKE 23:15
[IRO] that you are a prophet, prove it by telling us who it was that struck you!” 65 They
said many other evil things about him, insulting him.
The Jewish leaders asked Jesus about his identity.
Luke 22:66-71
66 At dawn the next morning, many of the Jewish leaders gathered together. The
group included the chief priests and the men who taught the Jewish laws. They took
Jesus to the Jewish Council. There the men of the Council said to him, 67 “If you (sg)
are the Messiah, tell us!” But he replied, “If I tell you that, you will not believe me.
68 If I ask you what you think about the Messiah, you will not answer me. 69 But some
day you will see me, the one who came from heaven, sitting next to almighty God
and ruling [MTY]!” 70 Then they all said, “If that is so, are you(sg) saying that you are
◄the Son of God/the Man who is also God►?” He said to them, “Yes, it is just like you
say [MTY].” 71 Then they said to each other, “◄We (inc) certainly do not need anyone
else to testify against him!/Why should we ask for any more people to testify against
him?► [RHQ]” We ourselves have heard him say [MTY] that he is equal with God!
23
Jesus was accused before Pilate, the Roman governor.
Luke 23:1-5
1 Then the whole group got up and took Jesus to Pilate, the Roman governor. 2 They
began to accuse Jesus, saying, “We (exc) have determined that this fellow has caused
political trouble in our country. He has been telling people that they should not pay
taxes to the Roman government [MTY]. Also, he says that he is the Messiah, a king!”
3 Pilate asked him, “Do you (sg) claim that you are the King of the Jews?” He replied,
“It is as you have just now said.” 4 Pilate said to the chief priests and the rest of
the crowd, “I do not conclude that this man is guilty of any crime.” 5 But they kept
insisting, “He is inciting the people to riot! He has been teaching his ideas throughout
all of Judea district. He started doing it in Galilee district and now he is doing it here!”
After Pilate sent Jesus to Herod, Jesus refused to answer Herod’s questions.
Luke 23:6-12
6 When Pilate heard that, he asked, “Is this man from Galilee district?” 7 When
they told him that Jesus was from Galilee, which was the district that Herod Antipas
ruled, he told them to take Jesus to Herod Antipas, because Herod was in Jerusalem
at that time. 8 So they did. When Herod saw Jesus, he was very happy. He had heard
about Jesus, and he had been hoping for a long time that he could see Jesus perform
a miracle. 9 So he asked Jesus many questions, but Jesus did not reply to any of them.
10 The chief priests and men who taught the Jewish laws stood near Jesus, accusing
him very strongly. 11 Then Herod and his soldiers ◄made fun of/ridiculed► Jesus.
They put gorgeous clothes on him to mock him as being a king. Then Herod sent him
back to Pilate. 12 Until that time Herod and Pilate had been very hostile to each other,
but that very day they became friends.
Pilate was unsuccessful in his efforts to set Jesus free.
Luke 23:13-25
13 Pilate then gathered together the chief priests and other Jewish leaders and the
crowd that was still there. 14 He said to them, “You brought this man to me, saying that
he had caused trouble among the people. But I want you to know that after having
examined him while you were listening, I do not conclude that he is guilty of any of
the things that you are accusing him about. 15 Obviously Herod did not conclude that
either, because he sent him back to me without punishing him. So it is clear that thisLUKE 23:16-17
1508
LUKE 23:36
man has not done anything for which we (inc) should kill him. 16-17 So I will have my
soldiers flog him and then release him.”* 18 But the whole crowd shouted, “Execute
this man! Release Barrabas for us (exc)!” 19 Barrabas was a man who had tried to
persuade people in the city to rebel against the Roman government. While doing that,
he had murdered someone. So he had been put {they had put him} in prison, where
he was waiting to be executed. 20 Because Pilate wanted to release Jesus, he tried to
persuade the crowd again. 21 But they kept shouting, “Command your soldiers to kill
him by nailing him to a cross!/Have him crucified!” 22 He spoke to them a third time
and asked them, “Why? What crime has he committed? I have concluded that he has
done nothing for which he deserves to die. So I will have my soldiers flog him and
then release him.” 23 But they kept insisting. They shouted loudly that Jesus should be
nailed {that Pilate should have his soldiers nail Jesus} to a cross. Finally, because they
continued to shout [PRS] so loudly, 24 Pilate decided to do what the crowd requested.
25 The man who had been {whom they had} put in prison because he had rebelled
against the government and who had murdered someone, he released! That was the
man whom the crowd had asked him to release. He handed Jesus over to the soldiers,
to do what the crowd wanted.
The soldiers nailed Jesus to a cross.
Luke 23:26-31
26 As the soldiers were taking Jesus away, they seized a man named Simon, who was
from Cyrene city in Africa. He was returning to Jerusalem from out in the countryside.
They took from Jesus the cross that he had been carrying. Then they put it on Simon’s
shoulders, and told him to carry it behind Jesus. 27 A large crowd followed Jesus.
The crowd included many women who were beating their breasts to show how sad
they were, and wailing for him. 28 But Jesus turned to them and said, “You women
of Jerusalem, do not cry for me! Instead, cry because of what is going to happen to
yourselves and your children! 29 I want you to know that there will soon be a time
when people will say, ‘Women [SYN] who have never borne children or nursed babies
are fortunate!’ 30 Then, in order that they will not have to suffer greatly when their
enemies destroy this city, people who are left in the city will say to the mountains, ‘Fall
down on us!’ And people will say to the hills, ‘Cover us!’ 31 I am innocent [MET]. I am
like a living tree that people do not try to burn. But the people of Jerusalem deserve
that their enemies punish them. They are like dry wood that is ready to burn. So if
they nail me to the cross, ◄their enemies will certainly do much worse things to them!/
what worse things will happen to them?► [RHQ]”
The things that happened when Jesus died.
Luke 23:32-49
32 Two other men who were criminals were also being led away {The soldiers also
led away two other men who were criminals}. They were going to be executed {The
soldiers were going to execute them} with Jesus. 33 When they came to the place
which is called ‘The Skull’, they nailed Jesus to a cross after removing his clothes.
They did the same thing to the two criminals. They crucified one at the right side
of Jesus and one at his left side. 34 Jesus prayed, “My Father, forgive them, because
they do not realize whom they are doing this to!” Then the soldiers divided Jesus’
clothing by gambling with something like dice, to decide which piece of clothing each
one would get. 35 Many people stood nearby, watching. And the Jewish leaders ◄made
fun of/ridiculed► Jesus, saying, “He said [IRO] that he saved other people! If he is
the Messiah, the one God has chosen, he should save himself!” 36 The soldiers also
* 23:16-17 Pilate had to release one prisoner for the people during the Passover festival each year.LUKE 23:37
1509
LUKE 23:56
ridiculed him because he claimed to be a king. They came up to him and offered
him some sour wine. 37 They said to him, “If you (sg) are the King of the Jews, save
yourself!” 38 They also fastened on the cross a sign that stated why they were nailing
him to the cross. But all it said was, ‘This is the King of the Jews’.
39 One of the criminals who was hanging on a cross began to insult Jesus, saying,
“You (sg) said that you are the Messiah, so you must be powerful! So save yourself,
and save us, too!” 40 But the other criminal rebuked him, saying, “◄You (sg) should
be afraid of God punishing you!/Are you not afraid of God punishing you?► [RHQ]
They are punishing him and us similarly. 41 They have justly decided that we (inc)
two must die. They are punishing us as we deserve for the evil things that we did. But
this man has done nothing wrong!” 42 Then he said, “Jesus, please remember me and
take care of me when you become king!” 43 Jesus replied, “I want you (sg) to know
that today you (sg) will be with me in the place where everyone is happy!” (OR, that
today you will be with me in Paradise!)
44 Then it was about noontime. It became dark over the whole land, and it stayed
dark until three o’clock in the afternoon. 45 There was no light from the sun. Then
the thick curtain that closed off the most holy place in the Temple split into two pieces.
That signified that ordinary people could now go into the presence of God. 46 As that
happened, Jesus shouted loudly, “Father, I put my spirit into your care [MTY]!” When
he said that, he [EUP] died.
47 When the officer who supervised the soldiers who were executing Jesus saw what
happened, he praised God for the way Jesus died, saying, “I am sure that this man
had done nothing wrong!” 48 When the crowd of people who had gathered to see
those events saw what happened, they returned to their homes, beating their chests
to show that they were sorrowful. 49 All of Jesus’ friends, including the women who
had come with him from Galilee district, stood at a distance and saw everything that
happened.
Joseph and others buried Jesus while some women watched.
Luke 23:50-56
50 There was a man named Joseph who came there. He was from the town of
Arimathea in Judea. He was a good and a righteous man, and he was a member
of the Jewish Council. 51 But he had not agreed with the other Council members
when they decided to kill Jesus and when they planned how to do it. He was waiting
expectantly for the time when God would send his king to begin to rule. 52 He went
to Pilate and asked Pilate to permit him to take Jesus’ body and bury it. After Pilate
allowed him to do that, 53 he and some others took Jesus’ body down from the cross.
They wrapped it in a linen cloth. Then they put his body in a tomb that he had hired
others to dig out of a rock cliff. No one had ever put a body in it before. 54 They
had to do it quickly because that was Friday, the day when people prepared things for
the Jewish day of rest. ◄The Sabbath/The day of rest► was about to start at sunset, so
they had to finish burying Jesus’ body before sunset. 55 The women who had come with
Jesus from Galilee district followed Joseph and the men who were with him. They saw
the tomb, and they saw how the men laid Jesus’ body inside it, and saw the men roll a
huge stone across the entrance. 56 Then the women returned to the houses where they
were staying. That evening they prepared spices and ointments to put on Jesus’ body,
but ◄on the Sabbath/on the Jewish rest day► they rested, according to what Moses
had commanded.LUKE 24:1
1510
LUKE 24:25
24
Some women discovered that Jesus had become alive again.
Luke 24:1-12
1 Before dawn on Sunday those women went to the tomb. They took with them the
spices that they had prepared to put on Jesus’ body. 2 They discovered that the stone
had been rolled away from the entrance to the tomb. 3 They went in the tomb, but the
body of the Lord Jesus was not there! 4 They did not know what to think about that.
Then suddenly two men wearing bright shining clothes stood by them! 5 The women
were frightened. As they prostrated themselves on the ground, the two men said to
them, “◄You should not be seeking someone who is alive in a place where they bury
dead people!/Why are you seeking in a place where they bury dead people someone
who is alive?► [RHQ] 6 He is not here; he has ◄become alive again/risen from the
dead►! Remember that while he was still with you in Galilee district he said to you,
7 ‘Even though I am the one who came from heaven, someone will enable sinful men
to seize [MTY] me. They will kill me by nailing me to a cross. But on the third day
after that, I will become alive again.’ ” 8 The women remembered that he had said
that. 9 So they left the tomb and went to the eleven apostles and his other disciples
and told them those things. 10 The ones who kept telling those things to the apostles
were Mary from Magdala village, Joanna, Mary who was the mother of James, and the
other women who were with them. 11 But the apostles thought that what the women
said was nonsense. They did not believe what the women said. 12 But Peter got up
and ran to the tomb anyway. He stooped down and looked inside. He saw the linen
cloths in which Jesus’ body had been wrapped. The cloths were by themselves (OR, He
did not see anything else). So, wondering what had happened, he went home.
Jesus appeared to two disciples as they were walking to Emmaus.
Luke 24:13-35
13 That same day two of Jesus’ disciples were walking to a village named Emmaus.
It was about ◄seven miles/eleven kilometers► from Jerusalem. 14 They were talking
with each other about all the things that had happened to Jesus. 15 While they were
discussing those things, Jesus himself approached them and started walking with
them. 16 But they were prevented {something prevented them} from recognizing
[MTY] him. 17 Jesus said to them, “What have you two been talking about while you
were walking?” They stopped, and their faces looked very sad. 18 One of them, whose
name was Cleopas, said, “◄You (sg) must be the only person who is visiting Jerusalem
for the Passover festival who does not know the events that have happened there in
recent days!/Are you the only person who is visiting Jerusalem for the Passover festival
who does not know the events that have happened there in recent days?► [RHQ]”
19 He said to them, “What events?” They replied, “The things that happened to Jesus,
the man from Nazareth, who was a prophet. Many people saw him perform great
miracles, and God enabled him to teach wonderful messages! 20 But our chief priests
and leaders handed him over to the Roman authorities. The authorities sentenced him
to die, and they killed him by nailing him to a cross. 21 We (exc) were hoping that
he was the one who would free us Israelites from our enemies But this does not seem
possible now, because three days have already passed since that happened. 22 On the
other hand, some women from our group amazed us. Early this morning they went
to the tomb, 23 but Jesus’ body was not there! They came back and said that they
had seen some angels in a vision. The angels said that he was alive! 24 Then some of
those who were with us went to the tomb. They saw that things were exactly as the
women had reported. But they did not see Jesus.” 25 He said to them, “You two foolishLUKE 24:26
1511
LUKE 24:49
men! You are so slow to believe all that the prophets have written about the Messiah!
26 ◄You should certainly have known that it was necessary that the Messiah should
suffer all those things and die, and then enter his glorious home in heaven!/Was it not
necessary that the Messiah should suffer all those things and die, and then enter his
glorious home in heaven?► [RHQ]” 27 Then he explained to them all the things that
the prophets had written in the Scriptures about himself. He started with what Moses
[MTY] wrote and then explained to them what all the other prophets wrote.
28 They came near to the village to which the two men were going. Jesus indicated
that he would go further, 29 but they urged him to not do that. They said, “Stay with
us tonight, because it is late in the afternoon and it will soon be dark.” So he went
in the house to stay with them. 30 When they sat down to eat, he took some bread
and asked God to bless it. He broke it and gave some pieces to them. 31 And just then
God enabled them to recognize [MTY] him. But immediately he disappeared! 32 The
two men said to each other, “While we were walking along the road and he talked
with us and enabled us (inc) to understand the Scriptures, we became so excited that
it was as though [MET] a fire was burning within us [RHQ]! We should not stay here;
we should go tell the others what happened!” 33 So they left immediately and returned
to Jerusalem. There they found the eleven apostles and others who had gathered
together with them 34 who told those two men, “It is true that the Lord has become
alive again, and he has appeared to Peter!” 35 Then those two men told the others
what had happened as they were walking along the road. They also told them how
they both recognized Jesus as he broke some bread for them.
Jesus appeared to many of his disciples and taught them more and gave them other
instructions.
Luke 24:36-49
36 As they were saying that, Jesus himself suddenly appeared among them. He said
to them, “May God give you inner peace!” 37 They were startled and afraid, because
they thought that they were seeing a ghost! 38 He said to them, “◄You should not be
alarmed!/Why are you alarmed?► [RHQ] And ◄you should not be doubting that I am
alive/Jesus!/why are you doubting that I am alive/Jesus?► [RHQ] 39 Look at the wounds
in my hands and my feet! You can touch me and see my body. Then you can see that
it is really I myself. You can tell that I am really alive because ghosts do not have
bodies, as you see that I have!” 40 After he said that, he showed them the wounds in
his hands and his feet. 41 They were joyful and amazed, but they still did not believe
that he was really alive (OR, that Jesus was the one that they were seeing). So he said
to them, “Do you have anything here to eat?” 42 So they gave him a piece of broiled
fish. 43 While they were watching, he took it and ate it.
44 Then he said to them, “I will repeat what I told you while I was still with you:
Everything that was written about me by Moses and the other prophets [MTY] and in
the Psalms must be fulfilled!” 45 Then he enabled them to understand the things that
had been written about him in the Scriptures. 46 He said to them, “This is what they
wrote: That the Messiah would suffer and die, but on the third day after that he would
become alive again. 47 They also wrote that the message must be preached {that his
disciples must preach the message} everywhere that people must turn from their sinful
ways for God to forgive their sins. They wrote that his followers should preach that
message, claiming his authority [MTY]. They wrote that they should start preaching it
in Jerusalem, and then go and preach it to all ethnic groups. 48 You apostles must tell
people that you know that those things that happened to me are true. 49 And I want
you to know that I will send the Holy Spirit [MTY] to you, as my Father promised thatLUKE 24:50
1512
LUKE 24:53
he would do. But you must stay in this city until God fills you with the power of his
Spirit.”
Jesus left his disciples and returned to heaven.
Luke 24:50-53
50 Then Jesus led them outside the city until they came near Bethany village. There
he lifted up his hands and blessed them. 51 As he was doing that, he left them and
went up to heaven. 52 They worshipped him. And then they returned to Jerusalem
very joyfully. 53 Each day [SYN] they went into the Temple courtyard, and spent a lot
of time praising God.JOHN 1:1
1513
JOHN 1:16
This book is the Gospel that John wrote. We call this book
John
John 1:1-18
This book is about Jesus, who was eternally with God but also became a human
being to reveal God to mankind.
1 The one who expresses [MET] ◄God’s character/what God is like► has always
existed ◄from the beginning [MTY] of everything/before everything began►. He has
always existed with God, and he has God’s nature. 2 He always existed with God before
he began [MTY] to create anything. 3 He is the one by whom God caused everything
to exist. He is the one who created absolutely everything [LIT]. 4 He is the one who
caused everything to live. He, who caused us people to live, revealed to us the truth
about God as a light [MET] reveals what is in the darkness. 5 People do not want him to
reveal that what they do is evil [MET], just like darkness is evil. But just like darkness
cannot put out light [MET], evil people have never prevented the one who was like a
light from revealing God’s truth (OR, evil people have never understood the one who
was like a light.)
6 A man whose name was John was sent by God {God sent a man whose name was
John}. 7 He came to tell people about the one who was like [MET] a light. He came
to show that everything that the one who was like a light [MET] said was true, in
order that he could enable all people to believe in the one who was like a light. 8 John
himself was not the one who was like a light [MET]. Instead, he came to tell others
about that one who was like a light. 9 While John was doing that, the one who was
truly like a light was about to show himself to the world. He was the one who enables
all people to know about God, as a light [MET] enables people to know what is in the
darkness.
10 Although the one who was like a light was here on the earth, and although he
was the one whom God caused to create everything, most people [MTY, HYP] did
not realize who he was. (OR, although he was the one whom God caused to create
everything, most people did not accept him.) 11 Although he came to the land that
belonged to him because he created it, most of his own people, the Jews, rejected him
(OR, did not accept him). 12 But those of us who welcomed him, God authorized that
we would have a relationship with him [MET] like children have a relationship with
their father. We were people who believed that what he said about himself [MTY]
was true. 13 We became like God’s children, not because our ancestors belonged to
God, or because of someone’s sexual desires, nor because some man desired to have
children like himself. Instead, we were caused by God {God caused us} to become
like his children.
14 The one who expresses [MET] ◄God’s character/what God is like► became a
human being, and he lived among us for a while. As a result, we saw how wonderful
he is. He came from God his father, and there was no other person as wonderful as
he. He was wonderful because he always acted ◄kindly toward us/in ways we did
not deserve►, and he always spoke truthfully to us about God.
15 One day when John was telling people about him, he saw Jesus. Then he shouted
to them, “I told you previously that someone will come later who is more important
than I am, since he existed long before me. This is the man I was talking about!”
16 We have all benefited very much from what he has done. Again and again, he hasJOHN 1:17
1514
JOHN 1:33
acted in kind way toward us in ways we did not deserve. 17 Moses proclaimed God’s
laws to our ancestors. But what Jesus Christ did for us was much better. He acted
in kindness toward us in ways we did not deserve and told us the truth about God.
18 No one has ever seen God. But God’s only Son, Jesus, who has always had a very
close relationship with God, has told us about God.
When religious authorities asked John about his identity, he said he was preparing
people for the coming of the Messiah, who was much more important than himself.
John 1:19-28
19 The Jewish leaders [SYN] in Jerusalem city sent some Jewish priests and ◄Levites/
men who worked in the temple► to where John was, to ask him some questions. They
said to him, “What do you claim about yourself?” 20 So John told them the truth, and
he told them clearly [DOU]. He said, “I am not ◄the Messiah/God’s chosen king►!”
21 Then they asked him, “Then what do you say about yourself? Are you the prophet
Elijah that was prophesied to return {◄someone/another prophet► prophesied would
return} before the Messiah?” He replied, “No, I am not.” Then they asked him, “Are
you the prophet like Moses that ◄we are waiting for/God promised to send►?” He
replied, “No.” 22 So they asked him, “Then who do you claim to be? Tell us so that
we can go back and report to those who sent us. What do you say about yourself?”
23 John replied, “I am the one the prophet Isaiah said would proclaim this new message
loudly to the people who would pass by in this desolate area: ‘Prepare yourselves to
receive the Lord when he comes [MET], just like people prepare a road for an important
official.
24 Some of those people who were questioning John were ones who had been sent
by the Pharisee religious group {whom the Pharisee religious group had sent}. 25 They
asked John, “Since you say you are not the Messiah, nor the prophet Elijah, nor
the prophet like Moses, what authority do you have? Furthermore, why are you
baptizing Jews, treating them as though they were non-Jews who wanted to become
Jews?” 26 John replied, “I am just baptizing people with water to prepare them to
welcome the Messiah. But right now someone is among you whom you people do
not know. 27 He will preach to you after I am gone. He is so important that I am not
worthy to serve him as a slave [MET] by untying his sandals.”
28 Those things happened at a place called Bethany, on the east side of the Jordan
River, where John was baptizing people.
John the Baptizer announced that Jesus was the one who would become a sacrifice
to remove guilt for sin, and how God had confirmed that Jesus was the Son of God.
John 1:29-34
29 The next day John saw Jesus coming toward him. He said to the people, “Look!
Here is the man whom God has appointed to be a sacrifice [MET], like the lambs that the
people of Israel sacrificed! By sacrificing himself he will make it possible for everyone in
the world to be no longer guilty for having sinned. 30 He is the one about whom I said
before, ‘Someone will come later who is more important than I am, since he existed
long before me.’ 31 I myself did not previously recognize that he was the Messiah. But
now I know who he is, and I have baptized people with water to enable you people of
Israel to recognize who he is.”
32 John spoke clearly what God had shown him about Jesus. He said, “I saw God’s
Spirit as he was descending from heaven in the form of a dove. The Spirit remained
on Jesus. 33 I myself did not know previously that he was the Messiah. However, God
sent me to baptize people with water, people who said they wanted to turn from their
sinful ways. While I was doing that, God told me, ‘The man on whom you will see myJOHN 1:34
1515
JOHN 1:51
Spirit descend and remain is the one who will put the Holy Spirit within you (pl) to
truly change your lives.’ 34 I saw the Spirit descend on him, and I tell you that he is
◄the Son of God/the person who is both God and man►.”
After John declared again that Jesus would be a sacrifice to remove guilt for sin, four
men decided to become Jesus’ disciples.
John 1:35-42
35 The next day John was at the same place again ◄with two of us/with two of
his disciples►. 36 When he saw Jesus passing by, he said, “Look! There is the man
God has appointed to be a sacrifice, like the lambs [MET] the people of Israel have
sacrificed!” 37 ◄When we/those two disciples► heard John say this, we/they went
with Jesus. 38 Jesus turned around and saw us/them coming behind him. So he asked
us/them, “What do you want?” We/They replied, “Teacher, tell us where you are
staying, because we want to talk with you.” 39 He replied, “Come with me, and you
will see where I am staying!” So we/they went with him and saw where he was
staying. We/They stayed with him until about 4 o’clock (OR, from about 4 PM until
the next day).
40 ◄One of us/One of the two men► who heard what John had said and who went
with Jesus was Andrew, Simon Peter’s younger brother. 41 After Andrew left Jesus, the
first thing he did was to find his own older brother Simon and say to him, “We have
found the Messiah!” 42 Then he took Simon to Jesus. Jesus looked intently at him,
and then said, “You are Simon. Your father’s name is John. You will be given {I will
give you} the name Cephas.” Cephas is an Aramaic name that means ‘solid rock’. It
means the same in Greek as the name Peter.
Jesus told Nathaniel that he knew about him supernaturally, but that he would do
things that were more surprising than that.
John 1:43-51
43 The next day Jesus decided to leave the Jordan River valley. He went to Galilee
district and (OR, on the way there he) found a man named Philip. Jesus said to him,
“Come with me!” 44 Philip and Andrew and Peter were all from Bethsaida town.
45 Then Philip searched for Nathaniel and found him, and said to him, “We have met
the Messiah, the one Moses wrote about! The prophets also prophesied that he would
come. He is Jesus, from Nazareth town. His father’s name is Joseph.” 46 Nathaniel
replied, “Nazareth? ◄Nothing good can come from such an unimportant place!/Can
anything good come from such an unimportant place?► [RHQ]” Philip replied, “Come
and see!” 47 When Jesus saw Nathaniel approaching, he said about Nathaniel, “Here
is an example of a good Israelite! He never deceives anyone!” 48 Nathaniel asked him,
“How do you know what I am like?” Jesus replied, “I saw you before Philip called you,
when you were by yourself under the fig tree.” 49 Then Nathaniel declared, “Teacher,
you must be ◄the Son of God/the person who is both God and man►! You are the King
of Israel we have been waiting for!” 50 Jesus replied to him, “You [RHQ] believe those
things about me because I told you I saw you when you were under the fig tree. I was
able to see you supernaturally even though I was far away from you. But you will see
me do things that are more surprising than that!” 51 Then Jesus said to him, “This is
the absolute truth: Just like what your ancestor Jacob saw long ago in a vision, some
day you (pl) will see heaven opened up, and you will see God’s angels ascending from
me and descending on me, the one who came from heaven.”JOHN 2:1
1516
JOHN 2:20
2
In Cana Jesus did his first miracle, turning water into delicious wine.
John 2:1-11
1 Two days later there was a wedding celebration in Cana town, in Galilee district.
Jesus’ mother was there. 2 Jesus and we his disciples were also there, because we had
been invited {someone had invited us} also. 3 When the guests had drunk all the
wine that was there, Jesus’ mother said to him, “The wine is all gone; can you do
something about that?” 4 Jesus said to her, “Ma’am/Woman, ◄do not tell me what to
do!/why do you tell me what to do?► [RHQ] It is not yet time [MTY] to show that I
am the Messiah by working miracles.” 5 Then Jesus’ mother said to the servants, “Do
whatever he tells you!” 6 There were six empty stone jars there. The Jews habitually
put water in them to use for washing things to make them acceptable to God. Each
jar held ◄20 to 30 gallons/80 to 120 liters►. 7 Jesus said to the servants, “Fill the jars
with water!” So they filled the jars to the brim. 8 Then he told them, “Now, ladle
out some of it and take it ◄to the head waiter/to the master of ceremonies►.” So the
servants did that. 9 ◄The head waiter/The master of ceremonies► tasted the water,
which had now become wine. He did not know where the wine had come from, but
the servants who had ladled out the wine knew. The wine was delicious! So he called
the bridegroom over, 10 and said to him, “Everyone else serves the best wine first.
Then when the guests have drunk so much that they cannot tell the difference, they
serve the cheap wine. But you have not done what others do. You have kept the best
wine until now!” 11 That was the first miracle that Jesus did. He did it in Cana town,
in Galilee district. By doing it he showed how awesome he is, and as a result, we his
disciples believed that he truly was the Messiah.
Jesus and others went to Capernaum and stayed there several days.
John 2:12
12 Jesus then went down to Capernaum city with his mother and younger brothers
and us his disciples. We stayed there several days.
After Jesus expelled the merchants from the temple, the Jewish leaders wanted him
to do a miracle to show by what authority he did that. He told them metaphorically
that he would become alive again three days after he died.
John 2:13-25
13 Later, when it was almost time for the Jewish Passover celebration, Jesus and we
his disciples went up to Jerusalem. 14 There, in the Temple courtyard, he saw some
men who were selling cattle, sheep, and pigeons for sacrifices. He also saw men who
were sitting at tables, making a big profit as they gave people Temple tax coins in
exchange for their Roman coins. 15 Then Jesus made a whip from some cords and
used it to chase out the sheep and cattle from the Temple courtyard. By overturning
their tables he scattered the coins of the men who were exchanging them. 16 He said
to those who were selling doves, “Take these doves away from here! Stop defiling
my Father’s Temple by making it a market!” 17 Then we disciples remembered that
these words had been written {that someone/David had written these words} in the
Scriptures prophesying what the Messiah would say: “Others [PRS] will strongly oppose
me because I greatly desire that people respect your Sacred Tent.”
18 So one of the Jewish leaders [SYN] replied to him, “What miracle will you perform
to show us that you have authority from God to do these things?” 19 Jesus replied to
them, “If/When you destroy this temple, I will build it again within three days.” 20 So
the Jewish leaders [SYN] said, “We have been building this Temple for 46 years and
it is not finished yet! So ◄there is no way you will build it within three days!/howJOHN 2:21
1517
JOHN 3:14
will you build it within three days?► [RHQ]” 21 But when Jesus said that about the
temple, he was really talking about his own body. 22 Later, after Jesus had died and had
become alive again, we his disciples remembered the words he had said. As a result,
we believed what had been prophesied in the Scriptures about the Messiah becoming
alive again, and we believed that what Jesus said was true.
23 While Jesus was in Jerusalem at the Passover celebration, many people came to
believe that he was the Messiah because they saw the miracles he was performing.
24 But he did not let them tell him what he should do as the Messiah, because he
knew within himself what they were all thinking. 25 He did not need anyone to tell
him what others were thinking, because he already knew what they were thinking
and wanting.
3
Jesus told Nicodemus that people needed to be born again spiritually to have eternal
life.
John 3:1-15
1 There was a man named Nicodemus, who was a member of the Jewish religious
council. He belonged to the Pharisee religious sect. 2 He went to see Jesus at night, to
talk to him about God’s kingdom. He said to Jesus, “Teacher, we believe that you are a
teacher who has come from God. We believe this because we know that someone could
perform the miracles you are doing only if God were helping him.” 3 Jesus replied to
him, “Listen to this carefully: Unless people are born again and have a new life from
God, they cannot even see the place where God rules [MET]!” 4 Then Nicodemus said
to him, “◄No one can be born when he is old!/How can anyone be born when he is
old?► [RHQ] ◄There is no way he can enter his mother’s womb and be born a second
time!/How can he enter his mother’s womb and be born a second time?► [RHQ]”
5 Jesus answered, “Note this: Being born naturally is not enough; people need to also
be born spiritually by God’s Spirit. If that does not happen, they cannot experience
God ruling [MET] their lives. 6 Humans give birth to humans. But those who are born
again as a result of what God’s Spirit does receive a new spiritual nature from God.
7 Do not be surprised about my telling you that you must be born again and have a
new life from God. 8 Let me illustrate: The wind blows wherever it wants to blow.
You hear its sound, but you do not know where the wind comes from or where it is
going. Similarly, those who do not know God cannot understand/control/predict how
people are born again as a result of what God’s spirit does.” 9 Nicodemus replied
to him, “How can that happen?” 10 Jesus replied to him, “You (sg) are a well-known
teacher among us Israelite people, so ◄I am surprised that you do not understand
these things!/how is it that you do not understand these things?► [RHQ] 11 Listen to
this carefully: ◄My disciples and I/I► tell you (pl) about the things that my disciples
and I have seen and know are true, but you (pl) do not admit that what my disciples
and I are saying is true. 12 I have told you about the things that happen here on earth
that are true, but you (pl) do not believe me. So if I tell you (sg) about things that
happen in heaven, ◄you certainly will not believe me!/how will you believe me?►
[RHQ] 13 I am the only one who has gone up to heaven; no one else has gone up
there. I am also the one who came down from heaven. So I know what happens
there. 14 Long ago when the Israelite people rebelled against God in the desolate area,
God sent poisonous snakes to bite them. But when Moses lifted up on a pole the model
of a poisonous snake, everyone who looked at that model was healed from their snake
bites. Similarly, even though I am the one who came from heaven, some day peopleJOHN 3:15
1518
JOHN 3:30
will lift me up on a cross to kill me. 15 As a result, everyone who believes/trusts in me
will have eternal life.”
God sent his Son into the world to save everyone who trusts in him.
John 3:16-21
16 God loved us people [MTY] in the world so much that he gave his only Son as a
sacrifice for us, in order that everyone who believes in him would not be separated
from God forever. Instead, they would have eternal life. 17 When God sent his Son
into the world, his purpose was not to punish the people in [MTY] the world for their
sins. Instead, he sent him in order that they might be saved by him {he might save
them} from being ◄guilty/punished► for their sins. 18 Everyone who trusts in his Son,
God says that they will not be punished {that he will not punish them}. But God has
already said that everyone who does not trust in his Son will be punished {that he
will punish everyone who does not trust in his Son}, because they have not trusted
in what his only Son has done for them. 19 The one who was like a light [MET] to
reveal God’s truth to us came into the world. But people loved doing what was evil,
like darkness [MET] is evil, instead of loving the one who was like a light. That is the
reason God will judge people and condemn them. 20 Everyone who does what is evil
hates the one who is like a light, and they will not come to the one who is like a light,
because it would be shown {the one who is like a light would show} that their deeds
are evil, and he would rebuke them. 21 But those who live according to God’s truth
come to the one who is like a light, in order that it may be seen clearly {that people
may see clearly} that the things they have done, they did them because they have
depended on God.
When many people began to become Jesus’ disciples, and John the Baptizer declared
that Jesus was greater than he, the Jewish leaders rejected John’s and Jesus’ testimony
that Jesus was equal to God.
John 3:22-36
22 Some time later Jesus and we disciples went to Judea district. He stayed with us
there and directed us as we baptized people.
23 John the Baptizer was also baptizing people. He was doing that at Aenon village
near Salim town in Samaria district, because there were many springs in that area.
Many people kept coming to John and were being baptized {he was baptizing them}.
24 That happened before John was put {they put John} in prison. 25 Then some of
John’s disciples and a certain Jew started arguing about the Jewish rituals of washing
things to make them acceptable to God. 26 Then those disciples went to John and
said to him, “Teacher, do you remember the man who was with you when you were
baptizing people on the other side of the Jordan River? He is the one you were telling
us about. Well, now he is baptizing people, and many people are going to him instead
of coming to us!” 27 John replied, “A person can become important only if God [MTY]
permits it. So we should not be jealous about Jesus being popular! 28 You yourselves
can verify what I said. I told you that I am not ◄the Messiah/God’s promised king►.
Instead, I told you that I was sent {that God sent me} to prepare the way for him.
29 Let me illustrate [MET]: He is like a ◄bridegroom/man who is being married►, and
I am like his friend. The friend of the bridegroom stands there and waits for him
to come. That friend is very happy when he hears the bridegroom’s voice when he
arrives. Similarly, I am very happy about what you have told me. 30 It is necessary for
Jesus to become more important by making more disciples than I have, and for me to
become less important.”JOHN 3:31
1519
JOHN 4:15
31 Jesus came from heaven.
He is more important than anyone else. Those who
are born from parents here on earth [MTY] are just humans, and they speak about
things that happen here on the earth. But since Jesus came from heaven, his words
are more important than anyone else’s. 32 He tells people what he has seen and what
he heard in heaven, but very few people [HYP] listen to what he says. 33 Those who
have accepted what he has said verify that what God has said is true. 34 We know
it is true because Jesus, the one God sent, speaks the message of God. That is also
true because God causes his Spirit to live in Jesus to completely direct everything he
says and does. 35 God loves his Son, and has caused him to have control/power over
everything. 36 Those who trust in God’s Son have eternal life. But those who reject
God’s Son will never have eternal life. Instead, God is angry with them and he will
surely punish them.
4
John 4:1-30
While Jesus talked with a Samaritan woman, he showed by his God-given knowledge
of her personal life that he is the life-giving Messiah.
1-2 At that time, many people were asking Jesus to baptize them. He did not baptize
people; it was we his disciples who were doing the baptizing. But when some of the
Pharisee religious group heard people say that Jesus was making more disciples than
John the Baptizer and was baptizing them, they became very jealous. 3 When the Lord
Jesus heard about that, so that the Pharisees would not cause trouble for him, he left
Judea district, and went again with us disciples to Galilee district.
4 He knew that God wanted him to travel through Samaria district. 5 So we arrived
at a town named Sychar in Samaria district. That was near the plot of ground that
our ancestor Jacob had given to his son Joseph long ago. 6-8 The well that used to
belong to Jacob was on that plot of ground. Jesus was tired from walking. So while
we disciples went into the town to buy some food, he sat down alongside the well. It
was about noontime. A woman who lived there in Samaria came to get some water
from the well. Jesus said to her, “Will you give me from the well some water to drink?”
The woman knew that Jews did not like ◄to touch things that belong to Samaritans/to
come near Samaritans►, (OR, Jews did not like to associate with Samaritans,) 9 so the
woman said to him, “You are a Jew, and I am from Samaria. Furthermore, I am a
woman. So ◄I am surprised that you are asking me for a drink of water!/how is it
that you are asking me for a drink of water?► [RHQ]” 10 Jesus replied to her, “If you
(sg) knew what God wanted to give you, and if you knew who I am, the one who is
asking you for a drink, you would have asked me, and I would have given you water
that gives life.” 11 She thought he was talking about ordinary water. So she said to
him, “Sir, you do not have a bucket or a rope with which to get water from the well,
and the well is deep. So since you cannot get water from this well, where can you get
that life-giving water? 12 Our ancestor Jacob left us this well. He drank water from it,
and there was enough good water so that his sons and his flocks of sheep and goats
drank from it also. Do you claim that you are greater than Jacob, and because of that
you can give us life-giving water?” 13 Jesus replied to her, “Everyone who drinks water
from this well will later become thirsty again. 14 But those who drink the water that I
will give them will never be thirsty again. On the contrary, the water that I give them
will become in their inner beings like a spring of water that will enable them to have
eternal life.” 15 The woman did not understand that Jesus was speaking figuratively
about something that would sustain her spiritually. So she said to him, “Sir, give meJOHN 4:16
1520
JOHN 4:36
that kind of water so that I will not get thirsty again, and so that I will not have to
keep returning here to get water!”
16 Jesus knew that she did not understand, but he wanted to show her by his God-
given knowledge of her personal life that because he was the Messiah he could supply
her spiritual need. So he said to her, “Woman, go and call your husband, and bring
him here!” 17 She replied, “I do not have a husband!” Jesus said to her, “You said
that you do not have a husband, and that is true. 18 It is also true that you have had
five husbands one by one. And the man you are living with now is not your husband!
What you have said is very true.”
19 The woman said to him, “Sir, I perceive you must be a prophet because you are
able to know people’s secrets. 20 But let me ask you a different question: Our ancestors
worshipped God here on Gerizim Mountain, but you Jews say that Jerusalem is the
place where we must worship God. So who is right?” 21 Jesus said to her, “Woman,
believe me when I say that there will be a time when it will not matter whether you
worship God our Father on this mountain or in Jerusalem or somewhere else. 22 You
people from Samaria do not know the one you are worshipping. But we (exc) Jews
know whom we worship, because it is from us Jews that God has sent the one who will
save people from the guilt of their sins. 23 However, there will be a time when those
who genuinely worship God will worship him as God’s Spirit directs and according
to God’s truth. In fact, that time is now. Those are the kind of worshipers my Father
seeks. 24 God is a spiritual being. So it is necessary that those who worship him must
worship him as his Spirit directs and according to God’s truth.” 25 The woman said to
him, “I know that the Messiah is coming. When he comes, he will tell us everything
we need to know.” (‘Messiah’ and ‘Christ’ both mean ‘God’s promised king’.) 26 Jesus
said to her, “I, the one speaking to you, am the Messiah!”
27 Just then we disciples returned from town. Since it was contrary to our custom
for Jewish religious teachers to converse with a woman they did not know, we were
surprised that he was talking to a woman. However, none of us asked her, “What do
you want?” and none of us asked him, “Why are you talking with her?”
28 The woman left her water jar there and went into the town. She said to the
people there, 29 “Come and see a man who was able to tell me all about my past life
[HYP], even though I never met him before Could this man be the Messiah?” 30 So many
people left the town and started going to where Jesus was.
Jesus told his disciples that what sustained him was doing his Father’s will, which
meant convincing non-Jewish people to believe in him.
John 4:31-38
31 Meanwhile, we disciples were urging him, “Teacher, eat some of the food we
brought!” 32 But he said to us, “I have food to eat that you do not know anything
about!” 33 So we started saying to each other, “◄Surely no one has brought him any
food when we were not here!/Has anyone brought him any food when we were not
here?► [RHQ]” 34 Jesus said to us, “Doing what my Father who sent me wants me to do
and finishing the work he gave me to do is ◄what sustains me/like my food► [MET].
35 At this time of the year you are saying (OR, your ancestors used to say), ‘There are
four months left before we harvest the crops.’ But I say to you, look carefully at the
non-Jewish people around here. God says, ‘They are ready to accept my message [MET],
like crops in fields that are ready for people to harvest. 36 If you help them to accept my
message, I will reward you [MET], as an owner of a field pays those who harvest the
crops. Because of your work, people will gain eternal life.’ I have been telling people
God’s message. That is like [MET] a man who plants seeds. You will help people toJOHN 4:37
1521
JOHN 5:2
accept my message. That will be like [MET] harvesting crops. When that happens, both
you and I will rejoice. 37 As a result, this saying will become true: One person plants
seeds, but others harvest the crops. 38 I am sending you to enable people to accept
my message, but you will not be the first ones who tell them God’s message. Others
previously worked hard to tell people God’s message, and now you will be harvesting
the results of their work.”
Many Samaritans believed that Jesus was the Messiah.
John 4:39-42
39 Many of the Samaria district people who lived in that town believed that Jesus
was the Messiah because they heard what that woman said about Jesus, “That man
was able to tell me all about my past life [HYP]!” 40 So when those people of Samaria
came to Jesus, they urged him to stay with them. So we stayed there two days. 41 Many
more of those people believed ◄in Jesus/that he was the Messiah► because of what
he said. 42 They told the woman, “We believe in Jesus now, but not just because of
what you told us. Now we have heard him ourselves. And now we know that this
man truly is the one who can save people [MTY] from the guilt of their sins.”
After Jesus healed an official’s son, the official and his family believed that Jesus is
the Messiah.
John 4:43-54
43-44 Jesus had said previously that people did not honor prophets like himself when
they tried to teach people in their own home area. So, two days later, Jesus and we
disciples left that area and went to his own area in Galilee district, because he knew
that people there would not think very highly of him, and as a result the Jewish leaders
would not be jealous. 45 However, when we arrived in Galilee district, many of the
people there welcomed him, because they had been in Jerusalem during the Passover
celebration and had seen all the things he did there. 46 Jesus went again to Cana in
Galilee district. That was where he previously turned water into wine. There was one
of the king’s officials who lived in Capernaum, whose son was very sick. 47 When that
man heard others say that Jesus had returned to Galilee district from Judea district,
he went to Jesus in Cana and pleaded with him, “Please come down to Capernaum
and heal my son, who is about to die!” 48 Jesus said to him, “You people will believe
my message only if you see me perform more miracles!” 49 But the official said to
him, “Sir, ◄I believe in you/I believe that you came from God►. So please come down
to my home before my son dies!” 50 Jesus said to him, “Then you may go home. Your
son ◄will live/not die►!” The man believed what Jesus said, and left. 51 The next day
while he was on the way home, his servants met him. They told him, “Your child is
going to live!” 52 He asked them, “At what time did my son start to become well?”
They said to him, “His fever ceased yesterday afternoon at one o’clock.” 53 Then the
boy’s father realized that this was the time Jesus told him, “Your son will ◄live/not
die►.” So he and all the people in his house believed that Jesus was the Messiah.
54 That was the second miracle that Jesus performed in Galilee district, after he had
returned from Judea district.
5
The Jewish leaders did not like the fact that Jesus healed a paralyzed man on the
Sabbath day.
John 5:1-13
1 Some time later, Jesus went up to Jerusalem when the Jews were having another
celebration. 2 At one of the gates into the city called the Sheep Gate, there is a pool. InJOHN 5:3-4
1522
JOHN 5:24
our language we call it Bethzatha. Around the pool were five open areas with roofs
over them. 3-4 Many people were lying there. They were people who were blind, lame,
or paralyzed.* 5 One of those who was there had been paralyzed for 38 years. 6 Jesus
saw him lying there and found out that the man had been like that for a long time.
He said to the man, “Do you want to become well?” 7 The paralyzed man replied to
him, “Yes, sir, I want to get well, but there is no one to help me get down into the pool
when the water is stirred {stirs}. While I am trying to get to the pool, someone else
always gets there before me.” 8 Jesus said to him, “Get up! Then pick up your mat
and walk!” 9 The man immediately was healed. He picked up his mat and started
walking!
The day on which this happened was a Jewish day of rest. 10 So the Jewish leaders
said to the man who had been healed, “Today is ◄the Sabbath/our rest day►, and in
our Jewish laws it is written that people should not work on our ◄Sabbath/rest day►,
so you should not be carrying your mat!” 11 The man replied to them, “The man who
healed me, he himself said to me, ‘Pick up your mat and walk!’ ” 12 They asked him,
“Who is the man who said to you, ‘Pick it up and walk!’?” 13 But since Jesus had
disappeared in the crowd without telling the man his name, the man did not know
who it was who had healed him.
The Jewish leaders became very angry with Jesus for saying that he was the man
who was also God.
John 5:14-18
14 Later, Jesus found the man in the Temple courtyard. He told the man his name,
and said to him, “Listen! You are healed! So stop sinning! If you do not stop sinning,
something will happen to you that will be worse than the illness you had before!”
15 The man went away and told the Jewish leaders [SYN] that it was Jesus who had
healed him. 16 So the Jewish leaders [SYN] started to harass Jesus, because Jesus was
doing these things ◄on the Sabbath/on the Jewish rest day►. 17 Then Jesus replied
to them, “My Father has always been working every day, including ◄the Sabbath/the
day of rest►, up until now. I am doing the same thing!” 18 The Jewish leaders [SYN]
considered that he was disobeying their rules about ◄the Sabbath/the day of rest►,
and that by saying that God was his Father, he was making himself equal with God.
And they considered that both these things were grounds for killing him. So they
tried even harder to find a way to kill him.
Jesus replied to their objections by stating five reasons why they should believe that
he is the ◄Son of/man who was also► God.
John 5:19-45
19 Jesus replied to them by saying, “You need to know this: I can do nothing by
my own authority. I do only the kind of things that I see my Father doing. Whatever
kinds of things my Father is doing, those are the things I am doing. 20 My Father loves
me, and he shows me everything that he is doing. He will show me the miracles that
he wants me to do that will be greater than the ones that you have already seen me
do, so that you may be amazed. 21 For example, just like my Father causes people
who have died to become alive again, I will give eternal life to everyone that I want
to. 22 Furthermore, my Father is not the one who judges people concerning their sins.
Instead, he has given to me the work of judging people, 23 in order that all people may
honor me, just like they honor my Father. My Father considers that anyone who does
not honor me is not honoring him, the one who sent me. 24 Listen to this carefully:
* 5:3-4 send down an angel, and the angel would stir the water. Then the first person who got down into the
water after the water was stirred would be healed of whatever disease that person had.JOHN 5:25
1523
JOHN 5:47
Those who hear my message and believe that God is the one who sent me have eternal
life. God will not ◄condemn them/say that he will punish them►. They are no longer
separated from God. Instead, they have eternal life.
25 Listen to this carefully:
There will be a time when those who are ◄spiritually
dead/separated from God► will hear the voice of me, ◄the Son of God/the man who
is also God►. In fact, it is that time already. Those who hear and pay attention to my
message will have eternal life. 26 My Father has power to make things live. Similarly,
he has given me the power to enable people to live eternally. 27 Because I am the one
who came from heaven, he has given me the authority to judge people concerning
their sins. 28 Do not be surprised about that, because there will be a time when all
people who have died will hear my voice, 29 and they will become alive again. Those
who have lived good lives will rise from their graves and live forever. But those who
have lived evil lives will rise, and I will ◄condemn them/declare that I will punish
them for their sins►. 30 I do not do anything like that by my own authority. I judge
people only according to what I hear my Father tell me. I will judge people fairly,
because I do not want to please only myself. Instead, I want to please my Father, who
sent me.
31 If I were the only one to tell people about myself, people could rightly say that
what I say is not true. 32 But there is someone else who tells people about me. And
I know that what he tells people about me is true. 33 As for you, when you sent
messengers to John the Baptizer to ask about me, he told the truth about me. 34 I do
not need that people tell others about me. But instead, I am reminding you about
what John told people about me, in order that you will believe it and be saved {God
will save you}. 35 John’s message about me (OR, John) [MET] was like a lamp that
shines brightly. For a short while you were willing to be made happy by that message
{to let that message make you happy}.
36 But there is something else that tells you about me.
It should prove who I am
more than what John said about me. The miracles [PRS] that my Father told me to do,
the miracles that I am performing, show (OR, prove) to people that my Father sent
me. 37 Furthermore, my Father, who sent me, tells people about me. You have never
heard his voice or seen him. 38 Furthermore, you have not believed in me, the one
he sent. So you have not believed his message in your inner beings. 39 You carefully
study (OR, Study) the Scriptures, because you think that by studying them you will
find the way to have eternal life. And those Scriptures tell people about me! 40 But you
refuse ◄to come to me/to believe my message► in order that you may have eternal
life.
41 It does not matter to me whether people praise me. 42 But you want people to
praise you. I know that within yourselves you do not love God. 43 Although I have
come to earth with my Father’s authority [MTY], you do not accept me. But if someone
else comes with his own authority [MTY], you accept him! 44 You accept your praising
each other, but you do not try to do things that will result in God himself praising
you. So ◄there is no way you can believe in me!/how can you believe my message?►
[RHQ]
45 But do not think that I am the one who will accuse you while my Father is
listening! No, it is Moses who will accuse you! You thought that he would defend
you. 46 Moses wrote about me, so if you had believed what he wrote, you would have
believed what I said 47 But because you did not believe what he wrote about me, ◄you
will certainly not believe what I say!/how will you believe what I say?► [RHQ]”JOHN 6:1
1524
JOHN 6:24
6
Jesus miraculously fed more than 5,000 people.
John 6:1-15
1 Some time later, when Jesus was in Galilee district, near the time of the Jewish
Passover celebration, Jesus went with us disciples by boat and crossed to another place
along Galilee Lake. This lake is also called Tiberias Lake. 2 A large crowd of people
kept following Jesus on land because they had been seeing the miracles he performed
by healing sick people. 3 Jesus went up on the hillside and sat down with us disciples
to teach us. 4 Then he looked up and saw a great crowd of people coming toward him.
5 He said to Philip, “Where will we buy food for all these people to eat?” 6 He asked
this only to find out if Philip believed what Jesus could do, because Jesus already knew
what he himself was going to do. 7 Philip replied to him, “Even if we had the amount
of money a man earns in eight months, that would not be enough to buy bread so
that each person could have a little bit!” 8 Another one of us disciples, Andrew, who
was Simon Peter’s younger brother, said to Jesus, 9 “There is a boy here who has five
small barley loaves and two cooked fish. But ◄they will not help much among so
many people!/what good will that do among so many people?► [RHQ]” 10 Jesus said,
“Tell the people to sit down!” There was plenty of grass there, so they all sat down
comfortably. There were about 5,000 men among the crowd. 11 Then Jesus took the
small loaves and the fish and thanked God for them. Then he gave them to us, and
we distributed the small loaves and the fish to all the people sitting on the ground.
Because God caused the food to keep increasing, everyone ate as much as they wanted.
12 When everyone had all the food they wanted, he said to us disciples, “Gather up
the pieces that are left over. Do not let anything be wasted!” 13 So we gathered up
the pieces of the small loaves that were left over by those who had eaten. We filled
twelve baskets with those pieces!
14 After the people saw that miracle that Jesus had performed, many of them started
to say, “Surely this is the prophet like Moses that God promised to send to the world!”
15 So, because Jesus realized that they were about to come and seize him to make him
their king, he left them again and went up into the hills by himself.
Jesus miraculously walked on the water.
John 6:16-24
16 When it was evening, we disciples went down to Galilee Lake. 17 When it became
dark and Jesus had still not joined us, we got into a boat and went across the lake
towards Capernaum city. 18 A strong wind started to blow and caused the water ◄to
become very rough/to have high waves►. 19 After we had rowed ◄three or four miles/
five or six kilometers►, we saw Jesus coming near the boat; he was walking on the
water! So we were terrified! 20 But he said to us, “Do not be afraid! It is I!” 21 We
were glad to take him into the boat. As soon as we did that, the boat reached the
shore where we were going!
22 The next day the crowd of people that had stayed on the other side of the lake
were perplexed about how Jesus had left that area. They knew that there had been only
one boat there the previous day. They knew that we had gone away in it by ourselves.
They knew that Jesus had not gone with us. 23 Then some men came from Tiberias city
in boats. They were hoping to take some of the crowd back to Tiberias. They arrived
near the place where the people had eaten the food after Jesus had given thanks and
caused it to multiply. 24 When the crowd realized that neither Jesus nor we disciples
were there, some of them got into those boats and they sailed to Capernaum to find
Jesus.JOHN 6:25
1525
JOHN 6:44
Jesus taught them figuratively of the need for them to take for themselves the benefits
of his sacrificing himself and shedding his blood to atone for their sins.
John 6:25-59
25 When they found him in Capernaum further around the lake, they asked him,
“Teacher, since you(sg) did not come in a boat, when and how did you get here?”
26 Jesus replied to them, “Listen to this carefully: Do you know why you are looking
for me? It is not because you saw me perform miracles and as a result have realized
who I really am. No! You are looking for me only because you had plenty of bread
to eat after I provided it for you by performing a miracle. 27 Stop desiring food that
will soon spoil! Instead, desire to get spiritual food that will last forever! Yearn for
eternal life! That is what I, the one who came from heaven, will give you. God my
Father has shown that he approves of me enabling me to do that.”
28 Then the people asked him, “What things should we do to please God?” 29 Jesus
replied, “What God wants you to do is this: He wants you to believe that I am the one
he has sent.” 30 So they said to him, “Then perform another miracle so that we may
see it and believe that you came from God. What miracle would you like to perform?
31 Our ancestors ate the food called manna that God provided for them by a miracle
in the desolate area. This is written {The Psalmist wrote this} in the Scriptures about
what Moses caused to happen: ‘He gave them food from heaven to eat.’ Will you
perform a miracle like that?”
32 So Jesus said to them, “The truth is that it was not Moses who gave your ancestors
that food from heaven. No, it was my Father who gave it to them. And my Father is
the one who gives you the true food from heaven. 33 The true bread from God came
down from heaven, and he is the one who will give eternal life to the people of the
world [MTY].”
34 Not understanding what he meant, they said to him, “Sir, give us that kind of
bread all the time!” 35 Jesus said to them, “Just like food [MET] sustains physical life,
I am the one who enables you to have spiritual life. Those who eat ordinary food and
drinks will later be hungry and thirsty. But those who come to me to receive that life
will never again lack anything spiritually. 36 I told you before that you have seen
my miracles, but after seeing them, instead of understanding who I am, you have not
believed in me. 37 All the people that my Father entrusts to me will come to me, and I
will certainly ◄welcome/never send away► [LIT] anyone who comes to me. 38 When
I came down from heaven, it was not to do what I want. Instead, I came to do what
◄God/my Father►, who sent me, wants. 39 What the one who sent me wants is that I
◄keep forever all/never lose any► [LIT] of those whom he has entrusted to me. He
wants me to cause all of them to become alive again ◄on the last day/on the day when
I judge everyone► [MTY]. 40 Long ago in the desolate area when those who were bitten
by snakes looked at the bronze replica of a snake, they were healed [MET]. What my
Father wants is that similarly everyone who looks at what I have done and believes
in me will have eternal life. I will cause them to become alive again ◄on the last day/
on the day when I judge everyone► [MTY].”
41 The Jewish leaders [SYN] began to grumble about him because he said, “I am
the one who is like true bread who came down from heaven.” 42 They said, “◄This
man is Jesus, the son of Joseph!/Isn’t this man the son of Joseph?► [RHQ] We know
the names of both his father and his mother. He certainly did not come from heaven,
so ◄he is lying by saying ‘I came from heaven.’/why is he now saying, ‘I came from
heaven?’► [RHQ]” 43 Jesus replied to them, “Stop grumbling among yourselves about
what I just said! 44 My Father, who sent me, makes people want to come to me. No
others will come to me to receive eternal life. Those who come to me are the onlyJOHN 6:45
1526
JOHN 6:65
ones who will believe in me. I will ◄cause them to be alive again/raise them from
the dead► ◄on the last day/on the judgment day►. 45 It was written ◄by one of the
prophets/by the prophet Isaiah► {◄One of the prophets/The prophet Isaiah► wrote}
about all those who will trust in me, ‘God will teach them all.’ Everyone who listens
to what my Father says and learns from him will ◄come to/believe in► me. 46 I came
from God. I am the only one who has seen my Father. No one else has seen him.
47 Listen to this carefully: Everyone who believes ◄my message/in me► has eternal
life. 48 Just like food [MET] sustains your physical life, I am the one who enables you
to have spiritual life. 49 Even though your ancestors ate the manna while they were
traveling in the desolate area, they died anyway. 50 But the bread I am talking about
is something that came down from heaven. If people eat that bread, their spirits will
never die. 51 I am the one who came down from heaven to enable people to have
spiritual life. If people take what I will give them, they will live forever. What I will
give them is my flesh, which I will give to all the people in [MTY] the world in order
that they may have spiritual life.”
52 Then the Jewish leaders [SYN] began to argue among themselves. They said,
“◄There is no way this man can give us his flesh to eat!/How can this man give us
his flesh to eat?►” [RHQ] 53 So, speaking figuratively of the need for them to accept for
themselves the benefits of his sacrificing himself and shedding his blood to atone for
their sins [MET], Jesus said to them, “Listen carefully to this: Although I am the one
who came from heaven, if you do not eat my flesh and drink my blood, you will not
have eternal life. 54 Those who eat my flesh and drink my blood have eternal life, and
I will cause them to become alive again at ◄the last day/the judgment day►, 55 because
my flesh and my blood are truly spiritual food. 56 Those who eat my flesh and drink
my blood will have a close relationship with me, and I will have a close relationship
with them. 57 My Father, who is the source of everything that lives, sent me, and I
live because my Father has given me life. Similarly those who eat my flesh will live
eternally because of what I do for them. 58 I am the true bread that came down from
heaven. Although our ancestors ate manna, they later died anyway. But those who
eat this bread will live forever.” 59 He said this while he was teaching people in ◄the
synagogue/the Jewish meeting place► in Capernaum.
Some of Jesus’ disciples left him because of this teaching.
John 6:60-71
60 After they heard him say that, many of his disciples said, “What he is teaching
is hard to understand; ◄it is very difficult for anyone to accept it!/how can anyone
accept it?► [RHQ]” 61 Jesus was aware that his disciples were grumbling about it,
so he said to them, “◄I am sorry that this is offending you./Is this offending you?►
[RHQ] 62 ◄Perhaps you will believe my message if you see me, the one who came from
heaven, ascending there to where I was before!/(What will you think if you see me, the
one who came from heaven, ascending there to where I was before)?► [RHQ] 63 God’s
Spirit is the one who gives people eternal life. Human efforts are no help at all for
giving people eternal life. The message I have spoken to you gives spiritual life (OR,
comes from God’s Spirit and gives eternal life.) 64 But there are some of you who do
not believe my message.” Jesus said that because he knew from the time he started
[MTY] his ministry which of them would not believe his message. He also knew who
would ◄betray him/enable his enemies to seize him►.
65 Then he continued by saying, “That is why I told you that only those whom my
Father has enabled to believe in me will come to me and receive eternal life.”JOHN 6:66
1527
JOHN 7:18
66 From that time, many of his disciples left him and no longer went with him. 67 So
he said to us twelve apostles, “You do not want to leave me also, do you?” 68 Simon
Peter replied to him, “Lord, we will not leave you, because ◄there is no other person
like you to whom we can go!/what other person is there like you to whom we can
go?► [RHQ] You have the message about eternal life! 69 We have come to believe for
certain that you are the holy one who has come from God!” 70 Then Jesus replied
to us, “You are saying that as though all you twelve men whom I have chosen [RHQ]
believe that. But one of you is under the control of Satan!” 71 He was talking about
Judas, the son of Simon, from Kerioth village. Even though Judas was one of us twelve
apostles, he was about ◄to betray Jesus/to enable Jesus’ enemies to seize him►.
7
Jesus rejected his younger brothers’ suggestion that he go immediately to Jerusalem.
John 7:1-9
1 After those things happened, Jesus went around in Galilee province. He did not
want to travel in Judea province, because he knew that the Jewish leaders there were
wanting to kill him. 2 But when the time of the Jewish celebration called ‘Celebration
of Living in Shelters’ was near, 3 Jesus’ younger brothers said to him, “Since many
people here have left you, you should leave and go to Judea province and perform
some miracles there, so that your disciples may see them! 4 No one who wants to
become famous does things secretly. You say you are doing these miracles, so do
some miracles there so that everyone [MTY] can see them!” 5 They said this critically,
because even though they were his own younger brothers, they did not believe he
was from God. 6 So Jesus said to them, “It is not yet time for me [MTY] to go to the
celebration. For you, any time is right to go to the celebration. 7 The people [MTY]
who ◄do not believe in me/do not belong to God► cannot hate you, but they hate
me because I tell them that what they are doing is evil. 8 You (pl) go ahead to the
celebration. I am not going up to Jerusalem to the celebration yet, because now is not
the right time for me to go.” 9 After he said that, Jesus stayed a little longer in Galilee.
Jesus went to the celebration.
John 7:10-13
10 However, a few days after his younger brothers left to go up to the celebration,
he went also. He went, along with us disciples, but no others went with us. 11 At
the celebration, the Jewish leaders were looking for him. They were asking people,
“Has Jesus come?” 12 Among the crowds, many people were whispering about Jesus.
Some were saying, “He is a good man!” But others were saying instead, “No! He is
deceiving the crowds!” 13 But no one was speaking so that others could hear them,
because they were afraid of the Jewish leaders [SYN].
After Jesus taught people, the Jewish leaders wanted to arrest him, but many others
believed he was the Messiah.
John 7:14-36
14 In the middle of the days of the celebration, Jesus went to the Temple courtyard
and began to teach people. 15 The Jewish elders were amazed at what he was saying.
They said, “This man never studied in one of our religious schools! So ◄how can
he have learned so much about Scripture?/it is difficult for us to believe that he has
learned so much about Scripture!► [RHQ]” 16 Jesus replied to them, “What I teach
does not come from myself. It comes from God, the one who sent me. 17 Those who
choose to do what God wants will find out whether what I teach comes from God or
whether I am speaking with only my own authority. 18 Those who speak with onlyJOHN 7:19
1528
JOHN 7:36
their own authority do that only so that others will honor them. But I am doing things
so that others will honor the one who sent me, and I am someone who speaks the
truth. I never lie. 19 Think about the laws that Moses gave you [RHQ]. None of you
completely obeys those laws. So why are you trying to kill me, saying I do not obey
the laws concerning ◄the Sabbath/the Jewish day of rest►?”
20 Someone in the crowd answered, “By saying this you show that you are crazy (OR,
A demon is controlling you)! Certainly no one is trying to kill you!” 21 Jesus replied
to them, “Because I did a miracle of healing someone ◄on the Sabbath/on the Jewish
rest day►, you are all shocked. 22 Moses gave you a law that you must circumcise
the male children and that you must do that exactly seven days after they are born.
Actually, it was your ancestors, Abraham and Isaac and Jacob, not Moses, who started
that ritual. But because of that law, you sometimes circumcise them ◄on the Sabbath/
on the Jewish rest day►, but that is working, too 23 You sometimes circumcise boys
◄on the Sabbath/on the Jewish rest day► so that the law of Moses is not disobeyed
{you do not disobey the law of Moses}, so ◄it is ridiculous that you are angry with
me, saying I worked ◄on the Sabbath/on the Jewish rest day► by healing a man!/why
are you angry with me, saying I worked ◄on the Sabbath/on the Jewish rest day► by
healing a man?► [RHQ] Healing someone is far more helpful than circumcising a baby
boy! 24 Stop deciding whether my healing this man is wrong according to what you
see! Instead, decide according to what is really the right action to help people”!
25 Some of the people from Jerusalem were saying, “◄This is the man that they
are trying to kill!/Isn’t this the man that they are trying to kill?► [RHQ] 26 He is
saying these things ◄publicly/in front of many people►, but our Jewish rulers are not
saying anything to oppose him. Is that because they have decided that he is truly
◄the Messiah/God’s chosen king►? 27 But he cannot be the Messiah, because we know
where this man came from. When the Messiah really comes, no one will know where
he comes from.”
28 They said that because they thought Jesus was born in Nazareth. So while Jesus was
teaching people in the Temple courtyard, he shouted, “Yes, you say that you know me,
and you think you know [IRO] where I am from. But I have come here not ◄because
I appointed myself/with my own authority►. Instead, God is the one who truly sent
me. You do not know him. 29 But I know him, because I have come from him. He is
the one who sent me!”
30 Then they tried to seize him because he said that he had come from God. But no
one put their hands on him to do that, because it was not yet the time [MTY] for him
to die. 31 But many of the crowd believed that he had come from God. They said,
“When the Messiah comes, he certainly will not do more miracles than this man has
done, will he?” 32 The Pharisees heard them whispering these things about him. So
they and the chief priests sent some Temple guards to seize him.
33 Then Jesus said, “I will be with you for only a short time. Then I will return to
the one who sent me. 34 Then you will search for me, but you will not find me. And
you will not be able to come to the place where I am.” 35 So the Jewish leaders [SYN]
said to themselves, “Where is this man about to go with the result that we will not be
able to find him? Some Jewish people have dispersed and live among Greek people.
He is not intending to go and live among them and teach them, is he? 36 When he said
‘You will search for me, but you will not be able to find me,’ and when he said ‘You
will not be able to come to the place where I am,’ what did he mean?”
Many people were divided after Jesus said that the Spirit would produce eternal life
within those who come to him.
John 7:37-53JOHN 7:37
1529
JOHN 8:3
37 On each of the seven days of the celebration, the high priest poured out some water
on the altar in the Temple to remember how God provided water for the people in the
desolate area long ago. But the water he poured did not help anyone who was thirsty.
So on the last day of the festival, which was the most important day, Jesus stood up in
the Temple courtyard and said with a loud voice, “Those who are thirsty should come
to me to drink what I will give them. 38 Just like the Scriptures teach, streams of water
shall flow out from within those who believe in me, and that water will cause them
to live eternally.” 39 When Jesus said that, he was referring to God’s Spirit, whom
those who believed in Jesus would receive later. Up to that time God had not sent
the Spirit to live within believers, because Jesus had not yet died and returned to his
glorious home in heaven, from where he would send the Spirit.
40 When some of the crowd heard those words, they said, “Surely this man is the
prophet whom God promised to send who would be like Moses!” 41 Others said, “He is
the Messiah!” But others, thinking Jesus was born in Galilee, said, “The Messiah will
not come from Galilee province, will he? 42 ◄Did a prophet not write in the Scriptures
that the Messiah will come from King David’s family, and be born in Bethlehem,
where King David lived?/It is written in the Scriptures that the Messiah will come from
King David’s family, and be born in Bethlehem, where King David lived!► [RHQ]” 43 So
the people were divided because of what they thought about Jesus. 44 Some people
wanted to seize him, but no one tried to do that.
45 So the Temple guards returned to the chief priests and the Pharisees, the ones
who had sent them to arrest Jesus. They said to the guards, “Why did you not seize
him and bring him here?” 46 They replied, “No one ever spoke such amazing things
as this man does!” 47 Then the Pharisees replied, “Have you been deceived {Has he
deceived you}, too? 48 ◄None of our rulers nor any of us Pharisees have believed that
<he is the Messiah!/he came from God!>/Have any of our Jewish rulers or any of us
Pharisees believed that <he is the Messiah?/he came from God?>► [RHQ] 49 Not one!
But, on the contrary, some of this crowd have believed in him. They do not know the
true teachings of our laws! They will go to hell for listening to him!”
50 Then Nicodemus spoke. He was the one who earlier went to Jesus at night. He
was also a member of the Jewish council. He said to the rest of the Council members,
51 “We have not listened to what he says to find out what he is doing. ◄It is not
permitted in our Jewish law [PRS] for us to say, before questioning someone, that
we must punish him!/Is it permitted in our Jewish law [PRS] for us to say, before
questioning someone, that we must punish him?► [RHQ]” 52 They replied to him,
“◄Are you another disgusting person from Galilee?/You talk like another disgusting
person from Galilee!► [RHQ] Read what is written in the Scriptures You will find that
no prophet comes from Galilee province, like he does!” 53 [Then they all left and went
to their own homes.
8
Jesus evaded a trap about condemning a woman who had been caught committing
adultery.
John 8:1-11
1 But Jesus went with us disciples to Olive Tree Hill and we stayed near there that
night. 2 Early the next morning, we returned to the Temple courtyard. Many people
gathered around Jesus, so he sat down to teach them. 3 Then men who taught the
Jewish laws and some of [SYN] the Pharisee religious group brought a woman to him.
She was seized {They had arranged to seize her} while she was having sex with a
man who was not her husband. They made her stand up in front of the group thatJOHN 8:4
1530
JOHN 8:22
was listening to Jesus. 4 Then they said to Jesus, “Teacher, this woman was seized {we
seized this woman} while she was having sex with a man who is not her husband.
5 Moses commanded us in the laws that he gave us that we should throw stones at
such women and kill them. So what do you say we should do?” 6 They asked this
question as a trap so that they could accuse him. If he said that they should not kill
her, they would shame him for disobeying the law of Moses. If he said that they should
kill her, they could accuse him to the Roman governor.
But Jesus bent down and wrote something on the ground with his finger. 7 While
they continued to question him, he stood up and said to them, “Whichever one of
you has never sinned can be the first one to start throwing stones at her.” 8 Then he
stooped down and wrote some more on the ground. 9 After they heard what he said,
those who were questioning him went away, one by one, the older ones first and then
the younger ones, knowing they were all sinners. Finally only Jesus was there, along
with the woman. 10 Jesus stood up and asked her, “Woman, where are they? Has no
one said you must die for your sin?” 11 She said, “No, sir, no one.” Then Jesus said,
“I do not condemn you either. Go home now, and do not continue your sinful life any
longer!”]
Jesus replied to the Pharisees’ objection to his claim to be like a light for the people
of the world.
John 8:12-20
12 Jesus spoke to the people again. He said, “I am like a light [MET] for all the people
in [MTY] the world. Just like a light reveals what has been in the darkness [MET], I
reveal God’s truth to them. Those who walk in the darkness are unaware of what is
around them. But those who become my disciples will always be aware of God’s truth
[MET]. They will have my light which shows them how to have eternal life.” 13 So the
Pharisees said to him, “You are just telling about yourself! Since there is no one else to
verify these things that you say about yourself, we do not need to accept that what you
say is true.” 14 Jesus replied, “Even if I were the only one to say these things about
myself, what I say is true, because I know that I came from heaven, and I know that
I am going back to heaven. But you do not know where I came from or where I am
going. 15 You judge people according to human standards. The reason that I am here
is not ◄to condemn people/to say that I will punish people► for their sins. 16 But if
I did judge people, what I decided would be correct, because I am not the only one
who will decide those things. I and the one who sent me will both decide. 17 It is
written {Moses wrote} in your law that if at least two people testify that some event
has happened, people should consider that what they say is true. 18 I am telling you
about myself, and the other one who is telling you about me is my Father who sent
me. So you should believe that what we declare is true.”
19 Then they asked him, “If you have a father whom we can question about you,
where is he?” Jesus replied, “You do not know who I really am. If you knew who
I really am, you would know who my Father is also.” 20 He said these things when
he was in the Temple courtyard, near the place where the people put their offerings.
This was also very close to the place where the Jewish council met. But no one seized
him to arrest him, because it was not yet time [MTY] for him to suffer and die.
Jesus replied to the Pharisees’ continued rejection of Jesus’ claims about himself.
John 8:21-30
21 Jesus also said to them, “I will soon be going away. Then at the end of your life
you will seek me, but you will die without God forgiving your sins. Where I will go,
you will not be able to come.” 22 So the Jewish leaders said among themselves, “IsJOHN 8:23
1531
JOHN 8:44
he going to kill himself? Is that the reason that he said, ‘Where I go, you will not be
able to come’?” 23 But Jesus continued by saying to them, “You were born here in this
world, but I came from heaven. You belong to those who are opposed to God [MTY]. I
do not belong to them. 24 I told you that you will die without God forgiving your sins.
If you do not believe that I am who I say that I am, you will die without God forgiving
your sins.”
25 So they said to him, “You! Who do you think you are?” Jesus said to them, “Ever
since I began teaching, I have been telling you who I am! 26 I could judge you and
say that you are guilty of many things. But instead, I will say only what the one who
sent me tells me to say. What he says is true, and I tell the people in the world [MTY]
what I have heard from him.”
27 They did not understand that he was talking about his Father in heaven. 28 So
Jesus said, “I am the one who came down from heaven, but when you lift me up on a
cross to kill me, you will know who I am. You will also know that I do not do anything
with my own authority. Instead, I say just what my Father has taught me. 29 He is
the one who sent me, and he helps me. Because I always do the things that please
him, he has never abandoned me.” 30 As Jesus was saying these things, many people
believed that he was ◄from God/the Messiah►.
Jesus told his critics which people were true believers like Abraham and which ones
really were serving Satan.
John 8:31-59
31 Then Jesus said to the Jews who now said they believed in him, “If you continue
to live in accordance with my message, you will truly be my disciples. 32 Then you will
know God’s truth, and as a result of your believing his truth, he [PRS] will free you from
being controlled by the one who has made you his slaves.” 33 They replied to him, “We
are descendants of Abraham. We have never been anyone’s slaves. So why do you
say we will be freed from being someone’s slaves?” 34 Jesus replied, “Listen carefully
to what I am going to tell you. All those who continue to sin are forced to obey their
sinful desires [MET], just like a slave is forced to obey his master. 35 A slave is not a
permanent member of a family. But a son is a member of a family forever. Similarly,
you say you are members of God’s family because you are descendants of Abraham, but
really, because you are like slaves of your sinful desires, you are no longer permanent
members of God’s family. 36 So if you allow me to free you, you will truly be free. 37 I
know that you are Abraham’s descendants. But you are trying to kill me because you
are not allowing [PRS] my message to continue to change your inner being. 38 I am
telling you what I saw when I was with my Father. But you do the things that you
have heard from your father.”
39 They replied to him, “Abraham is our ancestor.” Jesus said to them, “If you were
Abraham’s descendants, your character would be like Abraham’s character, and you
would do good things like Abraham did. 40 I have been telling you the truth that I
heard from God, but you are trying to kill me. Abraham did not do things like that.
41 No! You are doing the things that your real father does.”
They said to him, “We do not know about you, but we are not illegitimate children.
And spiritually, we have only one Father. That is God, and you do not know who
your father is!” 42 Jesus said to them, “If God were your father, you would love me,
because I came from God, and now I have come here to this world. My coming was
not ◄because I appointed myself/with my own authority►. He sent me. 43 ◄And I
will tell you why you do not understand what I say./Do you know why you do not
understand what I say?► [RHQ] It is because you do not want to accept my message.
44 You belong to your father, ◄the devil/Satan►, and you desire to do what he wants.JOHN 8:45
1532
JOHN 9:5
He has caused people to become murderers from the time when people first sinned. He
has abandoned God’s truth because he is a liar by his nature. Whenever he lies, he
is speaking according to his nature, because he is a liar and is the one who originates
[MET] all lies. 45 But because I tell you the truth, you do not believe me! 46 Since I have
never sinned, ◄none of you can show that I have sinned./can anyone among you show
that I have sinned?► [RHQ] So, since I tell you the truth, ◄there is no good reason for
your not believing me!/why is it that you do not believe me?► [RHQ] 47 Those who
belong to God habitually obey God’s message. You do not belong to God, so you do
not obey his message.”
48 The Jewish leaders [SYN] replied to him, “◄We are certainly right by saying that
you believe what is false as the Samaritans do!/Are we not right by saying that you
believe what is false as the Samaritans do?► [RHQ] And that ◄a demon/an evil spirit►
controls you!” 49 Jesus replied, “A demon does not control me! I honor my Father,
and you do not honor me! 50 I am not trying to honor myself. There is someone else
who desires to honor me, and he is the one who will judge whether it is I who am
telling the truth or whether it is you who are telling the truth. 51 But the truth is that
anyone who obeys what I say will never die!”
52 Then the Jewish leaders [SYN], thinking that he was talking about ordinary death
and not about spiritual death, said to him, “Now we are sure that a demon controls
you! Abraham and the prophets died long ago! But you say that anyone who obeys
what you teach will never die! 53 ◄You are certainly not greater than our ancestor
Abraham!/Do you think you are greater than our ancestor Abraham?► [RHQ] He died,
and all the prophets died, so who do you think you are by saying something like that?”
54 Jesus replied, “If I were honoring myself, that would be worthless. My Father is
the one who you say is your God. He is the one who honors me. 55 Although you do
not know him, I know him and have a close relationship with him. If I said that I did
not know him, I would be a liar like you are. But I know him, and I obey what he
says. 56 Your ancestor Abraham was happy when he thought about what I would do
during my life [MTY]. It was as though he saw that, and was happy.”
57 Then the Jewish leaders [SYN] said to him, “You are not 50 years old yet! So ◄you
certainly did not see him!/how could you have seen him?► [RHQ] Because he died long
ago!” 58 Jesus said to them, “The truth is that I existed before Abraham was born!”
59 So, because they were very angry about Jesus thus saying that he ◄had eternally
existed/was equal with God►, they picked up stones to throw at him to kill him. But
Jesus caused them not to be able to see him, and he left the Temple courtyard.
9
Jesus healed a man who was born blind.
John 9:1-12
1 As Jesus walked along with us, he saw a man who had been blind from the time
he was born. 2 We disciples asked him, “Teacher, was this man blind from when he
was born because his parents sinned or because he himself sinned?” 3 Jesus replied,
“His being blind was not because he or his parents sinned. Instead, he has been blind
in order that people can see the power of God {the power of God can be seen} as a
result of what will now happen to him. 4 While there is still time, I must do the work
that the one who sent me wants me to do. Just like daytime is followed by nighttime
when people do not work, at the end of our lives [MET] it is too late for us to do what
God wants. 5 While I am still living in this world, I am the one who enables people to
know about God, like [MET] a light enables the people in [MTY] this world to see what
is in the darkness.”JOHN 9:6
1533
JOHN 9:30
6 After he said that, he spat on the ground. He made a little bit of mud with the
saliva, and put it on the man’s eyes. 7 Then he said to him, “Go and wash in Siloam
pool!” (That name means ‘sent;’ just like they sent the water by a channel into the
pool, God sent Jesus). So the man went and washed in the pool, and when he went
home he was able to see! 8 His neighbors and others who previously had seen him
when he was begging said, “He is the man who used to sit here and beg, isn’t he?”
9 Some said, “Yes, he is.” Others said, “No, he is not. It is just a man who looks like
him!” But the man himself said, “Yes, I am that man!” 10 So they said to him, “How
is it that now you can see?” 11 He replied, “The man whose name is Jesus made some
mud and put it on my eyes. Then he told me to go to Siloam pool and wash. So I
went there and washed, and then I could see.” 12 They said to him, “Where is that
man now?” He said, “I do not know.”
The Pharisees investigated the healing of the blind man.
John 9:13-41
13 They took to the Pharisees the man who was previously blind. 14 The day on
which Jesus made the mud and enabled the man to see again was a ◄Sabbath/Jewish
day of rest►. The Pharisees considered that healing someone was work, and their rules
did not permit people to do any work ◄on the Sabbath/on the Jewish rest day►. 15 So
the Pharisees also asked that man, “How did you become able to see?” He said to
them, “The man put mud on my eyes. Then I washed, and now I can see!” 16 So some
of the Pharisees said, “Since this man Jesus disobeys our rules about working ◄on the
Sabbath/on the Jewish rest day►, he is not from God.” But others said, “If he was a
sinner, ◄he could certainly not do such miracles!/how could he do such miracles?►
[RHQ]” So they were divided. 17 So one of them said to the blind man again, “You are
the man whom he enabled to see. What do you yourself say about him?” The man
said, “I think he is a prophet!” So they told him to go.
18 The Jewish leaders [SYN] still did not believe that the man was blind when he
was born, and that he was now able to see. So they sent someone to bring the man’s
parents. 19 When they got there, one of the Jewish leaders asked them, “Is that man
your son? Do you say that he was blind when he was born? If that is true, how is
he now able to see?” 20 His parents replied, “We know that he is our son. We know
that he was blind when he was born. 21 But we do not know how he is able to see
now. We also do not know who enabled him to see. Ask our son! He is old enough
to answer questions from authorities like you He can tell you himself!” 22 The Jewish
leaders [SYN] had previously declared that they would prevent anyone who declared
that Jesus was the Messiah from entering their synagogues. His parents knew that, so
they were afraid of the Jewish leaders [SYN]. 23 That is the reason that they said, “He
is old enough to answer questions, so ask him!”
24 So they sent someone to bring back to them the man who had been blind. When
he got there, the Jewish leaders said to him, “Knowing that God is listening [IDM],
tell the truth! We know that the man who healed you is a sinner.” 25 He replied, “I
do not know if he is a sinner or not. But one thing I do know is that I was blind,
but now I can see!” 26 So they said to him, “What did he do to you? How did he
enable you to see?” 27 He replied, “I told you that already, but you did not [RHQ] pay
attention! Why do you want to hear me tell you again? ◄Do you also want to become
his disciples?/You talk as though [IRO] you also want to become his disciples [RHQ]►.”
28 Then they insulted him angrily. They said, “You are that man’s disciple, but we are
Moses’ disciples! 29 We know that God spoke to Moses; but this man, we do not know
where he is from or where he gets any authority from!” 30 The man replied, “That is
very surprising! You say that you do not know where he gets any authority. But heJOHN 9:31
1534
JOHN 10:10
enabled me to see! 31 We know that God does not help sinners who ask God to help
them. Instead, he listens to and helps godly people who pray. He listens to people who
do what God wants. 32 No one has ever enabled a man to see who was blind when
he was born like I was. That has never happened since the world began! 33 So if this
man had not come from God, he would not be able to do anything like that!” 34 They
replied to him, “You ◄were born as a result of your parents’ sin [EUP]/bastard►! ◄Do
you think you are qualified to teach us?/You are not qualified to teach us!► [RHQ]”
Then they threw him out of the synagogue.
35 Jesus heard people say that they had thrown that man out. He found the man
and said to him, “Do you believe that the one who came down from heaven is the
Messiah?” 36 The man answered, “Sir, who is he? Tell me, in order that I may believe
in him.” 37 Jesus said to him, “You have seen him. In fact, it is I, the one who am
speaking to you.” 38 The man said, “Lord, I believe that you are the Messiah!” Then
he knelt down before Jesus and worshipped him.
39 Jesus said, “I have come into this world to judge the people in the world. The
result will be that those who realize that they do not know God’s truth will perceive it.
That is like [MET] enabling those who are blind to see. But the result will also be that
people who falsely think [IRO] that they understand God’s truth will never understand
it. That is like [MET] people who are blind remaining blind permanently.” 40 Some
of the Pharisees who were with him heard him say that, and said to him, “You are
not suggesting that we are like blind people, are you?” 41 Jesus said to them, “If you
realized that you did not yet know God’s truth, but you wanted to, then you would be
like blind people who wanted to see. God would be able to forgive your sins. But you
are now falsely claiming that you know God’s truth, so you are like people who are
blind who claim that they can see. Because of that, God is not able to forgive your
sins.”
10
Jesus explained why he is like a good shepherd.
John 10:1-21
1 Jesus continued by saying to us, “Listen carefully to what I say. Anyone who does
not enter the sheep pen through the gate, if he climbs in some other way, he is a thief
or a bandit. 2 The man who enters the pen through the gate is the shepherd of the
sheep. 3 The man who watches the gate at night opens the gate for him. The sheep
recognize the shepherd’s voice. He summons his own sheep by calling out the names
he has given them. Then he leads them outside the pen. 4 After he has brought out all
his own sheep, he goes in front of them. His sheep follow him because they recognize
and pay attention to his voice. 5 But they will never follow a stranger. Instead, they
will run away from him, because they do not recognize a stranger’s voice.”
6 Jesus said that [MET] to illustrate the difference between himself and the Pharisees,
who were deceiving the people. But they did not understand what he was telling
them. 7 So Jesus spoke to them again. He said, “Listen carefully to what I am saying.
I am like [MET] a gate for the sheep to enter the sheepfold, because I am the one who
allows people to enter God’s presence. 8 All of your religious leaders who have come
previously without my authority are like [MET] thieves and bandits because they act
violently and dishonestly for their own benefit. But just like sheep do not obey strangers,
God’s people do not pay attention to them. 9 I am like a gate. Those will be saved {God
will save all those} who come to God by trusting in me. Just like sheep go in and out
through the gate safely to find pasture [MET], I will provide for them and protect them.
10 Thieves come to a sheep pen only to steal or kill or destroy sheep [MET]. Similarly,JOHN 10:11
1535
JOHN 10:32
your religious leaders injure God’s people spiritually. But I have come in order that
people may have eternal/spiritual life, and that they may have abundantly all they
need to sustain them spiritually.
11 I am like a good shepherd. A good shepherd is willing to die to save the sheep
[MET]. Similarly, I am ready to sacrifice myself to save those who belong to me. 12 A
worker whom someone has hired to look after the sheep is not like the shepherd or
the one who owns the sheep. So when he sees a wolf coming, he leaves the sheep
and runs away. Then the wolf attacks the flock of sheep and seizes one sheep and
causes the others to scatter. 13 The worker runs away because he is only a man whom
someone has hired. He is not really concerned about what happens to the sheep
[MET]. Similarly, your religious teachers do not really care what happens to you. 14 I
am like a good shepherd. Just like a good shepherd knows his sheep [MET], I know
those who belong to me, and they know me 15 in the same way as my Father knows
me and I know my Father. Furthermore, I am ready to sacrifice myself for those who
belong to me. 16 And I have other people who are not Jews who will some day belong
to me. They will be like [MET] sheep from another sheep pen. I must bring them
to God/myself also. They will pay attention to what I say, and eventually all those
who belong to me will be like one flock, and I will be like [MET] their one shepherd.
17 The reason my Father loves me is that I will sacrifice my life. But after I do that,
I will become alive again. 18 No one is causing me to die. Instead, I have chosen to
sacrifice myself. I have authority to sacrifice myself and I have authority to become
alive again. That is what my Father has commanded me to do.”
19 After hearing these words that Jesus said, the Jews were divided again. 20 Many
of them said, “A demon is controlling him and has caused him to become crazy. ◄It
is useless to listen to him!/Why should we listen to him?► [RHQ]” 21 But others said,
“What he is saying is not something a man whom a demon is controlling would say.
◄No demon could enable a blind man to see like he did!/ How could a demon enable
a blind man to see like he did?► [RHQ]”
The Jewish leaders tried to kill or arrest Jesus for claiming that he was equal with
God.
John 10:22-42
22 Then it was time for the celebration to remember when our ancestors rededicated
the Temple in Jerusalem. It was in winter. 23 Jesus was in the Temple courtyard,
walking in the place that people called King Solomon’s porch. 24 The Jewish leaders
[SYN] gathered around him and said, “How long will you keep us from knowing for
sure if you are the Messiah? If you are the Messiah, tell us clearly!” 25 Jesus answered
them, “I have told you that I am the Messiah, but you do not believe me! You should
know who I am because of the miracles I do with my Father’s authority [MTY]. 26 But
instead, you do not believe in me because you do not belong to me. You are like [MET]
sheep who belong to a different shepherd. 27 Just like sheep heed the voice of their true
shepherd [MET], my people pay attention to what I say. I know them, and they have
become my disciples. 28 I will give them eternal life. No one will separate them from
me, not ever. No one shall ever pull them away from belonging to me. 29 Those that
my Father has given to me are more precious than anything else (OR, My Father, who
has given them to me, is greater than anything that opposes them). So no one can
pull them away from belonging to him [MTY]. 30 My father and I are equal.”
31 The Jewish leaders [SYN] again picked up stones to throw at Jesus and kill him
because they were angry at his saying that he was equal with God. 32 But Jesus said
to them, “You have seen me perform many miracles that my Father told me to do.
You should realize from seeing them that I am equal with God. So, because of whichJOHN 10:33
1536
JOHN 11:12
of these miracles [IRO] are you wanting to kill me by throwing stones at me?” 33 The
Jewish leaders [SYN] replied, “We are wanting to throw stones at you not because
you performed a great miracle. Instead, we are wanting to do it because you are
dishonoring God. You are just a man, but you are saying that you are God!” 34 Jesus
replied to them, “In the Scriptures it is written {◄someone/the Psalmist► has written}
[RHQ] what God said to the rulers whom he had appointed, ‘I have said that you are
like gods.’ 35 God said that to those leaders when he appointed them. No one objected to
that. And nothing that is in Scripture can be set aside {no one can set aside anything
that is in Scripture}. 36 But I am the one my Father set apart to completely belong to
him. He sent me here into this world. So ◄why are you angry with me for saying that
I am equal with God when I say that I am the man who is also God?/you should not
be angry with me for saying that I am equal with God when I say that I am the person
who is both God and man!► [RHQ] 37 If I were not doing the miracles that my Father
told me to do, I would not expect you to believe in me. 38 But because I perform these
miracles, believe what these miracles show about me, even though you do not believe
what I say. If you do that, then you will know and understand that my Father has a
close relationship with me, and I have a close relationship with my Father.”
39 After they heard that, they tried to seize him again, but he got away from them.
40 Then Jesus went, along with us, back across to the east side of the Jordan River.
We went to the place where John was previously baptizing people. He/We stayed
there for a few weeks. 41 Many people came to Jesus. They were saying, “John never
performed a miracle, but this man has performed many miracles! Everything that
John said about this man is true!” 42 Many people who came there believed ◄that
Jesus was the Messiah/that Jesus truly had come from God►.
11
Jesus’ friend, Lazarus, died.
John 11:1-16
1 One time there was a man whose name was Lazarus who was very sick. He lived
in Bethany village, where his older sisters Mary and Martha also lived. 2 Mary was
the woman who later poured perfume on the feet of the Lord Jesus, and then wiped
his feet with her hair. 3 So the two sisters sent someone to tell Jesus about Lazarus,
saying, “Lord, the one you love very much is very sick.” 4 They hoped that Jesus would
come, but when Jesus heard the message, he said, “His being sick will not end in his
dying. Instead, it will result in people realizing how great God is, and that I, God’s
son, may be honored {that people may honor me, God’s son}, because of what I will
do.” 5 Jesus loved Martha and her younger sister Mary and Lazarus. 6 But when Jesus
heard that Lazarus was sick, he stayed where he was for two more days.
7 But Jesus wanted to see Lazarus. So he said to us disciples, “Let’s go back to Judea.”
8 We said, “Teacher, just a short while ago the Jewish leaders [SYN] wanted to kill you
by throwing stones at you. So ◄we think that you should not go back there again!/are
you sure that you want to go back there again?► [RHQ]” 9 To show us that nothing bad
could happen to him until the time that God had chosen [MET], Jesus replied, “There
are [RHQ] twelve hours in the daytime, which is enough time to do what God wants
us to do. People who walk in the daytime will not stumble over things they cannot
see, because they see things by the light from the sun. 10 It is when people walk in
the nighttime that they stumble over things, because they have no light.”
11 After he said that, he told us, “Our friend Lazarus has gone to sleep. But I will
go there so that I can wake him up.” 12 So we said to him, “Lord, if he is sleeping,JOHN 11:13
1537
JOHN 11:40
he will get well. So you do not need to risk your life by going there.” 13 Jesus was
speaking figuratively about Lazarus’ death, but we thought that he was talking about
really being asleep. 14 So then he told us plainly, “Lazarus is dead. 15 But for your
sake I am glad that I was not there when he died, because I want you to believe more
firmly that I ◄am the Messiah/came from God►. So now, instead of staying here, let’s
go to him.” 16 Then Thomas, who was {whom they} called ‘The Twin’, said to the rest
of us disciples, “Let’s all go, so that we may die with Jesus when his enemies kill him.”
Lazarus’ sisters expressed disappointment that Jesus did not come and heal Lazarus
before he died.
John 11:17-40
17 When we arrived close to Bethany, someone told Jesus that Lazarus had died
and had been buried and his body had been in the tomb for four days. 18 Bethany
is less than ◄two miles/three kilometers► from Jerusalem. 19 Many Jews had come
from Jerusalem to console Martha and Mary over the death of their younger brother.
20 When Martha heard someone say that Jesus was coming, she went along the road to
meet him. But Mary stayed in the house. 21 When Martha got to where Jesus was, she
said to him, “Lord, if you had been here, my brother would not have died because you
would have healed him! 22 But I know that even now God will do for you whatever
you ask concerning my brother.” 23 Jesus said to her, “Your brother will become alive
again!” 24 Martha said to him, “I know that he will become alive again when all
people become alive again on the Judgment day.” 25 Jesus said to her, “I am the one
who enables people to become alive again and who causes people to live eternally.
Those who believe in me, even if they die, will live again. 26 Furthermore, all those
who believe in me while they are alive, their souls will not die forever. Do you believe
that?” 27 She said to him, “Yes, Lord! I believe that you are the Messiah, ◄the Son
of God/the man who is also God►. You are the one God promised to send into the
world!”
28 After she said that, she returned to the house and took her younger sister, Mary,
aside and said to her, “The Teacher is close to our village, and he wants to talk to
you.” 29 When Mary heard that, she got up quickly and went to him. 30 Jesus had
not yet entered the village; he was still at the place where Martha met him. 31 The
Jews who were in the house with Mary, consoling her, saw Mary get up quickly and
go outside. So they followed her, thinking that she was going to the tomb where they
had buried Lazarus, in order to cry there.
32 When Mary got to where Jesus was and saw him, she prostrated herself at his
feet and said, “Lord, if you had been here, my younger brother would not have died!”
33 When Jesus saw her crying, and saw that the Jews who had come with her were also
crying, he was very angry that Satan had caused Lazarus to die (OR, very troubled)
and disturbed in his spirit. 34 He said, “Where have you buried ◄him/his body►?”
They said to him, “Lord, come and see.” 35 Jesus began to cry. 36 Then some of the
Jews said, “Look how much he loved Lazarus!” 37 But some others said, “He enabled
a blind man to see. So ◄he should have been able to heal this man so that he did not
die!/why did he not heal this man so that he did not die?► [RHQ]”
38 Within himself Jesus was again very angry about Lazarus dying (OR, very
troubled). He came to the tomb. It was a cave. The entrance had been covered
with a large stone. 39 Jesus said, “Take away the stone!” Martha, who, as I mentioned
before, was an older sister of the man who had died, said, “Lord, his body has been
in the tomb for four days, so now there will be a bad smell!” 40 Jesus said to her, “I
told [RHQ] you that if you believed in ◄me/what I can do►, you would see how great
God is! Have you forgotten that?”JOHN 11:41
1538
JOHN 12:2
Jesus caused Lazarus to be alive again.
John 11:41-48
41 So they took away the stone. Then Jesus looked up toward heaven and said, “My
Father, I thank you that you heard me when I prayed about this earlier. 42 I know that
you always hear me when I pray. But instead of just praying silently, I said that for
the sake of the people who are standing here. I want them to believe that you sent
me.” 43 After he said that, he shouted, “Lazarus, come out!” 44 The man who had been
dead came out! The strips of cloth were still wrapped around his hands and feet, and
a cloth was still around his face, but he came out! Jesus said to them, “Take off the
cloths so that he can walk easily!” So they did that.
45 As a result, many of the Jews who had come to see Mary and who had seen what
Jesus did, believed that he ◄was the Messiah/had come from God►. 46 But some of the
others went to the Pharisees and told them what Jesus had done. 47 So the chief priests
and the Pharisees gathered all the members of the Jewish Council together. They
started saying to each other, “What are we going to do about Jesus? He is performing
many miracles! 48 If we allow him to keep doing this, everyone will believe ◄in him/
that he is the Messiah►, and they will make him their king. Then the Roman army will
come and destroy our Temple and our whole nation of Israel!”
The Jewish leaders decided to kill Jesus.
John 11:49-57
49 One of the Jewish Council members was Caiaphas. He was the Jewish high priest
that year. Hinting that they should get rid of Jesus, he said to them, “You talk as though
you do not know anything [HYP]! 50 You do not realize that it would be much better
for us if one man died for the sake of the people rather than that the Romans kill all
the people of our Jewish nation.” 51 He said that, not because he thought of it himself.
Instead, since he was the high priest that year, he was prophesying that Jesus would
die for the whole Jewish nation. 52 But he was also prophesying that Jesus would die,
not just for the Jews, but for all the people living in other lands who would belong to
God, in order that he would unite all of them into one group. 53 So from that day the
Jewish leaders started to make plans how they could kill Jesus.
54 Because of that, Jesus no longer traveled around publicly among the Jewish
people. Instead, he left Jerusalem, along with us disciples, and went to a village called
Ephraim, in an area near the desolate region. We stayed there for a while.
55 When it was almost time for the Jewish Passover celebration, many Jews went
up to Jerusalem from other places in the country. They went there to perform the
rituals to make themselves acceptable to God before the Passover celebration started.
56-57 The Jewish chief priests and Pharisees issued an order that if anyone found
out where Jesus was, that person should report it to them, in order that they could
seize him. So the people thought that Jesus would probably not dare to come to the
celebration. But they kept looking for him, and as they were standing in the Temple
courtyard they were saying to each other, “What do you think? He will not come to
the celebration, will he?”
12
A woman anointed Jesus with perfume
1 Six days before the Passover celebration started, Jesus arrived in Bethany village,
along with us. That was where Lazarus lived. He was the man Jesus previously caused
to be alive again after he died. 2 There they gave a dinner to honor Jesus. Martha
served the meal. Her younger brother, Lazarus, was among the people who wereJOHN 12:3
1539
JOHN 12:19
eating with Jesus. 3 Then Mary took a bottle of expensive perfume called nard and
poured it on Jesus’ feet to honor him. Then she wiped his feet with her hair. The
whole house was filled with the beautiful smell of the perfume.
4 But one of his disciples, Judas Iscariot, (OR, Judas, the man from Kerioth Town)
objected. He was the one who later enabled Jesus’ enemies to seize him. 5 He said,
“◄We should have sold this perfume and given the money to poor people!/Why did
we not sell this perfume and give the money for it to the poor people?► [RHQ] We
could have gotten 300 days’ wages for it!” 6 He said that, not because he cared about
the poor people, but instead, because he was a thief. He was the one who kept the
bag of funds that people gave to help Jesus and us his disciples, and he often stole some
of the money that was {that people} put into it. 7 Then Jesus said, “Do not bother her!
She bought this perfume in order to save it until the day when they will bury me after
I die. 8 There will always be poor people among you, so you can help them whenever
you want to. But I will not be with you much longer, so it is good that she showed
right now how much she appreciates me.”
The Jewish leaders decided to kill Lazarus, too.
John 12:9-11
9 A large crowd of Jews heard people say that Jesus was there in Bethany. So they
came, not only to see Jesus but also to see Lazarus, the man whom he had caused to
become alive again after he died. 10 So the chief priests decided to kill Lazarus also,
11 because many of the Jews were deserting them and going to Jesus and believing in
him because of Jesus causing Lazarus to be alive again.
Jesus entered Jerusalem as a king, but a humble one.
John 12:12-19
12 The next day the huge crowd of people that had come to Jerusalem for the
Passover celebration heard that Jesus was coming to Jerusalem. 13 So they cut
branches from some palm trees and took the branches out of the city to wave them
when they met him. Some of them were shouting things like, “Hooray!” “May the Lord
God bless the one who is coming with his authority [MTY]!” Some other people were
shouting, “May God bless the King of Israel!” 14 When Jesus came near to Jerusalem,
he got a young donkey and sat on it as he rode into the city. By doing this, he fulfilled
what had been written {what a prophet had written} in Scripture,
15 You people of Jerusalem,
do not be afraid!
Look! Your king is coming!
He is riding on a donkey’s colt!
16 At first we disciples did not understand those things. But after Jesus had returned
to heaven, we realized that those things had been written {that a prophet had written
those things} about him, and that by doing those things for him the people had fulfilled
what the prophet prophesied.
17 The crowd that was with him continued to tell other people that he called Lazarus
to come out of the tomb, and that Lazarus had then become alive again. 18 Because of
that, many people, because they heard others say that he had performed this miracle,
went to meet him. 19 So the Pharisees said to each other, “It is obvious that we
are making no progress in trying to stop him! It looks like [HYP] everyone [MTY] is
becoming his disciple!”
Jesus told some Greeks what people who wanted to be his disciples had to be ready
to do.
John 12:20-28aJOHN 12:20
1540
JOHN 12:38
20 Among those who went up to Jerusalem to worship God during the Passover
celebration were some Greeks. 21 They came to Philip, who was from Bethsaida town
in Galilee province. They wanted him to do something for them. They said, “Sir, we
would like to talk with Jesus.” 22 So after Philip went and told that to Andrew, they
both went and told Jesus. 23 Then, to show them that he must die in order to give
eternal life to non-Jews like those Greeks, Jesus replied to them, “It is time for God to
honor me, the one who came from heaven. That will happen when I die. 24 Listen to
this carefully: My life is like a seed [MET]. If someone does not plant a kernel of grain
in the ground, it does not change. It remains only one seed. But if it changes after it is
planted in the ground, it will grow and produce many seeds. 25 Anyone who strongly
wants to keep on living here on earth will surely lose his life forever. But anyone who
is willing to die [HYP] for my sake will surely gain eternal life. 26 If any of these Greeks
or anyone else wants to serve me, they must become my disciples. Then, after they
die, they will be where I am, in heaven. My Father will honor all those who serve me.
27 Now I am deeply disturbed. ◄I do not know what to say./What shall I say?►
[RHQ] Should I say, ‘My Father, save me from this time when I will suffer and die!’?
No, I should not say that, because the reason I came ◄into this world/from heaven►
was that I would suffer [MTY] now. 28 My Father, show how great you are!”
God encouraged Jesus about his coming death by a voice from heaven.
John 12:28b-36a
Then God spoke [EUP] from heaven, saying, “I have already shown how great I
am, and I will do it again!” 29 The crowd that was there heard it but they did not
understand the words. Some said it was thunder. Others said an angel had spoken to
him. 30 Jesus replied to them, “The voice that you heard speaking was God’s voice,
but it was not for my benefit. It was for your benefit! 31 Now is the time for God to
judge the people in [MTY] the world. Now is the time when I will destroy the power
of Satan, the one who rules this world. 32 But as for me, when I am lifted {when men
lift me} up from the ground on a cross, I will make a way for gathering everyone to
myself.” 33 He said this to show us the way in which he was going to die.
34 Someone in the crowd answered him, “We understand from the Scriptures that
the Messiah will live forever. So why do you say that the one who came from heaven,
who is the Messiah, will be lifted up {that men will lift up the one who came from
heaven, who is the Messiah,} on a cross? What kind of man who came from heaven
are you talking about? (OR, That’s not the kind of Messiah we are expecting!)” 35 Then
Jesus said to them, “My message is like [MET] a light for you. I will be with you for
only a little while longer. Live and act as you should while I am still with you, because
suddenly you will have no more opportunity to hear my message! You do not want to
be like [MET] someone who cannot see where he is going any more when it suddenly
becomes dark! 36 Believe in my message [MET] while you still have an opportunity
to do it, in order that you may become people who have accepted my truth [MET]!”
Most of the Jewish leaders continued to reject Jesus’ message.
John 12:36b-43
After Jesus said those things, he left them and hid from them. 37 Although he had
done many miracles while people were watching, most of them refused to believe
that he is ◄the Messiah/from God►. 38 Their stubbornness and refusal to believe was
similar to the stubbornness of the people that the prophet Isaiah wrote about long ago:
Lord, ◄hardly anyone has believed our message!/who has believed our message?►
[RHQ]
Most people refused to accept it,JOHN 12:39
1541
JOHN 13:5
even though you showed them your power!
39 That was the reason why they were unable to believe. It was like Isaiah wrote
somewhere else that God said:
40 They have refused to understand; they acted as though they were blind people!
They were insensible in their inner beings!
As a result, they have not perceived my truth!
They have not understood it in their inner beings!
They have not turned from their sinful lives,
and because of that I cannot help them!
41 Isaiah wrote that because it was as though he saw ahead of time how great Jesus
would be, and he prophesied those things about him.
42 Although most of the Jewish leaders [SYN] did not believe that Jesus is ◄the
Messiah/from God►, some of them believed in him. But they would not tell anyone
that they believed in him, because they were afraid that if they said that, the Pharisees
would not let them worship in the synagogues. 43 They wanted people to praise them
more than they wanted God to praise them.
Jesus warned that God would condemn those who rejected his message.
John 12:44-50
44 Another day, when Jesus was teaching the people, he shouted, “Those who believe
in me, they are not believing in me alone. Instead, it is as though they also believe in
the one who sent me. 45 When they see me and what I am doing, it is as though they
are seeing the one who sent me. 46 I have come into the world to show people God’s
truth, as a light shows people what is around them. I have come in order that people
who believe in me will not remain ignorant of God’s truth [MET], as those who are in
the darkness are ignorant of what is around them.
47 As for those who hear my message but do not obey its commands, I am not the
one who judges them. The main reason that I came ◄into the world/from heaven► was
not to judge the people of [MTY] the world. Instead, I came to save them from being
punished for their sins. 48 There is something that will judge those who reject me and
do not accept my message. On the judgment day God will condemn them because
they rejected the message that I have told them. 49 I have not said things from my
own authority. Instead, my Father, the one who sent me, instructed me what to say
and how I should say it. 50 I know that paying attention to what he has instructed us
leads to eternal life. So whatever I say is exactly (OR, only) what my Father has told
me to say.”
13
Jesus washed the disciples’ feet as an example of humble service to each other.
John 13:1-17
1 When it was the evening before the Passover celebration, Jesus knew that it was
time for him to leave this world and to return to his Father in heaven. He loved us
who were his disciples. He knew we would continue to live here in this world, so
now he showed us how completely he loved us. 2 We were eating the Passover meal.
◄The devil/Satan► had already suggested to Judas Iscariot (OR, Judas, the man from
Kerioth Town), the son of Simon, that he should ◄betray Jesus/enable Jesus’ enemies
to seize him►. 3 But Jesus knew that his Father had given to him complete authority
to control the situation. He knew that he had come from God and would soon return
to God. 4 But before he left us, he wanted to show us how we should love each other. So
he got up from where he was eating. He took off his outer cloak and wrapped a long
towel around his waist, as a slave would do. 5 Then he poured some water in a basin.JOHN 13:6
1542
JOHN 13:28
He began to wash our feet, and then dry them with the towel that he had wrapped
around himself.
6 When he came to Simon Peter, Peter said to him, “Lord, it is not right for you
[RHQ] to humble yourself by washing my feet!” 7 Jesus replied to him, “Now you do
not understand the meaning of what I am doing, but you will understand later.” 8 Peter
said, “I will never, ever, allow you to wash my feet!” Jesus replied to him, “If I do not
wash you, you cannot continue ◄to be my disciple/to belong to me►.” 9 So Simon Peter
said to him, “Lord, in that case, do not wash only my feet. Wash my hands and my
head, too!” 10 Then, to show him that after God had cleansed people from being guilty
for sin, they needed only for God to forgive their daily sins [MET], Jesus said to him,
“Those who have recently bathed need only to have their feet washed, because they
get dirty very quickly on the dusty roads. The rest of their bodies are clean. Similarly, I
have made you disciples free/clean from the guilt of your sins, although not all of you
are free from guilt.” 11 He knew which one of us was going to betray him. That is the
reason he said, “Not all of you are free from guilt.”
12 After he finished washing our feet, he put his cloak back on. Then he sat down
and said to us, “Do you understand what I have done for you? 13 You show that you
respect me by calling me ‘Teacher’ and ‘Lord’. You are right to say that, because I
am your teacher and your Lord. 14 But if I, who am your teacher and your Lord,
have washed your feet, you ought to serve each other by doing things like washing
each other’s feet. 15 I have made myself an example for you in order that you should
humbly serve each other as I have done for you. 16 Listen to this carefully: A servant
is not greater than his master. A messenger is not greater than the one who has sent
him. So, since you are not greater than I am, you should not be proud and unwilling to
serve each other. 17 Since you now know these things, God will be pleased with you
if you do them.”
Jesus predicted that one of them would betray him to his enemies.
John 13:18-30
18 “I am not saying that God will bless all of you. I knew what all of you were like
when I chose you. But I also chose the one who will betray me, in order that what is
written in Scripture might be fulfilled {to fulfill what someone/the psalmist wrote in
Scripture}, ‘The one who is acting like he is my friend by eating with me has become
my enemy [IDM].’
19 I am telling you about someone betraying me before it happens, in order that
when it happens, you may continue to believe that I am ◄the Messiah/who I say I
am►. 20 Listen to this carefully: Those who accept any one of you whom I am sending
out, God will consider that they are accepting me. And those who accept me, God will
consider that they are accepting my Father, who sent me.”
21 After Jesus said this, he was very troubled. He solemnly declared, “Listen to this
carefully: One of you is going to enable my enemies to seize me.” 22 We looked at each
other. We had no way to know whom he was talking about. 23 I, the man other people
call ‘the one Jesus loved’, was sitting very close to Jesus. 24 Simon Peter motioned to
me to indicate that I should ask Jesus whom he was talking about. 25 So I leaned close
to Jesus and asked him, “Lord, who is it?” 26 Jesus answered, “It is the one to whom
I will give this piece of bread after I dip it in the sauce in the dish.” Then, to show us
that he knew who would enable his enemies to seize him, after he dipped the bread in
the sauce, he gave it to Judas Iscariot (OR, Judas, the man from Kerioth Town). 27 As
soon as Judas ate the bread, Satan took control of him. Then Jesus said to him, “What
you are going to do, do quickly.” 28 But none of the rest of us who were sitting thereJOHN 13:29
1543
JOHN 14:10
knew why Jesus said that to him. 29 Since Judas took care of the money people gave us
to help us, some thought Jesus was telling him to go and buy some things we needed
for the Passover celebration. Some thought he was telling him to give some money to
poor people. 30 As soon as Judas had eaten the bread, he left. It was dark outside, and
it was dark [MET] in his soul, too.
Jesus commanded his disciples that they should love each other.
John 13:31-35
31 After Judas left, Jesus said, “Now it will be shown {my Father will show} how
wonderful I, the one who came from heaven, am. And by what I do it will be seen
{people will see} how great God is. 32 Since by what I do people will see how awesome
God is, God himself will show people how awesome I am. And he will do that very
soon.
33 You whom I love as though you were my children, I will continue with you only
a short time longer. Then you will look for me, but I will not be here. Just like I told
the Jewish leaders [SYN], I am telling you now, that where I am going, you cannot
come yet. 34 Now I am giving you a new commandment: You must love each other.
You must love each other in the way that I have loved you. 35 If you keep loving each
other, everyone who is aware of that [HYP] will know that you are my disciples.”
Jesus also prophesied that Peter would deny that he knew Jesus.
John 13:36-38
36 Simon Peter said to him, “Lord, where are you going?” Jesus replied, “The place
where I am going, you cannot come with me now, but you will come there later.”
37 Peter said, “Lord, why can I not come with you now? I am ready to die for you!”
38 Jesus answered, “You say [RHQ] that you are ready to die for me. But the truth is
that before the rooster crows early tomorrow morning, you will say three times that
you do not know me!”
14
Jesus encouraged his disciples and told them that he is the only way to the Father.
John 14:1-14
1 Jesus continued by saying to us, “Stop being anxious/worried. Keep on trusting in
God (OR, You are trusting in God); also keep trusting in me. 2 Where my Father is in
heaven there is plenty of room! If that were not true, I would have told you. I am
about to go there to prepare a place for you. 3 And because I will go there and prepare
a place for you, I will return and take you there to be with me. I will do that so that
you may also be where I am. 4 You know the road to the place where I am going.”
5 Thomas said to him, “Lord, we do not know where you are going. So how can we
know the road?” 6 Jesus said to him, “I am the road [MET] to where my Father is. I
am the one who reveals [MET] the truth about God and the one who gives eternal life
to people. I am the only one who can enable people to come to my Father. There is no
other way. 7 If you really knew who I was, you would have known my Father also.
From now on, you know him, and it is as though you have seen him.”
8 Philip said to him, “Lord, show us your Father and that will be enough for us!”
9 Jesus said to him, “Philip, I have been with you for a long time. So ◄surely you
should know who I really am!/why have you not come to know who I really am?►
[RHQ] Those who have seen me, it is as though they have seen my Father. So ◄why
do you say ‘Show us your Father’?/you should not say ‘Show us your Father’!► [RHQ]
10 Do you not [RHQ] believe that I have a close relationship with my Father, and that
my Father has a close relationship with me? The messages that I tell you do not comeJOHN 14:11
1544
JOHN 14:29
from me. They come from my Father, who has a close relationship with me. He is
enabling me to teach these things, and to perform the miracles that he wants me to
perform. 11 Believe that I have a close relationship with my Father and that my Father
has a close relationship with me. If you do not believe that just because of what I
say, believe it because of the miracles themselves that I have done. 12 Listen to this
carefully: You who trust in me will do the kinds of miracles that I have done. Because
of what I will do for you (OR, Because I will send God’s Spirit to you) after I go to my
Father, you will be able to do miracles that will be greater than the ones I have done.
13 And whatever you, using my authority, ask me to do, I will do it, in order that I can
show you how great my Father is. 14 Anything that you ask my Father to do, anything
that you ask with my authority [MTY], I will do.”
Jesus promised to send the Holy Spirit to them.
John 14:15-31
15 “If you love me, you will do what I have commanded you. 16 Then I myself will
request my Father, and he will send you someone else who will ◄encourage/be like
a legal counsel for► you. 17 I am talking about the Spirit, who will teach you God’s
truth. He will be with you forever. Those who are opposed to God [MTY] cannot
receive him, because they cannot understand what he does, and they cannot know
who he is. But you know who he is, because he is with you and he will be inside
you. 18 When I leave you, I will not let you be alone/helpless [MET]. When I send the
Spirit, it will be like I am coming back to you (OR, When I rise from the dead, I will
come back to you.) 19 Soon those who do not belong to God [MTY] will not see me
any more. But when the Spirit comes to you, it will be as though you will be seeing
me again (OR, But after I become alive again, you will see me again.) Because I will
be alive again, you also will have eternal life. 20 At that time you will know that I
have a close relationship with my Father, and you will have a close relationship with
me, and I will have a close relationship with you. 21 Those who have accepted my
commands and obey them are the people who love me. My Father will love those
who love me. I also will love them, and I will fully reveal to them what I am like.”
22 Then Judas spoke to him. He was not Judas Iscariot (OR, Judas, the man from
Kerioth Town), but instead a disciple whose other name was Thaddeus. He said, “Lord,
what has happened so that you can fully reveal to us what you are like, and not reveal
that to those who do not belong to God [MTY]?” 23 Jesus replied to him, “Those who
love me will obey what I have told them. My Father will also love them. It is those
people whom my Father and I will be able to come to and ◄live with/have a personal
relationship with►. 24 But those who do not love me will not obey what I have told
them. So I cannot reveal to them what I am really like.
These words that I am telling you have not come just from me. They came from my
Father, the one who sent me. 25 I have told you all these things while I am still with
you. 26 But my Father will send the Holy Spirit. He is the one who will ◄encourage/be
like a legal counsel for► you. He will come with my authority [MTY]. He will teach
you all of God’s truth that you need to know. He will also cause you to remember
all the things that I have told you. 27 As I leave you, I am causing you to have inner
peace. This inner peace comes from me. I am not causing you to have something that
those who do not belong to God [MTY] can give you. So stop being anxious/worried,
and do not be afraid.
28 You heard me say to you, ‘I am going away, but later I will come back to you.’
If you loved me, you would be glad that I am going back to my Father, because my
Father is greater than I am, and there he will honor me and will send the Spirit to you.
29 I have told you these things now before they happen, so that when they happenJOHN 14:30
1545
JOHN 15:16
you will believe that what I said is true. 30 I will not be able to talk to you much
longer, because what happens to me will be as though Satan, the ruler of this world,
is coming to attack me. But he has no control over what happens to me. 31 Instead,
the people who do not belong to God [MTY] must learn from what happens to me that
I love my Father, and I am doing the things that he has commanded me to do. Now,
let’s get up and leave here.”
15
Jesus taught them that they needed to remain closely united to him in order to live
in a way that would please God.
John 15:1-17
1 Jesus talked to us as we were walking along. Speaking figuratively of the need for us
to live in a way that God wants us to, he said, “I am like [MET] a genuine vine, not like
those Jewish leaders who do not teach the truth. My father is like [MET] a gardener
who works to take care of a vineyard. 2 Just like a gardener cuts off the branches that
bear no grapes [MET], God gets rid of those who do not please him even though they
say that they belong to him. Those branches that bear fruit, the gardener trims so that
they may bear more grapes. Similarly, my Father disciplines/corrects those who live
as he wants them to live. 3 You are already like the branches that a gardener trims
because you have believed the message that I have told you. 4 Remain having a close
relationship with me. If you do that, I will remain having a close relationship with
you. A branch of a vine cannot bear fruit if it is cut off and left by itself. To bear fruit,
it must remain attached to the vine. Similarly, you cannot live the way that God wants
you to if you do not remain united to me [MET].
5 I am like [MET] a vine. You are like [MET] the branches. All those who have a
close relationship with me and with whom I have a close relationship will do much
that pleases God, like [MET] a vine that bears much fruit. Remember that you can
do nothing [HYP] that truly pleases God without my help. 6 A gardener cuts off and
throws away useless branches. Then, after they dry up, he picks them up and throws
them into a fire and burns them [SIM]. Similarly, everyone who does not remain
having a close relationship with me, God will get rid of. 7 If you remain having a
close relationship with me and you keep living in accordance with my message, you
can ask God to do anything for you, and he will do it. 8 The way my Father is honored
is by your {The way you honor my Father is by} doing much that pleases him [MET],
and by doing that, you will show that you are my disciples.
9 I have loved you just as my Father has loved me. Now keep living in a way that
is appropriate for those whom I love. 10 If you obey what I have commanded you,
you will be acting in a way that is appropriate for those whom I love, just like I have
obeyed what my Father has commanded me and I act in a way that is appropriate for
someone whom he loves. 11 I have told you these things so that you may be joyful as
I am joyful, and that you may be completely joyful. 12 What I am commanding you
is this: Love each other just like I have loved you. 13 The best way that people can
show that they love someone is to die for that person. There is no way that you can
love someone in a greater way than that. 14 You show that you are my friends if you
keep doing what I have commanded you. 15 I will no longer call you my servants,
because servants do not know why their masters want them to do things. Instead, I
have said that you are my friends, because I, acting like a friend, have revealed to
you everything that my Father told me. 16 You did not decide to become my disciples.
Instead, I chose you, so that you would do many things that please him [MET]. The
results of what you do will last forever. I also chose you so that my Father will do forJOHN 15:17
1546
JOHN 16:8
you whatever you, using my authority, ask him to do [MTY]. 17 I repeat what I have
commanded you: Love each other.”
Jesus taught them that those who were opposed to God would hate them, too.
John 15:18—16:4
18 “The people who are opposed to God will hate you.
When that happens,
19
remember that they hated me first.
If you belonged to those who are opposed
to God [MTY], they would love you like they love those who belong to them. But you
do not belong to those who are opposed to God [MTY]. Instead, I chose you so that you
would separate yourselves from [MTY] them. That is why those who are opposed to
God [MTY] hate you. 20 Remember these words that I told you: ‘No servant is greater
than his master.’ That means that you, who are like my servants, cannot expect people
to treat you better than they treat me. So, since they have ◄persecuted me/caused
me to suffer►, they will ◄persecute you/cause you to suffer► also. If they had paid
attention to the things I taught them, they would pay attention to what you teach
them. 21 They will treat you like that because you belong to me [MTY], and because
they do not know the one who sent me. 22 If I had not come and spoken God’s message
to them, they would not be guilty of rejecting me and my message. But now I have
come and told them God’s message, so they will have no excuse when God judges them
for their sin. 23 All those who hate me, it is as though they hate my Father as well. 24 If
I had not done among them the miracles that no one else ever did, they would not
be guilty of the sin of rejecting me. But now, although they have seen those miracles,
they have hated both me and my Father. 25 But this has happened in order that these
words that have been written in their Scriptures might be fulfilled {to fulfill this that
◄someone/the Psalmist► wrote in their Scriptures}: ‘They hated me for no reason.’
26 Later I will send to you from my Father the one who will ◄encourage/be like
a legal counsel for► you. He is the Spirit who will teach you God’s truth. He will
come from my Father. He will tell people about me. 27 But you disciples must also tell
people about me, because you have been with me from the time when I started my
ministry [MTY].”
16
1 Jesus continued by saying to us, “I have told you these things in order that you
will not stop trusting in me when people ◄cause you to suffer/persecute you►. 2 They
will not allow you to worship in ◄synagogues/their meeting places►. In fact, there
will be a time when anyone who kills you will think that he is serving God by doing
that. 3 They will do such things because they have never known who I really am, nor
who my Father is. 4 I have told you these things in order that when they start ◄to
cause you to suffer/to persecute you► [MTY], you will remember that I warned you. I
did not tell you these things when you first started to accompany me [MTY] because
I was with you, and they were causing trouble for me, not for you.”
Jesus told them some things that the Holy Spirit would do.
John 16:5-15
5 “Now I am about to return to the one who sent me. But I am disappointed that
none of you is asking me, ‘Where are you going?’ 6 Instead, because I have told you
these things, you are very sad. 7 But the truth is that it is good for you that I am going
away, because if I do not go away, the Holy Spirit, who will ◄encourage/be like a legal
counsel for► you will not come to you. But when I go, I will send him to you. 8 When
he comes, he will prove that those who do not belong to God [MTY] are wrong about
what is sinful and about who is really righteous and about whom God will judge andJOHN 16:9
1547
JOHN 16:30
condemn for their sin. 9 He will tell people that their greatest sin is that they do not
believe in me. 10 He will tell people that because I am going back to my Father, and
you will no longer see me, you will know that I am the one who was truly righteous.
11 He will tell people that the fact that God has already determined that he will punish
Satan, the one who rules this world, shows that some day God will also punish those
who do not belong to him.
12 I have many more things that I would like to tell you, but you are not able to
accept them now. 13 But God’s Spirit is the one who will teach you God’s truth. When
he comes, he will guide you so that you understand all spiritual truth. He will not
speak from his own authority. Instead, it is the things that he hears my Father say
that he will tell you. He will also tell you about things that will happen later. 14 He
will honor me by revealing my truth to you. 15 Everything that my Father has is mine.
That is why I said that the Spirit is able to reveal my truth to you.”
Jesus told them that after he left they would be sad, but that they would later be
joyful when they saw him again.
John 16:16-33
16 “After a short time I will leave you, and you will not see me. Then a short time
after that you will see me again.” 17 So some of us said to each other, “What does he
mean by saying ‘After a short time you will not see me,’ and ‘A short time after that
you will see me again’? And what does he mean by ‘Because I am going back to my
Father’?” 18 We kept asking each other, “What does he mean by saying ‘After a little
while’? We do not understand what he is saying.”
19 Jesus realized that we wanted to ask him about that. So he said to us, “You are
asking [RHQ] each other what I meant when I said, ‘After a short time you will not see
me, and then a short time after that you will see me again.’ 20 Listen to this carefully:
After I ◄leave you/die►, those who oppose God [MTY] will be happy, but you will be
sad. But later you will stop being sad and you will become joyful. 21 A woman who
is about to bear a child feels pain, because that is what happens [MTY] at that time.
But after her baby is born, she forgets that pain, because she is very joyful that her
child has been born. 22 It will be the same with you. I will soon die and you will be
sad. But after that, I will see you again. Then you will be joyful, and no one will
be able to stop you from being joyful. 23 When that happens, you will not ask me
any questions about anything. Listen to this carefully: After that happens, my Father
will do for you anything you ask, because of his relationship with me [MTY]. 24 Up to
the present time, using my authority you have not asked God to do anything for you
[MTY]. Now keep asking him for things that you need. If you do that, you will receive
them, and then you will be completely joyful.
25 Although I have been speaking these things using figurative language, there will
soon be a time when I will no longer use that kind of language. Instead, I will tell
you plainly ◄about my Father/what my Father wants►. 26 At that time, you will ask
him for things ◄because you belong to me/with my authority► [MTY]. I will not need
to ask my Father to do what you ask. 27 My Father himself loves you because you
have loved me and because you have believed that I came from God my Father, so he
wants you to ask him (OR, so he does not need anyone to persuade him to help you)
28 I came from my Father into this world. Very soon I will be leaving this world and
going back to my Father.”
29 Then we, his disciples, said, “Now you are speaking plainly, without using
figurative language. 30 Now we understand that you know everything. You do notJOHN 16:31
1548
JOHN 17:17
need anyone to ask you questions about anything, because you know what we want to
ask before we ask you. That also leads us to believe that you came from God.”
31 Jesus replied, “Now you [RHQ] say that you believe that I came from God. 32 But
listen! There will soon be a time, and that time is already here, when you will all run
away! Each of you will run away to your own home. You will leave me, and I will
be alone. But I will not really be alone at that time, because my Father is always with
me. 33 I have told you these things in order that you may have inner peace because of
your relationship with me. In this world you will have trouble. But be courageous! I
have defeated those who are opposed to me [MTY], and you can defeat them, too!”
17
Jesus prayed that God would honor him.
John 17:1-5
1 After Jesus said those things, he looked up toward heaven. Then he prayed, “My
Father, it is now the time [MTY] for me to suffer and die. Honor me as I do that, in
order that I may honor you. 2 You gave me authority over all people, in order that
I might enable all those whom you chose to come to me to live eternally. 3 The way
for people to live eternally is for them to know that you are the only true God, and
to know that I, Jesus, am the Messiah, the one you have sent. 4 I have honored you
here on this earth by completing all the work that you gave me to do. 5 My Father,
now honor me when I am with you again, by causing me to have the greatness I had
when I was with you before the world began.”
Jesus prayed that God would protect his disciples.
John 17:6-19
6 “I have revealed what you are like to the people whom you brought to me from
among those who do not belong to you [MTY]. Those who came to me belonged to you,
and you brought them to me. Now they have obeyed your message. 7 Now they know
that everything you have given me, your message and your work, comes from you. 8 I
gave them the message that you gave me, and they have accepted it. They now know
for certain that I came from you. They now believe that you sent me. 9 I am praying
for them. I am not praying for those who do not belong to you [MTY]. Instead, I am
praying for those whom you have brought to me, because they belong to you. 10 All
the disciples that I have belong to you, and all those who belong to you also belong
to me. They have shown how great I am. 11 I will not be staying in the world any
longer. I will be coming back to you. They, however, will be here in the world among
those who are opposed to you. My Holy Father, protect them from spiritual harm by
your power [MTY], the power that you gave me, in order that they may be united as
we are united. 12 While I have been with them, I have completely protected them by
the power [MTY] that you gave me. As a result, only one of them will be eternally
separated from you. He is the one who was doomed to be eternally separated from
you. That has happened to fulfill what a prophet wrote in the Scriptures would happen.
13 Father, now I am about to return to you. I have said these things while I am
still here in the world in order that my disciples may fully experience being joyful,
as I have been joyful. 14 I have given them your message. As a result, those who are
opposed to you [MTY] have hated them, because my disciples do not belong to those
who oppose you [MTY], just like I do not belong to those who oppose you [MTY]. 15 I
am asking you, not that you take them out of this world, but instead that you protect
them from Satan, the evil one. 16 They do not belong to those who are opposed to
you [MTY], just like I also do not belong to them. 17 Set my disciples apart so that theyJOHN 17:18
1549
JOHN 18:10
may ◄completely belong to/serve► you, by enabling them to live in accordance with
what is true. Your message is true. 18 Just like you sent me here into this world, now
I surely will be sending them to other places in [MTY] the world. 19 I dedicate myself
to completely belong to you, in order that they also may truly be dedicated {dedicate
themselves} completely to you.”
Jesus prayed for future believers.
John 17:20-26
20 “I am praying not only for these eleven disciples. I am praying also for those who
will believe in me as a result of hearing their message. 21 My Father, I want all of them
to be united, just like I am united with you because of my relationship with you, and
as you are united with me because of your relationship with me. I also want them to
be united with us. I want that to happen so that those who do not know you [MTY]
may know that you sent me. 22 I have honored my disciples just like you honored me,
in order that they may be united, as we are united. 23 I want them to be united just
like they are united with me and as you are united with me. May they be completely
united, in order that those who do not belong to you [MTY] may know that you sent
me and that you have loved them just like you have loved me.
24 My Father, I want the disciples you have brought to me to some day be with me
in heaven, where I will be. I want them to see my greatness. I want them to see the
greatness you gave me because you loved me. You gave me that greatness before you
created the world.
25 My righteous Father, although the people who do not belong to you [MTY] do not
know what you are like, I know what you are like, and my disciples know that you
sent me. 26 I have revealed to them what you are like, and I will continue to reveal
to them what you are like. I will do that in order that they may love others just like
you love me, and in order that I may be in them by my Spirit.”
18
They seized Jesus in a grove of olive trees.
John 18:1-11
1 After Jesus finished praying, he went across the Kidron Brook, along with us
disciples, to a grove of olive trees.
2 Judas, who was about to enable Jesus’ enemies to seize him, knew that he would
probably be there. He knew that because Jesus often gathered there with us. 3 So Judas
came to that grove. He was leading a troop of Roman soldiers and some Temple guards
who had been sent by the Pharisees and chief priests. They were carrying torches
and lamps and weapons. 4 Jesus knew everything that was about to happen to him.
So as they approached, he stepped forward and asked them, “Who are you looking
for?” 5 They replied to him, “Jesus, the man from Nazareth.” He replied, “That is who
I am.” Judas, the one who was enabling his enemies to seize him, was with them.
6 When Jesus told them, “That is who I am,” they lurched backward and fell down on
the ground because of his power. 7 He asked them again, “Who are you looking for?”
They said, “Jesus, the man from Nazareth.” 8 Jesus replied, “I told you that I am Jesus.
So since I am the one you are looking for, allow these disciples of mine to go.” 9 This
happened in order that when they did what he asked them to do, the words would be
fulfilled that he had prayed, “I will never lose any of those whom God has brought to
me.”
10 Simon Peter had a long dagger. So he drew it and tried to kill the high priest’s
servant, but he only cut off the man’s right ear. The servant’s name was Malchus.JOHN 18:11
1550
JOHN 18:27
11 Jesus said to Peter, “Put your sword back into its sheath! ◄I must endure what my
Father wants me to suffer./Do you not think that I must endure what my Father wants
me to suffer?► [MET, RHQ]”
They took Jesus to be questioned by Annas, the former high priest.
John 18:12-14
12 Then the troop of soldiers, along with their commander and the Jewish Temple
guards, seized Jesus. They tied his hands behind his back. 13 Then they took him first
to Annas, who was previously the high priest. He was the father-in-law of Caiaphas.
Caiaphas was the high priest that year. 14 Caiaphas was the one who previously
advised the Jewish Council that it would be better if one man died for the sake of
the people than for all the people of the Jewish nation to die.
Peter denied that he was Jesus’ disciple.
John 18:15-18
15 Simon Peter and I were following Jesus. Because the high priest knew me, his
doorkeeper permitted me to enter the courtyard. 16 But Peter had to wait outside near
the doorway. However, since I knew the high priest, I went back to the doorway and
spoke to the girl who was guarding the entrance. Then she allowed Peter to come
in. 17 The servant girl who was guarding the doorway said to Peter, “Surely you are
not another disciple of that man they have arrested, are you?” He said, “I am not.”
18 It was cold, so the high priest’s slaves and Temple guards made a charcoal fire and
were standing around it to keep warm. Peter was also standing near it, warming
himself.
The High Priest questioned Jesus.
John 18:19-24
19 While Peter was doing that, the high priest asked Jesus about his disciples and
about what he was teaching people. 20 Jesus replied, “I have always spoken where
many people [MTY, HYP] could hear me. I have taught them in ◄the synagogues/their
meeting places► and in the Temple courtyard, in places where many [HYP] Jews come
together. I have spoken nothing secretly. 21 So ◄why are you asking me questions like
this illegally?/you should not be asking me questions like this illegally!► [RHQ] Ask
the people who heard what I taught! They certainly know what I said!” 22 After Jesus
said that, one of the Temple guards standing near him slapped him on his face. He
said, “◄That is not the way you should answer the high priest!/Is that the way you
should answer the high priest?► [RHQ]” 23 Jesus replied to him, “If I said something
that was contrary to your laws, you could tell me that what I said that was wrong.
But because I said only what was right, ◄you should not be striking me!/why are
you striking me?► [RHQ]” 24 Then after Jesus’ hands were tied {after they tied Jesus
hands} again, Annas sent him to Caiaphas, the high priest.
Peter denied two more times that he knew Jesus.
John 18:25-27
25 As Simon Peter was standing warming himself at the fire, someone else said to
him, “You are not one of that man’s disciples, are you?” He denied that he was, and
said, “I am not.” 26 Later one of the high priest’s servants, a man who was a relative
of the man whose ear Peter had cut off before, said to him, “I saw you with that man
in the grove of olive trees, did I not?” 27 Peter again denied it. Immediately a rooster
crowed, as Jesus had said would happen.
Pilate the governor questioned Jesus.
John 18:28-40JOHN 18:28
1551
JOHN 19:4
28 Then
the Jewish leaders [SYN] led Jesus from the home of Caiaphas to the
headquarters of Pilate, the Roman governor. It was before dawn. Pilate was a
non-Jew, and they thought that if they entered his headquarters, they would become
unacceptable to God {God would reject them}, and as a result they would not be able
to eat the food during the Passover celebration. Because of that, they did not want to
enter Pilate’s headquarters. 29 So Pilate came out to talk to them. He said, “What law
do you say that this man has disobeyed?” 30 They knew that Jesus had not disobeyed
any Roman law, so they did not want to answer him. Instead, they said, “If this man
were not a criminal, we would not have brought him to you!” 31 Then Pilate said
to them, “Take him yourselves, and judge him according to your own laws!” Then
the Jewish leaders [SYN] said, “No! We want him executed, but we want you Romans
to execute him, because we Jews have no right to execute anyone!” 32 The Romans
executed people by nailing them to a cross. So, as a result of what the Jewish leaders
said, it was fulfilled {the Romans would fulfill} what Jesus had said previously about
the way he was going to die.
33 Pilate then went back inside his headquarters. He summoned Jesus. Because the
Jewish leaders had said that Jesus claimed to be a king, Pilate said to Jesus scornfully,
“Are you the king of the Jews?” 34 Jesus replied, “Are you asking that because you
yourself want to know if I claim to be a king, or because ◄someone else/Caiaphas►
said that I claim to be their king?” 35 Pilate replied, “I am not a Jew, so ◄I cannot
understand these matters!/how can I understand these matters?► [RHQ] It was your
fellow Jews and your chief priests who brought you to me! What have you done
to make them want to execute you?” 36 Jesus replied, “It is not people in [MTY] this
world who are making me king. If it was people in this world who were making me
a king, my disciples would have fought in order that the Jewish leaders [SYN] would
be prevented {to prevent the Jewish leaders [SYN]} from seizing me. But it is not
someone here in this world who is making me a king.” 37 Then Pilate said to him, “So
are you saying that you are a king?” Jesus replied, “Yes, what you have said about
my being a king is correct. I was born to become a king, and I came into this world
to tell people the truth about God. Everyone who believes the truth pays attention to
what I say.” 38 Pilate said to him, “How can anyone know what the truth is?”
After he said that, he went outside and talked to the Jewish leaders [SYN] again. He
said to them, “I do not find that he has done anything at all for which I should punish
him. 39 But you Jews customarily, every year during the Passover celebration, ask me
to release for you someone who is in prison. So would you like for me to release for
you the man who you Jews say is your king?” 40 They shouted again, “No, do not
release this man! Instead, release Barrabas!” But Barrabas was in prison because he
was a revolutionist!
19
Pilate finally permitted them to crucify Jesus.
John 19:1-16a
1 Then Pilate took Jesus inside and had soldiers ◄scourge Jesus/strike Jesus with a
whip that had pieces of metal or bone fastened to it►. 2 The soldiers also took some
branches with thorns and wove them to make something like a crown. Then they put
it on his head. They also put a purple robe on him. They did these things to ridicule
him by pretending that he was a king. 3 Then they kept coming to him and saying,
“Hooray for the King of the Jews [IRO]!” and slapping him on his face.
4 Once more Pilate came outside and said to the crowd, “Look! I am bringing him
out to you so that you may know that I do not find that he has done anything forJOHN 19:5
1552
JOHN 19:21
which we should punish him any more.” 5 When Jesus came out, wearing the crown
of thorns and the purple robe, Pilate said to them, “Look at this wretched man!”
6 When the chief priests and Temple guards saw him, they shouted, “Command your
soldiers to kill him by nailing him to a cross! Crucify him!” Pilate, knowing that they
could not legally do it themselves, said to them, “You yourselves take him and nail
him to a cross! As for me, I do not find that he has done anything for which we
should punish him.” 7 The Jewish leaders [SYN] replied, “Our ancestor Moses gave us
the law that says we must kill anyone who claims to be God. This man claims that
he is ◄the Son of/the man who is also► God, so you must have him killed {command
your soldiers to kill him}.” 8 When Pilate heard that, he was more afraid of what
would happen to himself if he commanded the soldiers to kill Jesus. 9 So he took Jesus
back inside the headquarters. He said to Jesus, “Where do you really come from?”
But Jesus did not answer him. 10 So Pilate said to him, “Are you refusing to answer
me? Do you not know that I have authority to release you, and I also have authority
to have you crucified {command my soldiers to crucify you}?” 11 Jesus replied, “The
only authority you have is what has been given to you by God [MTY] {what God [MTY]
has given you}. The high priest put me into your hands. He has done to me what he
wanted to do, and you do not really want to do it. So he is guilty of committing a
greater sin than you are.”
12 Because of that, Pilate kept trying to release Jesus. But the Jewish leaders [SYN],
threatening to report to the Emperor that Pilate was not going to punish a man who
claimed he was a king, continued to shout, “Anyone who claims that he is a king is
opposing the Emperor! So if you release this man, we will make sure that the Emperor
learns about it, and then he will not consider you as his friend!” 13 When Pilate heard
that, he brought Jesus out again. He sat down at the place where he made decisions
about punishing people. The place was called {People called it} The Stone Pavement.
In the Aramaic language its name was Gabbatha. 14 It was almost noontime, on the
day that they prepared things for the Passover celebration (OR, the day before the
Sabbath during the Passover celebration).
Pilate said to the Jewish leaders [SYN], ridiculing them, “Look at your king!” 15 They
shouted, “Take him away! Take him away! Have him crucified {Command your
soldiers to nail him to a cross}!” Pilate said to them, “He is your king! Do you really
want me to tell my soldiers to nail him to a cross?” The chief priests replied, “The
Emperor is our king! We do not have any other king!” 16 Then at last Pilate agreed
to do what they wanted, and he told the soldiers to crucify Jesus.
They nailed Jesus to a cross.
John 19:16b-24
Then the soldiers took Jesus away. 17 As they left, he himself was carrying the cross
on which they were going to nail him. They went to a place called The Place of a Skull.
In the Aramaic language it is called {they call it} Golgotha. 18 There, after removing
most of his clothes, the soldiers nailed him to the cross. They also nailed two other
criminals to crosses. There was one on each side, and Jesus was in the middle.
19 Pilate also had them write on a board a notice that stated why they were executing
him, and fasten it to the cross. But all they wrote was ‘Jesus from Nazareth, the King
of the Jews’. 20 Many Jews were able to read this sign, because the place where Jesus
was nailed {where they nailed Jesus} to the cross was very close to Jerusalem, where
many people had come for the celebration, and because it was written {they wrote it}
in three languages: Hebrew, Latin, and Greek. 21 So the Jewish priests went back to
Pilate and protested, saying to him, “Change what they have written from ‘The KingJOHN 19:22
1553
JOHN 19:37
of the Jews’ to ‘This man said that he is the King of the Jews’!” 22 Pilate replied, “What
I told them to write is what they have written, and I will not change it.”
23 After the soldiers nailed Jesus to the cross, they took his clothes and divided them
into four parts, one part for each soldier. But they kept his cloak separate. This cloak
was without seam, woven from top to bottom, one piece of cloth. 24 So they said to
each other, “Let’s not tear it. Instead, let’s decide ◄by throwing lots/by gambling► who
will get it.” So that is what the soldiers did. As a result, these words were fulfilled
{they fulfilled these words} that the Psalmist had written in Scripture,
They divided most of my clothes among themselves.
They cast lots for one piece of my clothing.
Jesus entrusted his mother to John’s care.
John 19:25-27
25 Near the cross where they had nailed Jesus stood his mother, his mother’s sister,
Mary the wife of Clopas, and another Mary, the woman from Magdala village. 26 Jesus
saw his mother standing there. He also saw me standing nearby. Then he said to
his mother, “This man will now be like your son.” 27 And he said to me, “Treat this
woman as [MET] your mother.” So from that time I took her to my home and took
care of her.
Jesus died.
John 19:28-37
28 Later, Jesus knew that everything that God sent him to do had now been completed
{that he had now completed everything that God sent him to do}, but he knew that
something else that was written in the Scriptures had to be fulfilled {that he had to
fulfill something else that they had written in the Scriptures}. So he said, “I am thirsty!”
29 There was a jar of sour wine there. So someone took a stalk of a plant called hyssop
and fastened a sponge to it. Then he dipped the sponge into the wine and lifted it up to
Jesus’ lips. 30 When Jesus tasted the sour wine, he shouted, “I have finished all that I
came to do!” Then he bowed his head and ◄died/handed over his spirit to God►.
31 That was the day that they prepared everything for their ◄Sabbath/day of rest►.
The next day was a special day of rest, because it was the day of rest during the
Passover celebration. The Jewish leaders [SYN] did not want the bodies of the three
men to remain on the cross during their ◄Sabbath/day of rest► because leaving bodies
hanging overnight would be contrary to their Jewish laws. So they went to Pilate and
asked him to command that the legs of the three men on the crosses be broken {the
soldiers to break the legs of the three men on the crosses}, so that they would die quickly.
Then their bodies could be taken down and buried {someone could take down their
bodies and bury them}. 32 So, after Pilate agreed, the soldiers went and broke the legs
of the first man whom they had nailed on a cross near Jesus. Then they broke the
legs of the second man. 33 But when they came to Jesus, they saw that he was dead
already. So they did not break his legs. 34 Instead, one of the soldiers pierced Jesus’
side with a spear to make sure that Jesus was dead. Immediately blood clots and other
liquid flowed out, which showed that Jesus was really dead. 35 I, John, saw this myself,
and what I am writing is true. I know that I am telling the truth, and I am saying
this in order that you may believe in (OR, my testimony about) Jesus. 36 These things
happened in order that these words would be fulfilled {to fulfill these words} that
are written in Scripture: “Not one of his bones will be broken {No one will break any
of his bones}.”
37 And they fulfilled another Scripture passage that has these words: ‘They will look
on the one whom they have pierced’.JOHN 19:38
1554
JOHN 20:16
Joseph and others put Jesus’ body in a cave.
John 19:38-42
38 Later, Joseph, from Arimathea town, went to Pilate and asked Pilate to allow him
to take Jesus’ body down from the cross. Joseph was a disciple of Jesus, but he did
not tell anyone that, because he was afraid of the other Jewish leaders [SYN]. Pilate
permitted him to take Jesus’ body, so he went, along with others, and they took Jesus’
body down from the cross. 39 Nicodemus was one of them. He was the man who
previously went to visit Jesus at night. Nicodemus bought an expensive mixture of
myrrh and aloe spices to put on the body. It weighed about ◄75 pounds/35 kilograms►.
40 They took the body of Jesus and wrapped strips of linen cloth around it, putting the
spices in with the strips of cloth. They did this according to the Jewish customs about
burying bodies in tombs. 41 Close to the place where Jesus was crucified {where they
nailed Jesus to the cross} there was a grove of trees, and at the edge of that grove was
a new burial cave. Nobody had ever been put in that cave previously. 42 The Jewish
day of rest would start at sunset, and they had to finish burying his body before then.
So, since that cave was nearby, they laid Jesus’ body there and rolled a huge stone in
front of the entrance.
20
On Sunday morning they discovered that Jesus’ tomb was empty.
John 20:1-9
1 Early on Sunday morning, while it was still dark, Mary, the woman from Magdala
village, went to the burial cave with some other women. They saw that the stone had
been removed {that someone had removed the stone} from the entrance to the cave.
2 So Mary ran to where Simon Peter and I were staying in Jerusalem. She said to us,
“They have taken the Lord’s body out of the burial cave, and we do not know where
they have put it!” 3 So Peter and I started going to the cave. 4 We were both running,
but I ran faster than Peter and got there first. 5 I stooped down at the entrance and
looked inside. I saw the strips of linen cloth lying there where his body had been laid,
but I did not go inside. 6 Then Simon Peter, who was running behind me, arrived.
He went inside the cave. He, too, saw the strips of linen cloth lying there. 7 He also
saw the cloth that they had wrapped around Jesus’ head. It had been folded and put
{Someone had folded it and put it} aside, separate from the linen strips. 8 Then I also
went inside. I saw those things and I believed that Jesus had truly become alive again.
9 Before this happened, we did not understand from what the prophets had written in
the Scriptures, that he had to become alive again after he died.
Jesus appeared to Mary from Magdala.
John 20:10-18
10 Then we two disciples went back to where we were staying. In the meantime,
Mary returned to the cave. 11 As she stood outside the cave crying, she stooped down
to look inside the cave. 12 She saw two angels in very white clothing, sitting at the
place where Jesus’ body had been laid. One was where his head had been, and the
other was where his feet had been. 13 They said to her, “Woman, why are you crying?”
She said to them, “They have taken away the body of my Lord, and I do not know
where they have put it!” 14 After she said that, she turned around and saw Jesus
standing there, but she did not know that it was Jesus. 15 He said to her, “Woman,
why are you crying? Who are you looking for?” Thinking that he was the gardener,
she said to him, “Sir, if you have taken his body away, tell me where you have put
it. Then I will get it and bury it properly.” 16 Jesus said to her, “Mary!” She turnedJOHN 20:17
1555
JOHN 21:2
toward him again and recognized him. Then she exclaimed in Aramaic, “Rabboni!”
which means ‘Teacher’. 17 Jesus said to her, “Stop clinging to me, because I have not
yet returned to my Father. Go to my disciples and tell them, ‘I am about to return to
my Father and your Father, to the one who is my God and your God’.” 18 So Mary
went to where we disciples were and told us that she had seen the Lord alive again.
She also told us what Jesus said that she should tell us.
Jesus appeared to many of his disciples.
John 20:19-25
19 On that Sunday evening we disciples gathered together. The doors were locked
{We locked the doors} because we were afraid that the Jewish leaders [SYN] might
arrest us. Suddenly Jesus appeared miraculously and stood among us! He said to us,
“May God give you inner peace!” 20 After he said that, he showed us the wounds in his
hands and his side. We were very happy when we saw the Lord! 21 Jesus said to us
again, “May God give you peace! Just like my Father sent me, now I am sending you
to proclaim my message.” 22 After saying that, he breathed on us and said, “Receive
the Holy Spirit! 23 If you forgive people for their having sinned, God will already have
forgiven them. If you do not forgive them, God has not forgiven them.”
24 One of us disciples, Thomas, the one whom we called The Twin, was not with
us when Jesus appeared to us. 25 When the rest of us told him that we had seen the
Lord, he said to us, “If I do not see the marks of the nails in his hands and put my
fingers in the place where the nails were, and put my hands into the place in his side
where the soldier thrust the spear, I will certainly not believe that he was the one you
saw!”
Jesus appeared to all of his disciples, including Thomas.
John 20:26-29
26 A week later we were in the house again. This time Thomas was with us.
Although the doors had been locked {we had locked the doors}, Jesus again appeared
miraculously and stood among us. He said, “May God give peace to you!” 27 Then he
showed Thomas his hands and said to him, “Put your finger here! Look at the wounds
in my hands! Reach out your hand and put it in the wound in my side! Stop doubting
[LIT/DOU]! Instead, believe that I am alive again!” 28 Thomas answered him, “You are
truly my Lord and my God!” 29 Jesus said to him, “Because you have seen me, you
have believed that about me. But God is truly pleased with those who have believed
that about me, even though they have not seen me!”
John stated the purpose of this book.
John 20:30-31
30 We disciples saw Jesus perform many other miracles, but I have not written about
them in this book. 31 But these that I have written about, I have written about them in
order that you may believe that Jesus is the Messiah, ◄the Son of God/the man who
is also God►, and in order that you may have eternal life by trusting ◄in him/in what
he has done for you► [MTY].
21
Jesus appeared to seven disciples and enabled them miraculously to catch a lot of
fish.
John 21:1-14
1 After that, Jesus showed himself to us disciples when we were at Tiberias Lake,
which is another name for Galilee Lake. This is what happened: 2 Simon Peter, ThomasJOHN 21:3
1556
JOHN 21:22
who was called {whom we called} The Twin, Nathaniel from Cana town in Galilee,
my older brother and I, and two other disciples were together. 3 Simon Peter said
to us, “I am going to try to catch some fish.” We said, “We will go with you.” So
we went down to the lake and got into the boat. But that night we caught nothing.
4 Early the next morning, Jesus stood on the shore, but we did not know that it was
Jesus. 5 He called out to us, “My friends, you have not caught any fish, have you?” We
answered, “You are correct, we have not caught any.” 6 He said to us, “Throw your
net out from the right-hand side of the boat! Then you will find some!” We did that,
and we caught so many fish in the net that we were unable to pull the net into the
boat! 7 But I knew that it was Jesus, so I said to Peter, “It is the Lord!” Peter had taken
off his cloak while he was working, but as soon as he heard me say “It is the Lord!”
he wrapped his cloak around himself and jumped into the water and swam to shore.
8 The rest of us came to the shore in the boat, pulling the net full of fish. We were not
far from shore, only about 100 yards/meters. 9 When we got to the shore, we saw that
there was a fire of burning coals there, with a large fish on the fire, and some buns.
10 Jesus said to us, “Bring some of the fish that you have just caught!” 11 Simon Peter
got in the boat and dragged the net to the shore. It was full of large fish. There were
153 of them! But in spite of there being so many fish, the net was not torn. 12 Jesus
said to us, “Come and eat some breakfast!” None of us dared to ask him, “Who are
you?” because we knew that it was the Lord. 13 Jesus took the buns and gave them
to us. He did the same with the fish. 14 That was the third time that Jesus appeared
to us disciples after God caused him to become alive again after he died.
Jesus asked Peter three times if he really loved Jesus. Then Jesus told Peter how Peter
would die.
John 21:15-19
15 When we had finished eating, Jesus said to Simon Peter, “John’s son Simon, do
you love me more than these other disciples do?” Peter said to him, “Yes, Lord, you
know that you are dear to me (OR, that I love you).” Jesus said, “Give to those who
belong to me what they need spiritually, like [MET] a shepherd provides food for his
lambs.” 16 Jesus said to him again, “John’s son Simon, do you love me?” He replied,
“Yes, Lord, you know that you are dear to me (OR, that I love you).” Jesus said to
him, “Take care of those who belong to me, like [MET] a shepherd takes care of his
sheep.” 17 Jesus said to him a third time, “John’s son Simon, am I really dear to you
(OR, do you really love me)?” Peter was grieved because Jesus asked him this three
times, and because the third time he changed the question. He said, “Lord, you know
everything. You know that you are dear to me (OR, that I love you).” Jesus said, “Give
to those who belong to me what they need spiritually, as [MET] a shepherd provides
food for his sheep. 18 Now listen to this carefully: When you were young, you put
your clothes on by yourself, and you went wherever you wanted to go. But when you
are old, you will stretch out your arms, and someone will fasten them with a rope and
will lead you to a place where you do not want to go.” 19 Jesus said this to indicate
how Peter would die ◄violently/on a cross► in order to honor God. Then Jesus said
to him, “Keep being my faithful disciple until you die.”
Peter asked Jesus what would happen to John.
John 21:20-23
20 Peter turned around and saw that I was following them. I was the one who leaned
close to Jesus during the Passover meal and said, “Lord, who is going to enable your
enemies to seize you?” 21 When Peter saw me, he asked, “Lord, what is going to
happen to him?” 22 Jesus said to him, “If I want him to remain alive until I return,JOHN 21:23
1557
JOHN 21:25
◄that is not your concern!/what is that to you?► [RHQ] You be my faithful disciple!”
23 Some of the other believers heard a report of what Jesus had said about me, and
they thought that Jesus meant that I would not die. But Jesus did not say that I would
not die. He said only, “If I want him to remain alive until I return, ◄that is not your
concern!/what is that to you?► [RHQ]”
A statement about the truth and accuracy of this document.
John 21:24-25
24 I, John, am the disciple who has seen all these things and I have written them
down.
My fellow apostles and I know that what I have written is true.
25 Jesus did many other things. If they would all be written {If people would write
them all} down in detail, I suppose that the whole world would not have enough space
[HYP] to contain the books that would be written {that they would write} about what
he did.ACTS 1:1
1558
ACTS 1:11
This book contains the account of the first Christians. We
call this book
Acts
Acts 1:1-3
Luke referred to the Gospel he had written to Theophilus.
1 Dear Theophilus,
In my first book that I wrote for you, I wrote about many of the things that Jesus
did and taught 2 until the day on which he was taken {God took him} up to heaven.
Before he went to heaven, saying what the Holy Spirit told him, he told the apostles
whom he had chosen the things that he wanted them to know. 3 After he had suffered
and died on the cross, he became alive again. As he appeared to them often during
the next 40 days, the apostles saw him many times. He proved to them in many ways
that he was alive again. He talked with them about how God would rule [MET] the
lives of people who accepted him as their king.
Jesus commanded his apostles to wait for the Holy Spirit.
Acts 1:4-5
4 One time while he was with them, he told them, “Do not leave Jerusalem yet.
Instead, wait here until my Father sends his Spirit [MTY] to you, as he promised to do.
You have heard me speak to you about that. 5 John baptized people in water because
they said that they wanted to change their lives, but after a few days [LIT] God will
put the Holy Spirit within you(pl) to truly change your lives.”
Jesus said that they would tell about him everywhere, and then he ascended to
heaven.
Acts 1:6-9
6 One day when the apostles met together with Jesus, they asked him, “Lord, will
you (sg) now become the King [MET] over us Israelite people like King David, who
ruled long ago?” (OR, “Lord, will you (sg) now defeat the Romans and restore the
kingdom to us Israelite people?”) 7 He replied to them, “You do not need to know
the time periods and days when that will happen. My Father alone has decided when
he will make me king. 8 But you do need to know that the Holy Spirit will make you
spiritually strong when he comes to live in you. Then you will powerfully tell people
about me in Jerusalem and in all the other places in Judea district, in Samaria district,
and in places far away all over [IDM] the world.” 9 After he said that, he was taken
{God took him} up to heaven, while they were watching. He went up into a cloud
[PRS], which prevented them from seeing him any more.
Angels told the apostles that Jesus would return later.
Acts 1:10-11
10 While the apostles were still staring towards the sky as he was going up, suddenly
two men who were wearing white clothes stood beside them. They were angels. 11 One
of them said, “You men from Galilee district, ◄you do not need to stand here any longer
looking up at the sky!/why do you still stand here looking up at the sky?► [RHQ] Some
day this same Jesus, whom God took from you up to heaven, will come back to earth.
He will return in the same manner as you just now saw him when he went up to
heaven, but he will not return now.”ACTS 1:12
1559
ACTS 1:23
The apostles and other believers often prayed together.
Acts 1:12-14
12 Then after the two angels left, the apostles returned to Jerusalem from Olive Tree
Hill, which was about ◄a half mile/one kilometer► [MTY] from Jerusalem. 13 When
they entered the city, they went upstairs to the room in the house where they were
staying. Those who were there included Peter, John, James, Andrew, Philip, Thomas,
Bartholomew, Matthew, another James the son of Alphaeus, Simon who belonged to
the group that wanted to expel the Romans, and Judas the son of another man named
James. 14 All these apostles agreed concerning the things about which they continually
were praying together. Others who prayed with them included the women who had
accompanied Jesus, Mary who was Jesus’ mother, and his younger brothers.
Peter told them why someone must replace Judas.
Acts 1:15-17
15 During those days Peter stood up among his fellow believers. There were at that
place a group of about 120 of Jesus’ followers. Peter said, 16 “My fellow believers,
there are words that King David wrote [MTY] in the Scriptures long ago that needed
to be fulfilled {to happen as he said they would}. The Holy Spirit, who knew that Judas
would be the one who would fulfill those words, told David what to write. 17 Although
Judas had been chosen {Jesus had chosen Judas}, along with the rest of us (exc) to
serve as an apostle, Judas was the person who led to Jesus the people who seized
him.”
How Judas died.
Acts 1:18-19
18 The Jewish leaders gave Judas money when he promised to treacherously/wickedly
betray Jesus. Later Judas returned that money to them. When Judas hanged himself, his
body fell down to the ground. His abdomen burst open, and all his intestines spilled
out. So the Jewish leaders bought a field using that money. 19 All the people who
reside in Jerusalem heard about that, so they called that field in their own Aramaic
language, Akeldama, which means ‘Field of Blood’, because it was where someone
bled and died.
Peter quoted from the Psalms about Judas.
Acts 1:20
20 Peter also said, “I perceive that what happened to Judas is like what the writer of
Psalms desired to happen: ‘May his house become deserted, and may there be no one
to live in it.’ (OR, ‘Judge him, Lord, so that neither he nor anyone else may live in his
house!)’ And it seems that these other words that David wrote also refer to Judas: ‘Let
someone else take over his work as a leader.’ ”
Peter concluded that they needed to choose a man to replace Judas.
Acts 1:21-22
21 “So it is necessary for us apostles to choose a man to replace Judas. He must be
one who accompanied [MTY] us all the time when the Lord Jesus was with us. 22 That
would be from the time when John the Baptizer baptized Jesus until the day when
Jesus was taken {when God took Jesus} from us up to heaven. He must be one who
saw Jesus alive again after he died.”
Jesus’ followers prayed and then chose Matthias to replace Judas.
Acts 1:23-26
23 So the apostles and other believers suggested the names of two men who qualified.
One man was Joseph, who was called {whom people called} Barsabbas (OR, Joseph
Barsabbas) who also had the Roman name Justus. The other man was Matthias.ACTS 1:24-25
1560
ACTS 2:13
24-25 Then they prayed like this:
“Lord Jesus, Judas stopped being an apostle. He
died and went to the place where he deserved to be [EUP]. So we(exc) need to choose
someone to replace Judas in order that he can serve you(sg) by becoming an apostle.
You (sg) know what everyone is really like. So please show us which of these two
men you have chosen.” 26 Then they cast lots to choose between the two of them,
and the lot fell for Matthias. (OR, Then one of the apostles shook in a container small
objects/stones that they had marked to determine which man God had chosen. And
the small object/stone that they had marked for Matthias fell out of the container). So
Matthias was considered {they considered Matthias} to be an apostle along with the
other eleven apostles.
2
The Holy Spirit came and enabled the disciples to speak other languages.
Acts 2:1-4
1 On the day when the Jews were celebrating the Pentecost festival, the believers were
all together in one place in Jerusalem. 2 Suddenly they heard a noise coming from the
sky that sounded like a strong wind. Everyone in the entire house where they were
sitting heard the noise. 3 Then they saw what looked like flames of fire. These flames
separated from one another, and one of them came down on the head of each of
the believers. 4 Then all of the believers were ◄completely controlled/empowered►
by the Holy Spirit {the Holy Spirit ◄completely controlled/empowered► all of the
believers}, and he enabled them to begin speaking other languages [MTY] that they
had not learned.
Jews from many places were amazed to hear their native languages spoken by the
believers.
Acts 2:5-13
5 At that time many Jews were staying in Jerusalem to celebrate the Pentecost festival.
They were people who always tried to obey the Jewish laws. They had come from many
different [HYP] countries. 6 When they heard that loud noise like a wind, a crowd
came together to the place where the believers were. The crowd ◄was amazed/did
not know what to think►, because each of them was hearing one of the believers
speaking in that person’s own language. 7 They were completely amazed, and they
said to each other, “All these men who are speaking have [RHQ] always resided in
Galilee district, so they would not know our languages. 8 ◄We(inc) do not understand
how these men can speak our own native languages!/How can these men speak our
own native languages?► [RHQ] But all of us hear them doing that 9 Some of us are
from the regions of Parthia and Media and Elam, and others of us reside in the regions
of Mesopotamia, Judea, Cappadocia, Pontus and Asia. 10 There are some from Phrygia
and Pamphylia, Egypt, and the regions in Libya that are near Cyrene city. There are
others of us who are here visiting Jerusalem from Rome. 11 They include native Jews as
well as non-Jews who have accepted what we Jews believe. And others of us are from
Crete Island and from the region of Arabia. So how is it that these people are speaking
our languages [MTY], telling us about ◄the great/the mighty things► that God has
done?” 12 All those people were amazed, and did not know what to think about what
was happening. So they asked one another, “What does this mean?” 13 But some of
them ◄made fun of/laughed at► those who believed in Jesus. They said, “These people
are talking like this because they are drunk!”
Peter said that the prophet Joel foretold what the Holy Spirit would do.
Acts 2:14-21ACTS 2:14
1561
ACTS 2:30
14 So Peter stood up with the other eleven apostles and spoke loudly to the crowd of
people, saying, “My fellow Jews and you others who are staying in Jerusalem, listen
to me, all of you, and I will explain to you what is happening! 15 Some of you think
that we(exc) are drunk, but we are not drunk. It is only nine o’clock in the morning,
and people here never get drunk this early in the day! 16 Instead, what has happened
to us is the miraculous thing that the prophet Joel wrote about long ago. Joel wrote:
God says, 17 ‘During the last/final days before I judge all people, I will give my
Spirit abundantly/generously to people [SYN] everywhere. As a result, your sons
and daughters will tell people messages from me, the young men among you will see
visions from me, and the old men among you will have dreams that I will give them.
18 During those days I will abundantly/generously give my Spirit even to men and
women believers who are my slaves/servants, so they can tell people messages from
me. 19 I will cause amazing things to happen in the sky, and I will do miracles on the
earth that will show that I am powerful. Here on the earth [CHI] I will cause wars with
blood, fire and thick/dark smoke everywhere. 20 In the sky the sun will appear dark
to people and the moon will appear red to them. Those things will happen before the
important and splendid/amazing day [MTY] when I, the Lord God, will come to judge
everyone. 21 Before that time, all those who ask me [MTY] to save them from the guilt
of their sins will be saved {I, the Lord, will save all those who ask me [MTY] to save
them from the guilt of their sins.}’ ”
Peter said, “You killed Jesus but God caused him to live again.”
Acts 2:22-24
22 Peter continued, “My fellow Israelites, listen to me! When Jesus from Nazareth
town lived among you, God proved to you that he had sent him by enabling him to
do many amazing miracles. You yourselves know that this is true. 23 Even though you
knew that, you turned this man Jesus over to his enemies. However, God had already
planned for that, and he knew all about it. Then you urged men [SYN] who do not
obey God’s law to kill Jesus. They did that by nailing him to a cross. 24 He suffered
terribly when he died, but God caused him to become alive again. God did not let him
continue to be dead, because it was not possible for him [PRS] to remain dead.”
David foretold that the Messiah would rejoice about becoming alive again.
Acts 2:25-28
25 “Long ago King David wrote what the Messiah said,
“ knew that you, Lord God, would always be near me. You are right beside [MTY]
me, so I will not be afraid of those who want to harm me. 26 Because of that I [SYN]
joyfully praise you, O God. And I am completely confident that you(sg) will ◄cause my
body to become alive again/raise me from the dead►. 27 You will not allow my spirit to
remain in the place where the dead are. You will not even let my body decay, because
I am devoted to you and always obey you. 28 You have told me that you will cause my
body to become alive again. You will make me very happy because you will be with
me forever.”
Peter explained that David wrote that the Messiah would become alive again.
Acts 2:29-31
29 Peter continued, “My fellow Jews, I can tell you confidently that our royal ancestor,
King David, died, and that his body was buried {that people buried his body}. And
the place where they buried his body is still here today. 30 So we(inc) know that David
was not speaking those words about himself. But because he was a prophet, he spoke
about the Messiah. David knew that God had strongly promised him that he would
cause one of his descendants to become king [MTY] like David was king. (OR, toACTS 2:31
1562
ACTS 2:45
be the Messiah who would rule God’s people like David had ruled them.) 31 David
knew beforehand what God would do, so he was able to say that God would cause
the Messiah to live again after he died. He said that God would not let the Messiah
remain in the place of the dead, nor let his body decay.”
Peter said, “Jesus has abundantly given us the Holy Spirit, shown by what you see
and hear.”
Acts 2:32-35
32 “After this man Jesus had died, God caused him to become alive again. All of
us(exc), his followers, have seen and tell people that Jesus has become alive again.
33 God has greatly honored Jesus by causing him to rule right beside him [MTY] in
heaven. Jesus has received the Holy Spirit from God his Father, just like God promised.
So Jesus has generously/abundantly given us the Holy Spirit, and he has shown that by
what you are seeing and hearing. 34 We(inc) know that David was not speaking about
himself because David did not go up into heaven as Jesus did. Besides that, David
himself said this about the Messiah:
The Lord God said to my Lord the Messiah, ‘Reign here beside me, 35 while I completely
defeat [MTY] your enemies.’ ”
Peter said, “Know surely that God has made this Jesus both Lord and Messiah.”
Acts 2:36
36 Peter concluded, “So I want you and all other Israelites [MTY] to acknowledge
that God has caused this Jesus to be both our Lord/Ruler and the Messiah. But God
considers that you are the ones who nailed Jesus to a cross.”
Peter told them to repent, and said that believers would baptize them.
Acts 2:37-40
37 When the people heard what Peter said, they felt very guilty [IDM]. So they asked
him and the other apostles, “Fellow-countrymen, what should we (exc) do so that God
will forgive us?”
38 Peter answered them, “Each of you should turn away from your sinful behavior.
Then we(exc) will baptize you, if you now believe in Jesus Christ. Then God will
give you the Holy Spirit. 39 God has promised to do that [MTY] for you and your
descendants, and for all others who believe in him, even those who live far away from
here. The Lord our God will give his Spirit to everyone whom he invites to become his
people!” 40 Peter spoke much more and spoke strongly/forcefully to them. He pleaded
with them, “Ask God to save you so that he will not punish you when he punishes these
evil people who have rejected Jesus!”
Many people became believers and joined the other believers.
Acts 2:41-42
41 So the people who believed Peter’s message were baptized. There were about
3,000 [SYN] who joined the group of believers that day. 42 They continually obeyed
what the apostles taught, and they very frequently met together with the other
believers. And they continually ate together and celebrated the Lord’s Supper, and
continually prayed together.
The apostles performed miracles, all the believers shared everything, and the Lord
helped them.
Acts 2:43-47
43 All the people [SYN] who were in Jerusalem were greatly revering God because
the apostles were frequently doing many kinds of miraculous things. 44 All of those
who believed in Jesus were united and regularly met together. They were also sharing
everything that they had with one another. 45 From time to time some of them soldACTS 2:46
1563
ACTS 3:14
some of their land and some of the other things that they owned, and they would
give some of the money from what they sold to others among them, according to what
they needed. 46 Every day they continued meeting together in the temple area. And
every day they gladly and generously shared their food [SYN] with each other, as
they ate together and celebrated the Lord’s Supper in their houses. 47 As they did so,
they were praising God, and all the other people in Jerusalem were thinking favorably
about them. As those things were happening, every day the Lord Jesus increased the
number of people who were being saved {whom he was saving} from the guilt of
their sins.
3
Peter healed a lame man, so the people were amazed.
Acts 3:1-8
1 One day Peter and John were going to the Temple courtyard. It was three o’clock
in the afternoon, which was the time when people prayed there publicly. 2 There was
a man there who had been lame from the time he was born. He was sitting by the gate
called Beautiful Gate, at the entrance to the Temple area. People put him there every
day, so that he could ask those who were entering or leaving the temple courtyard to
give him some money.
3 As Peter and John were about to enter the Temple courtyard, the lame man saw
them and asked them several times to give him some money. (OR, The lame man said
to them several times, “Please give me some money!”) 4 As Peter and John looked
directly at him, Peter said to him, “Look at us!” 5 So he looked directly at them,
expecting to get some money from them. 6 Then Peter said to him, “I do not have
any money [MTY], but what I can do, I will do for you. Jesus Christ, who was from
Nazareth town, has authorized [MTY] me to heal you! So get up and walk!” 7 Then
Peter grasped the man’s right hand and helped him to stand up. Immediately the
man’s feet and ankles became strong. 8 He jumped up and began to walk! Then he
entered the Temple area with them, walking and leaping and praising God!
The people were amazed.
Acts 3:9-10
9 All the people there saw that man walking and praising God. 10 They recognized
that he was the man who used to sit at the Beautiful Gate in the Temple courtyard
and ask people for money! So all the people there were greatly amazed at what had
happened to him. 11 As the man clung to Peter and John, all the people were so
surprised that they did not know what to think So they ran to the two apostles at the
place in the Temple courtyard that is called {that people call} Solomon’s Porch.
Peter explained that Jesus healed the man, and they should repent.
Acts 3:12-16
12 When Peter saw that, he said to the crowd, “Fellow Israelites, ◄you should not
be surprised about what has happened to this man!/why are you so surprised about
what has happened to this man?► [RHQ] And you should not stare at us, either! You
seem to [RHQ] think that the two of us enabled this man to walk because we (exc)
ourselves are powerful or because we please God very much! 13 So I will tell you what
is really happening. Our ancestors, including Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob, worshipped
God. And now he has greatly honored Jesus, who always served him. Your leaders
brought Jesus to the governor, Pilate, so that his soldiers would kill him. And God
considers that in front of Pilate you were the ones who rejected Jesus as your king,
after Pilate had decided that he should release Jesus. 14 Although Jesus always did
what was right/just and good, you rejected him. Pilate wanted to release him, butACTS 3:15
1564
ACTS 4:4
you urgently asked Pilate to release ◄a murderer/someone who had killed people►!
15 God considers that you killed Jesus, the one who gives people eternal life. But God
has greatly honored him ◄by causing him to become alive again after he died/by
raising him from the dead►. Many of us saw him after that, and now we (exc) are
telling you about it. 16 It is because we two trusted in what Jesus [MTY, PRS] could do,
that he made this man, whom you see and know, strong again. Yes, it is because we
(exc) trusted in Jesus that he has completely healed this man for all of you to see.”
Peter told the people to repent.
Acts 3:17-26
17 “Now, my fellow-countrymen, I know that you and your leaders did that to Jesus
because you and they did not know that he was the Messiah. 18 However, your putting
him to death was what God had predicted that people would do. Long ago he told all
the prophets [MTY] to write what people would do to the Messiah. They wrote that the
Messiah, whom God would send, would suffer and die. 19 So, turn away from your
sinful behavior and ask God to help you do what pleases him, in order that he may
completely forgive you for your sins. 20 If you do that, there will be times when you
will know that the Lord God is helping you. And some day he will again send back to
earth the Messiah, whom he appointed for you. That person is Jesus. 21 Jesus must
stay in heaven until the time when God will cause all that he has created to become
new. Long ago God promised to do that, and he chose holy prophets to tell that to
people. 22 For example, the prophet Moses said this about the Messiah: ‘The Lord ◄your
God/the God whom you worship► will cause someone to become a prophet to tell you
God’s message. God will send him as he sent me, and he will be from among your own
people. You must listen to everything that this prophet tells you and obey him [SYN].
23 Those who do not listen to that prophet and obey him will no longer belong to God’s
people, and God will get rid of them’.” 24 Peter continued, “All the prophets have told
about what would happen during the time [MTY] in which we(inc) are living. Those
prophets include Samuel and all the others who later also spoke about these events
before they happened. 25 You as well as we(exc) are the people to whom God sent the
Messiah, as the prophets said [MTY] that he would. And when God strongly promised
to bless our ancestors, he also surely promised to bless you. He said to Abraham
concerning the Messiah, ‘I will bless all people on the earth as a result of what your
descendant will do.’ ” 26 Peter concluded, “So when God sent to the earth ◄Jesus, the
one who always obeys him/his servant Jesus►, he sent him first to you Israelites to
bless you. God will enable you to stop doing what is wicked and to start doing what
pleases him.”
4
Jewish leaders arrested Peter and John, but many people became believers.
Acts 4:1-4
1 Meanwhile, in the temple courtyard, there were some priests, the officer who was in
charge of the temple police, and also some [SYN] Sadducee sect members. These men
came to Peter and John while the two of them were speaking to the people. 2 These
men were very angry, because the two apostles were teaching the people about Jesus.
What they were telling the people was that because ◄God caused Jesus to become
alive again/God raised Jesus from the dead►, God would cause other people who had
died to become alive again. 3 So those officials seized Peter and John. Then they put
them in jail. They had to wait until the next day to question Peter and John, because
it was already evening and it was contrary to their Jewish law to question people at
night. 4 However, many people who had heard the message from Peter believed inACTS 4:5
1565
ACTS 4:17
Jesus. (OR, But many people had already believed in Jesus, because they had heard
the message from Peter.) So the number of men who believed in Jesus increased to
about five 5,000.
Jewish leaders questioned Peter and John about healing the lame man.
Acts 4:5-7
5 The next day the supreme priest summoned the other chief priests, the teachers
of the Jewish laws, and the other members of the Jewish Council, and they gathered
together in one place in Jerusalem. 6 Annas, the former supreme priest, Caiaphas
who was the new supreme priest, two other former supreme priests whose names were
John and Alexander, and other men who were related to the supreme priest were
there. 7 They commanded guards to bring Peter and John into the courtroom [MTY]
and have them stand in front of them. Then one of the leaders questioned the two of
them, saying, “Who do you two claim gave you the power to heal this man? And who
authorized [MTY] you to do this [DOU]?”
Peter told them that Jesus healed the man and only Jesus could save people.
Acts 4:8-12
8 So as the Holy Spirit completely controlled Peter, he said to them, “You fellow
Israelites who rule us and all of you other elders, listen! 9 Today you are questioning
us concerning our doing something good for a man who was crippled, and you asked
us how he was healed. 10 So we(exc) want you and all of our other fellow Israelites to
know this: It is because Jesus the Messiah [MTY] from Nazareth healed this man that
he is able to stand here. God considers that it was you who nailed Jesus to a cross,
but God caused him to become alive again. 11 In the Psalms this was written about
the Messiah:
He is like [MET] the stone that was rejected by the builders {that the builders rejected}.
But that stone became the most important stone in the building that they were
building.
Jesus is that stone, and you are those builders who threw away the stone that was the
most important one. 12 So he alone can save us [MTY]. God has sent only one person
[MTY] into the world who can save us from the guilt of our sins, and that person is
Jesus!”
The Jewish leaders realized that Peter and John had been associating with Jesus.
Acts 4:13-14
13 The Jewish leaders realized that Peter and John ◄were not afraid of them/spoke
boldly►. They also learned that the two men were ordinary people who had not
studied in schools. So the leaders were amazed, and they realized that these men
had associated with Jesus. 14 They also saw the man who had been healed standing
there with the two of them, so they were not able to say anything to oppose Peter and
John.
The Jewish leaders commanded the two apostles to stop teaching people about Jesus.
Acts 4:15-18
15 So the Jewish leaders commanded guards to take Peter, John, and the man outside
of the room where those leaders were meeting. After they did so, the leaders talked
with each other about Peter and John. 16 Being frustrated, one after another, they said,
“◄There is really nothing that we can do to punish these two men!/How can we (inc)
do anything to punish these two men?► [RHQ] Almost everyone [HYP] who is living in
Jerusalem knows that they have done an amazing miracle, so we cannot tell people
that it did not happen! 17 However, we must not allow other people to hear about
this miracle. So we must tell these men that we will punish them if they continue toACTS 4:18
1566
ACTS 4:30
tell other people about this [MTY] man who they say gave them the power to do it.”
18 So the Jewish leaders commanded guards to bring the two apostles into that room
again. After they did so, they commanded them both that they should never speak
about Jesus, and they should not teach anyone about him [MTY] again.
Peter and John said that they needed to continue speaking about Jesus.
Acts 4:19-20
19 But Peter and John replied, “Would God think that it is right for us two to obey
you and not to obey him? We(exc) will let you decide which of those you think is
proper. 20 But as for us, we cannot obey you. We will not stop telling people about the
things that we (exc) have seen Jesus do and what we have heard him teach.”
The Jewish leaders threatened to punish Peter and John and then released them.
Acts 4:21-22
21-22 Then the Jewish leaders again told Peter and John not to disobey them. But all
the people there were praising God about what had happened to the lame man. The
leaders knew that only God could have enabled Peter and John to miraculously heal the
man, because the man was more than 40 years old and he was lame when his mother
bore him. They also knew that the people would become angry if they punished the two
apostles. So, because they could not decide how to punish Peter and John, they finally
let them go.
The believers talked to God about those who opposed him and them.
Acts 4:23-28
23 After Peter and John had been released, they went to the other believers and
reported all that the chief priests and other Jewish elders had said to them. 24 When
they heard that, they all agreed as they prayed to God, and one of them prayed, “O
Lord! You (sg) made the sky, the earth and the oceans, and everything in them. 25 The
Holy Spirit caused our ancestor, King David [MTY], who served you, to write these
words:
It is ridiculous [RHQ] that the non-Jews became angry and the Israelite people
planned uselessly to oppose God.
26 The kings of the world prepared to fight God’s Ruler, and the other rulers
assembled together with them to oppose the Lord God and the one whom he had
appointed to be the Messiah.
27 Lord, we know that what you(sg) said long ago was true, because King Herod and
the governor, Pontius Pilate, and many other people, both non-Jews and Israelites,
assembled together here in this city. They planned to kill Jesus, who devotedly served
you and whom you appointed [MTY] to be the Messiah. 28 Because you (sg) are all-
powerful, those people did only what you [SYN] allowed them to do. It was what you
decided long ago would happen.”
The believers asked God to help them speak boldly to people about Jesus.
Acts 4:29-30
29 “So now, Lord, listen to what they are saying about punishing us! Help us who
serve you (sg) to very boldly speak messages from you (sg) about Jesus 30 Also, by your
power [MTY] miraculously heal sick people and do other amazing miracles [SYN] that
show people your power! Ask Jesus, who always serves you, to give us the authority
[MTY] to do such miracles!”
God shook the place where they were, and his Spirit enabled them to speak his words
boldly.
Acts 4:31ACTS 4:31
1567
ACTS 5:9
31 When the believers had finished praying, the place where they were meeting
shook. All of them were ◄completely controlled/empowered► by the Holy Spirit {the
Holy Spirit ◄completely controlled/empowered► all of them}, with the result that
they began to speak boldly the words that God told them to speak.
The believers shared everything, and the apostles told others about Jesus.
Acts 4:32-35
32 The group of people who had believed in Jesus were completely agreed about
what they thought and what they wanted/desired. Not one of them claimed that he
alone owned anything. Instead, they shared with one another everything that they
had. 33 The apostles continued to tell others, very powerfully, that God had ◄caused
the Lord Jesus to become alive again/raised the Lord Jesus from the dead►. People
knew that God was graciously helping all the believers. 34 Some of the believers who
owned land or houses would occasionally sell some of their property. Then they
would bring the money for what they sold 35 and they would present it to the apostles
[MTY]. Then the apostles would give money to any believer who needed it. So no one
among the believers was lacking anything.
Joseph Barnabas sold a field and brought the money to the apostles.
Acts 4:36-37
36 For example, there was Joseph. He was a descendant of Levi and he was born on
Cyprus Island. The apostles called him Barnabas; in the Jewish language that name
means a person who [IDM] always encourages others. 37 He sold one of his fields, and
brought the money to the apostles for them to distribute to other believers.
5
Ananias pretended to give the apostles all the money from selling a field.
Acts 5:1-2
1 But there was one of the believers whose name was Ananias, and whose wife’s
name was Sapphira. He also sold some land. 2 He kept for himself some of the money
he had received for the land, and his wife knew that he had done that. Then he brought
the rest of the money and presented it to the apostles [MTY].
People were terrified when they saw or heard that Ananias had died.
Acts 5:3-6
3 Then Peter said, “Ananias, you (sg) let Satan completely control you [MTY] so
that you (sg) tried to deceive the Holy Spirit and us(exc). ◄That was terrible!/Why did
you do such a terrible thing?► [RHQ] You have kept for yourself some of the money
you (sg) received for selling the land, pretending that you(sg) were giving us all of it.
4 Before you (sg) sold that land, you truly owned [RHQ] it. And after you sold it, you
could [RHQ] certainly still have used the money any way you wanted to. So why
did you (sg) ever think [RHQ] about doing this wicked thing? You were not merely
trying to deceive us! No, you tried to deceive God himself!!” 5 When Ananias heard
that, immediately he fell down dead. So all who were there who heard about Ananias’
death became terrified [PRS]. 6 Some young men came in, wrapped his body in a sheet,
and carried it out and buried it.
Sapphira also died because she lied, and some men buried her beside her husband.
Acts 5:7-11
7 About three hours later, his wife came in, but she did not know what had
happened. 8 As Peter showed her the money that Ananias had brought, he asked her,
“Tell me, is this the amount of money you two received for the land you sold?” She
said, “Yes, that’s what we(exc) received.” 9 So Peter said to her, “You both did a terribleACTS 5:10
1568
ACTS 5:24
thing! You two agreed [RHQ] to try to determine if you could do that without the Spirit
of the Lord God revealing to anyone that you two tried to deceive them! Listen! Do
you(sg) hear the footsteps [SYN] of the men who buried your husband? They are right
outside this door, and they will carry your corpse out to bury it, too!” 10 Immediately
Sapphira fell down dead at Peter’s feet. Then the young men came in. When they
saw that she was dead, they carried her body out and buried it beside her husband’s
body.
11 So all the believers in Jerusalem became greatly frightened [PRS] because of what
God had done to Ananias and Sapphira. And all the others who heard people tell about
those things also became greatly frightened.
The apostles healed many people, and many people believed in Jesus.
Acts 5:12-16
12 God was enabling the apostles to do many amazing miracles among the people.
All the believers were meeting together regularly in the temple courtyard at the place
called Solomon’s Porch. 13 All of the other people who had not yet believed in Jesus
were afraid to associate with the believers, because they knew that if they did anything
evil, God would punish them, as well as revealing it to the believers. However, those
people continued to greatly respect the believers. 14 Many more men and women
started believing in the Lord Jesus, and they joined the group of believers. 15 The
apostles were doing amazing miracles, so people were bringing those who were sick
into the streets, and laying them on stretchers and mats, in order that when Peter
came by he would touch them, or at least his shadow might fall upon some of them and
heal them. 16 Crowds of people were also coming to the apostles from the towns near
Jerusalem. They were bringing their sick relatives/friends and those who were being
tormented/troubled by evil spirits {whom evil spirits were tormenting/troubling},
and God healed all of them.
Jewish leaders jailed the apostles, but an angel freed them to teach people.
Acts 5:17-21a
17 Then the high priest and all who were with him, who were members of the local
Sadducee sect in Jerusalem, became very jealous of the apostles, because many people
were accepting the apostles’ message. 18 So they commanded the Temple guards to
seize the apostles and put them in the public jail. 19 The guards did that, but during
the night an angel from the Lord God opened the jail doors and brought the apostles
outside! The guards were not aware of what the angel had done. 20 Then the angel
said to the apostles, “Go to the Temple courtyard, stand there, and tell the people all
about how God can give them eternal life!” 21 So having heard this, about dawn they
entered the Temple courtyard and began to teach the people again about Jesus.
The Jewish leaders were perplexed because the apostles were not in jail.
Acts 5:21b-24
Meanwhile, the high priest and those who were with him summoned the other
Jewish Council members. Altogether they made up the entire Council of Israel. After
they all gathered together, they sent guards to the jail to bring in the apostles. 22 But
when the guards arrived at the jail, they discovered that the apostles were not there.
So they returned to the Council, and one of them reported, 23 “We (exc) saw that the
jail doors were very securely locked, and the guards were standing at the doors. But
when we opened the doors and went in to get those men, none of them was inside the
jail!” 24 When the captain of the temple guards and the chief priests heard that, they
became greatly perplexed, wondering what might result from all this.ACTS 5:25
1569
ACTS 5:40
After finding them, the leaders brought the apostles back to question them.
Acts 5:25-26
25 Then someone came from the Temple courtyard and excitedly reported to them,
“Listen to this! Right now the men whom you put in jail are standing in the Temple
courtyard and they are teaching the people about Jesus!” 26 So the captain of the
Temple guards went to the Temple courtyard with the officers, and they brought the
apostles back to the Council room. But they did not treat them roughly, because they
were afraid that the people would kill them by throwing stones at them if they hurt
the apostles.
Peter and the other apostles said that they must obey God.
Acts 5:27-33
27 After the captain and his officers had brought the apostles to the Council room,
they commanded them to stand in front of the Council members, and the high priest
questioned them. 28 He said to them accusingly, “We (exc) strongly commanded you
not to teach people about that man [MTY] Jesus But you have disobeyed us, and you
have taught people all over Jerusalem about him! Furthermore, you are trying to
make it seem that we (exc) are the ones who are guilty [MTY] for that man’s death!”
29 But Peter, speaking for himself and the other apostles, replied, “We (exc) have to
obey what God commands us to do, not what you people tell us to do! 30 God considers
that you are the ones who killed Jesus by nailing him to a cross! But God, whom our
ancestors worshipped, ◄caused Jesus to become alive again after he died/raised Jesus
from the dead►. 31 God has greatly honored Jesus. He has taken him up to heaven! He
has authorized him to be the one who will save us and to rule over our lives! God did
this so that he might enable us Israelites [MTY] to turn away from our sinful behavior
and that he might forgive us for our sins. 32 We (exc) tell people about these things
that we know happened to Jesus, and the Holy Spirit, whom God has sent to us who
obey him, is also confirming that these things are true.” 33 When the Council members
heard those words, they became very angry with the apostles, and they wanted to kill
them.
After beating the apostles, they followed Gamaliel’s advice and released them.
Acts 5:34-40
34 But there was a Council member named Gamaliel. He was a Pharisee, and one
who taught people the Jewish laws, and all the Jewish people respected him. He stood
up in the Council and told guards to take the apostles out of the room for a short time.
35 After the guards had taken the apostles out, he said to the other Council members,
“Fellow Israelites, you need to think carefully about what you are about to do to these
men, and I will tell you why. 36 Some years ago a man named Theudas rebelled against
the Roman government. He told people that he was an important person, and about
400 men joined him. But he was killed {soldiers killed him} and all those who had been
accompanying him were scattered. So they were not able to do anything that they
had planned. 37 After that, during the time when they were ◄writing down names
of the people/taking the census► in order to tax people, a man named Judas from
Galilee province rebelled against the Roman government. He persuaded some people
to accompany him. But soldiers killed him, too, and all those who had accompanied
him went off in different directions. 38 So now I say this to you: Do not harm these
men! Release them! I say this because if this is just something that humans have
planned, they will not be able to do it. They will fail, like Theudas and Judas did
39 But, if God has commanded them to do it, you will not be able to prevent them from
doing it, because you will find out that you are opposing God!” The other members
of the Council accepted what Gamaliel said. 40 They told the temple guards to bringACTS 5:41
1570
ACTS 6:9
the apostles and flog them. So the guards brought them into the Council room and
flogged them. Then the Council members commanded them not to speak to people
about [MTY] Jesus, and they released the apostles.
The apostles rejoiced and continued to tell others about Jesus.
Acts 5:41-42
41 So the apostles left the Council. They were rejoicing, because they knew God had
honored them by letting people disgrace them because they were followers [MTY] of
Jesus. 42 And every day the apostles went to the temple area and to various people’s
houses, and they continued [LIT] teaching people and telling them that Jesus is the
Messiah.
6
The believers neglected the Greek-speaking widows.
Acts 6:1
1 During that time, many more people were becoming believers. Some of them
were from other countries and spoke only the Greek language, but most of them had
always lived in Israel and spoke the Hebrew language. Those who spoke Greek began
to complain about those who spoke Hebrew. They were saying. “When you Hebrew-
speaking believers distribute food or money to widows every day, you are not giving
fair amounts to the widows who speak Greek!”
The apostles told the other believers to choose men to care for those widows.
Acts 6:2-4
2 So, after the twelve apostles had heard what they were complaining about, they
summoned all the other believers in Jerusalem to meet together. Then the apostles
said to those other believers, “We (exc) would not be doing right if we stopped
preaching and teaching God’s message about Jesus in order to distribute food [MTY]
and money to the widows! 3 So, fellow believers, carefully choose seven men from
among you, men whom you know that the Spirit of God controls completely and who
are very wise. Then we (exc) will appoint them to do this work, 4 and we (exc) will
devote our time to pray and to preach and teach the message about Jesus.”
The apostles appointed seven men to care for the widows’ needs.
Acts 6:5-6
5 What the apostles recommended pleased all of the other believers. So they group
chose Stephen. He was a man who strongly believed in God and whom the Holy Spirit
controlled completely. They also chose Philip, Procorus, Nicanor, Timon, Parmenas,
and Nicolas who was from Antioch city. Nicolas had accepted the Jewish religion
before he had believed in Jesus. 6 They brought these seven men to the apostles. Then
after the apostles prayed for those men, they placed their hands on the heads of each
one of them to appoint them to do that work.
The number of people who were becoming believers increased greatly.
Acts 6:7
7 So the believers continued to tell many people the message from God. ◄The
number of people in Jerusalem who believed in Jesus was increasing greatly./More
and more people in Jerusalem were believing in Jesus.► Among them were many
Jewish priests who were believing the message about Jesus.
People opposed Stephen, but could not refute his arguments.
Acts 6:8-10
8 God was enabling Stephen to do many things by God’s power. He was doing
many amazing miracles among the Jewish people. 9 However, some people opposedACTS 6:10
1571
ACTS 7:7
Stephen. They were Jews from a group that regularly met together in a Jewish meeting
place that was {that people} called the Freedmen’s Meeting Place. Those people were
from Cyrene and Alexandria cities and also from Cilicia and Asia provinces. They all
began to argue with Stephen. 10 But they were not able ◄to refute what he said/to
prove that what he said was wrong►, because God’s Spirit enabled him to speak very
wisely.
People persuaded some men to falsely accuse Stephen.
Acts 6:11-14
11 Then that group secretly persuaded some men to falsely accuse Stephen. saying,
“We (exc) heard him say bad things about Moses and God.” 12 So, by saying that, they
made the other Jewish people angry at Stephen, including the elders and the teachers
of the Jewish laws. Then they all seized Stephen and took him to the Jewish Council.
13 They also brought in some other men who accused Stephen falsely about several
things. They said, “This fellow continually says bad things about this holy Temple
and about the laws that Moses received from God. 14 Specifically, we (exc) have heard
him say that this Jesus from Nazareth town will destroy this Temple and will tell us
to obey different customs than Moses taught our ancestors.”
The people saw Stephen’s face shining like the face of an angel.
Acts 6:15
15 When all the people who were sitting in the Council room heard that, and as they
all stared at Stephen, they saw that his face was shining [SIM] like the face of an angel.
7
Stephen started to answer the high priest’s accusations by talking about Abraham.
Acts 7:1-4
1 Then the high priest asked Stephen, “Are the things that these people are saying
about you(sg) true?” 2 Stephen replied, “Fellow Jews and respected leaders, please
listen to me! The glorious God whom we(inc) worship appeared to our ancestor
Abraham while he was still living in Mesopotamia region, before he moved to Haran
town. 3 God said to him, ‘Leave this land where you (sg) and your relatives are living,
and go into the land to which I will lead you.’ 4 So Abraham left that land, which was
also called Chaldea, and he arrived in Haran and lived there. After his father died,
God told him to move to this land in which you and I are now living.”
God promised to give the land to Abraham and his descendants.
Acts 7:5
5 “At that time God did not give Abraham any land here, not even a small plot of
this land that would belong to him. God promised that he would later give this land
to him and his descendants, and that it would always belong to them. However, at
that time Abraham did not have any children who would ◄inherit it/receive it after he
died►.”
God told Abraham that later on he would deliver his descendants from Egypt.
Acts 7:6-7
6 “Later God told Abraham, ‘Your descendants will go and live in a foreign country.
They will live there for 400 years, and during that time their leaders will mistreat your
descendants and force them to work as slaves.’ 7 But God also said, ‘I will punish the
people who make them work as slaves. Then, after that, your descendants will leave
that land and they will come and worship me in this land.’ ”
God commanded the ceremony of circumcision for Abraham and his descendants.
Acts 7:8ACTS 7:8
1572
ACTS 7:19
8 “Then God commanded Abraham that every male in his household and all of his
male descendants should be circumcised to show that they all belonged to God and
that they would obey what he had told Abraham to do. Later Abraham’s son, Isaac,
was born, and when Isaac was eight days old, Abraham circumcised him. Later
Isaac’s son, Jacob, was born, and Isaac similarly circumcised him. And Jacob similarly
circumcised his twelve sons. They are the twelve men from whom we(inc) Jews have
all descended.”
God helped Joseph, so Pharaoh appointed him to govern Egypt.
Acts 7:9-10
9 “You know that Jacob’s older sons became jealous because their father favored their
younger brother Joseph. So they sold him to merchants/traders who took him [MTY] to
Egypt. There he became a slave of an official who lived there. But God helped Joseph.
10 He protected him whenever people caused him to suffer. He enabled Joseph to be
wise; and he caused Pharaoh, the king of Egypt, to think well of Joseph. So Pharaoh
appointed him to rule over Egypt and to look after all of Pharaoh’s property [MTY].”
There was a famine in Canaan, so Jacob’s family moved to Egypt.
Acts 7:11-15a
11 “While Joseph was doing that work, there was a time ◄when there was very little
food/of famine► throughout Egypt and also throughout Canaan. People did not have
enough food to eat. People were suffering. At that time Jacob and his sons in Canaan
also could not find enough food. 12 When Jacob heard people report that there was
grain/food that people could buy in Egypt, he sent Joseph’s older brothers to go there
to buy grain. They went and bought grain from Joseph, but they did not recognize him.
Then they returned home. 13 When Joseph’s brothers went to Egypt the second time,
they again bought grain from Joseph. But this time he told them who he was. And
people told Pharaoh that Joseph’s people were Hebrews and that those men who had
come from Canaan were his brothers. 14 Then after Joseph sent his brothers back home,
they told their father Jacob that Joseph wanted him and his entire family to come to
Egypt. At that time ◄Jacob’s family consisted of 75 people/there were 75 people in
Jacob’s family► [SYN]. 15 So when Jacob heard that, he and all his family went to live
in Egypt.”
When Jacob and his sons died, people buried them in Canaan.
Acts 7:15b-16
“Later on, Jacob died there, and our other ancestors, his sons, also died there. 16 But
the bodies of Jacob and Joseph were brought {they brought the bodies of Jacob and
Joseph} back to our land, and Jacob’s body was buried {they buried Jacob’s body} in
the tomb that Abraham had bought, and they buried Joseph’s body in Shechem in the
ground that Jacob had bought from Hamor’s sons.”
An Egyptian king who did not know about Joseph began to oppress the Israelites.
Acts 7:17-19
17 “Our ancestors had become very numerous when it was almost time for God to
rescue them from Egypt, as he had promised Abraham that he would do. 18 Another
king had begun to rule in Egypt. He did not know that Joseph, long before that time,
had greatly helped the people of Egypt [MTY]. 19 That king cruelly tried to get rid of our
ancestors. He oppressed them and caused them to suffer greatly. He even commanded
them to leave their baby boys outside their homes so that they would die.”
Moses, who grew up as an Egyptian, spoke and acted powerfully.
Acts 7:20-22ACTS 7:20
1573
ACTS 7:38
20 “During that time Moses was born, and he was a very beautiful [LIT] child. So his
parents secretly cared for him in their house for three months. 21 Then they had to put
him outside the house, but Pharaoh’s daughter found him and adopted him and cared
for him as though he were her own son. 22 Moses was taught {The Egyptian teachers
taught Moses} many kinds of wise things [HYP] that the people in Egypt knew, and
when he grew up, he spoke powerfully and did things powerfully.”
Moses killed an Egyptian, so he had to flee to Midian.
Acts 7:23-29
23 “One day when Moses was about 40 years old, he decided that he would go
and see his fellow Israelis. So he went to the place where they worked. 24 He saw
an Egyptian beating one of the Israelis. So he went over to help [MTY] the Israeli
man who was being hurt/beat {whom the Egyptian was hurting/beating}, and he
◄got revenge on/paid back► the Israeli man by killing the Egyptian who was hurting/
beating him. 25 Moses was thinking that his fellow Israelis would understand that God
had sent him to free them from being slaves. But they did not understand that. 26 The
next day, Moses saw two Israeli men fighting each other. He tried to make them stop
fighting by saying to them, ‘Men, you two are fellow Israelis! So ◄stop hurting each
other!/why are you hurting each other?► [RHQ]’ 27 But the man who was injuring the
other man pushed Moses away and said to him, ‘◄No one appointed you (sg) to rule
and judge us (exc)!/Do you (sg) think someone appointed you (sg) to rule and judge
us (exc)?► [RHQ] 28 Do you want to kill me as you killed the Egyptian yesterday?’
29 When Moses heard that, he thought to himself, ‘Obviously, people know what I have
done, and someone will kill me.’ He was afraid, so he fled from Egypt to Midian land.
He lived there for some years. He got married, and he and his wife had two sons.”
God commanded Moses to rescue the Jewish people from Egypt.
Acts 7:30-34
30 “One day 40 years later, the Lord God appeared as an angel to Moses. He appeared
in a bush that was burning in the desert near Sinai Mountain. 31 When Moses saw
that, he was greatly surprised, because the bush was not burning up. As he went over
to look more closely, he heard the Lord God say to him, 32 ‘I am the God whom your
ancestors worshipped. I am the God that Abraham, Isaac and Jacob worship.’ Moses
was so afraid that he began to shake. He was afraid to look at the bush any longer.
33 Then the Lord God said to him, ‘Take your sandals off to show that you(sg) revere
me. Because I am here, the place where you are standing is holy/sacred. 34 I have
surely seen how the people of Egypt are continually causing my people to suffer.
I have heard my people when they groan because those people continually oppress
them. So I have come down to rescue them from Egypt. Now get ready, because I am
going to send you back to Egypt to do that.’ ”
God sent Moses to lead Israel and tell them of the Prophet who would come.
Acts 7:35-38
35 “This Moses is the one who had tried to help our Israeli people, but whom they
rejected by saying, ‘No one [RHQ] appointed you to rule and judge us!’ Moses is the
one whom God himself sent to rule them and to free them from being slaves. He is
the one whom an angel in the bush commanded to do that. 36 Moses is the one who
led our ancestors out from Egypt. He did many kinds of miracles in Egypt, at the Red
Sea, and during the 40 years that the Israelite people lived in the desert. 37 This Moses
is the one who said to the Israelite people, ‘God will appoint a prophet for you from
among your own people. He will speak words from God, just like I speak his words
to you.’ 38 This man Moses was our people’s leader when they gathered together inACTS 7:39
1574
ACTS 7:49-50
the desert. It is Moses to whom God sent the angel on Sinai Mountain to give him
our laws, and he was the one who told our other ancestors what the angel had said.
He was the one who received from God words that tell us how to live eternally, and
Moses passed them on to us.”
Israel rejected Moses, so God rejected them and said that he would punish them.
Acts 7:39-43
39 “However, our ancestors did not want to obey Moses. Instead, while he was still
on the mountain, they rejected him as their leader and decided that they wanted to
return to Egypt. 40 So they told his older brother Aaron, ‘Make idols for us who will
be our gods to lead us back to Egypt! As for that fellow Moses who led us out of Egypt
we (exc) do not know what has happened to him!’ 41 So, they made out of gold an
image that looked like a calf. Then they sacrificed animals and offered other things to
honor that idol, and they sang and danced to honor the idol that they themselves had
made. 42 So God rejected them. He abandoned them to worship the sun, moon and
stars in the sky. This agrees with the words that one of the prophets wrote that God
said,
You Israelite people [MTY], when you repeatedly killed animals and offered them as
sacrifices during those 40 years that you were in the desert, ◄you most certainly
were not offering them to me!/what makes you think that you were offering
them to me?► [RHQ] 43 On the contrary, you carried with you from place to
place the tent that contained the idol representing the god Molech that you
worshipped. You also carried with you the image of the star called Rephan.
Those were idols that you had made, and you worshipped them instead of me.
So I will cause you to be taken away {people to take you} from your own country.
You will be taken {They will take you} far from your homes to regions even
farther than Babylon Country.”
The Israelite people worshipped God at the tent Moses built and later in the temple
that Solomon built.
Acts 7:44-47
44 “While our ancestors were in the desert, they worshipped God at the tent that
showed that he was there with them. They had made the tent exactly like God had
commanded Moses to make it. It was exactly like the model that Moses had seen
when he was up on the mountain. 45 Later on, other ancestors of ours carried that tent
with them when Joshua led them into this land. That was during the time that they
took this land for themselves, when God forced the people who previously lived here
to leave. So the Israelis were able to possess this land. The tent remained in this land
and was still here when King David ruled. 46 David pleased God, and he asked God
to let him build a house where he and all of our Israeli people could worship God.
47 But instead, God let David’s son Solomon build a house where people could worship
God.”
People can worship God anywhere, not only at certain places.
Acts 7:48-50
48 “However, we(inc) know that God is greater than everything, and he does not live
in houses that people [SYN] have made. It is like the prophet Isaiah wrote. He wrote
these words that God had spoken:
49-50 Heaven is ◄my throne/the place from which I rule the entire universe►, and
the earth is ◄my footstool/merely like a stool on which I may rest my feet►. I
myself [SYN] have made everything both in heaven and on the earth. So you
human beings, ◄you really cannot build a house that would be adequate forACTS 7:51
1575
ACTS 8:3
me!/do you think you can build a house that would be appropriate for me?►
[RHQ] You cannot [RHQ] make a place good enough for me to live in!”
Stephen said that those who were listening to him were opposing God.
Acts 7:51-53
51 “You people are extremely stubborn [MET], not wanting to obey God or listen
[MTY] to him! You are exactly like your ancestors! You always resist the Holy Spirit
as they did! 52 Your ancestors caused [RHQ] every prophet to suffer, including Moses.
They even killed those who long ago announced that the Messiah would come, the
one who always did what pleased God. And the Messiah has come! He is the one
whom you recently turned over to his enemies and insisted that they kill him! 53 You
are the people who have received God’s laws. Those were laws that God caused angels
to give to our ancestors. However, incredibly, you have not obeyed them!”
All the people there became very angry with Stephen.
Acts 7:54
54 When the Jewish Council members and others there heard all that Stephen said,
they became very angry. They were grinding their teeth together because they were
so angry at him!
After Stephen said that he could see Jesus standing beside God in heaven, they stoned
him.
Acts 7:55-59
55 But the Holy Spirit completely controlled Stephen. He looked up into heaven
and saw a dazzling light from God, and he saw Jesus standing at God’s right side.
56 “Look,” he said, “I see heaven open, and I see the one who came from heaven
standing at God’s right side!”
57 When the Jewish Council members and others heard that, they shouted loudly.
They put their hands over their ears so that they could not hear Stephen, and
immediately they all rushed at him. 58 They dragged him outside the city of Jerusalem
and started to throw stones at him. The people who were accusing him took off their
outer garments in order to throw stones more easily, and they put their clothes on
the ground next to a young man whose name was Saul, so that he could guard them.
59 While they continued to throw stones at Stephen, Stephen prayed, “Lord Jesus,
receive my spirit!”
He asked the Lord to forgive them, and he died. The disciples fled, some men buried
Stephen, and Saul harassed believers. But the believers preached about Jesus wherever
they were scattered.
Acts 7:60—8:3
60 Then Stephen fell on his knees and cried out, “Lord, do not punish them (OR,
forgive them) [LIT] for this sin!” After he had said that, he died.
8
1-2 Then some men who revered God buried Stephen’s body in a tomb, and they
mourned greatly and loudly for him.
On that same day people started severely persecuting the believers who were living
in Jerusalem. So most of the believers fled to other places throughout Judea and
Samaria provinces. The apostles were the only believers who remained in Jerusalem.
3 While the people were killing Stephen, Saul was there approving of their killing
Stephen. So Saul also began trying to destroy the group of believers. He entered
houses one by one, he dragged away men and women who believed in Jesus, and then
he arranged for them to be put in prison.ACTS 8:4
1576
ACTS 8:22
Many Samaritans heeded Philip’s words and rejoiced.
Acts 8:4-8
4 The believers who had left Jerusalem went to different places, where they
continued preaching the message about Jesus. 5 One of those believers whose name was
Philip went down from Jerusalem to a city in Samaria province. There he was telling
the people that Jesus is [MTY] the Messiah. 6 Many people there heard Philip speak
and saw the miraculous things that he was doing. So they all ◄paid close attention
to/listened carefully to► his words. 7 For example, when Philip commanded evil spirits
who controlled many people that they should come out of them, they came out, while
those spirits screamed. Also, many people who were paralyzed and many others who
were lame were healed. 8 So many people [MTY] in that city greatly rejoiced.
Philip baptized many Samaritans, including a sorcerer.
Acts 8:9-13
9 There was a man in that city whose name was Simon. He had been practicing
sorcery for a long time, and he had been amazing the people in Samaria province
by doing that. He continually claimed that he was a great/important person. 10 All
the people there, both ordinary and important people, listened to him. Various ones
of them were saying, “This man works in extremely powerful ways because God has
caused him to be a great person.” 11 They continued to listen to him carefully, because
for a long time he had astonished them by practicing sorcery. 12 But then they believed
Philip’s message when he preached to them about how God desires to rule [MET] the
lives of people who believe in him, and about Jesus being the Messiah [MTY]. Both the
men and the women who believed in Jesus were baptized. {Philip was baptizing both
the men and the women who had come to believe in Jesus}. 13 Simon himself believed
Philip’s message and, after he was baptized {after Philip baptized him}, he began to
constantly accompany Philip. Simon was continually amazed because he often saw
Philip doing many kinds of miraculous things.
Samaritan believers received the power of the Holy Spirit.
Acts 8:14-17
14 When the apostles in Jerusalem heard that many people [PRS] throughout Samaria
district had believed the message from God about Jesus, they sent Peter and John
there. 15 When Peter and John arrived in Samaria, they prayed for those new believers
in order that the Holy Spirit’s power would come to them. 16 Peter and John realized
that the Holy Spirit had not yet begun to empower any of them. They had been
baptized {Philip had baptized them} because they had believed in [MTY] the Lord
Jesus, but they did not know about the Holy Spirit. 17 Then Peter and John placed their
hands on the heads of each person, and they received the power of [MTY] the Holy
Spirit.
Peter denounced Simon the sorcerer.
Acts 8:18-24
18 Simon saw things that convinced him that God had given the Spirit’s power to
people as a result of the apostles placing their hands on them. So he offered to
give money to the apostles, 19 saying, “Enable me also to do what you are doing, so
that everyone on whom I place/put my hands may receive the Holy Spirit’s power.”
20 But Peter said to him, “May you (sg) and your money go to hell, because you
mistakenly think that you can buy from us what God alone gives to people 21 God has
not authorized you to have any part of this ministry of giving the Holy Spirit’s power,
because he knows that you are not thinking rightly! (OR, because he knows that you
are thinking completely wrongly.) 22 So stop thinking wickedly like that, and pleadACTS 8:23
1577
ACTS 8:35
that the Lord, if he is willing, will forgive you for what you wickedly thought/planned
to do 23 Turn away from your evil ways, because I perceive that you (sg) are extremely
envious of us, and you are a slave of your continual desire to do evil! God will certainly
punish you severely!” 24 Then Simon answered, “Pray to the Lord God that he will not
do to me what you just said!”
Peter and John preached to many Samaritans.
Acts 8:25
25 After Peter and John told people there what they knew personally about the Lord
Jesus and declared to them the message about Jesus, they both returned to Jerusalem.
Along the way they preached the good message about Jesus to people in many villages
in Samaria province.
Philip met an Ethiopian official.
Acts 8:26-28
26 One day an angel whom the Lord God had sent commanded Philip, “Get ready
and go south along the road that extends from Jerusalem to Gaza.” That was a road
in a desert area. 27 So Philip got ready and went along that road. Suddenly he met a
man from Ethiopia. He was an important official who took care of all the funds for
the queen of Ethiopia. In his language people called their queen Candace. This man
had gone to Jerusalem to worship God, 28 and he was returning home and was seated
riding in his chariot. As he was riding, he was reading out loud from what the prophet
Isaiah had written [MTY] long ago.
The official could not understand what he was reading.
Acts 8:29-31
29 God’s Spirit told Philip, “Go near to that chariot and keep walking close to the
man who is riding in it!” 30 So Philip ran to the chariot and kept running close to it.
Then he heard the official reading what the prophet Isaiah had written. He asked
the man, “Do you (sg) understand what you are reading?” 31 He answered Philip,
“No! ◄I cannot possibly understand it if there is no one to explain it to me!/How can
I understand it if there is no one to explain it to me?► [RHQ]”
Philip preached about Jesus to the official.
Acts 8:31b-35
Then the man said to Philip, “Please come up and sit beside me.” So Philip did that.
32 The part of the Scriptures that the official was reading was this:
He will be silent when they lead him away to kill him
like when a sheep is led away to be killed.
As a young sheep is silent when its wool is being cut off {someone cuts off its wool},
similarly he will not protest [MTY] when people cause him to suffer.
33 When he will be humiliated by being accused falsely {people will humiliate him by
accusing him falsely},
the rulers ◄will not consider him innocent/will consider him guilty►.
No one will possibly be able to tell about his descendants, because he will be killed
{people will kill him} without him having any descendants on the earth.
34 The official asked Philip about these words that he was reading, “Tell me, who was
the prophet writing about? Was he writing about himself or about someone else?”
35 So Philip began to explain that Scripture passage. He told him the good message
about [MTY] Jesus. So the official understood and believed in Jesus.
Philip baptized the official. Then the Spirit took Philip away.
Acts 8:36-39ACTS 8:36-37
1578
ACTS 9:12
36-37 While they were traveling along the road, they came to a place where there was
a pond of water near the road. Then the official said to Philip, “Look, there is a pond of
water! ◄I would like you to baptize me, because I do not know of anything that would
prevent me from being baptized {prevent you from baptizing me.}/Do you know of
anything that would prevent me from being baptized {prevent you from baptizing
me}?► [RHQ]” 38 So the official told the driver to stop the chariot. Then both Philip
and the official went down into the pond of water, and Philip baptized him. 39 When
they came up out of the water, suddenly God’s Spirit took Philip away. The official
never saw Philip again. But although he never saw Philip again, the official continued
going along the road, very happy that God had saved him.
Philip preached in towns from Azotus to Caesarea.
Acts 8:40
40 Philip then realized that the Spirit had miraculously taken him to Azotus town.
While he traveled around in that region, he continued proclaiming the message about
Jesus in all the towns between Azotus and Caesarea. And he was still proclaiming it
when he finally arrived in Caesarea city.
9
Saul asked the high priest to authorize him to arrest believers.
Acts 9:1-2
1 Meanwhile, Saul angrily continued to say, “I will kill those who believe that Jesus
is the Lord!” He went to the supreme priest in Jerusalem 2 and requested him to write
letters introducing him to the leaders of [MTY] the Jewish meeting places in Damascus
city. The letters asked them to authorize Saul to seize any men or women who followed
the way that Jesus had taught, and to take them as prisoners to Jerusalem so that the
Jewish leaders could judge and punish them.
While Saul was traveling to Damascus, Jesus appeared to him and blinded him.
Acts 9:3-8
3 Saul took those letters, and while he and those with him traveled toward Damascus,
as they were approaching the city, suddenly a brilliant light from heaven shone
around Saul. 4 Immediately he fell down to the ground. Then he heard the voice
of the Lord say to him, “Saul, Saul, ◄stop causing me to suffer!/why are you causing
me to suffer?► [RHQ]” 5 Saul asked him, “Lord, who are you?” He replied, “I am
Jesus, and you (sg) are causing me to suffer by hurting my followers! 6 Now instead of
continuing to do that, stand up and go into the city! Someone there will tell you (sg)
what I want you to do.” 7 The men who were traveling with Saul became so frightened
that they could not say anything. They just stood there. They only heard the sound
when the Lord spoke, but they did not see anyone. 8 Saul got up from the ground, but
when he opened his eyes he could not see anything. So the men with him took him
by the hand and led him into Damascus. 9 For the next three days Saul could not see
anything, and he did not eat or drink anything.
Saul could see again after Ananias had put his hands on him.
Acts 9:9-19
10 In Damascus there was a Jew named Ananias who believed in Jesus. While
Ananias was seeing a vision, the Lord Jesus said to him, “Ananias!” He replied, “Lord,
I am listening.” 11 The Lord Jesus told him, “Go to Straight Street to the house that
belongs to Judas. Ask someone there if you(sg) can talk to a man named Saul from
Tarsus city, because, surprisingly, at this moment he is praying to me. 12 Saul has seen
a vision in which a man named Ananias entered the house where he was staying andACTS 9:13
1579
ACTS 9:28
put his hands on him in order that he might see again.” 13 But Ananias protested,
saying, “But Lord, many people have told me about this man! He has done many evil
things to the people in Jerusalem who believe in you! 14 And the chief priests have
authorized him to come here to Damascus in order to seize all of us who believe in
you (sg) [MTY] and take us to Jerusalem!” 15 But the Lord Jesus told Ananias, “Go to
Saul! Do what I say, because I have chosen him to serve me in order that he might
speak about me [MTY] both to non-Jewish people and their kings and to the Israeli
people. 16 I myself will tell him that he must often suffer greatly because of telling
people about me [MTY].” 17 So Ananias went, and after he found the house where Saul
was, he entered it. Then, as soon as he met Saul, he put his hands on him, and he said,
“Brother Saul, the Lord Jesus himself commanded me to come to you. He is the same
one who appeared to you (sg) while you were traveling along the road. He sent me
to you in order that you might see again and that you might be completely controlled
by the Holy Spirit {that the Holy Spirit might completely control you}.” 18 Instantly,
things like fish scales fell from Saul’s eyes, and he was able to see again. Then he
stood up and was baptized {Ananias baptized him} immediately. 19 After Saul ate
some food, he felt strong again. Saul stayed with the other believers in Damascus for
several days.
People there were astonished that Saul had believed in Jesus.
Acts 9:20-22
20 Right away Saul began to preach to people about Jesus in the Jewish meeting
places in Damascus. He told them that Jesus is ◄the Son of/the man who is also► God.
21 And all the people who heard him preach were amazed. Various ones of them were
saying, “◄We(inc) can hardly believe that this is the same man who persecuted the
believers in Jerusalem!/Is this really the same man who persecuted the believers in
Jerusalem?► [RHQ, MTY] And we (inc) know that he has [RHQ] come here to seize us
and take us to the chief priests in Jerusalem!” 22 But God enabled Saul to preach to
many people even more convincingly. He was proving from the Scriptures that Jesus
is the Messiah. So the Jewish leaders in Damascus could not think of anything ◄to
refute what he said/to prove that what he said was not true►.
Saul escaped from those who plotted to kill him.
Acts 9:23-25
23 Some time later, after Saul had left Damascus and then returned, the Jewish
leaders [SYN] there plotted to kill him. 24 During each day and night those Jews were
continually watching the people passing through the city gates, in order that when
they saw Saul they might kill him. However, someone told Saul what they planned to
do. 25 So some of those whom he had helped to believe in Jesus took him one night to
the high stone wall that surrounded the city. They used ropes to lower him in a large
basket through an opening in the wall. So he escaped from Damascus.
Barnabas introduced Saul to other believers in Jerusalem.
Acts 9:26-28
26 When Saul arrived in Jerusalem, he began trying to associate with other believers.
However, almost all of them continued to be afraid of him, because they did not
believe that he had become a believer. 27 But Barnabas took him and brought him
to the apostles. He explained to the apostles how, while Saul was traveling along the
road to Damascus, he had seen the Lord Jesus and how the Lord had spoken to him
there. He also told them how Saul had preached boldly about Jesus [MTY] to people in
Damascus. The apostles believed Barnabas and told the other believers about that. 28 SoACTS 9:29
1580
ACTS 9:42
Saul began to associate with the apostles and other believers throughout Jerusalem,
and he spoke boldly to people about [MTY] the Lord Jesus.
The believers sent Saul to Tarsus because some Jews tried to kill him.
Acts 9:29-30
29 Saul was also speaking about Jesus with Jews who spoke Greek, and he was
debating with them. But they were continually trying to think ◄of a way to kill him/
of how they could kill him►. 30 When the other believers heard that those Jews were
planning to kill him, some of the believers took Saul down to Caesarea city. There they
arranged for him to go by ship to Tarsus, his hometown.
The church in Israel had peace and many people believed.
Acts 9:31
31 So the groups of believers throughout the entire regions of Judea, Galilee, and
Samaria lived peacefully because no one was persecuting them any more. The
Holy Spirit was strengthening them spiritually and encouraging them. They were
continuing to revere/honor the Lord Jesus, and the Holy Spirit was enabling many
other people to become believers.
Because Peter healed Aeneas, many people believed in Jesus.
Acts 9:32-35
32 While Peter was traveling throughout those regions, once he went to the coastal
plain to visit the believers who lived in Lydda town. 33 There he met a man whose
name was Aeneas. Aeneas had not been able to get up from his bed for eight years,
because he was paralyzed. 34 Peter said to him, “Aeneas, Jesus Christ heals you (sg)
right now! Get up and roll up your mat!” Right away Aeneas stood up. 35 Most of the
people who lived in Lydda and on Sharon Plain saw Aeneas after the Lord had healed
him, so they believed in the Lord Jesus.
Dorcas died.
Acts 9:36-37
36 In Joppa town there was a believer whose name was Tabitha. Her name in the
Greek language was Dorcas. Both of these names mean gazelle/deer/antelope. That
woman was continually doing good deeds for others. Specifically, she was helping
poor people by giving them things that they needed. 37 During the time that Peter was
in Lydda, she became sick and died. Some women there washed her body according
to the Jewish custom so that the people could bury it. Then they covered her body with
cloth and placed it in an upstairs room in her house.
Peter resurrected Dorcas.
Acts 9:38-43
38 Lydda was near Joppa, so when the believers heard that Peter was still in Lydda,
they sent two men to go to Peter. When they arrived where Peter was, they repeatedly
urged/begged him, “Please come immediately with us to Joppa!” 39 So right away
Peter got ready and went with them. When they arrived at the house in Joppa, the
two men took Peter to the upstairs room where Dorcas’ body was lying. All the widows
therecrowded around Peter. They were crying and showing him the cloaks and other
garments that Dorcas had made for people while she was still alive. 40 But Peter sent
them all out of the room. Then he got down on his knees and prayed. Then, turning
toward Tabitha’s body, he said, “Tabitha, stand up!” Immediately she opened her eyes
and, when she saw Peter, she sat up. 41 He grasped one of her hands and helped her
to stand up. After he had summoned the believers and especially the widows among
them to come back in, he showed them that Tabitha was alive again. 42 Soon people
everywhere in Joppa knew about that miracle, and as a result many people believedACTS 9:43
1581
ACTS 10:18
in the Lord Jesus. 43 Peter stayed in Joppa many days with a man named Simon who
made leather from animal skins.
10
Obeying an angel, Cornelius sent men to summon Peter.
Acts 10:1-8
1 There was a man who lived in Caesarea city whose name was Cornelius. He was
an officer who commanded 100 men in a large group of Roman soldiers from Italy.
2 He always tried to do what would please God; he and his entire household [MTY]
were non-Jews who habitually worshipped God. He sometimes gave money to help
poor Jewish people, and he prayed to God regularly.
3 One day at about three o’clock in the afternoon Cornelius saw a vision. He clearly
saw an angel whom God had sent. The angel came into his room and said to him,
“Cornelius!” 4 Cornelius stared at the angel and became terrified. Then he asked
fearfully, “Sir, what do you (sg) want?” The angel answered him, “You (sg) have
pleased God because you have been praying regularly to him and you often give
money to help poor people. Those things have been like a sacrifice to God. 5 So, now
command some men to go to Joppa and tell them to bring back a man named Simon
whose other name is Peter. 6 He is staying with a man, also named Simon, who makes
leather. His house is near the ocean.” 7 When the angel who spoke to Cornelius had
gone, Cornelius summoned two of his household servants and a soldier who served
him, one who also worshipped God. 8 He explained to them everything that the angel
had said. Then he told them to go to Joppa to ask Peter to come to Caesarea.
Peter’s vision.
Acts 10:9-16
9 About noon the next day those three men were traveling along the road and
were coming near Joppa. As they were approaching Joppa, Peter went up on the
flat housetop to pray. 10 He became hungry and wanted something to eat. While
someone was preparing the food, Peter saw this vision: 11 ◄He saw heaven open/He
saw an opening in the sky► and something like a large sheet was being lowered to the
ground. It was tied at its four corners with ropes. 12 Inside the sheet were all kinds of
creatures. These included animals and birds that the Mosaic laws forbade Jews to eat.
Some had four feet, others scurried across the ground, and others were wild birds.
13 Then he heard God [SYN] say to him, “Peter, stand up, kill and cook some of these
and eat their meat!” 14 But Peter replied, “Lord, surely you (sg) do not really want
me to do that! I have never eaten any meat that our Jewish law says is unacceptable
to God or something that we(exc) must not eat!” 15 Then Peter heard [MTY] God talk
to him a second time. He said, “I am God, so if I have made something acceptable
to eat, do not say that it is not acceptable to eat!” 16 This happened three times, so
Peter knew that he had to think carefully about what it might mean. Immediately after
God had said that the third time, ◄the sheet with the animals and birds was the pulled
back into heaven/someone pulled the sheet with the animals and birds up into the sky
again►.
The Holy Spirit commanded Peter to go with the non-Jewish men.
Acts 10:17-23a
17 While Peter was trying to understand what that vision meant, the men who had
been sent by Cornelius {whom Cornelius had sent} arrived in Joppa. They asked people
how to get to Simon’s house. So they found his house and were standing outside the
gate. 18 They called and were asking if a man named Simon, whose other name wasACTS 10:19
1582
ACTS 10:35
Peter, was staying there. 19 While Peter was still trying to understand what the vision
meant, God’s Spirit said to him, “Three men are here who want to see you. 20 So get
up and go downstairs and go with them! Do not think that you (sg) should not go
with them because of their being non-Jews, because I have sent them here!” 21 So Peter
went down to the men and said to them, “Greetings! I am the man you are looking
for. Why have you come?” 22 One of them replied, “Cornelius, who is a Roman army
officer, sent us here. He is a righteous man who worships God, and all of the Jewish
people [HYP] who know about him say that he is a very good man. An angel ◄who
was sent from God/whom God sent► said to him, ‘Tell some men to go to Joppa to see
Simon Peter and bring him here, so that you (sg) can hear what he has to say.’ ” 23 So
Peter said that he would go with them, and then he invited them into the house and
told them that they could stay there that night.
Peter went with the men and met Cornelius.
Acts 10:23b-26
The next day Peter got ready and went with the men. Several of the believers from
Joppa went with him. 24 The day after that, they arrived in Caesarea. Cornelius was
waiting for them. He had also invited his relatives and close friends to come to his
house, so they were there, too. 25 When Peter entered the house, Cornelius met him
and bowed low in front of him to worship him. 26 But Peter grasped Cornelius by the
hand and lifted him to his feet. He said, “Stand up! Do not revere/worship me I myself
am only human, like you!”
Peter asked why they had sent for him.
Acts 10:27-29
27 While he was talking to Cornelius, Peter and the others entered a large room
inside the house. Peter saw that many people had gathered together there. 28 Then
Peter said to them, “You all know that any of us Jews think we are disobeying our
Jewish laws if we (exc) associate with a non-Jewish person or if we even visit him.
However, God has shown me in a vision that I should not say about anyone that God
will not accept him. 29 So when you sent some men to ask me to come here, I came
right away. I did not say that I could not go with non-Jewish people. So, please tell me,
why have you asked me to come here?”
Cornelius told about his vision.
Acts 10:30-33
30 Cornelius replied, “About this time four days ago I was praying to God in my
house, as I regularly do at three o’clock in the afternoon. Suddenly a man whose
clothes shone brightly stood in front of me, 31 and said, ‘Cornelius, when you (sg)
have prayed, you have been heard by God {God has heard when you (sg) have prayed
to him}. He has also noticed that you have often given money to help poor people,
and he is pleased with that. 32 So now, send messengers to go to Joppa, in order to
ask Simon whose other name is Peter to come here. He is staying near the ocean in
a house that belongs to another man named Simon, who makes leather. When Simon
Peter comes, he will tell you a message from God.’ 33 So I immediately sent some men
who asked you (sg) to come here, and I certainly thank you for coming. Now we (exc)
all are gathered here, knowing that God is with us, in order to hear all the things that
the Lord God has commanded you to say. So please speak to us.”
Peter reminded them of what they knew about Jesus.
Acts 10:34-38
34 So Peter began to speak [MTY] to them. He said, “Now I understand that it is true
that God does not favor only certain groups of people. 35 Instead, from every group ofACTS 10:36
1583
ACTS 11:2
people he accepts everyone who honors him and who does what pleases him. 36 You
know the message that God sent to us Israelis. He proclaimed to us the good news
that he would cause people to have peace with him because of what Jesus Christ has
done. This Jesus is Lord not only over us Israelis. He is also the Lord who rules over all
people. 37 You know what he did throughout the land of Judea, beginning in Galilee.
He began to do those things after John had been proclaiming to people that they should
turn away from their sinful behavior before he baptized them. 38 You know that God
gave [MTY] his Holy Spirit to Jesus, the Man from Nazareth town, and gave him the
power to do miracles. You also know how Jesus went to many places, always doing
good deeds and healing people. Specifically, he was continually healing all the people
whom the devil was causing to suffer. Jesus was able to do those things because God
was always helping him.”
Peter said that God would forgive the sins of all who believe in Jesus.
Acts 10:39-43
39 “We apostles tell people about all the things that we saw Jesus do in Jerusalem
and in the rest of Israel. The leaders in Jerusalem had him killed by being nailed to a
cross. 40 However, God caused him to become alive again on the third day after he had
died. God also enabled some of us(exc) to see him so that we would know that he was
alive again. 41 God did not let all the Jewish people see him. Instead, he had chosen us
apostles beforehand to see Jesus after he became alive again, and to tell others about
him. We apostles are the people who ate meals with him ◄after he had become alive
again/after he had risen from the dead►. 42 God commanded us to preach to the
people and tell them that Jesus is the one whom he has appointed to judge everyone
some day. He will judge all those who will still be living and all those who will have
died by that time. 43 All of the prophets who wrote about the Messiah long ago told
people about him. They wrote that if people believe in the Messiah [MTY], God would
forgive them for their sins, because of what the Messiah would do for them.”
The Holy Spirit came down on the non-Jewish believers.
Acts 10:44-48
44 While Peter was still speaking those words, suddenly the Holy Spirit ◄came
down on/began to control► all those non-Jewish people who were listening to the
message. 45 The Jewish believers who had come with Peter from Joppa were amazed
that God had generously given the Holy Spirit to the non-Jewish people, too. 46 The
Jewish believers knew that God had done that because they were hearing those people
speaking languages [MTY] that they had not learned and telling how great God is.
47 Then Peter said to the other Jewish believers who were there, “God has given them
the Holy Spirit just like he gave him to us Jewish believers, so ◄surely all of you would
agree that we(exc) should baptize these people!/would any of you forbid that these
people should be baptized?► [RHQ]” 48 Then Peter told those non-Jewish people that
they should be baptized to show that they had believed [MTY] in the Lord Jesus Christ.
So they baptized all of them. After they were baptized, they requested that Peter stay
with them several days. So Peter and the other Jewish believers did that.
11
Some Jewish believers criticized Peter.
Acts 11:1-3
1 The apostles and other believers who lived in various towns in Judea province
heard people say that some non-Jewish people had believed the message from God
about Jesus. 2 So when Peter and the six other believers returned from Caesarea toACTS 11:3
1584
ACTS 11:20
Jerusalem, some Jewish believers criticized Peter, because they thought that Jews
should not associate with non-Jews [MTY]. 3 They said to him, “Not only was it wrong
for you(sg) to visit non-Jewish people, you even ate with them!”
Peter told about his vision.
Acts 11:4-10
4 So Peter began to explain exactly what had happened concerning Cornelius. 5 He
said, “I was praying by myself in Joppa town, and in a trance I saw a vision. I saw that
something like a large sheet was being lowered from heaven. It was tied with ropes
at its four corners, and it came down to where I was. 6 As I was looking intently into
it, I saw some tame animals but also animals that our laws forbid us to eat, including
wild animals, snakes, and wild birds. 7 Then I heard God [MTY] commanding me,
‘Peter, get up, kill some of these, and cook and eat their meat!’ 8 But I replied, ‘Lord,
you(sg) surely do not really want me to do that, because I have never eaten [MTY]
meat from any animal that our laws say that we (exc) must not eat [SYN]!’ 9 God spoke
from heaven to me a second time, ‘I am God, so if I have made something acceptable
to eat, do not say that it is not acceptable to eat!’ 10 Then after that happened three
times, the sheet with all those animals and birds was pulled up into heaven again.”
Peter said that the Holy Spirit came to be with the non-Jewish believers. Peter
accepted those non-Jews as fellow believers.
Acts 11:11-17
11 “At that exact moment, three men who had been {whom Cornelius had} sent
from Caesarea arrived at the house where I was staying. 12 God’s Spirit told me that
I should be willing to go with them even though they were not Jews. These six Jewish
believers from Joppa went with me to Caesarea, and then we (exc) went into that non-
Jewish man’s house. 13 He told us that he had seen an angel standing in his house. The
angel told him, ‘Tell some men to go to Joppa and bring back Simon whose other name
is Peter. 14 He will tell you (sg) how you and everyone [MTY] else in your house will
be saved {how God will save you and everyone [MTY] else in your house}.’ 15 After
I started to speak, the Holy Spirit suddenly came down on them, just like he had first
[MTY] come on us during the Pentecost festival. 16 Then I remembered what the Lord
had said: ‘John caused people to be baptized in water, but God will cause the Holy
Spirit to enter you and change your lives.’ 17 God gave those non-Jews the same Holy
Spirit that he had given to us (inc) after we believed in the Lord Jesus Christ. So, ◄I
could not possibly tell God that he did wrong when he gave them the Holy Spirit!/how
could I tell God that he did wrong when he gave them the Holy Spirit?► [RHQ] He was
showing that he had received them!”
They praised God that he also saves non-Jewish people.
Acts 11:18
18 After those Jewish believers heard what Peter said, they stopped criticizing him.
Instead, they praised God, saying, “Then it is clear to us that God has also accepted
the non-Jews so that they will have eternal life, if they turn from their sinful behavior
and believe in Jesus!”
Many non-Jews in Antioch believed in the Lord Jesus.
Acts 11:19-21
19 After people had killed Stephen, many of the believers left Jerusalem and went to
other places, because people were causing them to suffer there in Jerusalem. Some
of them went to Phoenicia region, some went to Cyprus Island, and others went to
Antioch city in Syria province. In those places they were continually telling people
the message about Jesus, but they told only other Jewish people. 20 Some of theACTS 11:21
1585
ACTS 12:4
believers were men from Cyprus and from Cyrene city in north Africa. They went
to Antioch, and although they told other Jews about the Lord Jesus, they also told non-
Jewish people there. 21 The Lord God [MTY] was powerfully enabling those believers
to preach effectively. As a result, very many non-Jewish people believed their message
and trusted in the Lord Jesus.
Barnabas encouraged the believers at Antioch.
Acts 11:22-24
22 The group of believers in Jerusalem heard [MTY] people say that many people in
Antioch were believing in Jesus. So the leaders of the congregation in Jerusalem asked
Barnabas to go to Antioch. 23 When he got there, he realized that God had acted kindly
toward the believers. So he was very happy, and he continually encouraged all of the
believers to continue to trust completely in the Lord Jesus. 24 Barnabas was a good
man whom the Holy Spirit completely controlled, one who trusted God completely.
Because of what Barnabas did, many people there believed in the Lord Jesus.
Barnabas and Saul taught many believers at Antioch.
Acts 11:25-26
25 Then Barnabas went to Tarsus in Cilicia province to try to find Saul. 26 After
he found him, Barnabas brought him back to Antioch to help teach the believers. So
during a whole year Barnabas and Saul met regularly with the congregation there and
taught many of them about Jesus. It was at Antioch that the believers were first called
Christians {that people first called the believers Christians}.
Believers in Antioch helped needy believers in Judea.
Acts 11:27-30
27 During the time that Barnabas and Saul were at Antioch, some believers who were
prophets arrived there from Jerusalem. 28 One of them, whose name was Agabus,
stood up in order to speak. God’s Spirit enabled him to prophesy ◄that there would
soon be a famine in many countries/that people in many countries [HYP] would soon
suffer because they would not have enough food to eat►. (That famine happened
when Claudius was the Roman Emperor.) 29 When the believers there heard what
Agabus said, they decided that they would send money to help the believers who
lived in Judea. Each of them decided to give as much money as he was able to give.
30 They sent the money with Barnabas and Saul to the leaders of the congregation in
Jerusalem.
12
Herod had James killed and Peter put in prison.
Acts 12:1-4
1 It was about this time that King Herod Agrippa sent soldiers [MTY] who seized and
put in prison some of the leaders of the congregation in Jerusalem. He did that because
he wanted to make the believers suffer. 2 He commanded a soldier to cut off the head
of the apostle James, the older brother of the apostle John. 3 When Herod realized that
he had pleased the leaders of the Jewish people by doing that, he commanded soldiers
to arrest Peter in order to kill him, too. This happened during the festival when the
Jewish people ate bread that did not have yeast. 4 After they seized Peter, they put him
in prison. They arranged for four groups of soldiers to guard Peter. Each group had
four soldiers. Every three hours a different group began to guard him while the others
rested. Herod wanted to bring Peter out of prison and judge him in front of the Jewish
people after the Passover Festival was finished. He then planned to command soldiers
to execute Peter.ACTS 12:5
1586
ACTS 12:19
An angel freed Peter from prison.
Acts 12:5-11
5 So for several days Peter was kept {they kept Peter} in prison. But the other
believers in the congregation at Jerusalem were praying earnestly to God that he would
help Peter. 6 The night before Herod planned to bring Peter out from prison to have
him executed publicly, Peter was sleeping in the prison between two soldiers, with two
chains binding his arms to the arms of the soldiers. Two other soldiers were guarding
the prison doors. 7 Suddenly an angel from the Lord God stood beside Peter, and a
bright light shone in his cell. The angel poked Peter in the side and woke him up and
said, “Get up quickly!” While Peter was getting up, the chains fell off from his wrists.
However, the soldiers were not aware of what was happening. 8 Then the angel said to
Peter, “Put on your clothes and sandals!” So Peter did. Then the angel said to him,
“Fasten your belt/girdle around you(sg) and put on your sandals!” So Peter did that.
Then the angel told him, “Wrap your cloak around you and follow me!” 9 So, after
Peter put on his cloak and sandals, he followed the angel out of the prison cell, but he
had no idea that what the angel was doing was really happening. He thought that he
was seeing a vision. 10 Peter and the angel walked by the soldiers who were guarding
the two doors, but the soldiers did not see them. Then they came to the iron gate
that led out into the city. The gate opened by itself, and Peter and the angel walked
out of the prison. After they had walked a ways along one street, the angel suddenly
disappeared. 11 Then Peter finally realized that what had happened to him was not a
vision, but it had really happened. So he said to himself, “Now I really know that the
Lord God sent an angel to help me. He rescued me from what Herod planned to do
[MTY] to me, and also from all the things that the Jewish leaders [SYN] expected that
Herod would do to me.”
Peter reported to the other believers.
Acts 12:12-17
12 When Peter realized that God had rescued him, he went to Mary’s house. She
was the mother of John whose other name was Mark. Many believers had assembled
there, and they were praying that God would help Peter somehow. 13 When Peter
knocked at the outer entrance, a servant girl named Rhoda came to find out who was
outside the door. 14 When Peter answered her, she recognized his voice, but she was
so happy and excited that she did not open the door! Instead, she ran back into the
house. She excitedly announced to the other believers that Peter was standing outside
the door. 15 But one of them said to her, “You (sg) are crazy!” But she continued
saying that it was really true. Then they repeatedly said, “No, it cannot be Peter. It
is probably the angel who was guarding him who has come (OR, It is the angel who
has guarded/protected him, and he has come to tell us that Peter has died.)” 16 But
Peter continued knocking on the door. So when someone finally opened the door, they
saw that it was Peter, and they were completely amazed! 17 Peter motioned with his
hand for them to be quiet. Then he told them exactly how the Lord God had led him
out of the prison. He also said, “Tell James, the leader of our congregation, and our
other fellow believers what has happened.” Then Peter left and went away to another
town.
Herod commanded soldiers to execute the guards.
Acts 12:18-19
18 The next morning the soldiers who had been guarding Peter became terribly
distressed, because they did not know what had happened to him. 19 Then Herod
heard about it. So he commanded soldiers to search for Peter, but they did not find
him. Then he questioned the soldiers who had been guarding Peter, and asked them,ACTS 12:20
1587
ACTS 13:5
“How did Peter get away when you were there guarding him?” But they could not
explain it. So he commanded them to be led away to be executed {other soldiers to
lead them away to execute them}. Afterwards, Herod went from Judea province down
to Caesarea, where he stayed for some time.
An angel caused Herod to die.
Acts 12:20-23
20 King Herod had been furiously angry with the people who lived in Tyre and Sidon
cities. Then one day some men who represented them came unitedly to Caesarea in
order to meet with Herod. They persuaded Blastus, who was one of Herod’s important
officials, to tell Herod that the people in their cities wanted to make peace with him.
They wanted to be able to trade with the people that Herod ruled, because they needed
to buy food from those regions. Herod had commanded the people in the areas he ruled
to stop selling food to the people in those cities. 21 On the day that Herod had planned
to meet with them, he put on ◄very expensive clothes that showed that he was king/
his royal robes►. Then he sat on his ◄throne/chair from which he ruled people►,
and formally addressed all the people who had gathered there. 22 Those who were
listening to him shouted repeatedly, “This man who is speaking is a god, not a man!”
23 So, because Herod let the people praise him instead of praising God, immediately
an angel from the Lord God caused Herod to become seriously ill. Many worms ate
his intestines, and soon he died very painfully.
Many people heard God’s message and became believers. Barnabas and Saul
returned to Antioch from Jerusalem.
Acts 12:24-25
24 The believers continued telling God’s message to people in many places, and
◄the number of people who believed in Jesus was continually increasing/there were
continually more and more people who were believing in Jesus►.
25 When Barnabas and Saul finished delivering the money to help the Jewish believers
in Judea, they left Jerusalem and returned to Antioch, in Syria province. They took
John, whose other name was Mark, with them.
13
The Holy Spirit commanded Barnabas and Saul to go on a mission.
Acts 13:1-3
1 Among the people in the congregation at Antioch there were ◄prophets/those who
spoke messages from God► and those who taught people about Jesus. They were
Barnabas; Simeon, who was also called Niger/Blackman; Lucius, from Cyrene city;
Manaen, who had grown up with King Herod Antipas; and Saul. 2 While they were
worshipping the Lord and fasting, the Holy Spirit said to them, “Appoint Barnabas
and Saul to serve me and to go and do the work that I have chosen them to do!” 3 So
they continued ◄to fast/to abstain from eating food► and pray. Then having put their
hands on Barnabas and Saul and praying that God would help them, they sent them
off to do what the Holy Spirit had commanded.
Barnabas and Saul preached the gospel in Jewish meetings place on Cyprus.
Acts 13:4-5
4 Barnabas and Saul, guided by the Holy Spirit, went down from Antioch to Seleucia
port. From there they went by ship to Salamis port on Cyprus Island. 5 While they
were in Salamis, they went to the Jewish meeting places. There they proclaimed the
message from God about Jesus. John Mark went with them and was helping them.ACTS 13:6
1588
ACTS 13:21
Saul-Paul denounced a sorcerer, and an official believed in Jesus.
Acts 13:6-12
6 The three of them went across the entire island to Paphos city. There they met
a magician whose name was Bar-Jesus. He was a Jew who falsely claimed ◄to be a
prophet/to speak messages from God►. 7 He often accompanied the governor of the
island, Sergius Paulus, who was an intelligent man. The governor sent someone to
ask Barnabas and Saul to come to him, because he wanted to hear God’s message. So
Barnabas and Saul came and told him about Jesus. 8 However, the magician, whose
name was Elymas in the Greek language, was opposing them. He repeatedly tried to
persuade the governor not to believe in Jesus. 9 Then Saul, who now called himself
Paul, empowered by the Holy Spirit, looked intently at the magician and said, 10 “You
(sg) are serving the devil and you oppose everything that is good! You are always
lying to people and doing other evil things to them. ◄You must stop saying that the
truth about the Lord God is a lot of lies!/When will you stop changing what is true
about the Lord God and saying what is not true about him?► [RHQ] 11 Right now the
Lord God [MTY] is going to punish you! You will become blind and not even be able
to see light for some time.” At once he became blind, as though he was in a dark
mist, and he groped about, searching for someone to hold him by the hand and lead
him. 12 When the governor saw what had happened to Elymas, he believed in the
Lord Jesus. He was amazed by what Paul and Barnabas were teaching about the Lord
Jesus.
The leaders of the Jewish meeting place in Antioch asked Paul and Barnabas to speak
to them.
Acts 13:13-15
13 After that, Paul and the two men with him went by ship from Paphos to Perga
port in Pamphylia province. At Perga John Mark left them and returned to his home
in Jerusalem. 14 Then Paul and Barnabas traveled by land from Perga, and arrived
in Antioch city near Pisidia district in Galatia province. ◄On the Sabbath/On the
Jewish rest day► they entered the synagogue/the Jewish meeting place and sat down.
15 Someone read aloud from what Moses had written. Then someone read from what
the other prophets had written [MTY]. Then the leaders of the Jewish meeting place
gave someone this note to take to Paul and Barnabas: “Fellow Jews, if one of you
wants to speak to the people here to encourage them, please speak to us(exc) now.”
Paul said that God helped Israel and gave them the land of Canaan.
Acts 13:16-20
16 So Paul stood up and motioned with his right hand so that the people would listen
to him. Then he said, “Fellow Israelis and you non-Jewish people who also worship
God, please listen to me! 17 God, whom we (inc) Israelis worship, chose our ancestors
to be his people, and he caused them to become very numerous while they were
foreigners living in Egypt. Then after many years, God helped them [MTY] powerfully
and led them out of there. 18 Even though they repeatedly disobeyed him, he cared for
them for about 40 years while they were in the desert. 19 He enabled the Israelis to
conquer seven tribal groups who were then living in Canaan region, and he gave their
land to us Israelis for us to possess. 20 Our ancestors began to possess Canaan about
450 years after their ancestors had arrived in Egypt.”
Paul told about God’s removing Saul and appointing David to be Israel’s king.
Acts 13:20b-22
“After that, God appointed leaders to rule the Israeli people. Those leaders continued
to rule our people until the time when the prophet Samuel ruled them. 21 Then, while
Samuel was still their leader, the people demanded that he appoint a king to ruleACTS 13:22
1589
ACTS 13:35
them. So God appointed Saul, the son of Kish, from the tribe of Benjamin, to be their
king. He ruled them for 40 years. 22 After God had rejected Saul from being king, he
appointed David to be their king. God said about him, ‘I have observed that David,
son of Jesse, is exactly the kind of man that I desire [IDM]. He will do everything that
I want him to do.’ ”
Paul said that God sent David’s descendant, Jesus, to Israel to save them.
Acts 13:23-25
23 “From among David’s descendants, God brought one of them, Jesus, to us Israeli
people to save us, just like he had told David and our other ancestors that he would
do. 24 Before Jesus began his work, John the Baptizer preached to all of our Israeli
people who came to him. He told them that they should turn away from their sinful
behavior and ask God to forgive them. Then he would baptize them. 25 When John
was about to finish the work that God gave him to do, he frequently said to the people,
‘Do you think [RHQ] that I am the Messiah whom God promised to send? No, I am not.
But listen! The Messiah will soon come. He is so much greater than I am that I am
not even important enough to be his slave [MET].’ ”
Paul said that God resurrected Jesus and caused many people to see him.
Acts 13:26-31
26 “Fellow Israelis, you who are descendants of Abraham, and you non-Jewish people
who also worship God, please listen! It is to all of us that God has sent the message
about how he saves people. 27 The people who were living in Jerusalem and their
rulers did not realize that this man Jesus was the one whom God had sent to save
them. Although messages from [MTY] the prophets have been read aloud {someone
has read aloud messages from [MTY] the prophets} every ◄Sabbath/Jewish day of
rest►, they did not understand what the prophets wrote about the Messiah. So the
Jewish leaders condemned Jesus to die, which was just like the prophets predicted.
28 Many people accused Jesus of doing wicked things, but they could not prove that he
had done anything for which he deserved to die. They insistently asked Pilate the
governor to command that Jesus be executed {to command soldiers to execute Jesus}.
So Pilate did what they asked him to do. 29 They did to Jesus all the things that the
prophets long ago had written that people would do to him. They killed Jesus by nailing
him to a cross. Then his body was taken {some people took his body} down from the
cross and placed it in a tomb. 30 However, God ◄raised him from the dead/caused
him to live again after he had died► 31 and for many days he repeatedly appeared
to his followers who had come along with him from Galilee province to Jerusalem.
Those who saw him are telling the Jewish people about him now.”
Paul said that God had done what he had promised that he would do by resurrecting
Jesus.
Acts 13:32-37
32 “Right now we two are proclaiming to you this good message. We want to tell
you that God has fulfilled what he promised to our Jewish ancestors! 33 He has now
done that for us (inc) who are their descendants, and also for you who are not Jews,
by causing Jesus to live again. That is just like what David wrote in the second Psalm
that God said when he was sending his Son,
You (sg) are my Son;
Today I have shown everyone that I really am your Father.
34 God has ◄raised the Messiah from the dead/caused the Messiah to live again after
he had died► and will never let him die again. Concerning that, God said to our Jewish
ancestors, ‘I will surely help you, as I promised David that I would do.’ 35 So in writingACTS 13:36
1590
ACTS 13:48
another Psalm, David said this to God about the Messiah: ‘Because I am devoted to you
and always obey you, when I die you (sg) will not let my body decay.’ 36 While David
was living, he did what God wanted him to do. And when he died [EUP], his body was
buried, as his ancestors’ bodies had been buried, and his body decayed. So he could
not have been speaking about himself in this Psalm. 37 Instead, he was speaking about
Jesus. Jesus also died, but God ◄raised him from the dead/caused him to live again►,
and therefore his body did not decay.”
Paul informed them that God would forgive their sins if they believed in Jesus.
Acts 13:38-41
38-39 “Therefore, my fellow Israelis and other friends, it is important for you to know
that we(exc) are declaring to you that God can forgive you for your sins as a result
of what Jesus has done. Because of what Jesus has done, God considers that everyone
who believes in Jesus is no longer guilty (OR, the record has been erased {God has
erased the record}) concerning everything that they have done that displeased God.
But when God does that for you, it is not as a result of your obeying the laws that
Moses wrote. 40 Therefore be careful that God does not judge you [MTY], as one of
the prophets said [MTY] that God would do! 41 The prophet wrote that God said,
You who ridicule me, you will certainly be astonished when you see what I am doing,
and then you will be destroyed. You will be astonished because I will do
something terrible to you while you are living. You would not believe that I
would do that even though someone told you!”
People asked Paul and Barnabas to speak to them again the next Jewish day of rest.
Acts 13:42-43
42 After Paul finished speaking, while he and Barnabas were leaving the Jewish
meeting place, many of the people there repeatedly requested that on the next
◄Sabbath/Jewish day of rest► the two of them should speak to them again about
those things that Paul had just told them. 43 After they began to leave that meeting,
many of them went along with Paul and Barnabas. They consisted of Jews and also
of non-Jews who had accepted the things that the Jews believe. Paul and Barnabas
continued talking to them, and were urging them to continue believing the message
that God kindly forgives people’s sins because of what Jesus did.
Many non-Jews believed in Jesus and told others about him.
Acts 13:44-49
44 On the next Jewish rest day, most of the people in Antioch came to the Jewish
meeting place to hear Paul and Barnabas speak about the Lord Jesus. 45 But the leaders
of [SYN] the Jews became extremely jealous, because they saw that large crowds of
non-Jewish people were coming to hear Paul and Barnabas. So they began to contradict
the things that Paul was saying and also to insult him. 46 Then, speaking very boldly,
Paul and Barnabas said to those Jewish leaders, “We two had to speak the message
from God about Jesus to you Jews first before we proclaim it to non-Jews, because
God commanded us to do that. But you are rejecting God’s message. By doing that,
you have shown that you are not worthy ◄to have eternal life/to live eternally with
God►. Therefore, we are leaving you, and now we will go to the non-Jewish people to
tell them the message from God. 47 We are doing that also because the Lord God has
commanded us to do it. He said to us,
‘I have appointed you to reveal things about me to non-Jewish people [MET] that will
be like a light to them. I have appointed you to tell people everywhere [MTY]
in the world about the one who came to save them.’ ”
48 While the non-Jewish people were listening to those words, they began to rejoice,
and they repeatedly said that the message about the Lord Jesus was wonderful. AndACTS 13:49
1591
ACTS 14:10
all of the non-Jewish people whom God had chosen ◄to have eternal life/ to live
eternally with God► believed the message about the Lord Jesus. 49 At that time, many
of the believers traveled around throughout that region. As they did that, they were
proclaiming the message about the Lord Jesus [MTY].
People expelled the apostles, but the believers continued on.
Acts 13:50-52
50 However, some leaders of [SYN] the Jews incited the most important men in the
city, and some important/influential women who had accepted what the Jews believe,
to oppose Paul and Barnabas. So those non-Jewish people incited other people also
to persecute Paul and Barnabas. As a result they expelled the two men from their
region. 51 So, as the two apostles were leaving, they shook the dust from their feet to
show those Jewish leaders that God had rejected them and would punish them. They left
Antioch and went to Iconium city. 52 Meanwhile, the believers in Antioch continued
to rejoice greatly, and they continued to be completely controlled by the Holy Spirit.
14
Paul and Barnabas preached the gospel and performed miracles in Iconium.
Acts 14:1-3
1 At Iconium Paul and Barnabas went as usual into the Jewish meeting place and
spoke very convincingly about the Lord Jesus. As a result, many Jews and also non-
Jews believed in Jesus. 2 But some of the Jews refused to believe that message, and
told the non-Jews not to believe it. They told the non-Jewish people that the message
about Jesus was not true. As a result, some of the non-Jews became angry towards
the believers there. 3 So Paul and Barnabas spent considerable time there speaking
boldly for the Lord, and the Lord Jesus enabled them to do many miracles. In this
way he showed people that the message about how the Lord saves us in a way that
we do not deserve is true.
Before people could attack the apostles, they escaped to Lystra and Derbe.
Acts 14:4-7
4 The people who lived
in Iconium city strongly disagreed with each other
concerning the message about Jesus. Some of them agreed with the Jews [SYN] who
did not believe that message. Others agreed with Paul and Barnabas. 5 Then the non-
Jewish people and the Jewish leaders [SYN] who opposed those two talked among
themselves about how they could mistreat them. Some of the important men in
that city agreed to help them. Together, they decided that they would kill Paul and
Barnabas by throwing stones at them. 6 But Paul and Barnabas heard about that, so
they quickly went away to Lycaonia district. They went to Lystra and Derbe cities in
that district and to the area surrounding those cities. 7 While they were in that area,
they continually told people the message about the Lord Jesus.
God enabled Paul to heal a lame man.
Acts 14:8-10
8 Once while Paul was preaching to people in Lystra, a man was sitting there who
was crippled in his legs. When his mother bore him he had crippled legs, so he was
never able to walk. 9 He listened as Paul was speaking about the Lord Jesus. Paul
looked directly at him and could see in the man’s face that he believed that the Lord
Jesus could make him well. 10 So Paul called out to him, “Stand up!” When the man
heard that, he immediately jumped up and began to walk normally.
The apostles stopped the people from worshipping them.
Acts 14:11-18ACTS 14:11
1592
ACTS 14:23
11 When the crowd saw what Paul had done, they thought that Paul and Barnabas
◄were/must be► the gods that they worshipped. So they shouted excitedly in their own
Lycaonia language, “Look! These people are the gods that we(inc) worship! They have
made themselves look like people and have come down from the sky/heaven to help
us!” 12 They began to say that Barnabas was probably the chief god, whose name was
Zeus. And they began to say that Paul was Hermes, the messenger/spokesman for the
other gods. They mistakenly thought that because Paul was the one who had been
speaking. 13 Just outside the gates of the city there was a temple where the people
worshipped Zeus. The priest who was there heard what Paul and Barnabas had done,
so he came to the city gate, where many people had already gathered. He brought
two bulls with wreaths of flowers around their necks. The priest and the other people
wanted to kill the bulls as part of a ceremony to worship Paul and Barnabas. 14 But
when the apostles, Barnabas and Paul, heard about that, and understood that the
people thought that they were gods and wanted to sacrifice the bulls to worship them,
they were very distressed, so they tore their own clothes. They rushed among the
people, shouting, 15 “Men, ◄you must not kill those bulls to worship us(dl)!/why are
you doing this?► [RHQ] We are not gods! We are just human beings like you! We
have come to tell you some good news! We have come to tell you about the God who
is all-powerful. He wants you to stop worshipping other gods, because they cannot
help you. This true God made the heaven/sky and the earth and the oceans and
everything in it. 16 In the past, all of you non-Jewish people worshipped whatever
gods that you wanted to. God let you worship them, because you did not know him.
17 But he has shown us [LIT] that he acts kindly toward us(inc). He is the one who
causes it to rain and causes crops to grow. He is the one who gives you plenty of food,
and makes you very happy.” 18 The people heard what Paul said, but they still thought
that they should sacrifice those bulls to worship Paul and Barnabas. But finally, the
people decided not to do it.
Some Jews incited people to stone Paul at Lystra.
Acts 14:19-20a
19 However, after that, some Jews came from Antioch and Iconium and persuaded
many of the people of Lystra that the message Paul had been telling them was not
true. The people who believed what those Jews said became angry with Paul. They let
the Jews throw stones at him until he fell down, unconscious. They all thought that
he was dead, so they dragged him outside the city and left him lying there. But some
of the believers in Lystra had followed them outside the city. 20 They came and stood
around Paul, where he was lying on the ground. And Paul became conscious! He stood
up and went back into the city with the believers.
The apostles revisited believers and appointed leaders.
Acts 14:20b-23
The next day, Paul and Barnabas left Lystra and traveled to Derbe. 21 They stayed
there several days and they kept telling the people the good message about Jesus. Many
people became believers. After that, Paul and Barnabas started on their way back.
They went again to Lystra. Then they went from there to Iconium, and then they
went to Antioch in Pisidia province. 22 In each city, they helped the believers [SYN]
to become strong spiritually, and they urged them to keep on trusting in the Lord
Jesus. They told the believers, “It is necessary that we endure people often persecuting
us (inc) before we enter the place where God will rule over us forever.” 23 Paul and
Barnabas appointed leaders for each congregation. And before Paul and Barnabas
left each town, they gathered the believers together and spent some time praying andACTS 14:24
1593
ACTS 15:5
◄fasting/not eating any food►. Then Paul and Barnabas entrusted the leaders and
other believers to the Lord Jesus, in whom they had believed, in order that he would
care for them.
Paul and Barnabas reported to the believers at Syrian Antioch.
Acts 14:24-28
24 After Paul and Barnabas had traveled through Pisidia district, they went south
to Pamphylia district. 25 In that district, they arrived at Perga and preached God’s
message about the Lord Jesus to the people there. Then they went down to the seacoast
at Attalia. 26 There they got on a ship and went back to Antioch in Syria province.
That was the place where Paul and Barnabas had been appointed {where believers
had sent Paul and Barnabas} to go to other places and preach. Antioch was the place
where the believers had asked God to kindly help Paul and Barnabas in the work that
they had now completed. 27 When they arrived in Antioch, they called the believers
together. Then Paul and Barnabas told them all that God had helped them to do.
Specifically, they told them how God had enabled [IDM] many non-Jewish people to
believe in Jesus. 28 Then Paul and Barnabas stayed in Antioch with the other believers
for several months.
15
Some Jewish believers said that God will save only people who are circumcised.
Acts 15:1-2
1 Then some Jewish believers went down from Judea province to Antioch. They
started teaching the non-Jewish believers there, and said, “You ◄must be circumcised/
must have God’s mark put on you► to indicate you belong to God, as Moses
commanded in the laws that he received from God. If you do not do that, you will
not be saved {God will not save you}.” 2 Paul and Barnabas strongly disagreed with
those Jews and started arguing with them. So the believers at Antioch appointed Paul
and Barnabas and some of the other believers to go to Jerusalem, in order that they
would/could discuss this matter with the apostles and other spiritual leaders.
Paul and Barnabas reported what God had enabled them to do.
Acts 15:3-4
3 After Paul, Barnabas, and the others were given things for their trip by the
congregation at Antioch {After the congregation at Antioch gave Paul, Barnabas,
and the others things for their trip}, they traveled through Phoenicia and Samaria
provinces. When they stopped at different places in those provinces, they reported
to the believers that many non-Jews in Antioch had become believers. As a result,
all the believers in those places rejoiced greatly. 4 And when Paul, Barnabas, and the
others arrived in Jerusalem, they were welcomed by the apostles, the other elders, and
the other members of the congregation there {the apostles, the other elders, and the
other members of the congregation there welcomed them}. Then Paul and Barnabas
reported the things that God had enabled them to do among non-Jewish people.
Some Jewish believers said that non-Jewish believers must obey Moses’ laws.
Acts 15:5
5 But some of the Jewish believers who belonged to the Pharisee sect stood up among
the other believers and said to them, “The non-Jews who have believed in Jesus must
be circumcised, and they must be told to obey the laws that God gave to Moses.”
Peter told about non-Jews becoming believers when he preached to them.
Acts 15:6-11ACTS 15:6
1594
ACTS 15:20
6 Then the apostles and the other elders met together in order to talk about this
matter. 7 After they had discussed it for a long time, Peter stood up and spoke to
them. He said, “Fellow believers, you all know that a long time ago God chose me
from among you other apostles, in order that the non-Jewish people might also hear
me [SYN] tell them the good message about the Lord Jesus, so that they could hear it
and believe in him. So Paul and Barnabas are not the first ones to tell non-Jews about
Jesus. 8 God knows and judges people according to what they think, not according to
who their ancestors were. By sending the Holy Spirit to the non-Jews, just like he had
also done for us (inc) Jews, he showed me and others that he had accepted them also
to be his people. 9 God saved us Jews and those non-Jews similarly, making them clean
spiritually simply as a result of their believing in the Lord Jesus. That was exactly
how he has forgiven us. 10 You are wanting to force the non-Jewish believers to obey
our Jewish rituals and laws—laws that God has shown that he does not require them
to obey [MET]. Your doing that is like putting a heavy burden on them! So then, ◄stop
making God angry by doing that!/why are you making God angry by doing that?►
[RHQ] Our ancestors and we (inc) Jews have never been able to bear the burden of
obeying those laws! 11 But we (inc) know that it is not because we (inc) try to obey those
laws that God saves us(inc) Jews. On the contrary, we (inc) know that it is because of
what the Lord Jesus did for us (inc) that we did not deserve that we (inc) are saved
{that God saves us} from the guilt of our sins. God saves non-Jews who believe in the
Lord Jesus exactly like he saves us Jews.”
Barnabas and Paul reported what God had helped them to do among the non-Jews.
Acts 15:12
12 All the people there became silent after Peter had spoken. Then they all listened
to Barnabas and Paul, as the two of them told about the many great miracles that God
had enabled them to do among the non-Jewish people, miracles that showed that God
had accepted the non-Jews.
James recommended what they should tell the non-Jewish believers.
Acts 15:13-21
13 When Barnabas and Paul had finished speaking, James, the leader of the group
of believers there in Jerusalem, spoke to all of them. He said, “Fellow believers, listen
to me. 14 Simon Peter has told you how God previously blessed the non-Jews. God
did that by choosing from among them a people who would belong to him [MTY].
15 These words that God spoke, words that were written by one of the prophets {that
one of the prophets wrote} long ago, agree with that:
16 Later on I will return and I will re-establish the kingdom [MET] that David
ruled and that has been {that people have} destroyed. My doing that will be like
rebuilding a house that has been {that people have} torn down. 17 I will do that in
order that all other people might seek me, the Lord God. I will do that in order that
all the non-Jews whom I have called to belong to me [MTY] might seek me. You can
be certain that this will happen because I the Lord God, who will do those things,
have spoken these words. 18 I caused my people to know about them long ago.”
19 James continued by saying, “Therefore I have decided that we(inc) should stop
bothering the non-Jewish people who are turning away from their sins and turning
to God. That is, we should stop demanding that they obey all our laws and rituals.
20 Instead, we should write a letter to them requiring only four things: They should
not eat meat/food that people have offered to idols, they should not have sex with
someone to whom they are not married, they should not eat meat from animals that
have been killed by being strangled {people have strangled}, and they should not eat theACTS 15:21
1595
ACTS 15:33-34
blood of animals. 21 In many cities, for a very long time people have been proclaiming
the laws that Moses wrote [MTY], laws prohibiting those things. And every ◄Sabbath/
Jewish day of rest► those laws are read {someone reads those laws} in the Jewish
meeting places. So if the non-Jews want to know more about those laws, they can find
out in our meeting houses.”
The church leaders sent messengers with a letter to non-Jewish believers.
Acts 15:22-29
22 The apostles and the other elders, along with all the other members of the
congregation, accepted what James had said. Then they decided that they should
choose men from among themselves and that they should send them, along with
Paul and Barnabas, to Antioch, to let the believers there know what the leaders at
Jerusalem had decided. So they chose Judas, who was also called Barsabbas, and
Silas, who were leaders among the believers at Jerusalem. 23 Then they wrote the
following letter that they asked Judas and Silas to take to the believers at Antioch:
“We(exc) apostles and other leaders who are your fellow believers send our
greetings to you as we write this to you non-Jewish believers who live in Antioch
and other places in Syria and Cilicia provinces. 24 People have told us that some
men from among us went to you, although we had not told them to do that. They
troubled/distressed you [SYN] by telling you things that confused your thinking.
25 So while we(exc) met together here, we decided to choose some men and ask
them to go to you, along with Barnabas and Paul, whom we (exc) love very much.
26 Those two have put their lives in danger because of their serving our Lord
[MTY] Jesus Christ. 27 We (exc) have also chosen Judas and Silas to go to you.
They will tell you the same things that we are writing. 28 The Holy Spirit and also
we decided that you should not be required {that we should not require you} to
obey a lot of burdensome Jewish laws. Instead, we only require you to obey the
following instructions,
29 You should not eat food that people have sacrificed to idols.
You should not eat blood from animals, and you should not eat meat from animals
that people have killed by strangling them.
Also, you should not have sex with someone to whom you are not married.
Those things especially offend Jewish believers. So if you avoid doing them, you will
be doing what is right. That is all.”
The letter and messengers encouraged the believers at Antioch.
Acts 15:30-32
30 The four men whom they had chosen went from Jerusalem to Antioch city. When
all the believers there had assembled together, Judas and Silas gave the letter to
them. 31 When the believers there read the letter, they rejoiced, because its message
encouraged them. 32 Just like Paul and Barnabas were ◄prophets/men who spoke
messages from God►, Judas and Silas were also prophets. They spoke for a long
time and encouraged the believers there, and helped them to trust more strongly in
the Lord Jesus.
Paul and Barnabas continued to teach and preach in Antioch.
Acts 15:33-35
33-34 After Judas and Silas had stayed in Antioch for some time and were ready to
return to Jerusalem, the believers there wished them well, and the believers prayed
that God would protect them as they traveled. So the two men started to go back toACTS 15:35
1596
ACTS 16:7
the leaders in Jerusalem who had asked them to go to Antioch.* 35 However, Paul and
Barnabas continued to stay in Antioch. While they were there, they, along with many
others, were teaching people and preaching to them the message about the Lord Jesus.
Paul and Barnabas separated, and Paul chose Silas.
Acts 15:36-41
36 After some time Paul said to Barnabas, “Let’s go back and visit the fellow
believers in every city where we previously proclaimed the message about the Lord
Jesus. In that way, we will know how well they are continuing to believe in the Lord
Jesus.” 37 Barnabas agreed with Paul, and said that he wanted to take John, whose
other name was Mark, along with them again. 38 However, Paul told Barnabas that he
thought that it would not be good to take Mark with them, because Mark had deserted
them when they were previously in Pamphylia region, and had not continued to work
with them. 39 Paul and Barnabas strongly disagreed with each other about that, so
they separated. Barnabas took Mark along with him and they got on a ship and went
to Cyprus. 40 Paul chose Silas, who had returned to Antioch, to work with him. The
believers there asked the Lord God to graciously help Paul and Silas. Then the two of
them departed from Antioch. 41 Paul continued traveling with Silas through Syria and
Cilicia provinces. In those places he was helping the congregations to trust strongly
in the Lord Jesus.
16
Paul chose Timothy to work with him and Silas.
Acts 16:1-3
1 Paul and Silas went to Derbe city and visited the believers there. Next they went
to Lystra city. A believer whose name was Timothy lived there. His mother was a
Jewish believer, but his father was a Greek. 2 The believers in Lystra and Iconium
said good things about Timothy, 3 and Paul wanted to take Timothy with him when
he went to other places, so he circumcised Timothy. He did that so that the Jews who
lived in those places would accept Timothy, because they knew that his non-Jewish
father had not allowed him to be circumcised {anyone to circumcise his son}.
Paul, Silas and Timothy told believers in Galatia what the church leaders had
decided.
Acts 16:4-5
4 So Timothy went with Paul and Silas and they traveled to many other towns. In
each town they told the believers the rules that had been decided by the apostles
and elders in Jerusalem {that the apostles and elders in Jerusalem had decided} that
non-Jewish believers should obey.
5 God was helping the believers in those towns to trust more strongly in the Lord
Jesus, and every day more people became believers.
Because of a vision in Troas, Paul went to preach in Macedonia.
Acts 16:6-10
6 Paul and his companions wanted/planned to enter Asia province and preach the
message about Jesus there, but they were prevented by the Holy Spirit {the Holy
Spirit prevented them} from going there. So they traveled through Phrygia and Galatia
provinces. 7 They arrived at the border of Mysia province and they wanted to go north
into Bithynia province. But again the Spirit of Jesus showed them that they should
* 15:33-34 just before they left, Silas decided to stay there in Antioch.” Each translator should choose between
this text and the implied information that we have given in verse 40. Each should choose the way to translate
that seems the most preferable.ACTS 16:8
1597
ACTS 16:21
not go there. 8 So they went through Mysia province and arrived at Troas, a port city.
I, Luke, joined them there. 9 That night God gave Paul a vision in which he saw a
man who was a native of Macedonia province. He was standing some distance away,
and he was earnestly calling to Paul, “Please come over here to Macedonia and help
us!” 10 The next morning we (exc) immediately got ready to go to Macedonia, because
we believed that God had called us to go and preach the good message to the people
there.
Paul’s company went from Troas to Philippi.
Acts 16:11-12
11 So we (exc) got on a ship in Troas and sailed across the sea to Samothrace Island.
We spent the night there, and the next day we sailed again across the sea and arrived
at Neapolis port/town. 12 Then we left Neapolis and went by land to Philippi. It was
a very important city in Macedonia province, where many Roman citizens lived. We
stayed in Philippi several days.
Paul preached the gospel and Lydia became a believer.
Acts 16:13-15
13 On the first ◄Sabbath/Jewish day of rest► after we(exc) arrived, we went outside
the city gate down to the river. We had heard someone say that Jewish people gathered
to pray there. When we arrived there, we saw some women who had gathered to
pray. So we sat down and began to tell them the message about Jesus. 14 A woman
whose name was Lydia was one of those who were listening to Paul. She was a
non-Jewish woman, from Thyatira city, who bought and sold expensive purple cloth.
She had accepted what the Jews believe about God. The Lord God caused her to pay
attention to the message that Paul preached, and she believed it. The members of her
household also heard the good message and believed in Jesus [MTY]. 15 After Paul and
Silas baptized Lydia and the others who lived in her house [MTY] {After Lydia and
the others who lived in her house were baptized}, she invited us to go and stay in
her home. She said, “You (pl) know that I now believe in the Lord Jesus, so please
come and stay in my house.” She persuaded us to do that, so we(exc) stayed there.
Paul expelled a demon from a slave girl, so officials imprisoned Paul and Silas.
Acts 16:16-24
16 Another day, while we (exc) were going to the place where people regularly
gathered to pray, we met a young woman who was a slave. An evil spirit was enabling
her to be a ventriloquist and to tell people what would happen to them. People paid
a lot of money to the men who were her owners, in return for her telling them things
that she said would happen to them. 17 This young woman followed Paul and the
rest of us. She continually shouted, “These men serve the God who is the greatest
of all gods! They are telling you how ◄God can save you so that he will not punish
you/to be saved►” 18 She continued to do that for many days. Finally Paul became
irritated. So he turned toward the young woman and rebuked the evil spirit that was
in her. He said, “By the authority [MTY] of Jesus Christ, I command you (sg) to come
out of this young woman!” Right away the evil spirit left her. 19 And then her owners
realized that she could no longer earn money for them because she could no longer
predict what would happen to people, so they were angry. They grabbed Paul and Silas
and forcefully took them to the public square, to the place where the government
authorities and a lot of other people were gathered. 20 The owners of the young woman
brought Paul and Silas to the city officials and told them, “These men are Jews, and
they are greatly troubling the people in [MTY] our city. 21 They are teaching that we
(inc) should follow customs that our laws do not allow us Romans to consider to beACTS 16:22
1598
ACTS 16:40
correct or to obey!” 22 Many of the crowd joined those who were accusing Paul and
Silas, and started beating them. Then the Roman authorities commanded soldiers to
tear the shirts off Paul and Silas and to beat them with rods/sticks. 23 So the soldiers
beat Paul and Silas vigorously with rods. After that, they took them and shoved them
into the prison. They told the jailer that he should lock them up securely. 24 Because
the officials had commanded him to do that, the jailer shoved Paul and Silas into the
cell that was farthest inside. There, he made them sit down on the floor/ground and
stretch out their legs. Then he fastened their ankles in grooves between two large
wooden beams, so that Paul and Silas could not move their legs.
Paul and Silas helped the jailer and his household to become believers.
Acts 16:25-34
25 About midnight, Paul and Silas were praying aloud and praising God by singing
hymns. The other prisoners were listening attentively to them. 26 Suddenly there was
a very strong earthquake. It shook the entire jail [SYN] and its foundation [SYN]. The
earthquake caused all the doors of the jail to open suddenly, and caused all the chains
that fastened the prisoners to fall off. 27 The jailer woke up and saw that the doors of
the jail were open. He thought that the prisoners had escaped. So he pulled out his
sword in order to kill himself, because he knew that the officials would kill him if the
prisoners escaped. 28 Paul saw the jailer and shouted to him, “Do not harm yourself!
We (exc) prisoners are all here!” 29 The jailer shouted to someone to bring torches/
lanterns, and after they brought them, he rushed into the jail and knelt down in front
of Paul and Silas. He was very afraid, so much so that he was trembling/shaking.
30 Then he brought Paul and Silas out of the jail and asked: “Sirs, what do I need to
do to be saved from being punished for my sins?” 31 They answered, “Trust in what
the Lord Jesus has done for you, and you will be saved {God will save you}, and the
others who live in [MTY] your house will also be saved if they believe in Jesus.”
32-34 Then the jailer took Paul and Silas into his house, washed their wounds, and
gave them a meal. He woke up all the people in his house, and Paul and Silas told all
of them the message about the Lord Jesus. They all believed in him. Immediately after
that, the jailer and all his family were baptized {Paul and Silas baptized the jailer and
all his family}. They were very happy, because now they all believed in God.
Paul and Silas encouraged the believers and then left Philippi.
Acts 16:35-40
35 The next morning, the Roman officials commanded some police officers to go
to the jail to say to the jailer, “Our bosses say, ‘Let those two prisoners go now!’ ”
36 After the officers went and told that to the jailer, he went and told Paul, “The Roman
authorities have sent a message (sg) saying that I should release you (sg) and Silas
from prison. So you two can leave the jail now. Now you can go peacefully!” 37 But
Paul said to the police officers, “The authorities commanded men to beat us in front
of a crowd before those authorities had learned if we (exc) had done anything wrong!
Then they ordered men to shove us into jail! But that was not legal, because we (exc)
are Roman citizens! And now they want [RHQ] to send us away secretly! We will
not accept that! Those Roman officials must come themselves and tell us that they
are sorry, and take us out of jail.” 38 So the police officers went and told the city
authorities what Paul had said. When those authorities heard that Paul and Silas
were Roman citizens, they were afraid that someone would report to more important
officials what they had done, and as a result they would be punished {those officials
would punish them}. 39 So the city authorities came to Paul and Silas and told them
that they were sorry for what they had done to them. The authorities brought them
out of the jail, and repeatedly asked them to leave the city soon. 40 After Paul andACTS 17:1
1599
ACTS 17:12
Silas left the jail, they went to Lydia’s house. There they met with her and the other
believers. They encouraged the believers to continue trusting in the Lord Jesus, and
then the two apostles left Philippi.
17
In Thessalonica, Paul convinced many people that Jesus is the Messiah.
Acts 17:1-4
1 Paul and Silas traveled through Amphipolis and Apollonia towns and arrived at
Thessalonica city. There was a Jewish meeting place there. 2 ◄On the Sabbath/On
the Jewish rest day► Paul went into the meeting house, as he usually did. For three
weeks he went there on each Jewish day of rest. Referring to the Scriptures about the
Messiah, he spoke to the people who were there. 3 He explained and showed that
the prophets wrote that the Messiah needed to die and ◄to become alive again/to be
raised from the dead afterwards►. He told them: “This man Jesus, whom I am telling
you about, is our Messiah. He died and became alive again, just like the prophets
predicted.” 4 Some of the Jews there were persuaded by {believed} what Paul had
said and began to associate with Paul and Silas. There were also many non-Jewish
people there who worshipped God and many important women who also believed the
message about Jesus, and they began to associate with Paul and Silas.
Some Jews there incited people to oppose Paul and Silas.
Acts 17:5-9
5 But some leaders of the Jews there in Thessalonica became jealous because many
people believed what Paul taught. So they went to the public square and persuaded
some lazy men who were loitering there to follow them. In this way, the leaders of the
Jews gathered a crowd and incited them to become noisy and start a riot against Paul
and Silas. Those Jews and others ran to the house of a man named Jason. He was the
man who had invited Paul and Silas to stay at his house. They wanted to bring Paul
and Silas outside to where the crowd of people was waiting. 6 They discovered that
Paul and Silas were not there, but they found Jason and grabbed him. They dragged
him and some of the other believers to where the city officials/authorities and many
other people were gathered. The men who had brought Jason shouted, “Those two men
have caused trouble [IDM] everywhere [HYP] they have gone. Now they have come
to our city, 7 and this fellow Jason invited them to stay at his house. All the people of
this sect oppose what our Emperor has decreed. They say that another person, whose
name is Jesus, is the real king!” 8 When the crowd of people that had gathered and the
city authorities heard that, they became very angry and excited. 9 They wanted to put
the believers in jail. But instead, the officials made Jason and the other believers pay
a fine and told them that they would give the money back to them if Paul and Silas did
not cause any more trouble. Then the authorities let Jason and those other believers
go.
In Berea, Paul helped many Jews and non-Jews to believe in Jesus.
Acts 17:10-12
10 So that same night, the believers sent Paul and Silas out of Thessalonica to Berea
town. When Paul and Silas arrived there, they went to the Jewish meeting place, on
a day when people had gathered there. 11 The Jews in Thessalonica had not been very
willing to listen to God’s message, but the Jews who lived in Berea were very willing
to listen, so they listened very eagerly to the message about Jesus. Every day they
read the Scriptures for themselves to find out if what Paul said about the Messiah was
true. 12 As a result, many of the Jewish people believed in Jesus, and also some of the
important non-Jewish women and many non-Jewish men believed in him.ACTS 17:13
1600
ACTS 17:25
Jews from Thessalonica incited people to oppose Paul.
Acts 17:13-15
13 But then the Jews in Thessalonica heard people tell them that Paul was in Berea
and that he was preaching the message from God about Jesus. So they went to Berea
and told people there that what Paul was teaching was not true. Thus, they caused
many of those people to get angry at Paul. 14 So several of the believers in Berea took
Paul to the coast to go to another province. But Silas and Timothy stayed in Berea.
15 When Paul and the other men from Berea arrived at the coast, they got on a ship
and went to Athens city. Then Paul said to the men who had come with him, “Tell Silas
and Timothy to come to me here in Athens as soon as they can.” Then those men left
Athens and returned to Berea.
In Athens, idols distressed Paul, so he talked to many people about Jesus.
Acts 17:16-17
16 In Athens, Paul waited for Silas and Timothy to arrive. In the meantime, he
walked around in the city. He became very distressed/disturbed because he saw that
throughout [HYP] the city there were many idols. 17 So he went to the Jewish meeting
place and talked about Jesus with the Jews, and also with the Greeks who had accepted
what the Jews believe. He also went to the public square/center every day and talked
to the people whom he met there.
When Paul talked about Jesus, he perplexed some teachers.
Acts 17:18
18 Paul met some teachers who liked to talk about what people should believe.
People called some of them Epicureans and they called others Stoics. They told Paul
what they believed, and they asked him what he believed. Then some of them said
to one another, “This ignorant person is just talking nonsense [RHQ]!” Others said,
“We(exc) think that he is teaching people about ◄foreign gods/new gods that we (exc)
have not heard about►.” They said that because Paul was telling them that Jesus had
died and had become alive again afterwards. They had not heard that message before.
Athens Council members asked Paul to explain what he had been teaching.
Acts 17:19-21
19 So they took Paul to the place where the city council met. When they arrived
there, they said to Paul, “Please tell us, what is this new message that you (sg) are
teaching people? 20 You are teaching some things that startle us (exc), so we want to
know what they mean.” 21 They said that, because the people of Athens and also the
people from other regions who lived there continually talked about what was new to
them, or they listened to others tell what was new.
Paul told them about the God whom they did not know.
Acts 17:22-31
22 Then Paul stood up before the men of the city council and said, “Citizens of
Athens, I see that you ◄are very religious/think that it is very important to worship
many gods►. 23 I say that because, while I was walking along and observing the
objects that represent different gods that you worship, I even saw an altar that had
these words that someone had carved on it: THIS HONORS THE GOD THAT WE(exc)
DO NOT KNOW. So now I will tell you about that God whom you worship but you do
not know.
24 He is the God who made the world and everything in it. Because he rules over all
beings in heaven and on earth, he does not dwell in shrines that people have made.
25 He does not need to have anything made for him by people [MTY] {to have people
[MTY] make [MTY] anything for him}, because everything that exists belongs to him.ACTS 17:26
1601
ACTS 18:5
He is the one who causes ◄us (inc)/all people► to live and breathe, and he gives us
all the things that we(inc) need.
26 In the beginning, God created one couple, and from them God produced all ◄the
ethnic groups/the nations► that now live everywhere on the earth. He also decided
where each ethnic group of people should live and how long they should live there.
27 He wanted people to realize that they need him. Then maybe they would seek him
and find him. God wants us to seek him, although he is really close [LIT] to each one
of us. 28 As someone has said, ‘It is only because he enables us that we (inc) live and
move and do what we do.’ And, as some of your own poets have said, ‘We (inc) are
God’s children.’
29 Therefore, because we are God’s children and can communicate like God does,
we (inc) should not think that he is anything like an image that people have made
of gold or silver or stone which cannot communicate. Those images are designed
and skillfully made {People design and make those images}, but they are not alive.
30 During the times when people did not know what God wanted them to do, he did
not immediately punish them for what they did. But now God commands all people
everywhere to turn away from their evil behavior. 31 He tells us that on a certain day
that he has chosen he is going to judge all of us(inc) people in [MTY] the world. He
has appointed a certain man to judge us, and that man will judge each of us fairly/
justly. God has shown to all people that he has appointed that man to judge everyone,
because God ◄caused him to become alive again after he had died/raised him from
the dead►.”
Some Council members believed in Jesus.
Acts 17:32-34
32 When the men of the council heard Paul say that ◄a man had become alive again
after he had died/someone had been raised from the dead►, some of them laughed
scornfully. But others said, “We (exc) would like you (sg) to tell us more about this,
some other time.” 33 After they said that, Paul left the council meeting. 34 However,
some of the people there went along with Paul and became believers. Among those
who believed in Jesus was a member of the council whose name was Dionysius. Also,
an important woman whose name was Damaris and some other people who had heard
Paul’s message also believed in Jesus.
18
In Corinth, Paul helped many people to become believers.
Acts 18:1-4
1 After that, Paul left Athens city and went to Corinth city. 2 There he met a Jew
whose name was Aquila, who grew up in Pontus province. Aquila and his wife
Priscilla had recently come from Rome, in Italy. They had previously left Rome because
Claudius, the Roman Emperor, had ordered that all the Jews must leave Rome. Paul
later went to see Aquila and Priscilla. 3 Those two made tents to earn ◄money/a
living►. Paul also made tents, so he stayed with them, and they all worked together.
4 Every Sabbath, Paul went to the Jewish meeting place, where he spoke forcefully
to both Jews and non-Jews. He repeatedly tried to persuade them that Jesus is the
Messiah.
Paul helped many non-Jews become believers.
Acts 18:5-8
5 Then Silas and Timothy arrived there from Macedonia province. After they
arrived, Paul did not make tents any more. He used all his time preaching the message
about Jesus in the Jewish meeting place. He continued to tell the Jews that the MessiahACTS 18:6
1602
ACTS 18:21
they had been waiting for was Jesus. 6 But the Jews began to oppose Paul and to say
evil things about him. So he shook the dust from his clothes to show them that they
were displeasing God. Then he said to them, “If God punishes you, it will be your
[SYN] own fault [MTY], not mine! From now on I will go and preach to non-Jewish
people!” 7 So Paul left the Jewish meeting place and went into a house that was next
to it, and preached there. Titius Justus, the owner of the house, was a non-Jewish man
who had accepted what the Jews believe. 8 After that, the ruler of the Jewish meeting
place, whose name was Crispus, and all of his family [MTY] believed in the Lord Jesus.
Many other people in Corinth who listened to Paul also believed in Jesus. Then they
were baptized. But there were people who still opposed Paul and his preaching.
Jesus commanded Paul to continue speaking about him, so Paul did that.
Acts 18:9-11
9 One night Paul had a vision in which the Lord Jesus said to him, “Do not be afraid
of those who oppose you. Instead, you should continue speaking to people about me.
Do not stop, 10 because I will help you, and no one will be able to harm you (sg) here.
Keep telling people about me, because there are many in this city who will believe in
me.” 11 So Paul stayed in Corinth for a year and a half, teaching people the message
from God about Jesus.
Gallio refused to judge Paul.
Acts 18:12-17
12 When Gallio was the Roman governor of Achaia province, the Jewish leaders
[SYN] there got together and seized Paul. They took him before Gallio and accused
him, 13 saying, “This man is teaching people a false religion, leading them to worship
God in ways that are contrary to our Jewish laws.” 14 When Paul was about to speak
[MTY] to defend himself, Gallio said to the Jews, “If this man had acted deceitfully or
disobeyed any of our Roman laws, I would listen patiently to what you Jews want to
tell me. 15 However, you are merely arguing about words and names and your own
Jewish laws, so you yourselves need to resolve this. I refuse to judge these things!”
16 After Gallio had said that, he commanded some soldiers/guards that they expel those
Jewish leaders from the courtroom. 17 Then the mob outside grabbed the leader of the
Jewish meeting place, Sosthenes because they considered that he was responsible for
those accusations against Paul. They beat him, right there in front of the courthouse.
But Gallio did nothing about it.
At Ephesus, Paul parted from Priscilla and Aquila.
Acts 18:18-21
18 Paul stayed on with the believers in Corinth for ◄many days/some time►. Then
he left the believers there, and went with Priscilla and her husband Aquila. They
went down to Cenchrea, a port city. There Paul had his head shaved {someone shave
his head} in order to partially complete a vow that he had taken. Then they got on a
ship and sailed for Syria province. 19 They arrived at Ephesus city, and Priscilla and
Aquila stayed there.
Before Paul left Ephesus, he entered the Jewish meeting place and lectured to the
Jews. 20 They asked him to stay longer, but he refused. 21 But, as he left, he told them,
“I will come back, if God wills/desires me to do that.” Then, because he wanted to be
in Jerusalem to finish completing his vow, he got on a ship that sailed from Ephesus.
Paul visited Jerusalem, then he went on to Antioch in Syria and then he returned to
visit the believers throughout Galatia and Phrygia.
Acts 18:22-23ACTS 18:22
1603
ACTS 19:7
22 When the ship arrived at Caesarea, Paul got off.
He went up to Jerusalem and
greeted the believers there. Then he went back down to Antioch city in Syria province.
23 Paul spent some time with the believers there. Then he left Antioch and traveled
to several towns that he had visited previously in Galatia and Phrygia provinces. He
taught all of the believers more of the message from God about Jesus.
Priscilla and Aquila instructed Apollos about the gospel.
Acts 18:24-26
24 While Paul was traveling in Galatia and Phrygia, a Jewish man whose name was
Apollos came to Ephesus. He was a native of Alexandria city. He spoke eloquently
and he knew the Scriptures thoroughly. 25 Other believers had taught him some things
about how the Lord Jesus desires that people should conduct themselves, and he taught
those things very enthusiastically to people. He had heard about some of the things
that Jesus did and said, and he taught those facts accurately to people. However, he
was teaching incompletely about Jesus, because he knew only what John the Baptizer
had taught people whom he baptized. 26 Apollos went to the Jewish meeting place,
and he told the people there very confidently the things that he had learned. When
Priscilla and Aquila heard what Apollos taught, they invited him to their home. There
they explained more accurately to him the way that God gives people eternal life.
Apollos helped believers in Achaia.
Acts 18:27-28
27 When Apollos decided that he would like to go to Achaia province, the believers
in Ephesus told him that it would be good for him to do that. So they wrote a letter
to the believers in Achaia saying that they should welcome Apollos. So Apollos got
on a ship to go to Corinth. After he arrived, he greatly helped those whom God had
kindly enabled to believe in Jesus. 28 Apollos was vigorously arguing publicly with the
leaders of the Jews while many other people listened. By quoting from the Scriptures,
he proved to people that Jesus was the Messiah.
19
Paul helped some men to become real believers in Jesus.
Acts 19:1-7
1 While Apollos was at Corinth, Paul left the places in Phrygia and Galatia provinces
where he had been visiting, and traveled through Asia province back to Ephesus. He
met some people who said that they were believers. 2 He asked them, “Did you receive
the Holy Spirit when you believed God’s message?” They answered, “No, we (exc) did
not. We have not even heard that there is a Holy Spirit.” 3 So Paul asked, “So when
you were baptized, what were you showing?” They replied, “We were showing that
we (exc) believed what John the Baptizer taught.” 4 Paul said, “John baptized people
who turned away from their sinful behavior. He also told the people to believe in
the one who would come after he had come, and that was Jesus.” 5 So, when those
men heard that, they were baptized to affirm that they believed [MTY] in the Lord
Jesus. 6 After that, Paul placed his hands on their heads one by one, and the power
of the Holy Spirit came upon each of them. The Holy Spirit enabled them to speak in
various languages [MTY] that they had not learned, and they also spoke messages that
the Holy Spirit revealed to them. 7 There were about twelve men whom Paul baptized
and who received the power of the Holy Spirit.
Paul helped many people in Asia province to hear the gospel.
Acts 19:8-10ACTS 19:8
1604
ACTS 19:21
8 For three months after that, Paul entered the Jewish meeting place in Ephesus
on each Sabbath/Jewish day of rest, and he spoke boldly. He convincingly taught the
people about how God wanted to rule [MET] their lives. 9 A few of the people in the
meeting house believed the message about Jesus. But some of the people would not
believe that message and did not want to continue to hear it. While many people were
listening, they said many bad things about the way for people to receive eternal life
about which Paul was preaching. So Paul left them and took the believers with him to
meet in another place. He taught every day in a lecture hall that a man whose name
was Tyrannus lectured in/owned. 10 For two years Paul continued to teach people in
that building. In this way, most of [HYP] the Jews and non-Jews who lived in Asia
province heard the message about the Lord Jesus.
God enabled Paul to do amazing miracles.
Acts 19:11-12
11 Also, God gave Paul the power [MTY] to do amazing miracles. 12 If those who were
sick could not come to Paul, handkerchiefs or aprons that Paul had touched would be
taken and placed on the sick people {others would take and place on the sick people
handkerchiefs or aprons that Paul had touched}. As a result, those sick people would
become well, and evil spirits that troubled people would leave.
People honored Jesus’ name, after Jewish exorcists misused it and failed.
Acts 19:13-17
13 There were also some Jews who traveled around to various places, and they
commanded the evil spirits in those places to depart from people. Certain ones of
those Jews once tried to command the evil spirits to come out of people by saying “I
command you by the authority [MTY] of the Lord Jesus, the man about whom Paul
preaches, to come out!” 14 There were seven men who were doing that. They were
sons of a man named Sceva, a Jew, who called himself a chief priest. 15 But one day as
they were doing that, the evil spirit refused to come out of that person. Instead, he said
to them, “I know Jesus, and I know that he has authorized Paul to expel demons. ◄But
no one has authorized you to do anything to me!/who authorized you to do anything
to me?► [RHQ]” 16 After saying that, suddenly the man who was controlled by the evil
spirit jumped on the seven Jewish men, one after another, knocked all of them down,
and beat each of them severely. He tore off their clothes and wounded them, causing
them to bleed. So, greatly frightened, they all ran out of the house. 17 All the people
who lived in Ephesus, both Jews and non-Jews, heard what had happened. So they
were afraid [MTY]. They honored the Lord Jesus [MTY] because they realized that he
was very powerful.
Many believers confessed their former sins and burned their books of magic.
Acts 19:18-22
18 At that time, while other believers were listening, many believers confessed the
evil things that they had been doing. 19 Several of those who had previously practiced
sorcery gathered up their scrolls that told how to work magic and burned them in a
public place. When people added up how much those scrolls had cost, they realized
that altogether the amount was 50,000 valuable silver coins.
20 As a result, many more people heard [MTY] the message about the Lord Jesus,
and the message powerfully changed their lives.
21 After those things had happened, Paul decided that he wanted to go to Jerusalem,
but he decided that first he would visit the believers in Macedonia and Achaia
provinces again. Paul said, “After I have been to Jerusalem, I must also go to Rome.”ACTS 19:22
1605
22 He sent two of his helpers, Timothy and Erastus, ahead to Macedonia.
stayed a little longer in Ephesus city, in Asia province.
ACTS 19:35
But Paul
Demetrius made silver shrines of the goddess Artemis.
Acts 19:23-24
23 Soon after that, some of the people there tried to make a lot of [LIT] trouble for the
people who believed the way God revealed for us(inc) to receive eternal life. 24 There
was a man there whose name was Demetrius who made little images out of silver.
They were models of the temple of a goddess whose name was Artemis. Demetrius and
the other men who made those little images earned a lot of [LIT] money from selling
those images.
Demetrius incited people to shout and to riot.
Acts 19:25-31
25 Demetrius called a meeting of his workmen and also of others who made the
little silver images. He said to them, “Men, you know that we (inc) earn a lot of
money doing our kind of work. 26 Also, you know that this fellow Paul has persuaded
many people who live in Ephesus to no longer buy the images that we make. Now
even the people from many other towns in our province no longer want to buy what
we make. This fellow tells people that the gods that we have made and worship are
not gods and that we should not worship them. 27 If people continue to listen to him,
soon they will ruin our business. Besides, they will no longer think that they should
come to the temple of Artemis to worship her. People all over our Asia province and
everywhere [HYP] else worship our great goddess Artemis. Soon people may no longer
consider that Artemis is great!” 28 All the men there were very angry at Paul when
they heard what Demetrius said. They began to shout, “The goddess Artemis of us
Ephesians is very great!” 29 Many of the other people in the city heard the shouting
and went and joined the crowd. They also became angry at Paul and began shouting.
Several of the people seized Gaius and Aristarchus, two men from Macedonia who
had been traveling with Paul. Then the whole crowd of people ran, dragging those
men along with them, to the city stadium. 30 Paul also wanted to go to the stadium
and speak to the people, but the other believers would not let him go there. 31 Also,
some government officials of that province who were friends of Paul heard what was
happening. So they sent someone to tell him urgently not to go into the stadium.
The crowd shouted, “Great is Artemis of the Ephesians!”
Acts 19:32-34
32 The crowd of people in the stadium continued shouting. Some shouted one thing,
and some shouted something else. But most of them did not even know what the
meeting was about! 33 One of the Jews there was named Alexander. Some of the Jews
pushed him to the front of the stadium, so that he could speak to the crowd of people.
So Alexander motioned with his hands to the crowd, wanting them to be quiet. He
wanted to tell them that the Jews were not responsible for the riot. 34 But many of
the non-Jewish people knew that Alexander was a Jew. They also knew that the Jews
did not worship the goddess Artemis. So the non-Jews there unitedly and repeatedly
shouted for about two hours, “Great is the goddess Artemis whom we(inc) Ephesians
worship!”
The city secretary quieted, warned and dismissed the crowd.
Acts 19:35-41
35 Then the city secretary made the crowd stop shouting, and he said to them,
“My fellow-citizens, everyone in the world knows [RHQ] that we(inc) people who live
in Ephesus city guard the temple where we worship the great goddess Artemis. Also,ACTS 19:36
1606
ACTS 20:9
everyone knows that we(inc) watch over the sacred image of our goddess that fell down
from heaven! 36 Of course everyone knows that, and no one can say that these things
are not true. So you should be quiet now. Do not suddenly do anything ◄foolish/
that will cause us trouble►. 37 You should not have brought these two men here,
because they have not done anything evil. They have not gone into our temples and
taken things from there. And they have not spoken evil of our goddess. 38 Therefore,
if Demetrius and his fellow-workmen want to accuse anyone about anything bad,
they should do it in the right way. There are courts that you can go to when you
want to accuse someone, and there are judges there who have been appointed by the
government {whom the government has appointed}. You can accuse anyone there.
39 But if you want to ask about something else, you should ask for other officials to
resolve it when those officials legally assemble. 40 And this is certainly not a legal
meeting! Resolve this legally because, if we(inc) do not, I am afraid that the governor
will hear about all this noise that you have made and will say that we (inc) were trying
to rebel against the government. If he would ask me what you were all shouting about,
I would not be able to give him an answer.” 41 That is what the city secretary said to
the crowd. Then he told them all to go home. So they left.
20
After being in Macedonia and Greece, Paul went to Troas.
Acts 20:1-6
1 After the people at Ephesus had stopped rioting, Paul summoned the believers. He
encouraged them to continue to trust in the Lord Jesus. Soon after that, he told them
goodbye and left to go to Macedonia province. 2 After he arrived there, he visited each
town where there were believers, and encouraged them. Then he arrived in Greece
province, which is also called Achaia. 3 He stayed there for three months. Then he
planned to return to Syria by ship, but he heard that some of the Jews [SYN] in that
area were planning to kill him as he traveled. So he decided instead to go by land, and
he traveled again through Macedonia. 4 The men who were going to travel with him
to Jerusalem were Sopater, who was a son of Pyrrhus, who grew up in Berea town;
Aristarchus and Secundus, who were from Thessalonica city; Gaius, who was from
Derbe town; Timothy, who was from Galatia province; and Tychicus and Trophimus
who were from Asia province. 5 Those seven men went ahead of Paul and me, Luke,
by ship from Macedonia, so they got to Troas before we did and waited for the two of
us there. 6 But we two(exc) traveled by land as far as Philippi city. After the Jewish
festival when they eat unleavened bread, we got on a ship that was going from the
port near Philippi to Troas city. After five days we (exc) arrived at Troas and we met
the other men who had traveled there ahead of us. Then we all stayed in Troas for
seven days.
At Troas, Paul encouraged believers by resurrecting Eutychus.
Acts 20:7-12
7 ◄On Sunday evening/On the evening of the first day of the week►, we (exc) and the
other believers there gathered together to celebrate the Lord’s Supper and to eat other
food [SYN]. Paul spoke to the believers. He continued teaching them until midnight,
because he was planning to leave Troas the next day. 8 Many oil lamps were burning
in the upstairs room in which we (exc) had gathered, so the fumes caused some people
to become sleepy. 9 A young man whose name was Eutychus was there. He was seated
on the sill of an open window on the third story of the house. As Paul continued talking
for a long time, Eutychus became sleepier and sleepier. Finally, he was sound/really
asleep. He fell out of the window from the third story down to the ground. Some of theACTS 20:10
1607
ACTS 20:28
believers went down immediately and picked him up. But he was dead. 10 Paul also
went down. He lay down and stretched out on top of the young man and put his arms
around him. Then he said to the people who were standing around, “Do not worry,
he is alive again now!” 11 Then Paul, along with the others, went upstairs again and
they ate the Lord’s Supper and other food [SYN]. Afterwards, Paul conversed with
the believers until dawn. Then he left. 12 The other people took the young man home,
and were greatly encouraged because he was alive again.
Paul and his companions traveled from Troas to Miletus.
Acts 20:13-16
13 We then went to the ship. Paul did not get on the ship with us in Troas, because
he preferred to go more quickly overland to Assos town. The rest of us got on the ship
and sailed for Assos. 14 We (exc) met Paul in Assos. He got on the ship with us, and
we sailed to Mitylene town. 15 The day after we reached Mitylene, we sailed from there
and arrived at a place near Kios Island. The day after that, we sailed to Samos Island.
The next day we left Samos and sailed to Miletus town. 16 Miletus was just south of
Ephesus city. Paul had earlier decided that he would not get on a ship that would
stop at Ephesus, because he did not want to spend several days in Asia province. If
possible, he wanted to arrive in Jerusalem by the time of the Pentecost festival, and
the time of that festival was near.
Paul reminded the Ephesian elders how he had conducted himself and had taught
them.
Acts 20:17-21
17 When the ship arrived at Miletus, Paul sent a messenger to Ephesus to ask the
elders of the congregation to come to talk with him.
18 When the elders arrived, Paul said to them, “You personally know how I
conducted myself among you the entire time that I was with you, from the first day
when I arrived here in Asia province until the day I left. 19 You know how I was serving
the Lord Jesus very humbly and how I sometimes wept about people. You also know
how I suffered because the Jews [SYN] who were not believers often tried to harm me.
20 You also know that, as I preached God’s message to you, I never left out anything
that would help you. You know that I taught you God’s message when many people
were present, and I also went to your homes and taught it there. 21 I preached both
to Jews and to non-Jews, telling them all that they must turn away from their sinful
behavior. I also told them they should believe in our Lord Jesus.”
Paul told them that they would never see him again.
Acts 20:22-31
22 “And now note this: I am going to Jerusalem, because God’s Spirit has clearly
shown me that I must go there. I do not know what will happen to me while I am
there. 23 But I do know that in each city where I have stopped, the Holy Spirit has
◄told me/caused the believers to tell me► that in Jerusalem people will put me in
prison [PRS] and will cause me to suffer [PRS]. 24 But I do not care even if people kill
me, if first I am able to finish the work [MET] that the Lord Jesus has told me to do. He
appointed me to tell people the good message that God saves us by doing for us what
we do not deserve. 25 I have preached to you the message about how God desires to
rule people’s lives. But now I know that today is the last time that you fellow believers
will see me [SYN]. 26 So I want you all to understand that if anyone who has heard
me preach dies without trusting in Jesus, it is not my fault [MTY], 27 because I told you
[LIT] everything [HYP] that God has planned for us (inc). 28 You leaders must continue
to believe and obey God’s message. You must also help all the other believers [MET]ACTS 20:29
1608
ACTS 21:5
for whom the Holy Spirit has caused you to be responsible [MTY]. Watch over [MET]
yourselves and the other believers as a shepherd watches over his sheep. God bought
them with the blood that flowed from his Son’s body on the cross. 29 I know very well
that after I leave, people who teach [MET] false doctrines will come among you and
will do great harm to the believers. They will be like fierce wolves that kill sheep.
30 Even in your own group of believers there will be some who will deceive other
believers by teaching them messages that are false. They will teach those messages
so that some people will believe them and will become their followers. 31 So watch
out that none of you stops believing the true message about our Lord Jesus. Remember
that day and night for about three years I repeatedly taught you that message, and
warned you with tears in my eyes not to believe any other message.”
Paul entrusted them to God and to the message about God’s goodness.
Acts 20:32-35
32 “Now as I leave you, I ask God to protect you and to keep you believing the
message that he saves us(inc) by doing for us what we do not deserve. If you continue
believing the message that I told you, you will become spiritually mature, and God will
give you the blessings that he has promised to give to all of those who belong to him.
33 As for myself, I have not desired anyone’s money [MTY] or fine clothing. 34 You
yourselves know that I have worked with my hands [MTY] to earn the money that
my companions and I needed. 35 In everything that I did, I showed you that we (inc)
should work hard in order to have enough money to give some to those who are
needy. We (inc) should remember that our Lord Jesus himself said, ‘You are happy
when people give you what you need, but God will be happy with you when you give
other people what they need.’ ”
Paul prayed with them and they sadly told him goodbye.
Acts 20:36-38
36 When Paul had finished speaking, he knelt down with all of the elders and prayed.
37 They all cried a lot, and they hugged Paul and kissed him. 38 They were especially
sad because he had said that they would never see him [SYN] again. Then they all
went with him to the ship.
21
Paul, Luke and his other companions traveled from Miletus to Tyre.
Acts 21:1-3
1 After we said goodbye to the elders from Ephesus, we got on the ship and sailed
to Cos Island, where the ship stopped for the night. The next day we sailed from Cos
to Rhodes Island, where the ship stopped again. The day after that we sailed to Patara
town, where the ship stopped. This was on Patara Island. 2 At Patara we left that ship,
and someone told us that there was a ship that would be going to Phoenicia region.
So we got on that ship, and it left. 3 We sailed until we could see Cyprus Island. We
passed to the south of the island and continued sailing until we arrived at Phoenicia
region, in Syria province. We arrived at Tyre city. The ship was going to stay there
several days, because its workers had to unload the cargo.
At Tyre, believers warned Paul not to go to Jerusalem, but he went on anyway.
Acts 21:4-6
4 Someone told us where the believers in Tyre lived, so we (exc) went and stayed
with them for seven days. Because God’s Spirit revealed to them ◄that people would
cause Paul to suffer/Paul would suffer► in Jerusalem, they told Paul that he should not
go there. 5 But when it was time for the ship to leave again, we prepared to continueACTS 21:6
1609
ACTS 21:21
going to Jerusalem. When we left Tyre, all the believers, including their wives and
children, went with us to the edge of the sea. We all knelt down there on the sand/
shore and prayed. 6 After we all said goodbye, Paul and we his companions got on
the ship, and the other believers returned to their own homes.
Paul and his companions sailed from Tyre to Caesarea.
Acts 21:7-9
7 After we (exc) left Tyre, we continued on that ship to Ptolemais city. There were
believers there, and we greeted them and stayed with them that night. 8 The next day
we left Ptolemais and sailed to Caesarea city, where we stayed in the home of Philip,
who spent his days telling others how to become disciples of Jesus. He was one of the
seven men whom the believers in Jerusalem had chosen to care for the widows. 9 He
had four daughters who were not married. Each of them frequently spoke messages
that the Holy Spirit had revealed to them.
The believers could not persuade Paul from going on to Jerusalem.
Acts 21:10-14
10 After we(exc) had been in Philip’s house for several days, a believer whose name
was Agabus came down from Judea district and arrived in Caesarea. He frequently
spoke messages that the Holy Spirit had told him. 11 Coming over to where we were,
he took off Paul’s belt. Then he tied his own feet and hands with it and said, “The Holy
Spirit says, ‘The Jewish leaders [SYN] in Jerusalem will tie up the hands and feet of the
owner of this belt, like this, and they will hand him over to non-Jewish people as a
prisoner.’ ” 12 When the rest of us heard that, we and other believers there repeatedly
pled with Paul, “Please do not go up to Jerusalem!” 13 But Paul replied, “◄Please stop
crying and trying to discourage me [IDM] from going!/Why are you crying and trying
to discourage me [IDM] from going?► [RHQ] I am willing to be put {for people to put
me} in prison and also to be killed {for them to kill me} in Jerusalem because I serve
[MTY] the Lord Jesus.” 14 When we(exc) realized that he was determined to go to
Jerusalem, we did not try any longer to persuade him not to go. We said, “May ◄the
Lord God do what he wants/the Lord’s will be done►!”
Paul and other believers went from Caesarea to Jerusalem.
Acts 21:15-16
15 After those days in Caesarea, we (exc) prepared our things and left to go by land up
to Jerusalem. 16 Some of the believers from Caesarea also went with us. On the way
to Jerusalem, we stayed one night in the house of a man whose name was Mnason.
He was from Cyprus Island, and he had believed in Jesus when people were first
beginning to hear the message about him.
Paul agreed with church leaders to perform a Jewish purifying ritual.
Acts 21:17-26
17 When we arrived in Jerusalem, a group of the believers greeted us happily. 18 The
next day Paul and the rest of us went to speak with James, who was the leader of the
congregation there. All of the other leaders/elders of the congregation in Jerusalem
were also there. 19 Paul greeted them, and then he reported all of the things that God
had enabled him to do among the non-Jewish people. 20 When they heard that, James
and the other elders said, “Praise the Lord!” Then one of them said to Paul, “Brother/
Friend, you (sg) know that there are very many thousands of us (inc) Jewish people
here who have believed in the Lord Jesus. Also, you know that we (inc) all continue
very carefully to obey the laws that Moses gave us. 21 But our fellow Jewish believers
have been told {have heard people say} that when you are among non-Jews, you tell
the Jewish believers who live there that they should stop obeying the laws [MTY] ◄ofACTS 21:22
1610
ACTS 21:32
Moses/that Moses received from God►. People say that you tell those Jewish believers
not to circumcise their sons and not to practice our other customs. We(exc) do not
believe that this is true. 22 But our fellow Jewish believers will certainly hear that you
have arrived, and they will be angry with you. So you need to do something [RHQ]
to show them that what they heard about you is not true. 23 So you should do what
we suggest to you. There are four men among us who have strongly promised to
God about something. 24 Go with these men to the Temple and ritually purify yourself
along with them. Then, when it is time for them to offer the sacrifices for that ritual,
pay for what they offer as sacrifices. After that, they can shave their heads to show
that they have done what they promised to do. And when people see you in the courts
of the Temple with those men, they will know that what they have been told {what
people have told them} about you is not true. Instead, all of them will know that
you obey all our Jewish laws and rituals. 25 As for the non-Jewish believers, we elders
here in Jerusalem have talked about which of our laws they should obey, and we (exc)
wrote them a letter, telling them what we decided. We wrote that they should not eat
meat that people have offered as a sacrifice to any idol, that they should not eat blood
from animals, and that they should not eat meat from animals that people have killed
by strangling them. We also told them that they should not have sex with someone
to whom they are not married.” 26 So Paul agreed to do what they asked, and the
next day he took the four men, and together they ritually purified themselves. After
that, Paul went to the Temple courts and told the priest what day they would finish
purifying themselves ritually and when they would offer the animals as sacrifices for
each of them.
Some Jews seized Paul in the Temple courts.
Acts 21:27-30
27-29 When the seven days for purifying themselves were nearly finished, Paul
returned to the Temple courtyard. Some Jews from Asia province saw him there,
and they were very angry at him. On another day they had seen Paul walking around
in Jerusalem with Trophimus, who was a non-Jew. Their laws did not permit non-
Jews to be in the Temple, and they thought that Paul had brought Trophimus into
the Temple courtyard that day. So they called out to many other Jews who were in
the Temple courtyard to help them seize [MTY] Paul. They shouted, “Fellow Israelites,
come and help us punish this man! This is the one who is constantly teaching people
wherever he goes that they should despise the Jewish people. He teaches people that
they should no longer obey the laws of Moses nor respect this holy Temple. He has
even brought non-Jews here into the court of our Temple, causing God to consider it
no longer holy!” 30 People throughout [MTY] the city heard that there was trouble at
the Temple courtyard, and they came running there. They grabbed Paul and dragged
him outside of the Temple area. The gates to the Temple courtyard were shut {The
Temple guards shut the doors to the Temple courts} immediately, so that the people
would not riot inside the Temple area.
Roman soldiers ran to where those Jews were trying to kill Paul.
Acts 21:31-32
31 While they were trying to kill Paul, someone ran to the fort near the Temple and
told the Roman commander that many [HYP] people [MTY] in Jerusalem were rioting
at the Temple. 32 The commander quickly took some officers and a large group of
soldiers and ran to the Temple area where the crowd was. When the crowd of people
who were yelling and beating Paul saw the commander and the soldiers coming, they
stopped beating him.ACTS 21:33
1611
ACTS 22:7
After the commander arrested Paul, soldiers carried him towards the fort.
Acts 21:33-40
33 The commander came to where Paul was and seized him. He commanded soldiers
to fasten a chain to each of Paul’s arms. Then he asked the people in the crowd,
“Who is this man, and what has he done?” 34 Some of the many people there were
shouting one thing, and some were shouting something else. Because they continued
shouting so loudly, the commander could not understand what they were shouting.
So he commanded that Paul be taken {the soldiers to take Paul} into the barracks so
that he could question him there. 35 The soldiers led Paul to the steps of the barracks,
but many people continued to follow them, trying to kill Paul. So the commander told
the soldiers to carry Paul up the steps into the barracks. 36 The crowd that followed
kept shouting, “Kill him! Kill him!”
37 As Paul was about to be taken {the soldiers were about to take Paul} into the
barracks, he said in Greek to the commander, “May I speak to you?” The commander
said, “◄I am surprised that you can speak the Greek language!/Can you (sg) speak
the Greek language?►” [RHQ] 38 “◄I thought that you (sg) were that fellow/Are you
not that fellow► from Egypt [RHQ] who wanted to rebel against the government not
long ago, and who took 4,000 violent terrorists with him out into the desert, so that
we could not catch him?” 39 Paul answered, “No, I am not! I am a Jew. I was born
in Tarsus, which is an important [LIT] city in Cilicia province. I ask that you (sg) let
me speak to the people.” 40 Then the commander permitted Paul to speak. So Paul
stood on the steps and motioned with his hand for the crowd to be quiet. And after the
people in the crowd became quiet, Paul spoke to them in their own Hebrew language
[MTY].
22
Paul defended his believing in Jesus, but the Jews wanted to kill him.
Acts 22:1-16
1 Paul said, “Jewish elders and my other fellow Jews, listen to me now while I reply
to those who are accusing me!” 2 When the crowd of people heard Paul speaking to
them in their own Hebrew language, they became even more quiet and really listened.
Then Paul said to them, 3 “I am a Jew, as are all of you. I was born in Tarsus city, in
Cilicia province, but I grew up here in Jerusalem. When I was young, for many years I
studied the laws that Moses gave to our ancestors. I was taught by the famous teacher
Gamaliel [MTY] {The famous teacher Gamaliel taught [MTY] me}. I have carefully
obeyed those laws, because I have wanted to obey God. I am sure that many of you
also carefully obey those laws. 4 That is why I previously persecuted those who believe
the message that people call the Way that Jesus taught. I continually looked for ways to
kill them. Whenever I found men or women who believed that message, I commanded
that they should be seized and thrown {people to seize them and throw them} into
jail. 5 The supreme priest knows this, and so do the other respected men who belong
to our Jewish Council. They gave me letters to take to their fellow Jews in Damascus
city. By means of those letters, they authorized me to go to there and find people who
believed in Jesus. They had written in the letters that I was to bring those people as
prisoners to Jerusalem, so that they would be punished here {the leaders here could
punish them}.
So I went on my way to Damascus. 6 About noon, my companions and I were getting
near Damascus. Suddenly a bright light from the sky flashed all around me. 7 The light
was so bright that I fell to the ground. Then I heard the voice of someone speaking
to me from up in the sky. The one who was speaking to me said, ‘Saul! Saul! Why doACTS 22:8
1612
ACTS 22:26
you (sg) do things to harm me?’ 8 I answered, ‘Who are you?’ He replied, ‘I am Jesus
from Nazareth. I am the one whom you (sg) are harming by doing things to harm my
followers.’ 9 The men who were traveling with me saw the very bright light, and they
heard a voice, but they did not understand what the voice said to me. 10 Then I asked,
‘Lord, what do you want me to do?’ The Lord told me, ‘Get up and go into Damascus!
A man there will tell you (sg) all that I have planned for you to do.’ 11 After that, I
could not see, because the very bright light had caused me to become blind. So my
companions took me by the hand and led me until we(exc) arrived in Damascus. 12 A
couple of days later, a man whose name was Ananias came to see me. He was a man
who greatly respected God and carefully obeyed our Jewish laws. All the Jews living
in Damascus said good things about him. 13 He came and stood beside me and said
to me, ‘Brother Saul, see again!’ Instantly I could see! I saw Ananias standing there
beside me. 14 Then he said: ‘The God whom we(inc) worship and whom our ancestors
worshipped has chosen you and will show you what he wants you to do. He has
allowed you to see the righteous one, the Messiah, and you have heard him speaking
to you. 15 He wants you to tell people everywhere what you have seen and heard
from him. 16 So now ◄do not delay!/why delay?► [RHQ] Stand up, let me baptize you,
and by praying to the Lord Jesus ask God to forgive you (sg) for your sins!’ ”
Paul told about the Lord’s commanding him to go to non-Jewish people.
Acts 22:17-22
17 “Later, I returned to Jerusalem. One day I went to the Temple courtyard. While
I was praying there, I saw a vision in which 18 I saw the Lord speaking to me. He
said to me, ‘Do not stay here! Leave Jerusalem immediately, because the people here
will not ◄believe/listen to► what you (sg) tell them about me!’ 19 But I protested and
said to him, ‘Lord, they know that I went to many of our meeting houses looking for
people who believe in you. I was putting in jail those whom I found who believed in
you, and I was even beating them. 20 They remember that when Stephen was killed
[MTY] {when people killed [MTY] Stephen} because he told people about you, I stood
there watching it all and approving what they were doing. I even guarded the outer
garments that those who were murdering him had thrown aside. So if I stay here, the
fact that I have changed how I think about you will surely impress those leaders of our
people.’ 21 But the Lord said to me, ‘No, do not stay here! Leave Jerusalem, because I
am going to send you (sg) far away from here to non-Jewish people!’ ” 22 The people
listened quietly to what Paul was saying until he mentioned the Lord sending him to
non-Jewish people. Then they began shouting angrily, “Kill him! He does not deserve
to live any longer!” They said that because they could not believe that God would save
anyone except Jews.
Paul said that he was a Roman citizen, so soldiers did not flog him.
Acts 22:23-29
23 While they continued shouting, “Kill him!” they took off their cloaks and threw
dust into the air, which showed how angry they were. 24 So the commander commanded
that Paul be taken {soldiers to take Paul} into the barracks. He told the soldiers that
they should strike Paul with a whip that had pieces of bone/metal on the end of it,
in order to make him tell what he had done that made the Jews shout so angrily.
So the soldiers took Paul into the barracks. 25 Then they stretched his arms out and
tied them so that they could whip him on his back. But Paul said to the officer who
was standing nearby watching, “You(sg) should think carefully about this! You will
certainly be [RHQ] acting unlawfully if you whip me, a Roman citizen whom no one
has put on trial and condemned!” 26 When the officer heard that, he went to theACTS 22:27
1613
ACTS 23:9
commander and reported it to him. He said to the commander, “This man is a Roman
citizen ◄Surely you would not command us to whip him!/Do you really want us to
whip him?► [RHQ]” 27 The commander was surprised when he heard that. He himself
went into the barracks and said to Paul, “Tell me, are you (sg) really a Roman citizen?”
Paul answered, “Yes, I am.” 28 Then the commander said, “I am also a Roman citizen.
I paid a lot of money to become a Roman citizen.” Paul said, “But I was born a Roman
citizen, so I did not need to pay anything.” 29 The soldiers were about to whip Paul and
to ask him questions about what he had done. But when they heard what Paul said,
they left him immediately. The commander also became afraid, because he realized
that Paul was a Roman citizen and that he had illegally commanded soldiers to tie up
Paul’s hands.
The commander’s soldiers brought Paul to the Jewish Council.
Acts 22:30
30 The commander still wanted to know exactly why the Jews were accusing Paul.
So the next day he told the soldiers to take the chains off Paul. He also summoned
the chief priests and the other Jewish Council members. Then he took Paul to where
the Council was meeting and commanded him to stand before them.
23
Paul apologized for unknowingly denouncing the high priest.
Acts 23:1-5
1 Paul looked straight at the Jewish council members and said: “My fellow Jews, all
my life I have lived respecting our God, and I do not know of anything that I have
done that I knew was wrong/evil.” 2 When Ananias the supreme priest heard what
Paul said, he commanded the men who were standing near Paul to hit him on the
mouth. 3 Then Paul said to Ananias, “God will punish you (sg) for that, you hypocrite
[MET]! You sit there and judge me, using the laws that God gave Moses. But you
yourself disobey those laws, because you commanded me to be struck {these men to
strike me} without having proved that I have done anything that is wrong!” 4 The men
who were standing near Paul rebuked him. They said, “Are not you (sg) afraid to
insult God’s servant, our supreme priest?” 5 Paul replied, “My fellow Jews, I am sorry
that I said that. I did not know that the man who told one of you to hit me is the high
priest. If I had known that, I would not have insulted our supreme priest, because I
know that it is written {that Moses wrote} in our Jewish law, ‘Do not speak evil of any
of your rulers!’ ”
The commander rescued Paul from the Council members.
Acts 23:6-10
6 Paul realized that some of the Council members were Sadducees and others were
Pharisees. So, in order to cause the Pharisees and Sadducees to argue among themselves
instead of accusing him, he called out loudly in the Council hall, “My fellow Jews, I
am a Pharisee, like my father was. I have been put {You have put me} on trial here
because I confidently expect that some day God will ◄cause people who have died to
become alive again/raise people from the dead►.” 7 When he said that, the Pharisees
and Sadducees started to argue with one another about whether people who have died
will become alive again or not. 8 The Sadducees believe that after people die, they will
not become alive again. They also believe that there are no angels and no other kinds
of spirits. But the Pharisees believe that all people who have died will one day become
alive again. They also believe that there are angels and other kinds of spirits. 9 So
the Council members ◄were divided/did not agree with each other►, and they began
shouting at one another as they argued. Some of the teachers of the laws that GodACTS 23:10
1614
ACTS 23:24
gave Moses who were Pharisees stood up. One of them said, “We (exc) think that this
man has done nothing wrong.” Another said, “Maybe an angel or some other spirit
really spoke to him and what he says is true.” 10 Then the Pharisees and Sadducees
argued even more loudly with one another. As a result, the commander ◄was afraid/
thought► that they would tear Paul to pieces. So he commanded soldiers to go down
from the barracks and forcefully take Paul away from the Council members and bring
him up into the barracks. So the soldiers did that.
The Lord revealed that Paul would tell people about him in Rome.
Acts 23:11
11 That night, in a vision Paul saw the Lord Jesus come and stand near him. The
Lord said to him, “Be courageous! You (sg) have told people here in Jerusalem about
me, and you must tell people in Rome about me, too.”
Some Jews plotted to kill Paul.
Acts 23:12-15
12 The next morning some of the Jews [MTY] who hated Paul met secretly and talked
about how they could kill him. They promised themselves that they would not eat or
drink anything until they had killed him. They asked God to curse them if they did
not do what they promised. 13 There were more than 40 men who planned to do
that. 14 They went to the chief priests and Jewish elders and told them, “God has
heard us promise/vow that we (exc) will not eat or drink anything until we (exc) have
killed Paul. 15 So we request that you go to the commander and ask him, on behalf
of the whole Jewish Council, to bring Paul down to us from the barracks. Tell the
commander that you want to question Paul some more. But we (exc) will be waiting
to kill Paul while he is on the way here.”
Paul’s nephew warned that some Jews had plotted to kill Paul.
Acts 23:16-22
16 But the son of Paul’s sister heard what they were planning to do, so he went into
the barracks and told Paul. 17 When Paul heard that, he called one of the officers and
said to him, “Please take this young man to the commander, because he needs to tell
him something important.” 18 So the officer took Paul’s nephew to the commander.
The officer said to the commander, “That prisoner, Paul, called me and said, ‘Please
take this young man to the commander, because he needs to tell him something
important.’ ” 19 The commander took the young man by the hand, led him off by
himself, and asked him, “What do you (sg) need to tell me?” 20 The young man said,
“There are some [SYN] Jews who have planned to ask you (sg) to bring Paul before
their Council tomorrow. They will say that they want to ask him some more questions.
But that is not true. 21 Do not do what they ask you (sg) to do, because there are more
than 40 Jewish men who will be hiding and waiting to attack Paul when he passes by
on the way to the Council. They even promised/vowed to God that they will not eat
or drink anything until they have killed Paul. They are ready to do it, and right now
they are waiting for you (sg) to agree to do what they are asking you to do.” 22 The
commander said to Paul’s young nephew, “Do not tell anyone that you (sg) have told
me about their plan.” Then he sent the young man away.
Many soldiers escorted Paul safely to Governor Felix at Caesarea.
Acts 23:23-35
23 Then the commander called two of his officers and told them, “Get a group of 200
soldiers ready to travel. Take along 70 soldiers riding horses, and 200 other soldiers
carrying spears. All of you must be ready to leave at nine o’clock tonight, to go down
to Caesarea. 24 And take along horses for Paul and those accompanying him to ride,ACTS 23:25
1615
ACTS 24:9
and safely escort him to the palace of Governor Felix.” 25 Then the commander wrote
a letter to send to the governor. This is what he wrote: 26 “I am Claudius Lysias writing
to you. You, Felix, are our governor whom we (exc) respect, and I sincerely send you
my greetings. 27 I have sent you(sg) this man, Paul, because certain Jews seized him
and were about to kill him. But I heard someone tell me that he is a Roman citizen, so
I and my soldiers went and rescued him. 28 I wanted to know what those Jews were
saying that he had done wrong, so I took him to their Jewish Council. 29 I listened
while they asked this man questions and he answered them. The things they accused
him about were entirely concerned with their Jewish laws. But Paul has not disobeyed
any of our Roman laws. So our officials should not execute him or even put him in
prison [MTY]. 30 Someone told me that some [SYN] Jews were secretly planning to kill
this man, so I immediately am sending him to you, so that you(sg) may give him a
fair trial there. I have also commanded the Jews who have accused him to go there to
Caesarea and tell you (sg) what they are accusing him about.”
31 So the soldiers did what the commander commanded them, taking this letter with
them. They got Paul and took him with them during the night down to Antipatris
city. 32 The next day, the foot soldiers returned to the barracks in Jerusalem, and the
soldiers who rode horses went on with Paul. 33 When the men escorting Paul arrived
in Caesarea, they delivered the letter to the governor, and they delivered Paul to the
governor. Then the horsemen returned to Jerusalem. 34 The governor read the letter,
and then he said to Paul, “What province are you (sg) from?” Paul answered, “I
am from Cilicia province.” 35 Then the governor said, “When the people who have
accused you (sg) arrive, I will listen to what each of you says and then I will judge
your case.” Then he commanded that Paul be guarded {soldiers to guard Paul} in the
palace that King Herod the Great had built.
24
Paul defended himself, and the governor Felix promised to judge him.
Acts 24:1-9
1 Five days later Ananias the high priest, having heard that Paul was now in
Caesarea, went down there from Jerusalem, along with some other Jewish elders and
a lawyer whose name was Tertullus. There they formally told the governor what Paul
had done that they considered wrong. 2 The governor commanded Paul to be brought
{a soldier to bring Paul} in. When Paul arrived, Tertullus began to accuse him. He said
to the governor, “Honorable Governor Felix, during the many years that you (sg) have
ruled us, we (exc) have lived well/peacefully. By planning wisely, you have improved
many things in this province. 3 Therefore, sir, we (exc) always gratefully acknowledge
everything that you have done for all of us, wherever you have done those things. 4 But,
so that I will not take up too much of your time, I earnestly request that you kindly
listen to me very briefly. 5 We (exc) have observed that this man, wherever he goes,
causes trouble. Specifically, he causes all the Jews everywhere [HYP] to riot. Also,
he leads the entire group whom people call ‘the followers of the Nazarene’, a false
sect. 6 He even tried to do things in the Temple in Jerusalem that would ◄defile it/
make it unholy►. So we (exc) seized him. 7 But Lysias, the commander at the Roman
fort, came with his soldiers and forcefully took him away from us [SYN]. 8 Lysias
also commanded Paul’s accusers to come here and accuse Paul before you. If you
question him yourself, you will be able to learn that all these things about which we
are accusing him are true.” 9 When the Jewish leaders who were listening heard that,
they told the governor that what Tertullus had said was true.ACTS 24:10
1616
ACTS 24:25
Paul disproved what they had said, but admitted that he was a Christian.
Acts 24:10-21
10 Then the governor motioned with his hand to Paul that he should speak. So Paul
replied. He said, “Governor Felix, I know that you(sg) have judged this Jewish province
for many years. Therefore I gladly defend myself, confident that you will listen to me
and will judge me fairly. 11 You (sg) can easily ascertain that ◄it has not been more
than twelve days since/only twelve days ago► I went up went up to Jerusalem to
worship God. That is not enough time to cause a lot of trouble. 12 No one can claim
legitimately that they saw me arguing with anyone at the Temple courts because I did
not do that. No one can claim legitimately that they saw me causing people to riot in
any Jewish meeting place, or causing trouble anywhere else in Jerusalem city, because
I did not do that. 13 So they cannot prove to you the things about which they are now
accusing me. 14 But I admit to you (sg) that this is true: I do worship the God that
our ancestors worshipped. It is true that I follow the way that Jesus taught us. The
Jewish leaders call that a false religion/teaching. I also believe everything that was
written by Moses {that Moses wrote} in the laws that God gave him, and everything
that was written by the other prophets {that the other prophets wrote} in their books
[MTY]. 15 I confidently expect, just like some of these men also expect, that some day
God will cause everyone who has died to become alive again. He will ◄cause to
become alive again/raise from the dead► both those who were righteous and those
who were wicked. 16 Because I am confidently waiting for that day, I always try to do
what pleases God and what other people think is right. 17 After I had been in other
places for several years, I returned to Jerusalem. I went there to deliver some money
to my fellow Jews who are poor, and to offer sacrifices to God. 18 Some Jews saw me
in the temple courts after I had completed the ritual by which a person is made {that
makes a person} pure. There was no crowd with me, and I was not causing people
to riot. 19 But it was some other Jews who had come from Asia province who really
caused people to riot. They should be here in front of you (sg) to accuse me, if they
thought that I did something wrong. 20 But if they do not want to do that (OR, But
because they are not here), these Jewish men who are here should tell you (sg) what
they think I did that was wrong, when I defended myself before their Council. 21 They
might say that one thing that I shouted as I stood before them was wrong. What I
said was, ‘You are judging me today because I believe that God will ◄cause all people
who have died to become alive again/raise all people from the dead►.’ ”
Governor Felix adjourned the trial.
Acts 24:22-23
22 Felix already knew quite a lot about what people called ‘the way of Jesus’. But he
did not let Paul or his accusers continue to speak. Instead, he said to them, “Later,
when Commander Lysias comes down here, I will decide these matters that concern
you all.” 23 Then he told the officer who was guarding Paul to take Paul back to the
prison and make sure that he was guarded all the time. But he said that Paul was not
to be chained {that the officer was not to fasten chains on him}, and if his friends
came to visit him, the officer should allow them to help Paul in any way that they
wished.
Felix often talked to Paul, hoping that Paul would give him money.
Acts 24:24-27
24 Several days later Felix and his wife Drusilla, who was a Jew, came back to
Caesarea after having been away for a few days. Felix commanded Paul to be brought
in {a soldier to bring Paul in}. Then Felix listened to what Paul said to him. Paul
spoke about what Christians believe about the Messiah Jesus. 25 Paul explained toACTS 24:26
1617
ACTS 25:12
them about what God requires people to do in order to please him. He also explained
about God requiring people to control how they act. Paul also told him that there
will be a time when God will judge people. Felix became alarmed after hearing those
things. So he said to Paul, “That is all I want to hear now. When there is a time that
is convenient I will ask you (sg) to come to me again.” 26 Felix said that because he
hoped that Paul would give him some money to allow Paul to get out of prison. So
he repeatedly sent for Paul to come, and Paul repeatedly went and talked with him.
But he did not give Felix any money, and Felix did not command his soldiers to release
Paul from prison.
27 Felix let Paul remain in prison, because he wanted to please the Jewish leaders
and he knew that they did not want him to release Paul. But when two years had
passed, Porcius Festus became governor in place of Felix.
25
Festus told the Jews to go and accuse Paul at Caesarea.
Acts 25:1-5
1 Festus, who was now the governor of the province, arrived in Caesarea, and three
days later he went up to Jerusalem. 2 In Jerusalem, the chief priests and other Jewish
leaders formally told Festus about the things that they said that Paul had done that
were wrong. 3 They urgently asked Festus to do something for them. They asked him
to command soldiers to bring Paul to Jerusalem, so that Festus could put him on trial
there. But they were planning that some of them would hide near the road and wait
for Paul and kill him when he was traveling to Jerusalem. 4 But Festus replied, “Paul
is in Caesarea, and is being guarded {soldiers are guarding him} there. I myself will
go down to Caesarea in a few days. 5 Choose some of your leaders to go there with
me. While they are there, they can accuse Paul of the wrong things that you say that
he has done.”
Paul appealed to Caesar, so Festus agreed to that.
Acts 25:6-12
6 After Festus had been in Jerusalem eight or ten days, he went back down
to Caesarea. Several of the Jewish leaders also went there. The next day Festus
commanded that Paul be brought {someone to bring Paul} to him in the assembly
hall so that he could judge him. 7 After Paul was brought to the assembly hall, the
Jewish leaders from Jerusalem gathered around him to accuse him. They told Festus
that Paul had committed many crimes. But they could not prove that Paul had done
the things about which they accused him. 8 Then Paul spoke to defend himself. He
said to Festus, “I have done nothing wrong against the laws of us (exc) Jews, and I
have not disobeyed the rules concerning our Temple. I have also done nothing wrong
against your government [MTY].” 9 But Festus wanted to please the Jewish leaders,
so he asked Paul, “Are you (sg) willing to go up to Jerusalem so that I can listen as
these men accuse you there?” 10 But Paul did not want to do that. So he said to Festus,
“No, I am not willing to go to Jerusalem! I am now standing before you, and you
(sg) are the judge whom the Roman Emperor [MTY] has authorized. This is the place
where I should be judged {where you should judge me}. I have not wronged the
Jewish people at all, as you know very well. 11 If I had done something bad for which
I should be executed {concerning which the law said that they should execute me},
I would not plead with them that they not kill me. But none of these things about
which they accuse me is true, so no one can legally surrender me to these Jews. So
I formally request that the emperor [MTY] should judge me at Rome.” 12 Then after
Festus conferred with the men who regularly advised him, he replied to Paul, “YouACTS 25:13
1618
ACTS 25:27
(sg) have formally requested that I should send you to the emperor in Rome. So I will
arrange for you to go there in order that he can judge you.”
Festus told King Agrippa about Paul.
Acts 25:13-22
13 After several days, King Herod Agrippa arrived at Caesarea, along with his
younger sister Bernice. They had come to formally welcome Festus as the new
Governor of the province. 14 King Agrippa and Bernice stayed many days in Caesarea.
While they were there, Festus told Agrippa about Paul. He said to the king, “There is a
man here whom Felix kept in prison while he was governor. He left him there when his
time as governor ended. 15 When I went to Jerusalem, the chief priests and the other
Jewish elders told me that this man had done many things against their laws. They
asked me to condemn him to be executed {judge him so that people could kill him}.
16 But I told them that when someone has been accused of a crime, we Romans do
not immediately ◄condemn that person/declare that person to be guilty►. First, we
command him to stand before the people who are accusing him and to say whether
or not he has done those things. After that, the judge will decide what to do with him.
17 So those Jews came here to Caesarea when I came. I did not delay. The day after
we(exc) arrived, after I sat down at the place where I make decisions, I commanded
that Paul be brought {soldiers to bring Paul} into the courtroom. 18 The Jewish leaders
did accuse him, but the things about which they accused him were not any of the evil
crimes about which I thought they would accuse him. 19 Instead, what they argued
about with him were some teachings that some Jews believe and others do not believe.
They argued about a man whose name was Jesus who had died, but the man they were
accusing, whose name is Paul, kept saying, ‘Jesus is alive again.’ 20 I did not know what
questions to ask them, and I did not know how to judge concerning their dispute. So I
asked Paul, ‘Are you (sg) willing to go back to Jerusalem and have the dispute between
you and these Jews judged there {and let me judge there the dispute between you and
these Jews}?’ 21 But Paul answered, ‘No. I am not willing to go to Jerusalem!
22 Agrippa said to Festus, “I also would like to hear the man myself.”
Festus asked King Agrippa to tell him what to write to Caesar about Paul.
Acts 25:23-27
23 The next day Agrippa and Bernice came very ceremoniously to the assembly hall.
Some Roman commanders and prominent men in Caesarea came with them. Then,
Festus told an officer to bring Paul. So after the officer went to the prison and brought
him, 24 Festus said, “King Agrippa, and all the rest of you who are here, you see this
man. Many [HYP] Jews in Jerusalem and also those here in Caesarea appealed to me,
screaming that we (exc) should not let him live any longer. 25 But when I asked them to
tell me what he had done, and they told me, I found out that he had not done anything
for which he should be executed {anyone should execute him}. However, he has asked
that our emperor should judge his case, so I have decided to send him to Rome. 26 But
I do not know what specifically I should write to the emperor concerning him. That is
why I have brought him here. I want you all to hear him speak, and I especially want
you (sg), King Agrippa, to hear him. Then, after we (inc) have questioned him, I may
know what I should write to the emperor about him. 27 It seems to me that it would
be unreasonable to send a prisoner to the emperor in Rome without my specifying the
things about which people are accusing him.”ACTS 26:1
1619
ACTS 26:16
26
Paul requested that his hearers would listen to him.
Acts 26:1-3
1 Then Agrippa said to Paul, “You (sg) are permitted now to speak to defend
yourself.” Paul stretched out his hand ◄dramatically/to salute the king► and began
to defend himself. He said, 2 “King Agrippa, I consider that I am fortunate that today,
while you (sg) listen, I can defend myself from all the things about which the Jewish
leaders [SYN] are accusing me. 3 I am really fortunate, because you (sg) know all
about the customs of us Jews and the questions that we (exc) argue about. So I ask
you, please listen patiently to what I say.”
Paul told about being a Pharisee who believed that God would resurrect people.
Acts 26:4-8
4 “Many [HYP] of my fellow Jews know about how I have conducted my life, from
the time I was a child. They know how I lived in the area where I was born and
also later in Jerusalem. 5 They have known for many years, and they could tell you,
if they wanted to, that since I was very young I obeyed the customs of our religion
very carefully, just like the other Pharisees do. 6 Today I am being put on trial {they
are putting me on trial} because I am confidently expecting that God will do what
he promised our (exc) ancestors. 7 Our twelve tribes are also confidently waiting for
God to do for us what he promised, as they respectfully worship him, day and night.
Respected king, I confidently expect that God will do what he promised, and they also
believe that! But that is the reason that these Jewish leaders [SYN] are accusing me!
8 They believe that God can cause those who have died to become alive again, so
◄why do any of you refuse to believe that he raised Jesus from the dead?/none of you
should refuse to believe that he raised Jesus from the dead!► [RHQ]”
Paul told about how he had persecuted Christians.
Acts 26:9-11
9 “Formerly I, too, was sure that I should do everything that I could to oppose Jesus
[MTY], the man from Nazareth town. 10 So that is what I did when I lived in Jerusalem.
I put many of the believers in jail, as the chief priests there had authorized me to
do. When the Jewish leaders wanted those Christians killed {someone to kill those
Christians}, I voted for that. 11 Many times I punished the believers whom I found in
Jewish meeting places. By punishing them, I tried to force them to speak evil about
Jesus. I was so angry with the followers of Jesus that I even traveled to other cities to
find them and do things to harm them.”
Paul told how he had become a believer in Jesus.
Acts 26:12-18
12 “One day, I was on my way to Damascus city to do that. The chief priests in
Jerusalem had authorized and sent me to seize the believers there. 13 My respected
king, while I was going along the road, at about noon I saw a bright light in the sky.
It was even brighter than the sun! It shone all around me, and also around the men
who were traveling with me. 14 We (exc) all fell to the ground. Then I heard the
voice of someone speaking to me in my own Hebrew language [MTY]. He said ‘Saul,
Saul, ◄stop causing me to suffer!/why are you causing me to suffer?► [RHQ] You (sg)
are hurting yourself by trying to hurt me [MET], like an ox kicking against its owner’s
goad.’ 15 Then I asked, ‘Who are you, Lord?’ The Lord said to me, ‘I am Jesus. You
(sg) are harming me by harming my followers. 16 But instead of continuing to do that,
stand up now! I have appeared to you (sg) to tell you that I have chosen you to serve
me. You must tell people about what I am showing you as you are seeing me now, andACTS 26:17
1620
ACTS 26:31
about what I will show you when I will later appear to you. 17 I will protect you from
those who will try to harm you, both your own people and also those who are not
Jewish. I am sending you to non-Jews 18 to help them to realize [MTY] what is true
and to stop believing what is false [MET]. I am sending you to them so that they may
let God control them and not let Satan control them any more. Then God will forgive
their sins and will accept them as his people because they believe in me.’ That is
what Jesus said to me.”
Paul said that he obeyed what Jesus commanded him from heaven.
Acts 26:19-20
19 “So, King Agrippa, I fully obeyed [LIT] what the Lord Jesus told me to do when
he spoke to me from heaven. 20 First, I preached to the Jews in Damascus. Then I
preached to the Jews in Jerusalem and throughout the rest of Judea province. After
that, I also preached to non-Jews. I preached that they must turn away from their
sinful behavior and turn their lives over to God. I told them that they must do things
that would show that they had truly stopped their sinful behavior.”
Paul said that he proclaimed what the prophets had written about the Messiah.
Acts 26:21-23
21 “It is because I preached this message that some [SYN] Jews seized me when I was
in the Temple courtyard and tried to kill me. 22 However, God has been helping me
from that time, and he is still helping me today. So I stand here and I tell all of you
people, those who are important and those who are not, who Jesus is. Everything that
I say about him is what Moses and the other prophets wrote about long ago, things
that they said would happen. 23 They wrote that people would cause the Messiah to
suffer and die. They also wrote that he would be the first person to become alive
again, to proclaim the message that would be like light, that he would save both his
own Jewish people and non-Jewish people.”
Paul talked to Festus and Agrippa, urging them to become believers in Jesus.
Acts 26:24-29
24 Before Paul could say anything further to defend himself, Festus shouted: “Paul,
you are crazy! You have studied too much, and it has made you insane!” 25 But
Paul answered, “Your Excellency, Festus, I am not raving insanely. On the contrary,
what I am saying is true and sensible! 26 King Agrippa knows the things that I have
been talking about, and I can speak confidently to him about them. I am sure that he
knows [LIT] these things, because people everywhere [IDM] have heard [LIT] about
what happened to Jesus.” 27 Then Paul asked, “King Agrippa, do you believe what the
prophets wrote? I know that you (sg) believe it.” 28 Then Agrippa answered Paul, “◄I
hope that you(sg) do not think that by the few things that you have just now said you
can persuade me to become a Christian!/You do not think, do you, that by the few
things that you have just now said you can persuade me to become a Christian?►”
[RHQ] 29 Paul replied, “Whether it takes a short time or a long time, it does not matter.
I pray to God that you and also all of the others who are listening to me today will
also believe in Jesus like I do, but I do not want you to become prisoners [MTY] like I
am.”
The officials said that Paul was innocent but must go to Rome.
Acts 26:30-32
30 Then the king, the governor, Bernice, and all the others got up 31 and left the
room. While they were talking to one another they said to each other, “There is no
reason why ◄the authorities/we► should execute this man, or that he should even beACTS 26:32
1621
ACTS 27:16
kept in prison [MTY].” 32 Agrippa said to Festus, “If this man had not asked that the
Emperor judge him, he could have been released {we(inc) could have released him}.”
27
Paul and other prisoners sailed from Caesarea to Crete.
Acts 27:1-8
1 When the Governor and those who advised him decided that it was time for us
(exc) to get on a ship and go to Italy, they put Paul and some other prisoners into the
hands/care of an army captain whose name was Julius. He was the one who would
guard us on the journey. Julius was an officer in charge of a group of 100 soldiers that
people called ‘the Emperor Augustus Group’. 2 So we got on a ship that had come
from Adramyttium city in Asia province. The ship was going to return there, stopping
at cities along the coast of Asia province. Aristarchus, a fellow believer who was from
Thessalonica city in Macedonia province, went with us. 3 The day after the ship sailed,
we arrived at Sidon city. Julius kindly told Paul that he could go and see his friends
who lived there, so that they could give him whatever he might need. So Paul visited
the believers there. 4 Then the ship left Sidon, but the winds were blowing against us
(exc), so the ship went along the north side of Cyprus Island, the side that is sheltered
from the wind. 5 After that, we crossed over the sea close to the coast of Cilicia and
Pamphylia provinces. The ship arrived at Myra city, which is in Lycia province. We
got off the ship there. 6 In Myra, people told Julius that a ship was there that had come
from Alexandria city and would soon sail to Italy. So he arranged for us to get on that
ship, and we left. 7 We sailed slowly for several days and finally arrived close to the
coast of Asia province, near Cnidus town. After that, the wind was very strong and did
not allow the ship to move straight ahead westward. So instead, we sailed southward
along the side of Crete Island that is sheltered from the wind, and we passed near Cape
Salmone. 8 The wind was still strong, and it prevented the ship from moving ahead fast.
So we moved slowly along the coast of Crete, and we arrived at a harbor that was
called Fair Havens, near Lasea town.
Paul warned them not to travel on, but the ship’s officials decided to go on anyway.
Acts 27:9-20
9 Much time had passed, so it would have been dangerous if we (exc) had traveled
farther by ship because after that time of the year [MTY] the sea often became very
stormy. So Paul said to the men on the ship, 10 “Men, I perceive that if we(inc) travel
by ship now, it will be disastrous for us. A storm may destroy the ship and the cargo,
and possibly we will drown.” 11 But the officer did not listen to what Paul said. Instead,
he decided to do what the pilot of the ship and the owner of the ship advised. 12 The
harbor where the ship had stopped was not a good place to remain during the winter
when the weather frequently becomes stormy. So most of the people on the ship decided
that we(exc) should leave there, because they hoped that we could stay at Phoenix port
during the winter, if we could possibly arrive there. That harbor was open to the
sea in two directions, but the strong winds did not blow there. 13 Then a gentle wind
began to blow from the south, and the crew members thought that they could travel as
they had decided to do. So they lifted the anchor up out of the sea, and the ship sailed
westward along the southern shore of Crete Island. 14 But after a while, a wind that
was very strong blew across the island from the north side and hit the ship. That wind
was called {People called that wind} “the Northeast Wind.” 15 It blew strongly against
the front of the ship. The result was that we could not keep going in the direction in
which we had been going. So the sailors let the wind move the ship in the direction
that the wind was blowing. 16 The ship then passed a small island named Cauda. WeACTS 27:17-18
1622
ACTS 27:32
passed along the side of the island that sheltered the ship from the wind. Then while
the ship was moving along, the sailors lifted the lifeboat up out of the water and tied
it on the deck. But the strong wind made it difficult even to do that. 17-18 After the
sailors hoisted/lifted the lifeboat onto the ship, they tied ropes around the ship’s hull
to strengthen the ship. The sailors were afraid that, because the wind was pushing the
ship, it might run onto the sandbanks off the coast of Libya to the south and get stuck
there. So they lowered the largest sail so that the ship would move slower. Even so,
the wind continued to move the ship along. The wind and the waves continued to toss
the ship about roughly, so on the next day the sailors began to throw overboard the
things that the ship was carrying. 19 On the third day after the stormy wind had begun
to blow, the sailors/we [MTY] threw overboard most of the sails, ropes, and poles, in
order to make the ship lighter. 20 The wind continued to blow very strongly, and the
sky was full of dark clouds day and night. We could not see the sun or the stars for
many days, so we could not determine where we were. And the wind continued to blow
violently. So we (exc) finally thought that we would drown in the sea.
Paul told them that an angel from God said that they would all survive.
Acts 27:21-26
21 None of us on the ship had eaten for many days. Then one day, Paul stood up
in front of us and said, “Friends, you should have listened to me when I said that we
(inc) should not sail from Crete. Then we would have been safe, and the ship and
its cargo would be in good condition [LIT]. 22 But now, I urge you, do not be afraid,
because none of us will die. The storm will destroy the ship but not us. 23 I know this,
because last night God, the one to whom I belong and whom I serve, sent an angel
who came and stood by me. 24 The angel said to me, ‘Paul, do not be afraid! You (sg)
must go to Rome and stand before the Emperor there so that he can judge you. I want
you to know that God has made it clear to me that all those who are traveling by ship
with you will also survive.’ 25 So cheer up, my friends, because I believe that God will
make this happen, exactly as the angel told me. 26 However, the ship will crash on
some island, and we (inc) will go ashore there.”
Paul thwarted some sailors who tried to sneak ashore in the lifeboat.
Acts 27:27-32
27 On the fourteenth night after the storm had begun, the ship was still being blown
{the wind was still blowing the ship} across the Adriatic sea. About midnight, the
sailors sensed that the ship was getting close to land. 28 So they lowered a weight
on a rope to measure how deep the water was. When they pulled the rope up again,
they measured it and saw that the water was ◄120 ft./37 meters► deep. They went
a little farther and lowered the rope again. That time, they saw that the water was
only about ◄90 ft./28 meters► deep. 29 They were afraid that the ship might go onto
some rocks, so they threw out four anchors from the ship’s stern/back and continued
to wish/pray that it would soon be dawn so that they could see where the ship was
going. 30 Some of the sailors were planning to escape from the ship, so they lowered
the lifeboat into the sea. In order that no one would know what they planned to do,
they pretended that they wanted to lower some anchors from the ship’s front/bow.
31 But Paul said to the army officer and soldiers, “If the sailors do not stay in the ship,
you have no hope of being saved.” 32 So the soldiers cut the ropes and let the lifeboat
fall into the water.
Paul urged them to eat some food, so they did and then lightened the ship.
Acts 27:33-38ACTS 27:33
1623
ACTS 28:6
33 Just before dawn, Paul urged everyone on the ship to eat some food.
He said,
“For the past 14 days you have been waiting and watching and not eating anything.
34 So, now I urge you to eat some food. We (inc) need to do that in order to stay alive.
I tell you to do that because I know that none of you will drown [IDM].” 35 After Paul
had said that, while everyone was watching, he took some bread and thanked God
for it. Then he broke the bread and began to eat some of it. 36 The rest of us became
encouraged, so we (exc) all ate some food. 37 Altogether there were 276 of us [SYN]
on the ship. 38 When everyone had eaten as much as they wanted, they threw the
grain that the ship was carrying into the sea, and this made the ship lighter.
The waves began to break up the ship after it struck a shoal.
Acts 27:39-41
39 At dawn, we(exc) could see land, but the sailors did not recognize the place.
However, they could see that there was a bay and a wide area of sand at the water’s
edge. They planned that, if it was possible, they would steer the ship onto the beach.
40 So some of the sailors cut the anchor ropes and let the anchors fall into the sea. At
the same time, other sailors untied the ropes that fastened the rudders, so that they
could steer the ship again. Then the sailors raised the sail at the front/bow of the ship
so that the wind would blow the ship forward, and the ship headed towards the shore.
41 But the ship hit a sandbank. The front of the ship stuck there and could not move,
and big waves beat against the back of the ship and it began to break apart.
The officer saved Paul and commanded all to go to the shore, so they did that.
Acts 27:42-44
42 The soldiers said to one another, “Let’s kill all the prisoners on the ship, so that
they will not be able to swim away and escape.” They planned to do that because they
were sure that officials would order them to be executed if they let the prisoners escape.
43 But Julius, the army captain, wanted to save Paul, so he stopped the soldiers from
doing what they planned to do. Instead, he commanded first that everyone who could
swim should jump into the water and swim to land. 44 Then he told the others to hold
onto planks or pieces from the ship and go towards shore. We(exc) did what he said,
and in that way all of us arrived safely on land.
28
The Maltese thought that Paul was a god because a snake did not harm him.
Acts 28:1-6
1 After we (exc) had arrived safely on the shore, we learned that it was an island
called Malta. 2 The people who lived there received us kindly. They lit a fire and
invited us to come and warm ourselves, because it was raining and it was cold. 3 Paul
gathered some sticks and put them on the fire. But among those sticks was a snake
that had come out from the fire to escape from the heat, and it fastened itself on Paul’s
hand. 4 The islanders knew that the snake was poisonous, so when they saw it hanging
from Paul’s hand, they said to each other, “Probably this man has murdered someone.
Although he has escaped from being drowned, the god ◄who pays people back/who
punishes people► for their [MTY] sins will cause him to die.” 5 But Paul simply shook
the snake off into the fire, and nothing happened to him. 6 The people were expecting
that Paul’s body would soon swell up or that he would suddenly fall down and die.
But after they had waited a long time, they saw that the snake had not harmed him
at all. So then the people changed their minds and said to one another, “This man is
not a murderer! Probably he is a god!”ACTS 28:7
1624
ACTS 28:22
Paul healed many Maltese, so they supplied what he and the others needed.
Acts 28:7-10
7 Near where the people had made the fire, there were some fields that belonged to
a man whose name was Publius. He was the chief official on the island. He invited
us to come and stay in his home. He took care of us for three days. 8 At that time
Publius’ father had a fever and dysentery, and he was lying in bed. So Paul visited
him and prayed for him. Then Paul placed his hands on him and healed him. 9 After
Paul had done that, the other people on the island who were sick came to him and he
healed them, too. 10 They brought us gifts and showed in other ways that they greatly
respected us. When we were ready to leave three months later, they brought us food
and other things that we would need for the trip.
Paul and the others sailed to Puteoli, then went by land towards Rome.
Acts 28:11-14
11 After we had stayed there three months, we got on a ship that was going to Italy
and sailed away. The ship had been in a harbor on the island during the months
when there are many storms. It had come from Alexandria city. On the front of the
ship there were carved images of the twin gods whose names were Castor and Pollux.
12 We sailed from the island and arrived at Syracuse city on Sicily island and stayed
there three days. 13 Then we traveled on by ship and arrived at Rhegium port in Italy.
The next day, the wind was blowing from behind us, so we sailed along fast. The day
after that, we reached Puteoli town, where we left the ship. 14 In Puteoli we met some
believers who invited us to stay with them for a week. After visiting them, we left
there and started to travel by land to Rome.
Christians came out from Rome and escorted Paul into that city.
Acts 28:15-16
15 A group of believers who lived in Rome had heard that we (exc) were coming.
So they came out from Rome to meet us. Some of them met us at the town called
‘The Market on Appian Road’, and others met us at the town called ‘The Three Inns’.
When Paul saw those believers, he thanked God and was encouraged. 16 After we
(exc) arrived in Rome, Paul was permitted {a Roman official who was responsible for
guarding Paul permitted Paul} to live in a house by himself. But there was always a
soldier there to guard him.
The Jewish leaders asked Paul to tell them about Christianity.
Acts 28:17-22
17 After Paul had been there three days, he sent a message to the Jewish leaders to
come and talk with him. So they came, and Paul said to them, “My fellow Jews,
although I have not opposed our people nor spoken against the customs of our
ancestors, our leaders in Jerusalem seized [MTY] me. But before they could kill me,
a Roman commander rescued me and later sent me to Caesarea for Roman authorities/
officials to put me on trial. 18 The Roman authorities/officials questioned me and
wanted to release me, because I had not done any bad thing for which I should be
executed {they should kill me}. 19 But when the Jewish leaders [SYN] there opposed
what the Roman authorities wanted to do, I had to formally request that the Emperor
judge me here in Rome. But my reason for doing that was not that I wanted to accuse
our leaders about anything. 20 So I have requested you to come here so that I can tell
you why I am a prisoner. It is because I believe in [MTY] our Messiah, the one God
long ago promised to send to us (inc) Jews.” 21 Then the Jewish leaders said, “We (exc)
have not received any letters from our fellow Jews in Judea about you. Also, none
of our fellow Jews who have arrived here from Judea has said anything bad about
you. 22 But we (exc) want to hear what you (sg) think about this Christian sect/group,ACTS 28:23
1625
ACTS 28:31
because we know that in many places [HYP] bad things are being said {people are
saying bad things} about it.”
Paul told the Jews that non-Jews would believe the gospel.
Acts 28:23-31
23 So they talked with Paul and decided that they would come back on another day to
hear him. When that day arrived, those Jews came back to the place where Paul was
staying, and they brought more Jews with them. Paul talked to them from morning
until evening. He talked to them about how God wants to rule people’s lives [MET]. He
tried to convince them that Jesus is the Messiah by reminding them what Moses and
the other prophets had written [MTY]. 24 Some of those Jews believed that what was
said by Paul {what Paul said} about Jesus was true, but others did not believe that it
was true. 25 So they began to argue with one another. Paul realized that some of them
did not want to listen to him, so when they were about to leave, he said, “The Holy
Spirit said something to your/our(incl) ancestors. He spoke these words to Isaiah the
prophet, and what he said is also true about you:
26 Go to your fellow Israelites and tell them,
‘You repeatedly listen to the message of God, but you never understand what God is
saying.
You repeatedly look at and see the things that God is doing,
but you never understand what they mean.
27 God also said to the prophet,
These people do not understand, because they have become stubborn.
They have ears, but they do not understand what they hear,
and they have closed their eyes because they do not want to see.
If they wanted to obey what I say to them, they might understand what they see me
doing and what they hear me saying.
Then they might turn from their sinful behavior and I would save them.’
28-29 That is what God said to the prophet Isaiah about our ancestors. But you Jews
today do not want to believe God’s message. Therefore, I am telling you that God has
sent to the non-Jews this message about how he saves people, and they will listen and
accept it!”
30 For two whole years Paul stayed there in a house that he rented. Many people
came to see him, and he received them all gladly and talked with them. 31 He preached
and taught people about how God could rule their lives [MET] and taught them about
the Lord Jesus Christ. He did that without being afraid, and no one tried to stop him.ROMANS 1:1
1626
ROMANS 1:14
This book is a letter that the Apostle Paul wrote to the
Christians at Rome. We call this book
Romans
Romans 1:1-7
I, Paul, an apostle whom God appointed to proclaim the good message about Jesus
Christ, am writing this letter to all you believers who are in Rome. I pray that God will
continue to act kindly toward you and grant you peace.
1 I, Paul, who serve Christ Jesus, am writing this letter. God chose me to be an
apostle, and I was appointed by him {he appointed me} in order that I should proclaim
◄the good message/the gospel► that comes from him. 2 Long before Jesus came to
earth, God promised that he would reveal this good message by means of what his
prophets wrote in the sacred Scriptures. 3 This good message is about the one whom
we know as his Son. As to his Son’s physical/human nature, he was born a descendant
of King David. 4 As to his divine nature, it was shown {God showed} powerfully that
he is ◄God’s own Son/the man who is also God►. God showed this by his Holy Spirit
causing him to become alive again after he died. He is Jesus Christ our Lord. 5 He
is the one who appointed me, who did not deserve it, to be an apostle. He did that
in order that many among the non-Jews would honor him and would obey him as a
result of their believing my message about him. 6 You believers who are living in Rome
city are included among those whom God has chosen to belong to Jesus Christ. 7 I am
writing this letter to all of you in Rome whom God loves and whom he has chosen to
become his people. I pray that God our Father and Jesus Christ our Lord will continue
to act kindly toward you and will continue to cause you to have inner peace.
I thank God that people everywhere are talking about how you believers in Rome
are trusting Jesus Christ. I pray that God will permit me to visit you soon. I want you to
know that I have longed to visit you, but things have always prevented me from doing
that. I am eager to proclaim the gospel to you who are living at Rome also.
Romans 1:8-15
8 As I begin this letter, I thank my God for all you believers in Rome. It is because
of what Jesus Christ has done for us that I am able to do that. I thank him because
your trusting in Jesus Christ is something that people all over the Roman Empire [HYP]
are talking about. 9 God, whom I devotedly serve as I proclaim to people the gospel
concerning his Son, knows that I tell the truth when I say that I always mention you
whenever [DOU] I pray to God [HYP]. 10 I especially ask God that if he desires me to
visit you, somehow at last I shall be able to do so. 11 I pray this because I long to visit
you to help you spiritually, in order that you will become stronger spiritually. 12 I
long to visit you in order that you and I might encourage each other by means of our
sharing with each other how each of us trusts in Jesus. 13 My fellow believers, many
times I planned to visit you. I certainly want you to know [LIT] that. But I have not
been able to come to you because I have been hindered {things have always prevented
me} until the present time. I have wanted to come in order that I might help you to
mature spiritually [IDM], as I have helped people to mature spiritually in many other
non-Jewish groups [HYP]. 14 I feel obliged to proclaim the gospel to all non-Jewish
people, specifically to people who know the Greek language and culture and to those
who do not know it, to people who are educated and to those who are uneducated.ROMANS 1:15
1627
ROMANS 1:25
15 So what I have eagerly desired is that I might proclaim this good message to you
who are living in Rome also.
I very confidently proclaim the good message about what Christ has done, both to
Jews and non-Jews, because by that message God reveals his way of declaring all people
righteous.
Romans 1:16-17
16 That leads me to say that I very confidently proclaim [LIT] the good message about
what Christ has done, because this good message is the powerful means that God uses
to save from the guilt of their sins all people who trust in what Christ has done for them.
Specifically, God first has saved the Jews who believe the good message, and then he
has saved non-Jews. 17 By means of this good message God reveals how he erases the
record of people’s sins (OR, declares people no longer guilty for having sinned); and
his doing this is entirely because [IDM] they trust in Christ. This is confirmed by what
a prophet long ago wrote that God said, “Those ◄whose record of sin I have erased/
whom I have declared no longer guilty for sin► because they trust in me will live
forever.”
God is making it clear to all non-Jewish people who are godless and wicked that he
is angry with them.
Romans 1:18
18 From where God rules in heaven he is making it clear to all non-Jewish people
who show no respect for God and who do wicked things, that he is angry with them
and that they deserve to be punished {that he would punish them} [MTY]. By means of
their behaving wickedly, they keep other people from believing what they know to be
true about God.
Everyone can clearly know what God is like; so no one has a basis for saying, “We
never knew about God.”
Romans 1:19-23
19 Everyone can clearly know what God is like, because God himself has revealed
to everyone what he is like. 20 People cannot see what God is like. But ever since he
created the world, by means of what he created he has clearly revealed what he is
like. He has made clear to everyone that he has always been able to do very powerful
things. Therefore, we should recognize that God is powerful, completely different from
all that he created. So no one has a basis for saying, “We never knew about God.”
21 Although the non-Jews knew what God is like, they did not honor him as God, nor
did they thank him for what he had done. But instead, they began to think foolish
things about him, and they became unable to understand [MET] what he wanted them
to know. 22 Although they claimed that they were wise, they became foolish, 23 and
they refused to admit that God is glorious and will never die. Instead, they made and
worshipped idols that resembled people who will some day die, and then they made
other idols that resembled birds and four-footed animals, and finally they made idols
that resembled reptiles.
So God let the non-Jewish people feel compelled to do disgraceful things, which
resulted in their dishonoring their bodies sexually. He did this because they worshipped
idols and things that were created instead of worshipping God. As a result of both men
and women having unnatural sexual relations, they have been punished as they deserve.
Romans 1:24-27
24 So God allowed the non-Jews do immoral sexual things that they [SYN] strongly
desired, things that their desires were compelling them to do. As a result, they began
to dishonor each other’s bodies by their sexual actions. 25 Also, they chose to worshipROMANS 1:26
1628
ROMANS 2:3
false gods instead ◄of admitting/of choosing to believe► what is true about God. They
worshipped and served things that God created instead of worshipping and serving
God himself, the one who created everything. They did this even though he deserves
that those he created would forever praise him. Amen!/May it be so!
26 So, God allowed the non-Jews to do shameful sexual things that they strongly
desired. As a result, many women did not have natural sexual relations with their
husbands [EUP]. Instead, they were doing sexual actions with other women [EUP].
27 Similarly, many men stopped having/did not have natural sexual relations with
women [EUP]. Instead, they strongly desired to have sexual relations with other men.
They committed homosexual acts with other men, acts that were shameful. As a result,
God has punished them by sicknesses in their bodies, which is what they deserve
because they thought wrongly that God would not punish them for doing that.
The result of God’s letting people become obsessed by their own depraved thoughts
was that they themselves began to do all manner of evil things that God says are
improper. They even approve of others doing such things.
Romans 1:28-32
28 Furthermore, because they decided that it was not worthwhile to know God, he
allowed their own worthless thoughts to completely control them. As a result, they
began doing evil things that God says that people should not do. 29 They strongly
desire to do all kinds of unrighteous things. They strongly desire to do all kinds of
evil things to others. They strongly desire to possess things that belong to others.
They strongly desire to harm others in various ways. Many non-Jews are constantly
envying other people. Many constantly desire to murder people. Many constantly
desire to cause strife between people. Many constantly desire to deceive others. Many
constantly desire to speak hatefully about others (OR, to speak harmful things about
others, things that are not true). Many gossip about others. 30 Many slander others.
Many act especially hatefully toward God. Many speak or act in an insulting way
toward others. Many treat others contemptuously. Many boast about themselves to
others. Many invent new ways to do evil things. Many non-Jewish children disobey
their parents. 31 Many non-Jews act in other morally foolish ways. Many do not do
what they promised others that they would do. Many do not even love their own
family members. And many do not act mercifully toward other people. 32 Although
they know that God has declared that those who do such things deserve to be killed,
they not only habitually do these kinds of evil things, but they also approve of others
who habitually do them.
2
Any one of you Jews who condemns non-Jews for doing evil will be condemned by
God, because you also do the same evil things.
Romans 2:1-5
1 God will severely punish non-Jewish people who habitually do evil things, because
he has clearly revealed that he is angry with them. So, when God judges people, he will
not excuse any one of you Jews to whom I am writing. You (sg) say that God should
punish non-Jews for doing evil things. But when any one of you says that, it is you
yourself whom you are saying that God should punish, because you (sg) do some of
the same evil things that the non-Jews do. 2 We know very well that God will judge
and punish fairly non-Jewish people who do such evil things. 3 So, you who say God
should punish others for doing evil things yet you do evil things yourself, ◄you should
certainly not think that you yourself will be able to escape from being punished by
God!/do you think that you yourself will be able to escape from being punished byROMANS 2:4
1629
ROMANS 2:16
God?► [RHQ] 4 And you should not say, “God is acting very tolerantly and patiently
toward me, so I do not need to stop sinning [DOU].” ◄You should realize that God is
acting in a kind manner toward you in order to encourage you (sg) to turn away from
your sinful behavior!/Do you not realize that God is acting in a kind manner toward
you in order to encourage you (sg) to turn away from your sinful behavior?► [RHQ]
5 But instead, by your stubbornly refusing to turn away from your sinful behavior
[DOU], you are causing [MET] God to punish you even more severely. He will do that
at the time when he shows that he is angry and judges people fairly.
Because God is not influenced by a person’s status, he will pay back each person
according to what that person has done.
Romans 2:6-11
6 God will pay back everyone according to what they deserve for what they have
done. 7 Specifically, some people, by continuing to doing good things, strive to be
highly honored by God [DOU] and to receive a life that will not end. God will reward
them by enabling them to live forever. 8 But some people act in a selfish way and
refuse to believe that what God says is true, and they do the things that God says are
wrong. God will punish them very severely [DOU, MTY]. 9 He will cause everyone
who habitually does evil deeds to suffer greatly, with the result that they will become
severely distressed [DOU]. This certainly will happen to the Jews who refuse to accept
God’s message, because God gave them the privilege to be his special people, but it will
also happen to the non-Jews. 10 But God will greatly reward spiritually [MET, DOU]
every person who habitually does good deeds. He will certainly do this for the Jews
because God chose them as his special people, but he will also do it for the non-Jews.
11 God will do this fairly, because people’s status does not influence him.
All non-Jews and all non-Jews will be eternally separated from God for their sin,
since it is only those who have continually obeyed his laws whom God will justify.
Romans 2:12-16
12 Although non-Jews do not have the laws that God gave to Moses, all non-Jews who
sin will be eternally separated from God. He will not consider whether or not they
knew the laws that he gave to Moses. And all the Jews who have sinned in spite of
knowing the laws that God gave to Moses will also be punished {God will also punish
them}. They will be punished for disobeying God’s laws. 13 It is right for them to be
punished {God to punish them} because it is not those who merely know God’s laws
whom he considers to be righteous. On the contrary, it is only those who continually
have obeyed all ◄of God’s laws/of the laws that God gave to Moses► ◄whom God
will consider righteous/whose record of sins God will erase►. 14 Whenever the non-
Jews, who do not have the laws God gave to Moses, naturally obey those laws, they
prove that they have a law within their own minds, even though they do not have
the laws God gave to Moses. 15 They show that they know in their own minds what
God commands in his laws [MET], as each person in his very own conscience either
accuses or excuses/defends himself concerning his own behavior. 16 God will punish
people at the time when he will judge them according to what they have thought and
done. He will judge them even for the things that they have done secretly. He will
judge people by authorizing Christ Jesus to judge them. This is what I tell people when
I preach the gospel to them.
It is disgusting that any one of you who has all the advantages of being a Jew would
disobey God’s law and, by doing so, insult God.
Romans 2:17-24ROMANS 2:17
1630
ROMANS 2:29
17 Now I have something to say to any one of you Jews to whom I am writing: You
(sg) boast about yourself saying, “I am a Jew.” You (sg) trust that God will save you
because you possess the laws that he gave to Moses. You boast that you belong to God.
18 You know what God desires. Because you have been taught {people have taught
you} God’s laws, you are able to know which things are right and to choose to do
them. 19 You are certain that you are able to show God’s truth to non-Jews, as guides
show the road to those who are blind [MET]. You are certain that by what you say you
can show God’s way to the non-Jews who do not understand it, as a light shows the way
to those who walk in the darkness [MET, DOU]. 20 You are certain that you can instruct/
correct non-Jews, whom you consider foolish because of their not understanding God’s
message. Because you have in God’s laws a written expression of true knowledge
[HEN], you are certain that you can teach people who, being like children, do not
know God’s truth [MET]. 21 Since you claim that you have all these advantages because
you are a Jew, ◄it is disgusting that you who teach other people that they should
obey the laws God gave Moses do not obey the laws that you yourself teach!/why is
it that you who teach other people that they should obey the laws God gave Moses
do not obey the laws that you yourself teach?► [RHQ] You who preach that people
should not steal things, it is disgusting that you yourself steal things! [RHQ] 22 You
who command people not to have sexual relations with someone to whom they are
not married, it is disgusting that you commit adultery yourself! [RHQ] You who detest
idols, it is disgusting that you rob temples where people worship idols! [RHQ] 23 You
who boast saying, “I have God’s laws,” it is disgusting that you disobey those same
laws! [RHQ] As a result you are insulting God! 24 You must not be like our ancestors,
about whom were written these words in the Scriptures: “The non-Jews speak evil
about God because of the evil actions of many of you Jews.” The non-Jews say God
must be a hypocrite if he condones the behavior of people like you.
God will consider non-Jews acceptable to him if they obey his laws, and such non-
Jews will declare God is right in condemning those who disobey his laws, because it is
only those who are changed inwardly who are true Jews and acceptable to God.
Romans 2:25-29
25 Any one of you who is circumcised to show that he belongs to God can benefit
from that if he obeys the laws God gave to Moses. But if you (sg), a circumcised
person, disobey God’s laws, God will consider that you who are circumcised are no
better in God’s sight than someone who is not circumcised. 26 This means that God
will certainly consider that even non-Jews who are not circumcised can become his
people if they obey the things that he commanded in his laws. [RHQ] 27 If any one of
you disobeys God’s laws, even though you(sg) have the Scriptures and even though
someone has circumcised you {you are circumcised} God will punish you. And those
people who are not circumcised, but who obey God’s laws, will declare that God is
right when he says that he will punish you. 28 It is not those who perform rituals
to show they are God’s people who are true Jews, and it is not being circumcised in
their bodies that causes God to accept them [MTY]. 29 On the contrary, we whom God
has changed inwardly are true Jews [MTY]. And God has accepted us because we have
allowed God’s Spirit to change our hearts, not because we perform rituals. Even if
other people will not praise us for that change, God will praise us.
3
My reply to the objection that there is no advantage in being a Jew or being
circumcised is that there is much advantage, especially since God entrusted his promisesROMANS 3:1
1631
ROMANS 3:11
to us. My reply to the objection that God has not kept his promise is that he certainly
has, for his promises are always true. My reply to the objection that it is not right for
God to punish us Jews is that it certainly is right for him to punish us, because if God
did not judge us Jews he could not judge anyone.
Romans 3:1-8
1 Someone may object to this, saying, “If being circumcised does not cause God to
accept us Jews, ◄there is no advantage in being a Jew over being a non-Jew./is there
any advantage in being a Jew over being a non-Jew?► [RHQ] Being circumcised does
not benefit us Jews at all!” 2 I would reply that being Jews benefits us in many ways
[HYP]. First of all, it benefits us because it was to our ancestors that God’s words,
words that contain his promises, were given {that God gave his words, words that
contain his promises}. 3 Many Jews did not obey God as they promised that they would.
So someone might ask, “Does their not being faithful mean that God will not bless us
Jews as he promised that he would?” 4 I would reply, “No, it certainly does not mean
that! God always does what he has promised, even though people do not. All those
who accuse God of not keeping his promises to us Jews are very mistaken.” What King
David wrote about God’s justly saying that he would punish him for his sins is also true
of those who accuse God of not keeping his promises. What he said to God was, “So
everyone must acknowledge that what you (sg) have said about them (OR, their sin)
is true, and you will always win the case when you are accused {when people accuse
you}.”
5 So if we Jews’ being wicked [PRS] shows that it is right that God does not bless
us, what shall we say/conclude? Shall we conclude that it is not right for God to
be angry and punish us Jews [MTY]? I should not be saying these things, but I am
speaking as ordinary humans speak. 6 We should certainly not conclude that God
should not judge us, because if God did not judge us Jews, ◄it would not possibly be
right for him to judge anyone in the world [MTY]!/how could he judge anyone in the
world?► [MTY, RHQ] 7 But someone might object and say to me, “The fact that God
truly keeps his promises becomes very clear/evident because of my not doing what
God has commanded. But the result is that people praise God! So ◄God should no
longer say that I should be punished {that he should punish me} on account of my
having sinned!/why should God still say that I should be punished {that he should
punish me} on account of my having sinned?► [RHQ] 8 If what you, Paul, say is true,
then ◄we might as well/it is all right for us to► do evil things in order that good
things like that will result! For example, then people will praise God!” Some people
speak evil about me by their falsely saying that I say such things. God will fairly/justly
punish people who say such things about me!
My reply to a query about whether God will treat Jews more favorably than non-Jews
is no, because the Scriptures make clear that all people are condemned by God for their
sin.
Romans 3:9-18
9 If someone would ask, “Shall we conclude that God will treat us Jews more favorably
and will treat the non-Jews less favorably [RHQ]?” I would reply that we can certainly
not conclude that! I have already shown you that all people, the Jews and also the
non-Jews, have sinned and so they deserve to be punished {that God will punish them}
[PRS]. 10 The following words that are written {prophets have written} in the Scriptures
support this,
No person is righteous. There is not even one righteous person! 11 There is no one
who understands how to live properly (OR, about God). There is no one who seeks/
desires to know God!ROMANS 3:12
1632
ROMANS 3:26
12 Absolutely everyone has turned away [MET] from God.
God considers them
depraved (OR, Everyone has become useless to God). There is no one who acts
righteously; no, there is not even one!
13 What people say [MTY] is foul/bad, like the smell that comes from a grave that has
been {that people have} opened [MET]. By what people say [MTY], they deceive
people.
By what they say [MTY] they injure people, just like the poison of snakes injures people
[MET].
14 They are continually ◄cursing/asking God to do harmful things to► others and
saying ◄cruel/harsh/hateful► things [MTY].
15 They ◄go quickly/are eager► to murder people [MTY].
16 Wherever they go, they ruin everything and make people miserable [MTY].
17 They have not/never known how to live peacefully with other people.
18 They absolutely refuse to fear/reverence God [SYN]!
In summary, no one is able to object to God’s condemnation; everyone has been
declared guilty by God.
Romans 3:19-20
19 Furthermore, we know that it is to Jewish people, who are required to obey God’s
laws, that Moses wrote those laws [PRS]. We can infer from this that there are no Jews
or non-Jews [SYN] who are able to say anything in reply to God’s saying that he will
punish them for having sinned. God has declared everyone in the world [MTY] guilty!
20 It is not because people have done the things that God’s laws require that God will
◄erase the record of their sins/declare them no longer guilty for sin►, because no one
has done those things completely. In fact, the result of our knowing God’s laws is that
we know clearly that we have sinned (OR, are sinful).
Now God erases the record of sins of everyone, Jew and non-Jew, who trusts in what
Jesus Christ has done for them. God presented Christ as the one who would atone for
sins by dying on the cross.
Romans 3:21-26
21 But God’s ◄erasing the record of our sins/declaring us no longer guilty► does not
depend on our obeying the laws that he gave Moses. It has now been {God has now}
revealed to us how he erases the record of our sins by a different way. It was written
about by Moses {Moses wrote about it} in the laws [PRS] God gave him, and it was also
written about by the prophets {the prophets also wrote about it}. 22 God erases the
record of our sins because we trust in what Jesus Christ has done for us. God does this
for every person who trusts in Christ, because he considers that there is no difference
between Jews and non-Jews. 23 All people have done evil, and all people have failed
to accomplish the glorious goals that God set for them. 24 Our record of sins has been
erased {God erased the record of our sins} by God acting kindly to forgive our sins,
without our doing anything to earn it. Christ Jesus accomplished this by dying for
us. 25 God showed that Christ was the one who would atone for (OR, forgive) our
sins with the blood that flowed from his body when he died. God redeems/forgives us
because of our trusting in Christ’s having died for us. God wanted to show that he acts
justly. He wanted to do that because, before Jesus came, God did not punish everyone
who sinned. So it seemed as though he was not being just. But he was overlooking
people’s sins during that time, 26 because he is patient. God arranged for Jesus to die
for us. By doing that, God now shows that he is just, and he shows that he is justly
able to erase the record of sins for everyone who trusts/believes in Jesus.ROMANS 3:27
1633
ROMANS 4:7
So we are prevented from boasting that God saves us because of our obeying the
Mosaic laws. And God will also accept non-Jews on the same basis. And by agreeing
that people are declared righteous by their trusting in Christ, we actually confirm, not
nullify, the Mosaic laws.
Romans 3:27-31
27 It is not at all [RHQ] because of our obeying the laws of Moses that God erases the
record of our sins. So, ◄there is no way that we can boast that God does that because
of our obeying those laws./how can we boast about God erasing the record of our sins
because of our obeying those laws?► [RHQ] Instead, it is because of our believing/
trusting in Christ that God erases the record of our sins. 28 We cannot boast about that,
because we conclude that the record of our sins is erased {God erases the record of
our sins} because of our trusting in Christ. God does not erase the record of our sins
because of our obeying the laws that he gave to Moses, because it is impossible for us
to completely obey them. 29 ◄You who are Jews certainly should not think that you are
the only ones whom God will accept!/Do you Jews think it is you alone whom God will
accept?► [RHQ] You certainly should realize that he will accept non-Jews, too. [RHQ]
Of course, he will accept non-Jews also, 30 because, as you firmly believe, there is only
one God, who will erase the record of Jews’ [MTY] sins if they trust in what Christ has
done, and who will similarly erase the record of non-Jews’ [MTY] sins if they trust
in Christ. 31 So, if someone should ask concerning the laws that God gave Moses, “By
saying that God erases the record of our sins because of our trusting in Christ, does
that mean that those laws now are useless?”, I would reply, “Certainly not. Instead,
we truly fulfill the laws that God gave Moses.”
4
We can draw conclusions from Abraham’s life about how God erases the record of
our sins. Abraham could not boast about his accomplishing that because the Scriptures
record that it was because he believed what God promised that God erased the record
of his sins. God’s doing that was a gift, not a reward.
Romans 4:1-8
1 Abraham is the revered ancestor of us Jews. So think about what we can conclude
from what happened to Abraham about how God can erase the record of our sins.
[RHQ] 2 If it was because of Abraham’s doing good things that the record of his sins
was erased {that God erased the record of his sins}, Abraham could then have been
able to boast about that to people, but he would not have had any basis to boast to
God about it. 3 Remember that in the Scriptures it is written {someone wrote} [PRS]
that Abraham believed what God promised [RHQ], and as a result the record of his
sins was erased {God erased the record of his sins}. 4 If we receive wages for work
that we do, those wages are not considered to be a gift. Instead, they are considered
to be what we have earned. Similarly, if God erases the record of our sins because we
did things to earn God’s favor, we would not consider that God’s erasing the record
of our sin was a gift. Instead, we would consider it as what we had earned. 5 But
suppose that we do not do things to gain God’s acceptance. Suppose that we instead
trust in God, who erases the record of sins of wicked people. Then the erasing of the
record of our sins because of our trusting in Christ is considered to be a gift to us, not
something that we earned. 6 Similarly, it is as David wrote in the Psalms about people
being happy whose record of sins God has erased even though they have not done
things to earn it. David wrote:
7 God is pleased with people whose sins have been {whose sins he has} forgiven, and
whose sins he has decided to forget [DOU].ROMANS 4:8
1634
ROMANS 4:17
8 God causes to be happy the people whose sins he no longer keeps a record of.
This happiness of knowing that God has erased the record of our sins is also for
the non-Jews. Remember that it was before Abraham was circumcised, when he was
still in effect a non-Jew, that God did that. He later received circumcision simply as a
sign of God having erased the record of his sins because of his faith. The result was
that he became a spiritual father of all who believe in God as he did, whether they are
circumcised or not.
Romans 4:9-12
9 As for our being happy because God has erased the record of our sins, ◄it is not
something that only we Jews can experience./is it [MTY] something that only we Jews
can experience?► [RHQ] No, it is also something that non-Jews can experience [MTY].
What is written in the Scriptures, that it was because Abraham trusted in God that
the record of his sins was erased {God erased the record of his sins}, also shows that
this is true. 10 ◄Think about when God erased the record of Abraham’s sins./When
did God erase the record of Abraham’s sins?► [RHQ] ◄Consider whether it happened
after someone circumcised Abraham to mark him as one who belonged to God, or
before someone circumcised him./Did it happen after Abraham was circumcised to
be marked as one who belonged to God, or before he was circumcised?► [RHQ] It
happened before he was circumcised, not after he was circumcised. 11 Many years
later, God commanded that Abraham be circumcised. Abraham’s accepting that ritual
simply showed that he knew that God had accepted him. He knew that God had erased
the record of his sins because he trusted in God while he was still, in effect, a non-Jew
because he had not been circumcised. So we can understand that Abraham became ◄a
spiritual ancestor/like an ancestor► to all of us whose record of sins has been erased
{whose sins God has erased the record of} because we believe in God’s promise, even
though some of us are not circumcised. 12 Likewise, Abraham is the spiritual ancestor
of all us Jews who are not merely circumcised but who, more importantly, believe in
God’s promise as our ancestor Abraham did, even before he was circumcised.
It was because Abraham trusted in God that God erased the record of his sins and
promised him many blessings. So what God promised is guaranteed to all, both Jews
and non-Jews, who trust in God as Abraham did.
Romans 4:13-17a
13 God promised Abraham and his descendants that they would receive the blessings
that he promised to give to the people in the world. But when he promised that, it was
not because Abraham obeyed the laws that God later gave to Moses. Instead, it was
because Abraham believed that God would do what he promised that he would do. As
a result, God erased the record of his sins. 14-15 If we think that it is those who obey
God’s laws who will receive what he has promised, it is useless for us to trust in him.
And what he promised is worthless. Remember that it is stated in God’s law [PRS] that
he will punish people who do not perfectly obey them, and remember that wherever
[MTY] laws exist, people disobey them [LIT]. 16 So it is because we trust in God that
we will receive the things that he has promised. It is not because we perfectly obey
God’s laws. He wants ◄to erase the record of our sins/to declare us no longer guilty►
without our earning it. As a result, what God now promises, he guarantees to give to
all people who are Abraham’s spiritual descendants. He promises to do that not only
for us Jewish believers, who have God’s laws and trust in him as Abraham did, but
also for those non-Jews who do not have God’s laws but who trust in him as Abraham
did. Abraham is the spiritual ancestor of all of us believers. 17 What is written {What
Moses wrote} in the Scriptures about what God promised Abraham shows that this isROMANS 4:18
1635
ROMANS 5:5
true. God said to him, “It is in order that you (sg) may be the ancestor of many ethnic
groups that I have chosen you.”
It was because Abraham confidently believed God’s promise to give him many
descendants, when there was no physical basis for his hoping that this would happen,
that God erased the record of his sins.
Romans 4:17b-22
God guaranteed that he would give Abraham many descendants.
Abraham
confidently believed that God would do that, 18 even though there was no physical
reason for him to hope that he would have descendants, because he and his wife were
too old to bear children. But God is the one who causes dead people to live again,
and who talks about things that do not yet exist as already existing. God said to
Abraham, “You will have so many descendants that they will be as impossible to count
as the stars.” And Abraham believed that, and he believed that he would become the
ancestor of many ethnic groups. 19 He did not doubt that God would do what he
promised, even though he knew that his body was already as incapable of begetting
children as if he were dead [MET] because he was about 100 years old. And even
though he realized that Sarah had never been able to become pregnant [IDM], 20 he
did not doubt at all that God would do what he had promised. Instead, he trusted in
God more/very strongly, and he thanked God for what God was going to do. 21 He
was also convinced {very sure} that the thing that God promised, God was able to
do. 22 And that is the reason that the record of his sins was erased {God erased the
record of his sins}.
The words about God erasing the record of Abraham’s sins were written also to
assure us who believe in God.
Romans 4:23-25
23 The words in the Scriptures, “The record of his sins was erased {God erased the
record of his sins},” are not only about Abraham. 24 They were also written {They
also wrote that} for us whose record of sins would be erased {God would erase}. They
were written {They wrote it} for us who believe God, the one who caused our Lord
Jesus to become alive again after he died. 25 Jesus allowed men to execute [MTY] him
so that God could forgive our evil deeds. And God caused Jesus to live again because
God wanted to show that because of the death of Jesus he was able to erase the record
of our sins.
5
Because God has erased the record of our sins, we have peace with him, we
experience his acting kindly toward us, we rejoice because we expect to receive God’s
glory, and we even rejoice in suffering because we know the results that it brings.
Romans 5:1-5
1 Because we trusted in Christ, the record of our sins has been erased {God has
erased the record of our sins}. So we now have a peaceful relationship with God
because of our trust in what our Lord Jesus Christ has done for us. 2 Because of
what Christ has done, God has also enabled us to begin experiencing his continually
acting toward us in ways that we do not deserve. Also, we rejoice because we are
confidently expecting that God will gladly show us how great he is. 3 We rejoice even
when we suffer as a result of our trusting in Christ, because we know that when we
are suffering, the result is that we learn to endure things patiently. 4 And we know
that when we endure things patiently, the result is that God approves of us. And when
we know that God approves of us, the result is that we confidently expect that he will
do great things for us. 5 And we are very confident [PRS] that we will receive theROMANS 5:6
1636
ROMANS 5:17
things that we wait expectantly for, because God loves us very much. His Holy Spirit,
who has been {whom he has} given to us, causes us to understand how much God
loves us.
Because Christ died for us ungodly people, he will certainly save us from God’s
eternal punishment, and so we boast of what he has done for us.
Romans 5:6-11
6 When we were unable to save ourselves, it was Christ who, at the time that God
chose, died on behalf of us ungodly people. 7 Rarely would anyone die on behalf
of another person, even if that person were righteous, although someone might be
courageous enough to die on behalf of a truly good person person. 8 Nevertheless, as
for God, the way he showed us that he loves us is that Christ died on our behalf while
we were still rebelling against God. 9 The record of our sins has been erased {God has
erased the record of our sins} because of what Christ accomplished when his blood
[MTY] flowed when he died. So it is even more certain that we will be saved by Christ
{that Christ will save us} from God’s punishing us eternally [MTY]. 10 Even when we
were acting hostilely towards God, he enabled us to have a peaceful relationship with
him as a result of his Son dying for us. So it is even more certain that we will be saved
{Christ will be able to save us} from God’s punishing us [MTY] because Christ is alive
again and because God has enabled us to have a peaceful relationship with himself.
11 And that’s not all! Now we also rejoice about the things that God has done for
us because of our Lord Jesus Christ dying for us and enabling us to have a peaceful
relationship with God.
Although the sin of one man, Adam, led to all people dying and God declaring that
they deserved to be punished, Christ’s righteous act of obedience when he died led
to many people experiencing God’s kindness and being declared righteous and living
eternally, and it will also result in their ruling with Christ.
Romans 5:12-21
12 What you can learn from what I have written so far is as follows: All people are
sinful [PRS], and that is the result of Adam, the first man whom God created, sinning
long ago. Adam died [PRS] because he sinned. So, all people who have lived since then
die, because it is as though all people sinned when Adam sinned. 13 People in [MTY]
the world sinned before God gave his laws to Moses. But people are not considered by
God {God does not consider people} to be guilty for their sins if there is no law stating
that what they did was sinful. 14 But we know that from the time when Adam lived until
the time when Moses lived, all people sinned, and they died as a consequence [PRS,
MET]. Even people who sinned differently from the way Adam sinned, died. Adam’s
sin affected all people, just like what Christ did, the one who came later, can affect
all people. 15 But the results of God’s erasing the record of our sins as a gift to us
are not like the results of Adam’s sinning. The result of one man, Adam, sinning
was that many/all people have died. But it is certain, however, that many people
have abundantly experienced God’s acting kindly toward them in a way they did not
deserve. It is also certain that they have experienced God’s erasing the record of
their sins as the result of one man, Jesus Christ, acting kindly toward them/towards
them in a way they did not deserve. 16 And there is another way in which God’s freely
erasing the record of our sins is not like the results of Adam’s sinning. One person,
Adam, sinned. As a result, God declared that all people deserve to be punished. Many
people sinned. But what God did was that he erased the record of their sins without
their earning it. 17 All people die [MET, PRS] because of what one man, Adam, did. But
now many of us experience that God has abundantly acted towards us in ways we
did not deserve, and we experience that he has erased the record of our sins withoutROMANS 5:18
1637
ROMANS 6:6
our earning it. It is also very certain that we will rule with Christ (OR, share the glory
of Christ’s being king), in heaven. This will happen because of what one man, Jesus
Christ, did for us.
18 So, because one man, Adam, disobeyed God’s law, that resulted in all people
deserving to be punished {that God punish them}. Similarly, because one man, Jesus,
acted righteously by obeying God when he died, the result was that God is able to erase
the record of all people’s sins and enable them to live eternally. 19 It was because one
person, Adam, disobeyed God that many/all people became sinners. Similarly, it is
because one person, Jesus, obeyed God when he died that the record of many people’s
sins will be erased {that he will erase the record of many people’s sins}. 20 God gave
[PRS] his laws to Moses [PRS] in order that people might realize how greatly they had
sinned; but as people sinned more, God continued to act even more kindly toward
them, in a way that they did not deserve. 21 He did that in order that just like people
everywhere inevitably sin, which results in their dying [MET, PRS], people everywhere
might inevitably experience God’s acting kindly towards them in a way they do not
deserve [MET, PRS] by erasing the record of their sins. The result is that people can
live eternally because of what Jesus Christ our Lord did for them.
6
If someone were to say that perhaps we should continue to sin in order that God may
continue to act more kindly toward us, I would reply that we who ought to consider
ourselves unresponsive to sinful desires should certainly not continue sinning. We must
keep remembering that it is as though our former sinful nature has ceased to function,
and it is as though we have become unresponsive to sinful desires, living in a new way.
So do not let the desire to commit sin control you. Instead, present yourselves to God
to do righteous things.
Romans 6:1-14
1 Someone might [RHQ] say in reply to what I have written that since God acted kindly
toward us in a way we did not deserve because we sinned, perhaps we should continue
to sin in order that he may continue to act even more kindly toward us and keep on
forgiving us! [RHQ] 2 I would reply, No, certainly not! We ought to consider that our
sinful desires [MET] cannot make us do what they want us to do, just like we cannot
make a corpse do what we want it to do. So it is not right that we continue to sin!
[RHQ] 3 When we were baptized {asked someone to baptize us} in order to show that
we have a relationship with (OR, are united to) Jesus Christ, our being baptized was
to declare that it was as though we died with Christ. ◄I want you to remember that!/
Do you not know that?► [RHQ] 4 So, when we were baptized {someone baptized us},
it was as though we were buried with Christ. We were baptized in order to indicate
that we would not let our sinful desires make us do what they want us to do, just like
people cannot make a corpse do what they want it to do [MET]. We were baptized to
signify that we would continually conduct our lives in a new way, just like Christ was
caused to live again in a new way by the great power of God his Father. 5 Because
of our close relationship with Christ, we have separated ourselves from the former
way in which we conducted our lives, just like he was separated from his physical life
when he died [MET]. But God will also certainly enable us to live in a new way, just
like he enabled Christ to live again. 6 We must keep remembering that when Christ
died on the cross [MET], it was as though our sinful nature died with him. It has lost
its power to make us do what it wants us to do [MET]. That happened in order that
we would not do the sinful things that our bodies [MET], which desire to sin, want us
to do, and in order that we would no longer have to sin [MET], as slaves have to doROMANS 6:7
1638
ROMANS 6:22
what their masters want. 7 We are, as it were, freed {free} from sinful desires [MET]
controlling us, just like those who have died are free from anything controlling them.
8 Since it is as though we died with Christ, we believe that we will continue to live
with him. 9 We know that since God enabled Christ to live again after he died, Christ
will never die again. Nothing will ever be able to make him die again [PRS]. 10 When
he died, he died once for people who had sinned, and he will never die again; but
in regard to his living again now, he lives in order to serve/honor God. 11 Similarly,
you must consider that it is as though you have become unable to do what your sinful
desires [MET] want, as a corpse is not able to do what anyone wants it to do. You
must also consider that because of your relationship to Christ Jesus you are living in
a new way in order to serve/honor God. 12 So, do not let the desire to sin [PRS] control
your bodies [MET] with the result that you do the sinful things that you desire to do.
Remember that your bodies will surely die, but your spirits will never die. 13 Do not let
any of your body parts do wicked things, as you did [MET] when you were spiritually
dead. Instead, present yourselves to God as people who are alive spiritually. Present
all your body parts to God, to allow him to use them to do righteous things. 14 Do not
let a desire to sin control you [PRS]. The laws that God gave Moses did not enable you
to stop sinning. But now God controls you and kindly helps you not to sin.
If someone should conclude that people can sin now because they are not obligated
to obey the Mosaic laws, I would say, “Certainly not!” Instead, let your minds compel
your bodies to act righteously.
Romans 6:15-23
15 I suppose that certain people might think about what I have just said and they might
say [RHQ], “You say that the laws God gave Moses did not enable us to stop sinning,
but that God is now treating us kindly in ways we do not deserve. ◄That seems to
mean that God permits us to continue sinning./Does that mean that God permits us to
continue sinning?► [RHQ]” My reply to that is no, we should certainly not continue
sinning 16 Slaves have to obey what their masters command [MET] them to do. ◄I
want you to remember this./Do you not know this?► [RHQ] Similarly, if you present
yourselves to someone in order to obey him, you will be the slaves [MET] of the person
you obey. Similarly, if you have yielded yourselves to do the sinful things you desire,
you are slaves of your sinful desires [PRS], and you will be eternally separated from
God. If you have yielded yourselves to obey God, you are slaves of God and you need
to live righteously. 17 You were once slaves to your sinful desires. But you began to
sincerely obey the new teaching [MET] that you were taught {that people taught you}.
I thank God for that. 18 I also thank God that you have been freed {that he has freed
you} from being controlled by a desire to sin, and that you have become as though
you were slaves [MET] to living righteously [MET]. 19 I am illustrating what I say by
talking about slavery because your human nature prevents you from understanding
spiritual truth easily. In the past you willingly did the immoral and unlawful things
that your minds compelled your bodies to do [MET], just like slaves do what their
masters compel them to do. As a result, you did even more unlawful things. Now, you
need to willingly allow your minds to compel your bodies to act righteously [MET], in
order that you will behave in a holy/pure way. 20 When you were like slaves because
your sinful desires compelled you to do sinful things [MET], you were not concerned
about behaving righteously [MET]. 21 Nevertheless, doing those things resulted in your
being separated from God, so you did not benefit at all from doing the sinful things
that you are now ashamed of. [RHQ] 22 But you have been freed {God has freed you}
from letting the desire to sin control you. You have become as though you are [MET]
the slaves of God. So now the result is that God has caused you to completely belongROMANS 6:23
1639
ROMANS 7:10
to him and, as a result, you will live eternally. 23 What people receive for sinning
is that they are eternally separated from God. That is like wages that people receive
[MET]. But what God gives us is a gift. What he gives us is that we live eternally
because of our relationship with (OR, because we are united to) Christ Jesus our Lord.
7
You know that after people die they are freed from being required to obey any law.
Similarly, God has freed us from being required to obey all the Jewish rituals and laws.
Romans 7:1-6
1 My fellow believers, you know about laws. So you certainly know (OR, I want
you to remember) that people have to obey laws [PRS] only while they are alive.
[RHQ] 2 For example, a woman is required by the law {the law requires a woman}
to obey and be faithful to her husband as long as he is alive. But if her husband dies,
she is freed from having to {no longer has to} obey the law about remaining married
to her husband. 3 Therefore, a woman will be called {people will call a woman}
an adulteress if she lives with another man while her husband is alive. But if her
husband dies, she no longer has to obey that law. Then she will not be an adulteress
if she marries another man. 4 Likewise, my fellow believers, just like people are free
from having to obey any law after they die [MET], you and I have been freed {God has
freed you and me} from having to obey all the Jewish rituals and laws [MET]. That
is because it is as though we died with Christ when he was crucified. Now you and I
belong to someone else [MET], like a woman who marries again after her husband dies
belongs to another man. Specifically, you and I belong to Christ, who has come back
to life {whom God has caused to live again after he died}, in order that we may live
righteously [IDM] to honor God. 5 When our self-directed nature controlled us, desires
that led us to sin were acting in our bodies. Those desires were increased because of
our knowing God’s laws [PRS]. As a result we did evil things [IDM] that caused us to be
separated from God. 6 But now we are freed {free} from having to obey all the Jewish
rituals— it is as though we have died. The result is that now we are not controlled by
those rituals {those rituals do not control us now}. So we serve God, not by having
to obey those rituals, which is the old way, but in the new way, as God’s Spirit helps
us to serve him.
My reply to the objection that the laws of Moses are evil because they cause us to
sin is that the laws are holy and good; what the laws do are simply to reveal that what
we are doing is sinful.
Romans 7:7-12
7 Someone might object, saying, “◄The laws that God gave Moses must be evil if our
sinful desires are increased because of our knowing those laws. [MTY]/Are not the
laws that God gave Moses evil if they stir up our sinful desires?►” [MTY, RHQ] I would
reply that they certainly are not evil, even though our sinful desires are increased. What
I would reply is that I, for example, realized that what I was doing was sinful only
because of what is written {Moses wrote} in those laws. For example, I realized that
coveting is sinful only because he wrote in those laws [PRS], “You must not covet.”
8 And because of what that commandment stated, my sinful desire to have things
that belong to others [PRS] caused me to covet in many ways. Our desire to sin is
not stimulated [MET] when there is no law that prohibits our doing sinful things.
9 Formerly, when I did not know what God’s laws required, I used to live without
worrying about what I was doing. But when I became aware that God commanded,
“You must not covet,” I suddenly realized [PRS] that I was sinning, 10 and I realized that
I was separated from God. The laws that I thought would enable me to live eternallyROMANS 7:11
1640
ROMANS 7:25
as a result of my obeying them caused me to realize that I was separated from God!
11 My desire to sin found a way [PRS] to deceive me by making me think wrongly that I
could keep on sinning and at the same time obey those laws enough so that I would live
eternally, and thus it caused me to be separated from God [PRS]. 12 So we conclude that
the laws that God gave to Moses are holy. What God commanded about not coveting,
along with all the other things that he commanded, is also holy, and it is just and good.
My reply to the objection that God’s law, being good, causes people to become
spiritually dead is no, it is our desire to commit sin that causes us to sin and become
spiritually dead.
Romans 7:13
13 So, if someone were to object saying, “The laws that God gave Moses, which
are good, ◄resulted in my being separated from God!/did they result in my being
separated from God?► [RHQ]” I would reply, “Certainly they did not do that!” But
instead, those laws, which are good, stimulated my desire to sin. I knew that the
result was that I was separated from God. And also, because I learned what God had
commanded, I knew that what I was doing was truly sinful.
The laws came from God’s Spirit, but you and I are influenced by our sinful natures.
We often do not do the things that we desire, and we do the things that we detest because
of a desire to sin that permeates us and prevents us from doing good, unless Christ frees
us from being controlled by these desires.
Romans 7:14-25
14 We know that the laws that God gave Moses came from God’s Spirit. But as for
me, I am influenced by my self-directed nature. It is as though I have been forced to
become a slave of my desire to sin [MET]. 15 The things that I do, I often [HYP] do not
understand. That is, sometimes [HYP] it is the good things that I want to do that I do
not do. And sometimes [HYP] it is the evil things that I detest that I do. 16 Since I do
the evil things that I do not want to do, I agree that the laws of God are good. 17 So,
it is not that I do evil things because I wish to do them. Instead, what happens is that
I do sinful things because the desire to sin causes me to do them. The desire to sin
◄is within/permeates► me [PRS]. 18 I know that my self-directed nature will not let
me [PRS] do anything that is good. I know this because I want to do what is good, but
I do not do what is good. 19 I do not do the good things that I want to do. Instead,
it is evil things that I do not want to do that I do. 20 Because I do evil things that I
do not want to do, it is not that I do evil things because I want to. Instead, I do them
because my self-directed nature, which permeates me [PRS], causes me to do them.
21 I find, then, that what always happens is that when I want to do what is good, there
is an evil desire present within me that [PRS] prevents me from doing good. 22 With
my new inner nature I like the laws of God very much. 23 Nevertheless, I sense that
there is a different force that is in ◄my body/me► [PRS, SYN]. It is opposed to what
with my mind I desire to do [MET], and it puts me inescapably under the control of
[MET] the sinful desires that I have [SYN]. 24 When I consider this, I feel that I am a
very wretched person. I want someone to set me free from the control of what my
body desires, in order that I might not be separated from God. [RHQ] I also think that
what I have experienced is the same as what all believers experience. 25 I thank God
that it is by Jesus Christ our Lord that we can be free from the control of what our
bodies desire. So, with our minds, you and I on the one hand want to obey God’s laws.
But also, you and I often let our sinful desires control us because of our self-directed
nature.ROMANS 8:1
1641
ROMANS 8:13
8
God will not in any way condemn those who are united to Christ Jesus, because God’s
Spirit has freed us from the inevitability of sinning and from spiritual death.
Romans 8:1-11
1 Because God has erased the record of our sins because we trust in what Christ has
done for us, now God will not condemn and punish those/us who have a relationship
with (OR, are united to) Christ Jesus. 2 God’s Spirit causes us to live in a new way [PRS]
as a result of what Christ Jesus did for us. And he has set up a way by which he frees
each of us from continually being forced to sin (OR, to obey our self-directed natures)
and from being separated from God. 3 What we could not do by trying to obey the
laws of God [PRS], because our self-directed nature was too weak to obey them, God
did. He sent his own Son into the world in order that his Son might atone for our
sin. His Son came having a body (OR, human nature) that was like the body (OR, the
human nature) of us people who sin. By sending his Son in this way, he condemned
and punished his Son, who never sinned, instead of punishing us, who sinned [MTY].
He did that by making his Son’s body a sacrifice (OR, by causing his Son’s body to
suffer/die) for all our sin. 4 So we can now fulfill all that God required in his laws. We
do this, not by our acting the way our sinful human nature desires, but instead by
living as God’s Spirit desires us to live. 5 People who live according to what their self-
directed nature desires think about and are concerned about what their self-directed
nature desires. But people who live according to what God’s Spirit desires think about
and are concerned about what God’s Spirit desires. 6 Those people who [PRS] think
about and are concerned about what their self-directed nature desires will not live
eternally (OR, will be separated from God). But those people who think about and are
concerned about what God’s Spirit desires will live eternally and have inner peace.
7 Let me explain this. To the extent that people [PRS] think about and are concerned
about what their self-directed nature desires, they are acting contrary to God. They
do not obey the laws of God. In fact, they are not even able to obey his laws. 8 The
people who let their self-directed nature control them cannot do what pleases God.
9 But we do not have to let our self-directed nature control us. Instead, we can let
God’s Spirit control us, because he lives within us. If people do not have living in them
the Spirit who comes from Christ, they do not belong to Christ. 10 But since Christ is
living in you/us by his Spirit, although your/our bodies are certain to die because you/
we sin, your/our spirits are alive because God has erased the record of your/our sins.
11 God caused Jesus to live again after he died. And because his Spirit lives in you/
us, God will also make your/our bodies, which now are sure to die, live again after
you/we die. God, who caused Christ to live again after he died, will make you/us live
again by causing his Spirit, who lives within you/us, to do it.
We are compelled to live as the Spirit directs, not as our self-directed nature directs,
because if we do the latter we will be eternally separated from God, but if we cease
doing the latter we will live eternally.
Romans 8:12-13
12 Therefore, my fellow believers, we must live as the Spirit directs us. What we do
not have to do is to live as our self-directed nature guides us. 13 If you live the way
your self-directed nature directs, you will surely not live eternally (OR, will surely be
eternally separated from God). But if by the power of God’s Spirit you quit doing the
sinful things that your bodies desire [MET], you will live eternally.ROMANS 8:14
1642
ROMANS 8:27
Because we who allow the Spirit of God to guide us are God’s children, we will also
inherit eternal blessings from God.
Romans 8:14-17
14 We who are guided by the Spirit of God {allow the Spirit of God to guide us} are
God’s children. 15 You have showed that this is true, because you received from God
a Spirit that is not one that makes you fear God again. You are not like slaves who
fear their masters [MET]. On the contrary, we have received a Spirit by whose work in
our hearts God has adopted us. The Spirit now enables us to cry out to God, “You(sg)
are my Father [DOU]!” 16 The Spirit himself confirms what our spirits say, that we
are God’s children. 17 Because we are God’s children, we also will some day receive/
inherit eternal blessings/privileges. We will receive/inherit them from God, and we
will also receive/inherit them just like Christ has inherited them. But we must suffer
for doing good as Christ did, in order to receive splendor as he did.
Since everything that God has created is eagerly awaiting the time when he will
reveal who are his true children, I consider that what we suffer now is not worth paying
attention to.
Romans 8:18-25
18 I consider that what we suffer during the present time is not worth paying
attention to, because the future splendor/glory that will be revealed {that God will
reveal} to us is so great. 19 The things that God has created are very eagerly waiting
for the time [PRS, DOU] when God will reveal who his true children are. 20 God caused
the things that he created to be unable to achieve what he had purposed. That was
not because they wanted to be unable to do that. On the contrary, God made them
that way because he wanted them to keep confidently expecting 21 that the things that
he created will be freed {that he will free the things that he created} from their sure
decay [MET]. He will free them in order that he can give them the same glory that
belongs to his children. 22 We know that until now it is as though all things that God
created have been groaning together, and they long for that glory, just like a mother
having the pains before bearing a child groans and longs for her baby’s birth [MET].
23 Not only do those things groan, but we ourselves also groan inwardly. We who
have God’s Spirit, who is like a partial gift [MET] we have received as we wait for the
future glory, groan inwardly. We groan while we wait eagerly for the time when we
will receive our full rights as God’s adopted children. That will include his freeing our
bodies from the things that hinder us on earth. He will do this by giving us new bodies.
24 Ever since we were saved {since God saved us}, we have continued to confidently
expect that future glory. If we had what we waited for, we would not need to wait for
it any longer, because those who have something, certainly do not continue to wait
for it! [RHQ] 25 But because we keep waiting expectantly to receive what we do not
yet have, we wait for it eagerly and patiently/perseveringly.
God’s Spirit helps us when our spirits feel weak; he prays for us and God understands
what his Spirit intends.
Romans 8:26-27
26 Similarly, in addition to our continuing to wait for what God will give us, God’s
Spirit helps us when our spirits feel weak. We do not know what is proper/necessary
for us to pray. But God’s Spirit knows, and he prays for us when we groan (OR, he
groans) in a way that cannot be expressed in words (OR, prays with us, groaning in
a way that cannot be expressed in words). 27 God, who examines our inner feelings,
understands what his Spirit desires. What God understands is that his Spirit prays
for us who belong to God exactly as God wants him to pray.ROMANS 8:28
1643
ROMANS 8:39
God works out all things in a way that produces good spiritual benefits for us who
love him. He does this because, having known that we would be saved and thus we
would have the character of his Son, he chose us and declared us righteous, and he will
surely give us future splendor.
Romans 8:28-30
28 And we know that to those/us who love God, he works out all things that happen
to them/us in a way that produces good spiritual benefits for us. He does these things
for those/us whom he has chosen, because that was (OR, was according to) what he
planned to do. 29 God knew previously that we would believe in him (OR, would be
saved). We are those who God also decided previously would develop a character like
his Son’s character. The result of that is that Christ is like a firstborn/highest-ranking
son, and those/we who are God’s children [MET] are like [MET] many younger brothers
of Jesus. 30 And us who God decided previously that we would become like his Son, he
also summoned. And for us whom he summoned, he also erased the record of our
sins. And for us whose record of sins he has erased, he also will surely give future
splendor.
We must conclude from these things that no one can defeat us, and absolutely no
one and nothing can separate us from Christ’s loving us and God’s loving us.
Romans 8:31-39
31 So ◄I will tell you what we must conclude from all these things that God does for
us./what shall we conclude from all these things that God does for us?► [RHQ] Because
God is acting on our behalf, ◄no one can win against us!/can anyone defeat us? (OR, it
does not matter if anyone opposes us)!► [RHQ] 32 God did not spare even his very own
Son. Instead, he turned him over to others to cruelly kill him in order that all we who
believe in him may benefit from his dying for us. Therefore, because God did that, ◄he
will also certainly give us freely everything that we need to live for him, in addition
to giving us Christ./will he not also certainly give us freely everything that we need to
live for him, in addition to giving us Christ?► [RHQ] 33 It is God himself who erases the
record of our sins. So ◄no one who accuses us before God will win against us (OR, it
does not matter if anyone tries to accuse us) whom God has chosen./is it possible that
anyone who accuses us before God will win against us (OR, does it matter if anyone
tries to accuse us) whom God has chosen?► [RHQ] 34 It is Christ Jesus himself who
pleads with God for us, so ◄no one can condemn us (OR, say that we are still guilty for
our sin)./can anyone condemn us (OR, say that we are still guilty for our sin)?► [RHQ]
Christ died for us, but he was also brought back to life {God also raised him from
the dead}, and he is now at the place of honor ruling with God [MTY]. 35 Absolutely
no one and nothing can cause Christ to stop loving us! [RHQ] That could not [RHQ]
happen because someone caused us to have trouble [DOU], or because someone did
things to harm us, or because we did not have anything to eat, or because we did
not have enough clothes, or because we lived in a dangerous situation, or because
someone killed us with a sword [MTY] (OR, murdered us). 36 Such things may happen
to us, just like it is written {as David wrote} that David said to God, “Because we are
your (sg) people, other people repeatedly attempt to kill us. They consider that we
are only people to be killed, like a butcher considers that sheep are only animals to be
slaughtered [MET].” 37 But even though all these bad things may happen to us, we win
a great victory/triumph over these things because Christ, who loves us, helps us. 38 I
am absolutely certain that neither being dead (OR, being killed), nor what happens to
us while we live, nor angels, nor demons, nor present events, nor future events, nor
powerful beings/forces, 39 nor powerful beings above the horizon or below the horizonROMANS 9:1
1644
ROMANS 9:11-12
[MTY], nor anything else that God has created can cause God to stop loving us. God
showed us that he loves us by sending Jesus Christ our Lord to die for us.
9
I tell you very sincerely that I grieve greatly about most of my fellow Israelites having
rejected Christ. I would be willing to be separated from Christ if that would help them
believe in him.
Romans 9:1-5
1 Now I would like to discuss the fact that most of my fellow Israelites have rejected
Christ. Because of my relationship with Christ, I say completely truthfully what I will
now tell you. I am not lying [DOU]! My conscience confirms what I say because the
Holy Spirit controls it. 2 I tell you that I grieve very greatly and deeply [DOU] about my
fellow Israelites. 3 I personally would be willing to let God curse me and, as a result,
be separated from Christ, if that would help my fellow Israelites, my natural kinsmen,
to believe in Christ. 4 We Jews are Israelites, God’s chosen descendants of Jacob. God
has always considered us as his children [MET]. It was to our ancestors that he used
to appear gloriously while they were in the desert. It was with them that God made
covenants several times. It was to them that God gave the laws at Sinai Mountain.
They were the ones to whom God showed how they should worship him. They were
the ones to whom God promised many things, especially that the Messiah would come
from their race. 5 It was our ancestors, Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob, whom God chose
to found our nation. And, most importantly, it was from us Israelites that the Messiah
received his human nature. Nevertheless, most of my fellow Israelites have rejected
Christ, who is the one who controls all things! He is God, the one who is worthy that
we praise him forever! This is true! (OR, Amen!)
This does not prove that God has failed to do for Abraham what he promised,
because, as Scripture illustrates, it is not all who are naturally descended from Jacob
or Abraham whom God considers to be his children, but it is those who were born as a
result of what God promised whom he considers his children.
Romans 9:6-13
6 God promised to Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob, that their descendants would all inherit
his blessings. But although most of my fellow Israelites have rejected Christ, that does
not prove that God has failed to do the things that he promised, because it is not all
who are descended from Jacob and who call themselves the people of Israel whom
God considers to be truly his people. 7 And it is also not all of Abraham’s natural
descendants that God considers to be his people. Instead, God considers only some
of them to be Abraham’s children. This agrees with what God told Abraham: “It is
Isaac, not any of your(sg) other sons, whom I will consider to be the true father of
your descendants.” 8 That means that it is not all the natural-born descendants of
Abraham whom God considers as his children. Instead, it is those who believed what
God promised whom he considers to be his children. 9 You know that what God
promised to Abraham was this: “About this time next year Sarah your wife will bear
a son as a result of my enabling [MTY] her to do so.” So Abraham knew that it was
not through Ishmael, the son that he already had, that God would fulfill what he had
promised him (OR, that his true descendants would come). 10 And not only then did God
show that he did not determine who would be his true children according to who their
ancestors were. He showed it again when Rebecca conceived twins by our ancestor
Isaac. 11-12 Before the twins, Jacob and Esau, were born, when neither one had yet
done anything good or bad, God said to Rebecca about the twins she was to bear, “The
older one shall later serve the younger one, contrary to normal custom.” God saidROMANS 9:13
1645
ROMANS 9:25
this in order that we might clearly understand that what he purposed for people was
according to what he himself determined. That is, people’s eternal destiny does not
depend on what they do. Instead, their destiny depends on God, the one who chooses
them. 13 And this teaching is ◄supported/shown to be true► by what is written in the
Scriptures {what a prophet recorded} that God said: “I favored Jacob, the younger
son. I did not favor [HYP] Esau, the older son.”
As the Scriptures indicate, God’s choosing people depends not on their wishes or
efforts. He helps whomever he wants to help, and he makes stubborn whomever he
wants to make stubborn. We cannot conclude that God is unjust in choosing the ones
he wants to choose.
Romans 9:14-18
14 Someone might say, “◄Is God unjust by choosing the ones he wants to choose?/
I think that God is unjust by choosing the ones he wants to choose!►” [RHQ] I would
reply, “He is certainly not unjust!” 15 God told Moses, “I will pity and help anyone
whom I choose [DOU]!” 16 So God chooses people, not because they want God to choose
them or because they try hard to do things so that he will accept them. Instead he
chooses people because he himself has mercy on undeserving ones. 17 Moses recorded
[PRS] that God had told Pharaoh, “This is why I gave you (sg) authority [MTY]: It was
in order that I might show by how I oppose you how exceedingly powerful I am, and in
order that people everywhere [HYP] would hear about me [MTY].” 18 So we conclude
that God kindly helps the ones he wants to act kindly towards. But he makes stubborn
the ones such as Pharaoh that he wants to make stubborn.
My reply to anyone’s objection to this doctrine is that God has a right to carry out
his purposes; he tolerated the people who caused him to be angry, in order that he might
disclose how gloriously he acts toward those on whom he intends to have mercy.
Romans 9:19-29
19 One of you may object to this by saying to me, “Because God determines ahead
of time everything that people do, that also implies that he wants us to do everything
that we do. ◄No one has resisted what God has willed!/Who has resisted what God
has willed?► [RHQ] Therefore, ◄it would not be right that God would still condemn
a person for having sinned!/why does God still condemn a person for having sinned?►
[RHQ]” 20 I would reply that since you (sg) are just a human being, ◄you do not have
any right at all to criticize God!/who are you to say that what God does is wrong?►
[RHQ] As a potter is the one who creates a clay pot, God is the one who created you.
◄A clay pot [MET] certainly would not have a right to criticize the potter by asking
[PRS], “Why did you (sg) make me this way?”/Would a clay pot have a right to criticize
the potter by asking [PRS], “Why did you (sg) make me this way?”► [RHQ] 21 Instead,
◄the potter certainly has the right to take some clay and from one lump of clay make
one pot that people will honor and make another one for ordinary purposes [MET]./
does not a potter have the right to take some clay and from one lump of clay make
one pot that people will honor and make another pot for ordinary purposes?► [MET,
RHQ] Similarly, God has the right to carry out what he purposes for people. 22 Although
God desires to show that he is angry about sin, and although he desires to make clear
that he can powerfully punish people who have sinned, he tolerated very patiently
the people [MET] who caused him to be angry and who deserved to be destroyed
(OR, who were made to be destroyed). 23 God has been patient in order that he might
make clear how very wonderfully he acts toward those [MET] whom he intended to
act mercifully towards and whom he prepared ahead of time in order that they might
live gloriously in heaven. 24 That means us whom he chose—not only us Jews but also
non-Jews. 25 These words that Hosea wrote [MTY] that God said also ◄show thatROMANS 9:26
1646
ROMANS 10:4
God has the right/support God’s right► to choose from among both Jews and non-Jews
[MTY]:
I will declare that many people who were not my people are now my people. I will
declare that many people whom I did not love [HYP] before, I love now.
26 And another prophet wrote:
What will happen is that in the places where God told them before, “You are not
my people,” in those same places people will declare truthfully that they are
children of God, who is completely powerful.
27 Isaiah also exclaimed concerning the Israelites:
Even though the Israelites are so many that no one can count them, like sand
particles on the beach beside the ocean, only a small part of them will be saved
{God will save only a small part of them}, 28 because the Lord will punish
completely and speedily the people who live on this earth, as he said that he
would do.
29 Also, we can understand from what the prophet Isaiah said that God would not
save anyone if he did not show mercy:
If the Lord, who controls everything in heaven, had not mercifully allowed some of
our descendants to survive, we would have become like the people of the cities
of Sodom and Gomorrah, who were [SIM, DOU] completely destroyed.
The non-Jews found the way by which God could declare them righteous. The Jews
did not succeed in fulfilling what the Mosaic laws require. Instead, they tried to find a
way to be declared righteous by doing things in order that God would accept them.
Romans 9:30-33
30 We must conclude this: [RHQ] Although non-Jews did not search out a way by
which God would erase the record of their sins, they actually found that way because
they trusted in what Christ did for them. 31 But although the people of Israel sought
a basis by which God would erase the record of their sins, they did not succeed in
fulfilling the true purpose of the laws that God gave to Moses. 32 The reason [RHQ] that
they did not succeed is that they did not trust that God would provide a way to save
them. Instead, they were trying to do certain things in order that God would accept
them. Because they did not expect the Messiah to die, the Israelites felt disgusted about
Jesus’ death, which is like the stone [MET] on which people stumble. 33 This is what a
prophet predicted when he wrote these words that God said about the Messiah:
Listen! I am placing in Israel [MTY] one who is like a stone [MET] on which people
will stumble. What he does will offend people [DOU]. Nevertheless, those who
believe in him will not be disappointed.
10
My deep desire and earnest prayer is that God will save the Jews, who do not
understand how to seek him correctly.
Romans 10:1-4
1 My fellow believers, what I deeply desire and what I pray to God earnestly for
is that he will save my own people, the Jews. 2 I declare truthfully about them
that although they ◄zealously seek/very much want to know► God, they do not
understand how to seek/know him correctly. 3 They did not ◄submit themselves to/
accept► the way that God erases the record of people’s sins. They did not want to
recognize that way because they wanted him to do it their own way. 4 They wanted
God to erase the record of their sins as a result of their obeying his laws. But because
of what Christ has done, it is no longer necessary for people to obey the laws God gaveROMANS 10:5
1647
ROMANS 10:15
Moses in order for the record of their sins to be erased. Now God will erase the record
of sins of everyone who trusts in what Christ has done.
The message of Scripture is that those who confess publicly that Jesus is their Lord
and who believe inwardly that God brought Jesus back to life will be saved, because God
accepts people only because of their faith, Jews and non-Jews alike.
Romans 10:5-13
5 In regard to the old way, Moses wrote concerning people who obey God’s laws, “It
is the people who have done perfectly the things that the laws require who will gain
eternal life by doing them.” 6 But those whose record of sins God has erased as a
result of their believing in Christ can say to anyone [PRS] as Moses said, “You should
not critically think inwardly, ‘◄Someone will have to go up and enter heaven!/Who
will go up and enter heaven?►’ [RHQ]” That is to say, someone will have to go up and
bring Christ down to bring the message of salvation to us! 7 “Or you should not think
inwardly, ‘◄Someone will have to go down and enter the place where the spirits of
dead persons are!/Who will go down and enter the place where the spirits of dead
persons are?►’ [RHQ]” That is to say, someone will have to go down and bring Christ
up from there to bring the message of salvation to us. You should not say that because
Christ has already come down to save us, and has already become alive after he died!
8 But instead, those who believe in Christ [PRS] can say what [RHQ] Moses also said,
“You (sg) can find out about God’s message very easily. You can speak [MTY] about
it; you can think [MTY] about it.” This is the message that we proclaim, that people
must believe in Christ. 9 This message is that if anyone of you confesses/says publicly
that Jesus is Lord, and if you (sg) believe that God ◄caused him to become alive again
after he died/raised him from the dead►, you will be saved {God will save you}. 10 If
people believe that Christ died and that God caused him to become alive again [CHI],
the result is that God will erase the record of their sins. And for those who state/declare
publicly that Jesus is their Lord, the result is that God will save them. 11 It is written
{Isaiah wrote} in the Scriptures [PRS] about the Messiah, “Whoever believes in him
will not be disappointed.” 12 God treats Jews and non-Jews similarly. Because he is
the same Lord for all people who believe in him, he abundantly blesses all who ask
him to save them. 13 This is just like what the prophet Joel wrote: “All those who ask
the Lord God to save them will be saved {The Lord God will save all those who ask
him to save them}.”
There may be those who object by saying, “If God does not send someone to preach to
the Jews, they cannot ask Christ to save them.” My reply to them is that God has already
sent people to preach about Christ to them, but most of the Jews have not accepted the
gospel. However, some Jews do believe in Christ, and many other people are indeed
hearing the message.
Romans 10:14-17
14 In regard to the people of Israel rejecting the gospel, some people might object by
saying, (OR, This raises another problem about the Jews:) “◄They certainly cannot ask
Christ to save them if they have not first believed in him!/How can they ask Christ
to help/save them if they have not first believed in him?► [RHQ] And ◄they certainly
cannot believe in him if they have not heard about him!/how can they believe in him
if they have not heard about him?► [RHQ] And ◄they certainly cannot hear about
him if someone does not preach to them about him!/how can they hear about him if
someone does not preach to them about him?► [RHQ] 15 And those who preach to
them about Christ, ◄certainly cannot preach if they are not sent by God {if God does
not send them} to preach!/how can they preach if they are not sent by God {if GodROMANS 10:16
1648
ROMANS 11:5
does not send them} to preach?► [RHQ] His sending messengers to them would be just
like it is written {like someone wrote} in the Scriptures, ‘The arrival [MTY] of those
who preach the good message is wonderful!’ ” 16 I would reply in this way to people
who say such things: God has indeed sent people to preach the message about Christ.
But not all the people of Israel have paid attention to the good message! It is like
what Isaiah said when he felt very discouraged, “Lord, it seems as if hardly anyone
believed what they heard us (exc) preach! [RHQ]” 17 So then, I tell you that people
are believing in Christ as a result of hearing the message about him, and people are
hearing the message as a result of people preaching about Christ!
In reply to a question of whether the Jews have heard or understood about Christ, I
would say that, as is supported by the Scriptures, they have heard it and should have
understood it, because even non-Jews, who were not searching for God, understood it.
Romans 10:18-21
18 But if someone were to ask, “Have not the people of Israel heard the message about
God?” I would reply that they certainly have heard it! It is like what is written in the
Psalms,
People living all over the world [PRS, MTY] have seen the stars, and what they indicate
about God’s character has reached people living in the most remote places in the
world [DOU]!
19 But someone might ask, “Is it true that the people of [MTY] Israel understood
the message about Christ?” I would reply that certainly they understood it, but they
rejected it! Remember that Moses was the first one who warned the people of Israel
about disobeying God. He told them that God said,
You consider that non-Jewish groups are not nations at all [CHI]. But some of them
will believe in me, and I will bless them. Then you will envy them. I will cause
you to be angry with those people whom you Jews think do not understand my
ways [IRO].
20 Remember also what God said very boldly to Isaiah:
Non-Jews who did not ◄try to know/seek► me will surely find me [DOU]!
I will surely reveal what I am like to those who did not ask for me!
21 But concerning the people of Israel, Isaiah tells us that God said:
For a long time I have held out my arms to people who disobeyed and rebelled against
me, in order to invite them to return to me.
11
God has certainly not rejected all Jews. I am evidence of that. Just like in the past,
there is also at the present time a small group of us Jews who have become believers.
Romans 11:1-6
1 Because of that, if anyone should ask, “Has God rejected his people the Jews?”
I would declare that he certainly has not rejected all of us! You can realize that by
remembering that I also belong to the people of Israel. I am a descendant of Abraham,
and I belong to the tribe of Benjamin, but God has not rejected me! 2 No, God has not
rejected his people, whom he chose long ago to be people whom he would bless in a
special way. Remember [RHQ] what is written [PRS] in the Scriptures about Elijah
when he mistakenly complained to God about the people of Israel, saying, 3 “Lord, they
have killed the rest of your (sg) prophets, they have destroyed your altars. I am the
only one who believes in you who remains alive, and now they are trying to kill me!”
4 God answered him like this: “You(sg) are not the only one who believes in me! I have
protected for myself not just you, but 7,000 other men who have not worshipped the
false god Baal. ◄Remember that!/Do you not remember that?► [RHQ]” 5 So, similarly,ROMANS 11:6
1649
ROMANS 11:15
there is also at this time a small group of us Jews who have become believers. God
has chosen us to become believers (OR, his people) only because he acts kindly toward
us, in ways that we do not deserve. 6 Since it is because he acts kindly toward those
whom he chooses, it is not because they have done good things that he has chosen
them. If God chose people because they did good deeds, then it would not be because
he was acting toward them in a way that they did not deserve.
The Scriptures confirm that the people of Israel as a whole did not find the way of
being declared righteous, although those whom God had chosen did find it.
Romans 11:7-10
7 Since God chose only some people of Israel, this is what I conclude: [RHQ] Most of
the people of Israel did not find the way for him to erase the record of their sins, even
though some of them were earnestly looking for it. The people of Israel whom God
had chosen found it, but the rest of them were {God} made spiritually insensitive/
unresponsive. 8 Our fellow Jews are just like the ones about whom Isaiah wrote,
God ◄caused their senses to be dull/made them unable to think clearly►. Up to this
very day, they have eyes but they cannot see spiritually [MET]. They have ears,
but they cannot understand spiritually what they hear.
9 And they remind me of what King David said, when he asked God to cause his
enemies’ senses to be dull [MET],
Make them stupid [MTY], like animals that are caught in snares!
May they feel secure because of the things that they enjoy but which will catch them
like a trap [DOU, MET], with the result that you will destroy them.
10 May their ability to perceive danger be dulled {Dull their ability to perceive
spiritually} [MET], with the result that they will not become alarmed [MET]
when there is danger.
May you cause them to carry heavy loads on their backs continually as slaves do
[MTY].
My reply to a question as to whether the result of the Jews’ unbelief is a permanent
falling away from God is, “No! God is saving many non-Jews to make many Jews envious
and seek to be saved.”
Romans 11:11-12
11 Perhaps someone will ask, “When the Jews sinned by not believing in Christ, did
it result in their separating themselves from God permanently?” Then I would reply,
No, they have certainly not separated themselves from God permanently! What is
happening is that because they sinned, God is saving non-Jews in order to cause the
Jews to envy the way he blesses non-Jews and so ask Christ to save them. 12 When the
Jews sinned (OR, rejected Christ), the result was that God abundantly blessed other
people in [MTY] the world by offering them the opportunity to believe. And when the
Jews failed spiritually, the result was that God abundantly blessed the non-Jews. Since
that is true, think how wonderful it will be when the complete number of the Jews
whom God has chosen will believe in Christ [RHQ]!
I highly esteem the work that God has called me to do as an apostle among you
non-Jews. I hope that I will make my fellow Jews jealous, and as a result, some of them
will be saved.
Romans 11:13-16
13 Now it is to you non-Jews that I am saying what follows. I am the one who is the
apostle to non-Jews, and I highly esteem this work that God appointed me to do. 14 But
I also hope that by my labors I will make my fellow Jews ◄jealous/want what you non-
Jews have►, with the result that some of them will believe and be saved. 15 God has
rejected most of my fellow Jews because they refused to believe, with the result that heROMANS 11:16
1650
ROMANS 11:24
reconciled many other people in the world [MTY] to himself. But he will accept my
fellow Jews again when they trust in Christ! And ◄this is what the result will be./do
you know what the result will be?► [RHQ] It will be as though God is making them
alive again after they have been dead! 16 Just like the whole lump of dough will belong
to God if people offer to God [MET] the bread baked from the first part of it [MET], so
the Jews will belong to God because their ancestors belonged to God. And just like the
branches of a tree will be good if the roots are good [MET], so the descendants of our
great Jewish ancestors who belonged to God will also some day belong to God.
You non-Jews who trust in Jesus must not despise the Jews whom God has rejected.
You must not become proud, but instead beware. God will not spare you if you fall away
from him, and he will certainly act kindly toward the Jews if they trust in Christ.
Romans 11:17-24
17 God has rejected many of the Jews [MET], like branches of a tree are broken off
{like people break off dead branches of a tree}. And each of you non-Jews whom God
has accepted is like [MET] a branch of a wild/uncultivated olive tree that was {that
someone} grafted among the branches (OR, onto one of the branches) that were left
on a cultivated olive tree. God has caused you to benefit from how he blessed our(exc)
first Jewish ancestors, as branches benefit from the nutritious sap from the roots of a
cultivated olive tree [MET]. 18 However, you non-Jews must not despise the Jews whom
God rejected [MET], who are like the branches that were broken off from the tree If
any of you wants to boast about having received blessings from God, remember this:
Branches do not nourish the roots. Instead the roots nourish the branches [MET].
Similarly, you are blessed by God because of what you have received from the Jews! It
is not what the Jews have received from you that blesses them [MET]! 19 If one of you
then says, “God rejected the Jews [MET] like branches [MET] that are broken {that
people broke} off a tree and rejected, in order that he might accept us non-Jews, as
branches [MET] of a tree are grafted in {as people graft in branches of a tree},” 20 I
would reply that this is true. However, it is because the Jews did not believe in Christ
that they were rejected [MET] {that God rejected [MET] them}. As for you, it is only
because you believe in Christ that God has accepted you! So do not any of you become
proud, but instead beware of what could happen to you 21 Since God did not spare the
unbelieving Jews [MET] who were like a tree’s natural branches, he will not spare any
of you if you do not keep trusting in him!
22 Note then, that God acts kindly, but he also acts severely. He has acted severely
toward the Jews who have stopped trusting in him. On the other hand, he acts kindly
toward each of you non-Jews only if you continue to appreciate his acting kindly
toward you. However, you will be rejected {he will reject you} if you do not keep
trusting in him. 23 And if the Jews believe in Christ [LIT], God also will reunite them to
himself as branches are grafted {as people graft branches} into a tree again, because
God is able to do that. 24 Each of you non-Jews who were previously separated from God
has benefited from the ways in which God blessed the Jews [MET]. That is like taking
branches that have been cut {that someone has cut} from a wild olive tree that just
grew without being planted {someone planting it} and, contrary to what people usually
do, grafting them into a cultivated olive tree. So God will much more readily receive
back the Jews because they belonged to him before [MET]! That will be like the original
branches that had been cut off being grafted {like grafting the original branches that
someone cut off,} back into the olive tree to which they originally belonged!ROMANS 11:25
1651
ROMANS 11:36
I want you to know that all the people of Israel will some day be saved, as the
Scriptures say will happen. God still loves them because of their ancestors. It is his
purpose to act mercifully towards them as well as toward all non-Jews.
Romans 11:25-33
25 My non-Jewish fellow believers, I certainly want you to understand [LIT] this
truth that God has now revealed about my fellow Jews who are refusing to believe.
You should not proudly think that God now favors you more than the Jews (OR, that
you understand God’s further plans for the Jews). Many people of Israel will continue
to be stubborn until all the non-Jews whom God has chosen have believed in Jesus.
26 And then all [HYP] the people of Israel will be saved {God will save all [HYP] the
people of Israel}. Then these words that are written {that a prophet wrote} in the
Scriptures will ◄become true/be fulfilled►:
The one who sets his people free will originate from the place where God dwells (OR,
from the Jews) [MTY]. Then he will remove the guilt of the Israelite people (OR,
descendants of Jacob) [MTY].
27 And as God says,
The contract that I will make with them is that I will forgive their sins.
28 With regard to the Jews rejecting the good message about Christ,
God treats
them as enemies, which has benefited you non-Jews. But in regard to their being
the people whom God chose, God still loves them because of what he promised their
ancestors. 29 He still loves them, because he never changed his mind about the
privileges/blessings he gave to them and about his choosing them to be his people.
30 You non-Jews once disobeyed God, but now he has acted mercifully towards you
because the Jews disobeyed him. 31 Now the Jews have disobeyed God. The result
is that by the very same way in which he acted mercifully towards you, he will act
mercifully towards them again. 32 God has declared and proved that all people, both
Jews and non-Jews [MET], disobey ◄him/his laws►. He has declared that because he
wants to act mercifully towards us all.
I marvel at how great God’s wisdom and knowledge are, and his decisions and
actions toward us!
Romans 11:33-36
33 I marvel how vast and great are the wise things that God has done and what he
has always known [DOU]! We are completely unable to understand the things that
he has decided and the ways in which he acts toward us [DOU]! 34 I remember the
Scriptures that say,
◄No one has known what the Lord thinks./Who has known what the Lord thinks?►
[RHQ] ◄Absolutely no one has given him advice about what he should do!/Who
has advised him about what he should do?► [RHQ]
35 And,
◄No one has given anything to God that he did not previously receive from God!/
Has anyone given anything to God that he did not previously receive from God?►
[RHQ] So God ◄is not obligated to/does not have to► pay back anything to anyone!
36 God is the one who created all things. He is also the one who sustains all things.
The reason that he created them was that everything he created might praise him.
May all people honor him forever! ◄May it be so!/Amen!►ROMANS 12:1
1652
ROMANS 12:16
12
I appeal to you that you present yourselves to God by making yourselves like living
sacrifices, which is the appropriate way to serve him. Do not let anything non-Christian
determine how you act, but instead let God change your way of thinking.
Romans 12:1-2
1 My fellow believers, since God has acted mercifully toward you in so many ways,
I appeal to all of you that you present yourselves [SYN] to him by making yourselves
like holy sacrifices [MET]. Make yourselves sacrifices that he is pleased with, sacrifices
that are living/alive, not ones that are dead/killed. Since God has done so much for you/
us, this is the only appropriate way to serve him. 2 Do not let anything non-Christian
determine how you should act. Instead, let God change your way of life by making
your way of thinking new, in order that you may know what he wants you to do.
That is, you will know what is good, and you will know what pleases God, and you
will know how to be all that he wants you to be.
Do not think about yourselves more highly than you should. Instead, think about
yourselves sensibly, in a way that corresponds to the abilities that God has given to you
because you trust in Christ. May we do diligently and cheerfully what God has given us
the ability to do.
Romans 12:3-8
3 Because God has kindly appointed me to be his apostle, which I did not deserve,
I say this to every one of you: Do not think about yourselves more highly than
what is right for you to think! Instead, think about yourselves in a sensible way
that corresponds to the abilities that God has given you because you trust in Christ.
4 Although a person has one body, it consists of many parts. All of the parts are
needed for the body, but they do not all function the same way. 5 Similarly we,
although we are many, are united into one group because of our relationship with
Christ, and we belong to one another. So no one should act as though he is needed by
God more than others are! 6 Instead, since each one of us can do various things that
differ according to the abilities that God has given to us, we should do them diligently
and cheerfully! Those whom God has enabled to speak messages from him should
speak what corresponds to what they believe God told them. 7 Those whom God has
enabled to serve others should do that. Those whom God has enabled to teach his
truth should do that. 8 Those whom God has enabled to encourage/exhort his people
should do that. Those who share their goods/money with others should do it sincerely/
generously. Those who lead the congregation should do it wholeheartedly. Those who
help the needy should do it cheerfully.
In the various ways in which you act toward people, love them sincerely.
Romans 12:9-18
9 Love others sincerely! Hate what is evil! Continue to eagerly do what God
considers to be good! 10 Love one another as members of the same family do; and,
you should be ◄the first ones/eager► to honor each other! 11 Do not be lazy. Instead,
be eager to serve the Lord God! 12 Rejoice because you are confidently awaiting what
God will do for you! When you suffer, be patient! Keep praying and never give up!
13 If any of God’s people lacks anything, share with them what you have! Readily
take care of travelers who need a place to stay! 14 Ask God to be kind to those who
◄persecute you/cause you to suffer► because you believe in Jesus! Ask him to be kind
to them; do not ask him to cause bad things to happen to them. 15 If someone is
joyful, you should rejoice also! If someone is sad, you should also be sad! 16 Desire
for others what you desire for yourselves (OR, Live harmoniously with each other)!ROMANS 12:17
1653
ROMANS 13:7
Do not do things because you want to be famous! Instead, be content to do tasks that
others consider that only unimportant people do (OR, to associate with unimportant
people). Do not consider yourselves wise. 17 Do not do something evil to anyone who
has done something evil to you. Act in a way that all people will recognize as good!
18 Live peacefully with other people whenever it is possible, to the extent that you
can influence the situation.
Instead of avenging yourselves, allow God to avenge you; and instead of being
overcome by something evil done to you, overcome evil deeds by doing good to those
who do evil to you, because this is what the Scriptures command.
Romans 12:19-21
19 My fellow believers whom I love, do not do something evil in return when people
do something evil to you! Instead, allow God to punish them [MTY], because it is
{someone has} written in the Scriptures that the Lord said, “ ‘It is my responsibility
to take revenge; I am the one who will punish people who do something something
evil to you [DOU],’ says the Lord.” 20 Instead of doing something evil to those who
have done something evil to you, do as the Scriptures teach: “If your (sg) enemies are
hungry, feed them! If they are thirsty, give them something to drink! By doing that,
you (sg) will cause them to feel ashamed and perhaps they will change their attitude
toward you [IDM].” 21 Do not let evil things that others have done to you overcome
you (sg) by making you do evil things to them! [PRS] Instead, overcome the evil things
that they have done by doing good deeds to them!
13
Be subject to civil authorities, because those who oppose them oppose what God has
established and will bring punishment on themselves. Do what is good and then they
will commend you. Give to all the authorities what you are obligated to give to them.
Romans 13:1-7
1 Every believer must be subject to the authorities. Remember that God is the only
one who gives officials their authority. Furthermore, those officials that exist are ones
who have been appointed by God {God has appointed}. 2 So whoever resists the
officials is resisting what God has established. Furthermore, those who resist officials
will bring on themselves from the officials the punishment that God considers fitting.
3 What rulers do is not to cause people who do good deeds to be afraid. Instead, what
they do is to cause people who do evil to be afraid. So, if any of you [RHQ] wants to
be unafraid of officials, do what is good! If you(sg) do good, they will commend you
instead of punishing you! 4 It is in order to serve God by doing their work that every
official exists, in order that they may benefit each of you. If any of you does what is
evil, you (sg) will rightfully have reason to be afraid, because the authority that they
have to punish people [MTY] is very real [LIT]! The officials exist to serve God. That
is, they act as God’s agents as they punish those who do evil. 5 So, it is necessary for
you (pl) to be subject to officials, not only because they will punish you [MTY] if you
disobey them, but also because you know that you should be subject to them 6 It is for
this reason that you also pay taxes, because the officials are ones who serve God as
they continually do their work. 7 Give to all the officials what you are supposed to
give to them! Pay taxes to those who require that you pay taxes. Pay duties on goods to
those who require that you pay those duties. Respect those who ought to be respected.
Honor those who ought to be honored.ROMANS 13:8
1654
ROMANS 14:4
Do not leave any debt unpaid. Your only continual obligation is to love one another,
because doing so fulfills all that God’s law requires.
Romans 13:8-10
8 Pay all of your debts when you are supposed to pay them. The only thing that is
like a debt that you should never stop paying is to love one another. Whoever loves
others has fulfilled all that God requires in his laws. 9 There are many things that God
commanded in his laws, such as do not commit adultery, do not murder anyone, do
not steal, and do not desire anything that belongs to someone else. But the command
by which they are all summed up {that includes them all} is this: Each of you must
love the people with whom you come in contact, just like you (sg) love yourself. 10 If
you love people with whom you come in contact [PRS], you will not do any evil to
them [LIT]. So, whoever loves others fulfills all that God’s laws require.
Because it is time for us to be fully alert and active, we must quit doing wicked deeds.
We must do those things that will help us resist that which is evil, we must live properly,
and we must be like Christ.
Romans 13:11-14
11 Do what I have just told you, especially since you know the significance of the
time in which we are living. You know that it is time for you to be fully alert and active
[MET], like people who have awakened from sleeping [MET], because the time when
Christ will finally deliver us from this world’s pain/sin and sorrow is near. That time
◄is closer than/was not so close► when we first believed in Christ. 12 Our time to live
in this world [MTY] is almost ended [MET], like a night that is nearly ended. The time
when Christ will return [MTY] is near. So we must quit doing wicked deeds [MET]
such as people do in the darkness, and we must be doing the things that will help us
resist Satan/evil [MET], as soldiers who put on their armor in the daytime get ready
to resist their enemies. 13 We must behave properly, as though the time when Christ
will return [MTY] were already here. We must not participate in drunken carousing
[HEN]. We must not commit any kind of sexual immorality [MTY, DOU]. We must not
quarrel. We must not be jealous of other people. 14 On the contrary, you/we should be
like the Lord Jesus Christ so that others will see that we belong to him, just as people
put on special clothes so that others will see what group they belong to [MET]. You/We
should stop thinking about doing the things that your/our self-directed nature desires.
14
Accept those who are not sure whether they are permitted to do certain things.
Anyone who thinks that it is all right to eat all kinds of food must not despise those
who do not think that, and those who do not think that it is all right to eat certain foods
must not condemn those who do, because God has accepted them.
Romans 14:1-4
1 Accept those who are not sure whether God will permit them to do certain things
some people think are wrong. But when you accept them, do not argue with them
about what they think/their opinions. 2 Some people believe that they may eat all
kinds of food. Others believe that God does not want them to eat certain things, so
they believe that they may not eat meat. 3 Anyone who thinks that it is all right to
eat all kinds of food must not despise those who think it is not all right to eat all
kinds of food. Anyone who thinks it is not all right to eat all kinds of food must not
◄condemn/say that God will punish► those who think that it is all right to eat all kinds
of food, because God himself has accepted those people. 4 God is the master of us all,
so ◄he is the one who will decide whether those people have done wrong!/who are you
to decide whether they have done wrong?► [RHQ] Therefore, you have no right [RHQ]ROMANS 14:5
1655
ROMANS 14:12
to condemn those who eat everything, because they are also God’s servants! And just
like it is the servants’ own master who accepts or condemns [MTY] his servants, it
is God who accepts or condemns us. And believers will be accepted by the Lord {the
Lord will accept believers} regardless of whether they eat meat or not, because he is
able to keep them trusting in him.
Each person should be fully convinced about observing special days, thinking and
deciding for himself and not for others. We should try to please God by everything we
do.
Romans 14:5-9
5 Some people regard certain days as holy and think that the other days are not holy.
Other people regard all days as equally suitable for worshipping God. Each person
should be fully convinced about such matters, thinking and deciding for himself and
not for others. 6 As for those who believe that they should worship on a certain day
of the week, it is to honor the Lord that they worship on that day. And as for those
who think that it is all right to eat all kinds of food, it is to honor the Lord that they
eat those foods, as is clear from their thanking God for the food that they eat. As for
those who abstain from eating certain kinds of food, it is to honor the Lord that they
do not eat those foods, and they also thank God for the food that they do eat. So doing
either of those things is not wrong in itself. 7 None of us should live merely to please
ourselves, and none of us should choose when or how we will die, merely to please
ourselves. 8 While we live, it is the Lord whom we belong to and should be trying
to please, and not just ourselves. And when we die, it is the Lord whom we should
be trying to please. So, while we live and also when we die, we should be trying to
please the Lord to whom we belong, not just ourselves, 9 because the very purpose for
which Christ died and became alive again is that he might be Lord whom all people
should try to please, both of those who have already died and of those who are still
living.
You should neither condemn nor despise your fellow believers who believe differently
about religious regulations than you do, because it is God who will say whether he
approves of what we have done.
Romans 14:10-12
10 ◄It is disgraceful that you who practice certain religious regulations say that God
will punish your fellow believers who do not practice those regulations!/Why do you
who practice certain religious regulations say God will punish your fellow believers
who do not practice such regulations?► [RHQ] I say this because the time will come
when all of us will stand before God in order that he will say whether or not he
approves [MTY] of what we have done. So you who do not practice such regulations,
◄should not despise your fellow believers who practice them!/why do you despise
your fellow believers who practice them?► [RHQ] 11 We know this because it is written
{a prophet/Isaiah wrote} what God has said:
Everyone will bow down before me! That is as certain as the fact that I live [IDM]!
Everyone [SYN] will acknowledge that because I am God, I have the right to
judge and punish people.
12 So it is clear that it is God who will decide whether or not he approves of what
each of us has done.
Instead of condemning each other, decide not to do anything that might lead your
fellow believer to sin by following your example and which would then cause others to
speak evil of you.
Romans 14:13-18ROMANS 14:13
1656
ROMANS 15:3
13 Since it is God who will judge everyone, we must stop saying that God should
punish some of our fellow believers! Instead, you/we should decide that you/we
will not do anything that would be an example that might cause fellow believers to
stop trusting in God [DOU]. 14 I am absolutely certain [DOU] because of my close
relationship with (OR, my belonging to) the Lord Jesus that there is nothing that by
itself is wrong to eat. But if people think it is wrong to eat something, then to them it
is wrong to eat it. So you should not encourage them to eat it. 15 If you eat food [MET]
that anyone for whom Christ died thinks that it is wrong to eat, that person might be
encouraged {you might be encouraging that person} to do something that he believes
is wrong. As a result, you might cause that fellow believer to stop trusting in God. In
that way he would be ruined spiritually just because you have stopped behaving as
one who loves others should behave! 16 Similarly, do not do something that you think
is good if, as a result, your fellow believer would sin and then others would speak evil
of you who say that you are Christians. 17 Letting God rule our lives [MET] does not
mean that we must obey regulations about eating or drinking something! Instead, it
means we must live righteously, act peacefully towards others, and be joyful by the
power of the Holy Spirit. 18 Those who serve Christ by acting in such ways please God,
and others will also respect them.
Try to do what will help fellow believers to be at peace with each other and to grow
spiritually. Do not destroy what God has done in others’ lives as a result of your eating
certain things.
Romans 14:19-23
19 So we should always eagerly try to live in a way that will cause peace among fellow
Christians, and we should try to do what will help each other to mature spiritually.
20 Do not destroy what God has done in the life of any believer just because of your
eating certain kinds of food [MET] which that person considers wrong to eat! God
permits us to eat every kind of food. But if, by your eating certain kinds of food, you
encourage another person to sin by doing what he believes is wrong, you are doing
wrong. 21 It is good neither to eat meat nor to drink wine, nor to do anything else at
any time if it will cause one of your fellow believers to stop trusting in God. 22 Let
God tell you what things are right for you to do, but do not try to force others to accept
what you believe. God is pleased with those who do what they know is right and as a
result do not feel guilty concerning what they have done, because they have done only
those things that they believe are right. 23 But some believers are not certain that
God will approve of their eating a certain kind of food. So if they eat it, they think that
God will punish them. And they truly will be punished {God truly will punish them},
because they have done things that they believe are not right. Those who do anything
without being certain that God considers it to be right are sinning.
15
We should not be irritated by the practices of those who are uncertain whether God
will condemn them for doing certain things that the Mosaic laws forbid. Instead, we
should do things that please our fellow Christians, because Christ has set us an example.
Romans 15:1-4
1 Most of us are sure that God will not punish us for doing certain things that the
laws and rituals God gave Moses said the Jews should not do. But we should be patient
with those who are uncertain about such things, and we should not let them irritate
us. We should not simply please ourselves. 2 Each of us should do the things that
please the fellow believers with whom we come in contact, and things that will benefit
them. We should do those things in order to help them mature spiritually. 3 We shouldROMANS 15:4
1657
ROMANS 15:16
please our fellow believers, since Christ has set us an example. He did not do things
to please himself. On the contrary, he tried to please God even when others insulted
him. That was as it is written {as ◄someone/the Psalmist► wrote} in Scripture that
the Messiah said to God: “When people insulted you (sg), it was as though they were
also insulting me.” 4 And you need to remember that what was written previously
{what God’s servants previously wrote} in the Scriptures, was written {they wrote}
to teach us in order that we would be patient and be encouraged by reading/believing
what they wrote. If we do that, we can confidently expect God to do for us all he has
promised.
May God enable you all to live harmoniously with each other.
Romans 15:5-6
5 God is the one who enables us to be patient and encourages us. ◄Ask/Pray to►
him that he would enable you all to live harmoniously with each other, doing as Christ
Jesus did. 6 Then, as you are united in what you think and say [MTY], you will praise
God, who is the heavenly father [MET] of our Lord Jesus Christ.
Accept each other as Christ has accepted you, remembering that what Christ has
done was both to help the Jews and to cause non-Jews to praise God.
Romans 15:7-12
7 So I say to all of you believers at Rome, accept each other. If you do that, people
will praise God as they see you behaving like Christ. Accept each other just like Christ
accepted you! 8 I want you to remember that Christ helped us Jews [MTY] by what he
did, in order to show that God ◄is faithful/does what he says he will do►. That is, his
coming as our Messiah fulfilled what God promised to our Jewish ancestors. 9 And by
acting mercifully to them, he also caused non-Jews to praise him. What he has done
for non-Jews fulfills what is written in the Scriptures that David said to God: “So I will
praise you (sg) when I am among the non-Jews, and I will sing to you [MTY].” 10 David
also wrote, “You non-Jews, rejoice with us who are God’s people.” 11 And Moses wrote
in the Scriptures, “Praise the Lord, all you non-Jews, and may everyone praise him
[DOU].” 12 And Isaiah wrote in the Scriptures, “There will be a descendant [MET] of
King David who will begin to rule the non-Jews. They will confidently expect him to
fulfill what he has promised.”
May God make you completely joyful and peaceful in order that you may confidently
expect him to do what he has promised.
Romans 15:13
13 God is the one who causes you to confidently expect him to do what he has
promised. I pray/ask that he will cause you to be completely joyful and peaceful as
you trust in him. As you do that, the Holy Spirit will enable you to more and more
confidently expect to receive what God has promised you.
I have written frankly to you in this letter because of what God has kindly
commissioned me to do among non-Jews.
Romans 15:14-16
14 My fellow believers, I myself am completely sure that you yourselves have acted
toward others in a completely good way. You have done that because you have known
completely all that God wants you to know [HYP], and because you are able to teach
each other. 15 However, I have written to you quite frankly in this letter about some
things in order to remind you about those things. I have written this letter because I
have been appointed by God {God has appointed me}, which I did not deserve, 16 in
order that I would work for Jesus Christ among non-Jews. God has appointed me to act
like a priest as I proclaim his good message in order that he will accept the non-JewsROMANS 15:17
1658
ROMANS 15:29
who believe in Christ. They will be like an offering [MET] to God as a result of their
being dedicated to him by the Holy Spirit {the Holy Spirit dedicating them to God}.
I am happy about my work for God that I have now completed in this region by
proclaiming the gospel in places where people have not heard about Christ.
Romans 15:17-21
17 It follows that, because of my relationship with (OR, because I belong to) Christ
Jesus, I am happy about my work for God. 18 I will speak boldly only [LIT] about
the work that Christ has enabled me to do. I do that work in order that non-Jews
might pay attention to the message about Christ as a result of what I have said and
done, 19 specifically, by my performing many powerful miracles [DOU]. I have done
those things as a result of God’s Spirit powerfully enabling me. As a result of doing
those things, while traveling all the way around from Jerusalem to Illyricum province,
I have completed my work of proclaiming the message about Christ in those places.
20 As I proclaim that message, I am always eagerly trying to proclaim it in places where
people have not already heard about Christ. I do that in order that as I work for God
I might not be continuing the work for him that someone else already started [MET]. I
do not want to be like a man who builds a house on someone else’s foundation. 21 On
the contrary, I teach non-Jews, so that what happens may be like what was written
{the prophet Isaiah wrote} in the Scriptures about the Messiah: “Those who did not
hear about him previously will know the truth about him. Truly, those who have not
heard about him will hear and understand his message [DOU].”
Because of this work, I have often been hindered from visiting you, but I hope to see
you as I journey through your area and I hope that you will give me what I need for
my next journey. But now I am about to go to Jerusalem to take funds to God’s people
there. So later I will visit you in Rome, and I know that Christ will bless us there.
Romans 15:22-29
22 Because I have attempted to preach the message about Christ in places where they
have not heard about him, I have been hindered {things have hindered me} many
times from being able to visit you. 23 But now there are no more places in these
regions where people have not heard about Christ. Furthermore, for several years I
have wanted to visit you. 24 So I hope to go/come to see you. I hope to do that as
soon as I am on my way to the provinces in Spain. I hope to see you as I journey
through your area, and I hope that by whatever you give me [EUP] you will help me
on my journey to Spain. But before I go there, I want to enjoy being with you for
a little while, although I would like to stay with you longer. 25 But I cannot visit you
now, because I am about to go to Jerusalem in order to take money [EUP] for God’s
people there. 26 The believers in Macedonia and Achaia provinces [MTY] decided to
contribute some money [EUP] for those of God’s people in Jerusalem who are poor.
27 They themselves decided to do this, but truly they owe something to God’s people
in Jerusalem. The non-Jewish believers benefited spiritually from Jewish believers as
a result of hearing the message about Christ from them, so the non-Jews should also
help the Jewish believers in Jerusalem by giving them material things (OR, money)
[EUP]. 28 So when I have finished this task by safely delivering all this money [MET,
EUP] that the believers in Macedonia and Achaia have given, I will leave Jerusalem and
visit you in Rome while I am on my way to Spain. 29 And I know that when I visit you,
Christ will abundantly bless us (OR, enable me to bless you).ROMANS 15:30
1659
ROMANS 16:14
I urge you to pray fervently that God will protect me from the unbelieving Jews in
Judea and that God’s people there will accept the money that I take to them, and also
that I may be refreshed by visiting you. May God be with you all.
Romans 15:30-33
30 Because we belong to our Lord Jesus Christ and because the Spirit of God causes
us to love each other, I urge you all that you help me by fervently/intensely praying
to God for me. 31 Pray that I will be protected {that God will protect me} so that the
Jews in Judea who do not believe the message about Christ will not harm me. Also
pray that God’s people in Jerusalem will accept the money [EUP] that I take to them.
32 Pray these things in order that I may go/come to you if God wants me to go/come,
and that I may go/come joyfully, and that then God will refresh my spirit as a result
of my visiting/being with you. 33 I pray that God, who causes us to have inner peace,
will be with all of you and will help you. ◄May it be so!/Amen!►
16
I am introducing and commending Phoebe to you, and I ask that you receive her as
a fellow believer and that you give her whatever she needs.
Romans 16:1-2
1 By means of this letter I am introducing and recommending to you our fellow
believer Phoebe, who will be taking this letter to you. She is a deacon in the
congregation in Cenchrea city. 2 I request that you receive her because of her
relationship with the Lord. You should do that because those who are God’s people
ought to receive their fellow believers. I am also requesting that you help her by giving
her [EUP] whatever she needs, because she has helped many people, including me.
I send my greetings to many individuals among the believers there. All the
congregations in this area also send their greetings to you.
Romans 16:3-16
3 Tell Priscilla and her husband Aquila that I ◄send greetings to/am thinking fondly
of► them. They worked with me for Christ Jesus, 4 and they were even willing to die
[IDM] in order to save my life. It is not only I who thank them for helping me, but the
people in all [HYP] the non-Jewish congregations also thank them for saving my life.
5 Also tell the congregation that meets in their house that I ◄send my greetings to/am
thinking fondly of► them. Tell my dear friend Epaenetus the same thing. He is the
first man in Asia province who believed in Christ. 6 Tell Mary, who has worked hard
for Christ in order to help you, that I ◄send my greetings to/am thinking fondly of►
her. 7 Tell the same thing to Andronicus and his wife Junia (OR, and his sister Junia)
who are my fellow Jews and who were also previously in prison with me. They are
well-known/respected (OR, respected by the) apostles, and they became Christians
before I did. 8 I also send my greetings to Ampliatus, who is a dear friend because
of his relationship with the Lord. 9 I also send my greetings to Urbanus, who works
for Christ with us, and to my dear friend Stachys. 10 I also send my greetings to
Apelles, whom Christ has approved because Apelles successfully endured trials. Tell
the believers who live in the house of Aristobulus that I send my greetings to them.
11 Also tell Herodion, who is my fellow Jew, that I send my greetings to him. Tell the
same thing to those who live in the house of Narcissus who belong to the Lord. 12 Tell
the same thing to Tryphaena and her sister Tryphosa, who work hard for the Lord. I
also send my greetings to Persis. We all love her and she has worked very hard for
the Lord. 13 Tell Rufus, who is an outstanding Christian, that I send my greetings to
him. Tell the same thing to his mother, who has treated me as though I were her son
[MET]. 14 Tell Asyncritus and Phlegon and Hermes and Patrobas and Hermas and theROMANS 16:15
1660
ROMANS 16:27
fellow believers who meet with them that I am sending my greetings to them. 15 I
also send my greetings to Philologus, to his wife Julia (OR, his sister Julia), to Nereus
and his sister, and to Olympas, and to all God’s people who meet with them. 16 Greet
one another affectionately, but in a pure way, when you gather together. The believers
in all the Christian congregations [HYP] in this area ◄send their greetings to/say they
are thinking fondly of► you.
Note those who are causing quarrels among you and those who cause people to turn
away from God. Avoid them, because they only want to satisfy their own desires and
deceive those who do not suspect their motives. If you avoid such people, God will soon
crush Satan under your feet.
Romans 16:17-20
17 My fellow believers, I exhort you that you beware of those people who are causing
divisions among you and who cause people to turn away from God [MTY] because they
teach things that are contrary to the message about Christ that you have learned (OR,
that others taught you). Keep away from such people! 18 They do not serve our Lord
Christ! On the contrary, they only want to satisfy their own desires [MTY]! Also, by all
the eloquent things that they say [DOU] they deceive those people who do not realize
that their teaching is false. 19 Believers everywhere know that you have paid attention
to the good message about Christ, with the result that I rejoice about you. But I also
want you to be wise, with the result that you do what is good. I also want you to
avoid doing what is evil. 20 If you avoid people who teach what is false, what will soon
happen [MET] will be as though God, who causes us to be peaceful, will be crushing
Satan under your feet! I pray that our Lord Jesus will continue to act kindly towards
you.
Several of those who are with me send their greetings.
Romans 16:21-23
21 Timothy, who works with me, and Lucius and Jason and Sosipater, who are my
fellow Jews, want you to know that they are ◄sending their greetings to/thinking
fondly of► you. 22 I, Tertius, one who belongs to the Lord, also want you to know that
I am ◄sending my greetings to/thinking fondly of► you. I am writing this letter as
Paul tells me what to write for him. 23-24 I, Paul, am staying in the house of Gaius, and
the whole congregation here meets in his house. He also wants you to know that he
is ◄sending his greetings to/thinking fondly of► you. Erastus, the treasurer of this
city, also wants you to know that he is ◄sending his greetings to/thinking fondly of►
you. Our fellow believer Quartus also ◄sends his greetings to you./says he is thinking
fondly of you.►*
We should forever praise the One who alone is God, who alone is truly wise.
Romans 16:25-27
25 As I proclaim the good message about Jesus Christ, I tell about God, the one who
is able to strengthen you spiritually. I also proclaim the truth that was not revealed
{which God did not reveal} in all previous ages/times 26 but which has now been
{which he has now} revealed. I, along with others, have proclaimed what the prophets
wrote about Christ. We are doing what the eternal God commanded us(exc)/me to do.
We want people in all ethnic groups to know Christ so that they can believe in him
and obey him. 27 I desire that by Jesus Christ enabling us, we will forever praise the
one who alone is God, who alone is truly wise. ◄May it be so!/Amen!►
* 16:23-24 Some Greek manuscripts add v. 24, “May the Lord Jesus Christ continue to act kindly toward you all.
Amen!/May it be so!”1 CORINTHIANS 1:1
1661
1 CORINTHIANS 1:13
This book is one of the letters that the Apostle Paul wrote
to the Christians at Corinth. We call this book
1 Corinthians
1 Corinthians 1:1-3
As your apostle, I greet you Corinthian believers, and I desire that God bless you.
Sosthenes, our fellow believer, is with me as I
write it. God appointed me to be an apostle of Christ Jesus because that is what God
desired. 2 I am sending this letter to all you who are God’s believers in Corinth city.
You have been set apart by God {God has set you apart} for himself because ◄of
your close relationship with/you belong to► Christ Jesus. God has appointed you to
be his people and to live in a morally pure way, just like he has appointed all the
people everywhere who belong to him to live in a morally pure way. You and they
have trusted in the Lord Jesus Christ [MTY]. He is their sovereign Lord as well as the
sovereign Lord of all of us (inc) who have trusted in him.
3 We (exc) desire that God, who is our heavenly Father, and Jesus Christ, who is our
sovereign Lord, will continue to act kindly toward you and cause you to experience
inner peace.
1 I, Paul, am writing this letter.
I thank God for you and for all the spiritual abilities that he has given you.
1 Corinthians 1:4-9
4 I very often [HYP] thank God for you because he has acted toward you kindly,
acting in ways that you do not deserve. He has done this because of your ◄having
a close relationship with/being united to► Christ Jesus. 5 That is, God has [HYP]
helped you spiritually very much because of your ◄having a close relationship with/
being united to► Christ. Specifically, God has very much [HYP] enabled you to speak
messages that his Spirit revealed to you, and he has very much enabled you to know
many things [HYP] that his Spirit revealed to you. 6 In that way, he confirmed to you
that what we (exc) proclaimed about Christ is true. 7 As a result, while you wait for
our Lord Jesus Christ to return, within your group you truly have [LIT] every ability
that God’s Spirit gives to believers. 8 God will also cause you to steadfastly trust Christ
to the very end of your lives [EUP]. The result will be that God will not consider you
guilty of any sin when our Lord Jesus Christ returns to earth [MTY]. 9 You can depend
on God to do that. He is the one who chose you to become intimately associated with
his Son, Jesus Christ, who is our Lord.
Stop dividing into groups in your congregations on the basis of which Christian
leader you favor.
1 Corinthians 1:10-17
10 My fellow believers, by the authority of [MTY] our Lord Jesus Christ, I urgently
appeal to all of you to agree with one another. What I mean is, stop dividing into
groups. Instead, be united [MET] concerning what you understand about spiritual
matters,, and be united in what you decide. 11 My fellow believers, I urge this because
some members of Chloe’s household have told me that you are quarreling among
yourselves. 12 That is, some of you say, “Paul is the one to whom we are loyal,” and
others say, “Peter is the one to whom we are loyal,” and still others say, “Christ is
the one to whom we are loyal.” 13 It is ridiculous that [RHQ] you are quarreling and
dividing up into groups instead of being loyal to Christ alone. Christ certainly has1 CORINTHIANS 1:14
1662
1 CORINTHIANS 1:26
not divided himself into parts and distributed those parts out to groups of people
who oppose each other! [MET, RHQ] I, Paul, certainly did not die on the cross for you!
[RHQ] When you were baptized {When someone baptized you}, you certainly did not
promise that you were submitting to me! [RHQ] 14 I thank God that Crispus and Gaius
were the only ones from among you whom I baptized. 15 As a result, no one there
in Corinth except those two can say, “Paul baptized me so that I would become ◄his
disciple/submissive to him►.” 16 Now I remember that I also baptized the household
of Stephanas, but I do not remember baptizing anyone else there. 17 Christ sent me
not primarily to baptize people but to preach the good message about him. When I
do that, he does not want me to use words that human philosophers consider wise
[IRO]. I do not want the message about what he accomplished when he was nailed to
the cross [MTY] to lose its power.
it.
The message about Christ dying on the cross is the means of saving us who believe
1 Corinthians 1:18-19
18 Those who are perishing spiritually because they do not believe that message
consider that the message about what Christ accomplished when he was nailed to the
cross [MTY] is foolish. But to us who are being saved {whom God is saving} spiritually
because we believe that message, it demonstrates that God acts powerfully in order to
save us. 19 It is like what God said that a prophet wrote long ago,
By the things that I will do, I will show that the ideas of those who think [IRO] they
are wise are completely useless. I will ignore the ideas that they think are [IRO] so
smart.
Some people think that the message about Christ is foolish, but to us whom God has
chosen, it shows God’s power.
1 Corinthians 1:20-25
20 So, do you know what God thinks about what [RHQ] people who [IRO] consider
themselves to be wise and scholars and philosophers say? He does not pay attention
to what they say, because [RHQ] he has shown clearly that what unbelievers think is
[IRO] wise is not wise at all, but is really foolish. 21 God, acting very wisely, made it
impossible for unbelievers to know God by doing what they thought was [IRO] wise.
Instead, he was happy to save those who trust in Christ as the result of their hearing
the message that was proclaimed to them, a message that others consider to be foolish.
22 The Jews want people to prove, by performing miracles, that their message is true.
The non-Jews want to hear only messages consisting of talk that they consider to be
very wise. 23 As for us, we proclaim the message about what Christ accomplished for
us when he was nailed {when they nailed him} to the cross. That message offends
Jews because they do not think that the Messiah will die, and non-Jews think it is [IRO]
a foolish message. 24 But to us whom God has chosen to belong to himself, both Jews
and non-Jews, that message shows that God acted powerfully and wisely by sending
Christ to die for us. 25 Unbelievers may think [IRO] that God was acting foolishly by
doing that, but the truth is that he was acting more wisely than unbelievers who just
think that [IRO] they are wise. And unbelievers may think that God was acting weakly
by sending his son to die, but he was acting more powerfully than unbelievers who
just think [IRO] that they act powerfully.
God chose mostly despised, not important, people to belong to Christ; so you should
boast only about him.
1 Corinthians 1:26-31
26 My fellow believers, remember what kind of people you were when God chose
you. Not many of you whom he chose are people whom unbelievers considered to be1 CORINTHIANS 1:27
1663
1 CORINTHIANS 2:9
wise. Very few of you were considered to be important. Very few of you came from
families with a high social standing. 27 Instead, it was usually those whom unbelievers
considered to be foolish whom God chose. He did that in order to shame/discredit
those whom unbelievers consider [IRO] wise. It was usually those whom unbelievers
considered [IRO] unimportant whom God chose, in order to shame/discredit those
whom unbelievers consider important. 28 It was usually those who are despised and
considered {whom unbelievers despise and consider} worthless whom God chose, in
order to make completely ineffective what unbelievers consider to be important. 29 He
did that in order that no one could boast to God about being wise or important. 30 It
is because of what God has done that you ◄have a close relationship with/belong to►
Christ Jesus. God put into effect his wise plan to save us by what Christ did for us. As a
result of what Christ did, God erases the record of our sins, sets us apart for himself,
and frees us from our being guilty for our sins. 31 So, it is the Lord whom we should
boast about, not about one spiritual leader being better than another. We should do
as ◄a prophet/Jeremiah► wrote in the Scriptures that we should do:
Those who boast should boast only about what the Lord has done.
2
God showed that my message was true by the powerful things that he did, not
because I spoke in a way that would make people think highly of me.
1 Corinthians 2:1-5
1 My fellow believers, when I came to you, I proclaimed to you the message that
God had revealed to me. But I did not proclaim it using eloquent words that would
make people think highly of me, nor did I argue in a way that unbelievers would
think was very wise. 2 I did that because I decided that I would speak only about
Jesus Christ. Specifically, I told you what he accomplished for us when he was killed
by being nailed {when they killed him by nailing him} to a cross. 3 Furthermore,
when I was with you, I felt that I was not adequate to do what Christ wanted me to
do. I was afraid that I would not be able to do it, and because of that I was trembling
very much. 4 When I taught you and preached to you, I did not speak words that
unbelievers would consider [IRO] wise in order to convince them that my message
was true. Instead, God’s Spirit showed that it was true by enabling me to powerfully
perform miracles. 5 I taught and preached that way in order that you might believe
my message, not because you heard words that people considered to be [IRO] wise,
but because you recognized God’s power.
Unbelievers do not consider that my message is wise, because I speak what God’s
Spirit reveals to me.
1 Corinthians 2:6-16
6 I do teach a message that people who are spiritually mature consider to be wise.
But I do not teach a message that unbelievers consider to be wise. I also do not teach
a message that unbelieving rulers in the world consider to be wise. What they think
about it does not matter, because some day ◄they will lose their power/not be ruling
any more►. 7 Instead, I teach about what God planned wisely long ago. It is something
that people did not know about previously because God did not reveal it previously.
But God determined before he created the world that he would greatly benefit us
by his wise plan. 8 None of those who rule this world knew that wise plan. If they
had known it, they would not have nailed our wonderful Lord to the cross. 9 But we
believers need to remember these words that a prophet wrote in the Scriptures:
Things that no one has ever seen,
things that no one ever heard,1 CORINTHIANS 2:10
1664
1 CORINTHIANS 3:5
things that no one ever thought could happen,
those are the things that God has prepared for those who love him.
10 God has caused his Spirit to reveal those things to us (inc) believers. His Spirit
can do that because he knows thoroughly the meaning of all things. He even knows
the things about God that are very difficult to understand. 11 Only a person himself
(OR, a person’s spirit) knows what he is thinking. Similarly, only God’s Spirit knows
what God is thinking. 12 It was not the ideas that unbelievers teach that we accepted.
Instead, it was the Spirit who came from God that we received, in order that we might
know the things that God has freely done for us. 13 Those are the things that I tell
you about. As I do that, I do not tell you things that someone whom others thought
was [IRO] wise taught me. Instead, I tell you truths that God’s Spirit taught me, and
I explain those spiritual truths to people whose thinking is guided by God’s Spirit
(OR, I teach spiritual truths to spiritual people). 14 Those who are unbelievers reject
the truths that God’s Spirit teaches us (inc), because they consider those truths to be
foolish. They cannot understand them, because it is God’s Spirit who enables us to
evaluate those truths correctly, and those people do not have God’s Spirit. 15 We who
have God’s Spirit can judge correctly the value of all truths that the Spirit reveals, but
unbelievers cannot evaluate us correctly. 16 As one of our prophets wrote:
No human [RHQ] has known what the Lord is thinking.
No human [RHQ] is able to instruct him.
But we believers are able to think about things [MTY] in the way that Christ thinks
about them.
3
I was unable to teach you difficult concepts, because you were controlled by your
self-directed nature, as evidenced by your quarreling about which leader you should be
loyal to.
1 Corinthians 3:1-4
1 My fellow believers, when I was with you previously, I was not able to teach you
as I would teach people who are controlled by the Holy Spirit {whom the Holy Spirit
controls}. Instead, I had to teach you as I would teach people whom their self-directed
nature controls. I taught very simple concepts to you who had recently believed in
Christ, as a parent would speak very simple words to a baby. 2 I did not teach you
things that were difficult for you to understand, just like a woman does not give her
baby solid food that the baby cannot chew and digest. And just like a woman ◄gives
her baby milk/breast-feeds her baby►, I taught you simple spiritual concepts, because
at that time you were not able to understand difficult things. And you are still not
able to understand difficult concepts, 3 because you are still controlled by your self-
directed nature. Some of you are jealous and quarreling. ◄That shows that your
self-directed nature is controlling you!/Does not that prove your self-directed nature
is controlling you?► [RHQ] It shows that you are acting like unbelievers act. 4 By some
of you saying, “I am loyal to Paul,” and others saying, “I am loyal to Apollos,” ◄you
show that you are acting like unbelievers./does not it show that you are acting like
unbelievers?► [RHQ]
I preached the gospel to you first, and Apollos followed, but we are both serving God
equally.
1 Corinthians 3:5-9a
5 So what you really ought to think about Apollos and me [RHQ] is that we(dl) are
merely men who serve God. As a result of our telling you the message about Christ,
you trusted in him. Both of us (dl) are merely doing the work that the Lord appointed1 CORINTHIANS 3:6
1665
1 CORINTHIANS 3:17
us to do. 6 I was the first one who preached God’s message to you. I was like [MET]
someone who plants seeds. Later, Apollos taught you more of God’s message. That
was like [MET] someone who waters plants after they start to grow. But it is God who
enables people to grow spiritually, just like he is the one who causes plants to grow. 7 So
the person who first preaches God’s message to people is not important, and the person
who later teaches people more of God’s message is not important, just like [MET] it
is not the person who plants the seeds or the person who waters the plants who is
important. Instead, it is God, who causes plants to grow and who causes people to
grow spiritually, who is important. 8 The person who first preaches God’s message to
people and the one who later teaches them more of God’s message [MET] both ◄are
trying to reach the same goal/have the same purpose►. And God will reward each
of them according to how they served him. 9 Remember that Apollos and I are both
working together for God. You do not belong to us. Just like a field belongs to its
owner, not to those who work in it, you belong to God, not to us who work for him.
Each one who teaches believers must examine what he is teaching them because God
will reward him only if his teaching is valuable and long-lasting.
1 Corinthians 3:9b-15
Also, a house belongs to its owner. It does not belong to the man who built it.
Similarly, God is the one to whom you belong. 10 Just like a skilled person puts a
foundation in the ground before he builds a house, as a result of God kindly helping
me [MET], I was the first one who declared the message about Christ to you. And, just
like others build a house on its foundation, there were others who later taught you
more about Christ. But just like each person who builds a house must be careful about
what materials he uses to build it [MET], each person who teaches God’s truth must
be careful about what he teaches. 11 Just like people can put in only one foundation
for a house [MET], there is only one message that we can give to people. That message
is about Jesus Christ. 12 Furthermore, people can build a house on its foundation with
materials that are valuable and do not burn easily, such as gold, silver, and expensive
jewels. Or they could build a house with materials that are not valuable and that burn
easily, such as wood, hay, and straw. 13 Later it will become clear/evident what kind
of material they used to build the house. Similarly, when people teach others God’s
truth, it will later become clear what kind of things they taught. God will make that
clear/evident at the time when he judges us [MTY]. 14 When a fire starts burning a
house, it becomes clear whether the builders used materials in their work that will
burn, or materials that will not burn. Similarly [MET], when God judges us, it will
be clear whether we taught others things that were long-lasting and valuable or not.
If the materials that are used to build a house are materials that do not burn, the
builder will receive a reward [MET]. Similarly, if we have taught others things that
are valuable and long-lasting, God will give us a reward. 15 If the things that we have
taught are not valuable and long-lasting [MET], we will not get a reward. We will be
saved {God will save us} from hell, but that is all that we will get. We will be like a
man who escapes from a fire without saving any of his possessions.
God will destroy anyone who destroys the unity of a congregation.
1 Corinthians 3:16-17
16 You need to remember that God is present among you (pl) as he was present in
the Temple in Jerusalem. [RHQ] God’s Spirit lives within you. 17 So, just like God will
destroy anyone who tries to destroy his Temple, he will destroy anyone who destroys
the unity of a congregation. He will do that because he has set you, his people, apart
for himself, just like he set his Temple apart for himself.1 CORINTHIANS 3:18
1666
1 CORINTHIANS 4:7
Stop being proud of one Christian leader or another, because we are all just working
for your benefit.
1 Corinthians 3:18-23
18 Some among you think that you are wise because unbelievers thought you were
wise previously. Stop deceiving yourselves. If you really want to be wise, by accepting
what God considers to be wise you should be willing to let unbelievers consider that
you are foolish [IRO]. 19 You should do that because things that unbelievers consider
to be [IRO] wise, God considers to be foolish. We can learn from the Scriptures what
God says about that:
Those who think that they are [IRO] wise, he messes up their plans by the mistakes
they make!
20 And we can learn from these words of Scripture,
The Lord considers as useless the thoughts of humans who think that they are [IRO]
wise.
21 So, stop boasting about how good one Christian leader is or how good another
Christian leader is. All of us(exc) exist as leaders only to help you! 22 Specifically, do
not boast about me, or about Apollos, or about Peter! Everything in the world exists
to benefit you believers. Whether you live or whether you die, the things that are
happening now or the things that will happen in the future, they are all to benefit
you. 23 You should boast about Christ, not about your leaders, because you belong to
Christ, and Christ belongs to God.
4
Stop evaluating your leaders’ value; do not be proud of one and despise another.
1 Corinthians 4:1-7
1 So, people ought to consider us apostles (OR, Apollos and me) to be merely servants
of Christ. God has given to us (exc) the work of telling others the message that God
has now revealed to us. 2 With respect to doing that, those who are given work are
required {give others some work to do require them} to do that work faithfully. 3 I
am not concerned whether you or the judges in some court decide whether I have
done my work faithfully or not. I do not even judge myself about that. 4 I do not think
that I have done anything wrong, but that does not prove that I have done nothing
wrong. The Lord is the one who judges me. 5 So, stop evaluating any of us (exc) before
the time when God judges everyone [MTY]! Do not judge us before the Lord comes. He
is the one who will reveal the sinful things that people have done secretly. He will
even reveal what people have thought. At that time God will praise each person as
each one of them deserves.
6 My fellow believers, I have told you all these things as illustrations of myself
and Apollos. I have done this for your sake, in order that you may learn to live
according to the saying, “Do not act contrary to what is {what they have} written in
the Scriptures.” If you follow that rule, you will not be proud of one spiritual leader
and despise another. 7 ◄No one has made any of you superior to others!/Why do any
of you think that you are superior to others?► [RHQ] All the abilities that you have,
you received from God. [RHQ] So if you received them all from God, ◄you should
not boast thinking, “I got these abilities from myself, not from God!”/why do you boast
thinking, “I got these abilities from myself, not from God?”► [RHQ]
It is disgusting that you are so proud of your spiritual gifts and that you despise us
apostles.
1 Corinthians 4:8-131 CORINTHIANS 4:8
1667
1 CORINTHIANS 4:21
8 It is disgusting that you act as though [IRO] you have already received everything
that you need spiritually. You act as though [IRO] you were spiritually rich (OR, you
had received all the spiritual gifts you need). You act as though [IRO] you had already
begun to rule as kings with Christ. Well, I wish that you really were ruling with
him, in order that we apostles might also rule with you! 9 But it seems as though
God has put us apostles on display, like prisoners at the end of the victor’s parade.
We (exc) are like men who have been condemned to die, who have been put in the
arena where everyone can see the wild animals killing them. And not only people,
but even angels all over the world are watching us, as people watch those who are
performing a play in a theater. 10 Many people consider us to be [IRO] fools because
we preach about Christ, but you proudly think [IRO] that you are wise because ◄of
your close relationship with/you belong to► Christ. Many people consider us [IRO] to
be unimpressive, but you proudly think that you impress others. People respect you,
but they do not respect us. 11 Up to this present time we have often been hungry.
We have often been thirsty. We have ragged clothes. Often we have been beaten
{others have beaten us}. We have traveled so much that we have no regular homes
to live in. 12 We work very hard to earn a living. When we are cursed by people
{When people curse us}, we ask God to bless them. When we are persecuted {When
people cause us to suffer}, we endure it. 13 When we are slandered by people {When
people slander us}, we reply kindly to them. Up to now, unbelievers consider us to be
worthless [MET], as though we were just garbage.
Imitate the way in which I serve Christ.
1 Corinthians 4:14-17
14 I am writing this to you, not to make you feel ashamed, but instead to warn you
as though you were my own dear children. 15 I say that because as an apostle of Christ
Jesus I was the first one who proclaimed the good message to you. As a result, I was
the one who enabled you to have eternal life. So even if there were thousands of
Christians who instruct you [MET], I am the only one who became like a father to
you. 16 So I urge you to live for Christ the way I do. 17 In order to help you do that, I
have sent/will be sending Timothy to you. I love him as though he were my son. He
serves the Lord faithfully. He will remind you of the way I conduct my life as one who
◄has a close relationship with/belongs to► the Lord. The way I conduct my life is the
same as how I teach others to live in all the congregations to whom I have spoken.
I hope you will change your thinking, so I do not have to punish you when I come
there.
1 Corinthians 4:18-21
18 Some of you have become proud, thinking that I will not come there to rebuke
your congregation about what they are doing. 19 But if the Lord wants me to come, I
will come to you soon. Then I will not pay any attention to what those proud people
say. Instead, I will find out whether they have God’s power. 20 Remember that God
judges whether or not we are letting him rule our lives, not by listening to how we talk,
but by seeing whether his power is present ◄among us/in our lives►. 21 So which do
you prefer? Do you want me to come to you and punish you because you have not
changed your ways, or shall I come to you and act lovingly and gently toward you
because you have done what I told you to do?
5
You should expel the man in your congregation who has acted so immorally.
1 Corinthians 5:1-51 CORINTHIANS 5:1
1668
1 CORINTHIANS 5:12
1 Now I want to discuss another matter. It has been {People have} reported to me,
and I believe that it is true, that some people among you have been acting in a sexually
immoral way, in a way that is so bad that not even ◄pagans/people who do not know
about God► act that way. People tell me that a man is living with his stepmother (OR,
his father’s other wife). 2 You should be sad about what that man is doing! He should
have been expelled {You should have expelled him} from your congregation! But
you have not done that, so ◄how can you be proud, thinking that you are spiritually
mature?/it is disgusting that you are proud, thinking that you are spiritually mature!►
[RHQ] 3 As for me, I have already decided how you should punish that man. And even
though I am away from you, my spirit is with you, and you should do as I would do if
I were there with you. 4 What I have decided is that when you have gathered together
with the authority [MTY] of our Lord Jesus, and my spirit is with you, and the power
of our Lord Jesus is with you, 5 you should hand that man over to Satan. Then Satan
can injure/punish his body, in order that he will turn away from his sinful behavior
and his spirit will be saved on the day when the Lord returns [MTY].
Make sure that no one in your congregation is acting immorally or maliciously or
wickedly.
1 Corinthians 5:6-8
6 It is not good that, while you are letting that immoral man continue to be in your
congregation, you are boasting about being spiritually mature. ◄You know that a
small amount of yeast affects all the bread dough [MET] into which it is put {a woman
puts it}./Do you not know that a small amount of yeast affects all the bread dough
[MET] into which it is put?► [RHQ] Similarly, one person who continues to sin will
have a bad effect on all the congregation. 7 So, just like we Jews expel the old yeast
from our houses during the Passover celebration in order that we may have a fresh
batch of dough without yeast in it [MET], you must expel such evil people from your
congregation. Do that so that you can truly be holy people, as I know that you really
are. Remember that Christ was sacrificed {sacrificed himself} so that God could spare
us from being punished for our sins, just like the Jews sacrificed lambs during the first
Passover celebration so that God would spare their firstborn sons from being killed.
8 So let us celebrate the fact that God has freed us from being punished us for our sins
[MET], just like the Jews in later years celebrated Passover to celebrate God freeing
them from being slaves in Egypt. They made sure that there was no old yeast in the
dough. They ate bread that had no yeast in it. Similarly, we should make sure that
there are no people in our congregations [MET] who act maliciously toward others or
act wickedly. Instead, make sure [MET] that all those in our congregations are ones
who act sincerely and speak truthfully.
Expel wicked people from your congregation.
1 Corinthians 5:9-13
9 In the previous letter that I wrote to you, I said that you should not associate
with sexually immoral people. 10 I did not mean that you should not associate with
unbelievers who are immoral, or who desire things that belong to others, or who
◄forcefully seize things that belong to others/are swindlers►, or who worship idols.
You would have to leave this world to avoid all people like that. 11 But now I am
stating clearly that when I wrote, I meant that you should not associate with those
who say that they are fellow believers, if they are sexually immoral or if they desire
and forcefully seize things that belong to others, or worship idols, or slander others,
or become drunk. You should not associate with people like that, and you should not
even eat with them! 12 It is certainly not [RHQ] my business to judge people who are1 CORINTHIANS 5:13
1669
1 CORINTHIANS 6:11
not believers and who do not belong to Christian congregations. But it certainly is
[RHQ] your business to judge those who are in your congregation! 13 God is the one
who will judge those who are not believers. Do as the Scriptures command: “Expel
the wicked person from your midst!”
6
It is disgusting that you prosecute fellow believers and let judges who are not
believers decide your cases.
1 Corinthians 6:1-6
1 Now another matter: When any of you believers accuses another believer about
some matter, he takes that matter to judges who are not believers, for them to decide
the case, instead of asking God’s people to decide it. ◄That is disgusting!/Why do you
do that?► [RHQ] 2 I want you to know that we who are God’s people will some day
judge those who are unbelievers. [RHQ] So, since you will be judging unbelievers,
you certainly are capable of judging between believers who disagree on small matters!
[RHQ] 3 ◄You should keep in mind that we will even judge angels!/Do you not know
that we will even judge angels?► [RHQ] So we certainly should be able to judge about
matters that relate to how we conduct our lives here on earth! 4 Therefore, when you
believers have a dispute, you should certainly not choose as judges to decide your case
people whom the congregation cannot respect because those judges are not believers!
[RHQ] 5 I am saying this to make you ashamed. Surely there is someone among you
who is wise enough to judge disputes between believers! [RHQ] 6 But instead, some
believers among you accuse other believers in a legal court. And what is worse, you
let the cases be judged by unbelievers {unbelievers judge the cases}!
God has freed you from your former sinful behavior, so remember that he will exclude
from his kingdom those who engage in all kinds of sinful behavior.
1 Corinthians 6:7-11
7 The fact that you have any lawsuits among you shows that you have completely
failed as Christians (OR, allowed Satan to defeat you). You should allow other believers
to wrong you without taking them to court!! [RHQ] You should not accuse them when
they cheat you! [RHQ] 8 But what is happening is that some of you are cheating others
and doing wrong to them. That is bad. But you are doing that to fellow believers, and
that is worse!
9 ◄You should keep in mind that wicked people will not become members of the
group over whom God will rule./Do you not know that wicked people will not become
members of the group over whom God will rule?► [RHQ] Do not be deceived {Do not
deceive yourselves} by thinking wrongly about these matters. People who are sexually
immoral, or who worship idols, or who ◄commit adultery/have sex with someone to
whom they are not married►, or who happily allow others to commit homosexual
acts with them, or who take the initiative in committing homosexual acts, 10 or who
are thieves, or who desire and forcefully seize things that belong to others, or who
are drunkards, or who slander others, or who are swindlers, will not enter the place
where God rules. 11 Some of you previously did things like that. But God has freed/
cleansed you [MET] from your sinful behavior. He has set you apart for himself. He
has erased the record of your sins because you trusted [MTY] in the Lord Jesus Christ
and because of what the Spirit of our God has done for you.
Because the Lord wants us to use our bodies in ways that please him, we must avoid
all sexually immoral acts.
1 Corinthians 6:12-201 CORINTHIANS 6:12
1670
1 CORINTHIANS 7:5
12 Some of you may say, “God allows us to do anything that he does not forbid.” But
I would reply, “That is true, but not everything that God permits us to do helps us.”
Yes, as some of you say, God permits us to do anything that he does not forbid. But as
for me, I will not let anything make me its slave; that is, I will not do anything that
will gain control over me in such a way that I will not be able to stop doing it. 13 Some
of you may also say, “Food is just for us to put in the stomach, and the stomach is just
for us to put food in. And since God will do away with food and stomachs when he
gives us our new bodies, what we do with our bodies sexually does not affect us any
more than eating food does.” But what you have concluded is wrong, because the Lord
does not want us to use our bodies to do sexually immoral things. Instead, the Lord
wants us to use our bodies in ways that please him. Also, the Lord wants us to do what
is good for our bodies. 14 God, by his power, caused the Lord Jesus to live again after
he died, and he will cause us to live again after we die, which shows that he is very
concerned about our bodies.
15 You should keep in mind that your bodies belong to Christ. [RHQ] So, should I or
any other believer [RHQ] take our body, which belongs to Christ, and join it sexually
to a prostitute? No, certainly not! 16 When a man has sexual relations [EUP] with
a prostitute, it is as though their two bodies become one body. ◄You should never
forget that!/Do you not know that?► [RHQ] What Moses wrote about people who join
together sexually is, “The two of them will become as though they are one body.”
17 But anyone who is united {who joins himself} to the Lord becomes one with him
spiritually.
18 Always ◄run away from/avoid► committing sexually immoral acts. Other sins
that people commit do not affect their bodies, but those who commit sexually immoral
acts sin against their own bodies. 19 ◄Keep in mind that your bodies are like [MET]
temples of the Holy Spirit./Do you not know that your bodies are like [MET] temples
of the Holy Spirit?► [RHQ] The Spirit, whom God gave you, lives within you. You do
not belong to yourselves. You belong to God, 20 because when his Son died for you it
was as though [MET] God paid a price for you. So honor God by how you use your
bodies!
7
Married people should not deprive their spouses of sexual relations, except under
special conditions.
1 Corinthians 7:1-7
1 Now I will reply to the things that you wrote to me about.
It is good for people not to get married. 2 But because many people are committing
sexual immorality, which God detests, every man should have his own wife with
whom he can have sexual relations, and every woman should have her own husband
with whom she can have sexual relations. 3 Every man must continue having sexual
relations [EUP] with his wife, and every woman must continue having sexual relations
with her husband. 4 A man’s wife does not have the right over her own body to be
the only one to decide about having sexual relations with her husband. Instead, her
husband also has a right to decide about that. Similarly, a woman’s husband does
not have the right over his own body to be the only one to decide about having sexual
relations with his wife. Instead, his wife also has a right to decide about that. 5 You
may refuse to have sexual relations with each other [EUP] only if you both first agree
to do that for a short time, in order that you may both have more time to pray. Then
after that, begin having sexual relations again [EUP] in order that Satan will not be1 CORINTHIANS 7:6
1671
1 CORINTHIANS 7:21
able to persuade you to have sex with someone else because you are unable to control
your sexual desires.
6 I am telling you these things to say that God allows you to get married, but he
does not say that you must get married. 7 I myself wish that all people would stay
unmarried/single, as I am. But God has enabled each person to live in ways that seem
right for them. He has enabled some people to live without getting married, and he
has enabled other people to get married.
It is all right to get married, but it is wrong to get divorced. However, you should
not force an unbelieving spouse to keep living with you.
1 Corinthians 7:8-16
8 Now I want to say this to you unmarried people and to you whose spouses have
died: It would be good for you to remain unmarried as I am. 9 But if you cannot
control your sexual desires [EUP], you should get married. It is better to be married
so that you can satisfy your sexual desires with your spouse than to constantly have a
strong desire [EUP] for sexual relations.
10 And now I will give a command for believers who are married. This is not a
command from me alone; it also comes from the Lord Jesus. You married women
must not ◄separate from/divorce► your husbands! 11 But if any of you do that, you
must remain unmarried, or else you should be reconciled with your husband and live
with him again. Similarly, men must not ◄separate from/divorce► their wives.
12 Now I say this to the rest of you, to those who became believers after they were
married. This is what I am saying, not what the Lord has commanded. If someone
has a wife who is not a believer, if she is willing to keep living with him, he must
not divorce her. 13 Similarly, if a woman has a husband who is not a believer, if he is
willing to keep living with her, she must not divorce him. 14 I say that because God has
set apart every woman’s unbelieving husband for himself because of his wife being a
believer, and God has set apart every man’s unbelieving wife for himself because of
her husband being a believer. If that were not true, God would consider their children
unacceptable. But, the fact is that God does consider them acceptable to him.
15 However, if a woman’s husband who is not a believer or a man’s wife who is not
a believer wants to leave, let him or her do so. The husband or wife who is a believer
should not force the other one to stay. God has chosen us in order that we may live
peacefully. 16 You women believers should allow your unbelieving spouses to leave you
if they want to, because there is no way that you can be sure that God will save your
husband if you stay together [RHQ] (OR, perhaps God will save your husband if you
stay together.) Similarly, you men who are believers, there is no way that you can be
sure that God will save your wives if you stay together [RHQ] (OR, perhaps God will
save your wives if you stay together.)
In general, each person should remain in the status that he had before he became a
believer.
1 Corinthians 7:17-24
17 However, each person should continue in the status that the Lord gave him, the
status that he had when the Lord called him to belong to him. That is the rule that
I tell people in all the congregations where I speak. 18 If a man had already been
circumcised [RHQ] when he became a Christian, he should not try to pretend that he
is not circumcised. If a man had not been circumcised [RHQ] before he became a
Christian, he should not become circumcised. 19 You should not try to change your
status that way, because it means nothing to God whether someone is circumcised or
not. What is important is that we obey what God has commanded. 20 Generally, each
person should remain in the status that he had when he became a Christian. 21 If1 CORINTHIANS 7:22
1672
1 CORINTHIANS 7:35
one of you was a slave when you (sg) became a Christian [RHQ], do not be concerned
about it. However, if you get an opportunity to be free, do what you need to do to
become free. 22 Do not worry about your previously being a slave, because those who
were slaves before they became Christians, the Lord has freed them from Satan’s
control. Similarly, those who were not slaves before they became Christians, it is as
though [MET] they are Christ’s slaves because they must do what he tells them to do
[MET]. 23 Christ paid a price to buy you when he died for you. So do not act as if you
are evil people’s slaves by doing the evil things that they tell you to do. 24 My fellow
believers, I repeat that in general each believer, being in fellowship with God, should
continue in the status that he had before he became a Christian.
It is not sinful to get married, but married people will have a lot of problems.
1 Corinthians 7:25-28
25 Now I will answer your question about women who have never married. There is
nothing that the Lord has commanded me to write about them, but I am writing this
to tell you what I think is best, because the Lord Jesus has mercifully enabled me to
say what is reliable. 26 There are a lot of distressing events happening now (OR, that
will soon happen), so I think that it is better for people to remain in the marital status
that they now have. 27 If any of you men are married [RHQ], do not try to divorce your
wife. If any of you are unmarried [RHQ], do not seek a wife. 28 But if any of you men
get married, you have not committed a sin by doing that. Likewise, if an unmarried
woman gets married, she has not committed a sin by doing that. However, those who
get married will have many troubles, so I am urging you to remain unmarried in order
that you may not experience such troubles.
We believers should not devote our time to the affairs of this life.
1 Corinthians 7:29-31
29 My fellow believers, this is what I mean: There is not much time left before Christ
returns. So, from now on those men who are married should devote themselves to
serving the Lord as much as they would if they were not married. 30 Those who are
sad should devote themselves to serving the Lord as much as they would if they were
not sad. Those who are rejoicing should devote themselves to serving the Lord as much
as they would if they were not joyful. 31 Those who are buying things should devote
themselves to serving the Lord as much as they would if they did not possess those
things. Because this world as it exists now will soon be gone, those who are actively
involved in the affairs of this life should not devote all their time to be involved in
those things.
It is better to remain unmarried because married people are more concerned about
pleasing their spouses than about how to please the Lord.
1 Corinthians 7:32-35
32 Another reason why I encourage you to remain unmarried is that I desire that
none of you be anxious about the everyday affairs of this life. Unmarried men are
able to be primarily concerned about serving the Lord Jesus and trying to please
him. 33 But married men are often greatly concerned about the affairs of this life.
Specifically, they are concerned about pleasing their wives. 34 So their thinking is
divided. Unmarried women are able to be concerned about serving the Lord. They
want to set apart their minds and their bodies for serving the Lord. But married
women are often concerned about the affairs of this life. Specifically, they are
concerned about how to please their husbands. 35 I am telling you this for your own
good. I am not saying it in order to restrict you. Instead, I am saying it in order that
you may do what is proper and be able to serve the Lord without being distracted
{things distracting you}.1 CORINTHIANS 7:36
1673
1 CORINTHIANS 8:6
It is better for a man to decide that his daughter should remain unmarried than that
she should get married, but either decision is all right.
1 Corinthians 7:36-38
36 Some of you men have asked about your unmarried daughters. I suggest that if
any man thinks that he may be treating his daughter unfairly by keeping her from
marrying, and if it is already past the right time for her to get married, and if he
thinks that she ought to be married, he should do what he wants to do. He should let
her get married. He will not be sinning by doing that. 37 But if a man feels absolutely
sure that it is better that his daughter not get married, and if nothing is forcing her to
get married, and if he is free to do what he decides to do on the matter, if he decides
that his daughter should not get married, he is doing what is right in keeping her from
marrying. 38 So any man who decides that his daughter should get married is doing
what is good, but if he decides that she should not get married, he is doing something
even better. (OR, (36) Some of you men have asked about the women to whom you are
engaged to marry. If any man thinks that he may be treating that woman unfairly by
not marrying her, and if it is already past the right time for her to get married, and
if he wants to marry her very much, he should do what he wants to do. He should
marry her. He will not be sinning by doing that. (37) But if a man feels absolutely
sure that it is better for him not to get married, and if nothing is forcing them to get
married, if he is free to make his own decision on the matter, if he decides not to get
married, he is doing what is right. (38) So any man who decides that he should get
married to the woman he is engaged to is doing what is good, but if he decides that
he should not get married, he is doing something even better.)
Women whose husbands have died are free to get remarried, but only to believers.
However, they will probably be happier if they do not marry again.
1 Corinthians 7:39-40
39 Women must remain married to their husbands while their husbands are still
alive. But if a woman’s husband dies, she is free to marry any unmarried man whom
she wants to marry, but he must belong to the Lord. 40 However, I think that she
will be happier if she does not marry again. And I believe that the Spirit of God is
directing me as I say that.
8
We should not be proud about knowing the truth about idols.
1 Corinthians 8:1-3
1 Now I will answer what you asked about us believers eating meat that has been
sacrificed to idols. We know what some of you say, that God has enabled all of us to
know the truth about things such as idols. But often we become proud because we say
that we know all those things. But instead of being proud about what we know, we
should show that we love our fellow believers by helping them to become spiritually
mature. 2 Those who think that they thoroughly know something do not yet know it
as they should. 3 But as for those who love God, they know that they belong to him.
There are many idols that people think are gods, but there is only one true God.
1 Corinthians 8:4-6
4 So I will tell you about eating meat that people have sacrificed to idols. We know
that it is true, as you say, that idols are not really alive. We also know that there
is only one real God. 5 It is true that there are gods whom people think live in the
heavens or whom they think live on earth. Truly, there are many beings that people
call gods, and whom they call lords. 6 But for us believers there is only one real God.
He is our heavenly Father who created everything. He is the one whom we worship1 CORINTHIANS 8:7
1674
1 CORINTHIANS 9:5
and serve. Also, for us believers Jesus Christ is the one and only Lord. He is the one
whom God caused to create everything. It is because of what he has done for us on
the cross that we have spiritual life.
Do not eat meat offered to idols if that would encourage other believers to eat that
food contrary to their conscience.
1 Corinthians 8:7-13
7 Nevertheless, some people do not understand that idols are not really alive. In
the past, some among you who are believers now were accustomed to believing that
idols were really alive. As a result, when they eat such meat now, they still think that
it was sacrificed to an idol that is alive. They are not sure that God allows believers
to eat meat that has been offered to idols. So, when they eat such meat, they think
that they have sinned. 8 But God will not think more highly about us if we eat certain
foods, or if we do not eat certain foods. That is, we are not more acceptable to God
if we do not eat certain foods, nor are we more acceptable to him if we eat those
foods. 9 However, be sure that you do not do anything that God allows you to do, if
by doing that you would encourage any of your fellow believers to do something that
they are not sure God allows them to do. As a result, you would be causing them to
sin. 10 For example, you know that idols are not really alive. Suppose that in a temple
where they worship idols you eat food that has been sacrificed to idols. Suppose that
someone who is not sure whether God allows us to eat that food sees you eating it.
You would be encouraging him to eat it, too. [RHQ] 11 As a result, you who know
that idols are not really alive, might cause that fellow believer, one for whom Christ
died, ◄to be ruined spiritually/to stop believing in Christ►. 12 By sinning against your
fellow believer by causing him to do something that he thinks God does not allow
us to do, it is as though you are sinning against Christ himself! 13 So if I, Paul, think
that by eating a certain food I might cause a fellow believer to be ruined spiritually,
I will never eat such food again. I do not want to cause any fellow believer ◄to be
ruined spiritually/to stop believing in Christ►. And you should ◄do as I do/imitate my
example►.
9
As your apostle I am free to do anything that God allows me to do.
1 Corinthians 9:1-2
1 I am certainly free to do all the things that God allows me to do. [RHQ] I am an
apostle. [RHQ] You certainly know that I have seen Jesus our Lord. [RHQ] It is a result
of my work that you have believed in the Lord Jesus. [RHQ] 2 And even though other
people may think that I am not an apostle, you certainly should know that I am an
apostle. Remember that your having become Christians [MET] as a result of my telling
you about the Lord ◄confirms/shows that it is true► that I am an apostle.
Barnabas and I have the same right to receive financial support that the other
apostles have.
1 Corinthians 9:3-7
3 In order to defend myself, this is what I say to those who criticize me by claiming
that I do not act like an apostle. 4 As for Barnabas and me, we certainly have the
right as apostles to receive from you and other congregations food and drink for our
work. [RHQ] 5 We have the same right that the other apostles and the Lord Jesus’
younger brothers and especially Peter have. They all take along a wife who is a
believer when they travel various places in order to tell people about Christ. And they
have a right that the people whom they work among will support their wives, too. So1 CORINTHIANS 9:6
1675
1 CORINTHIANS 9:18
Barnabas and I certainly have those same rights. [RHQ] 6 It would be ridiculous to
think that Barnabas and I are the only apostles who must work to earn money to
pay our expenses while we are doing God’s work! [RHQ] 7 Soldiers certainly do not
pay their own wages. [RHQ] Those who plant a vineyard would certainly eat some of
the grapes when they become ripe. [RHQ] Those who care for sheep would certainly
drink the milk from those sheep. [RHQ] Similarly, those who tell others about Christ
certainly have a right to receive ◄financial help/food► from the people to whom they
preach.
God’s servants have always had the right to receive financial help from others, but
we have not insisted on that right because we want to preach the gospel without charge.
1 Corinthians 9:8-18
8 I am saying that, not only because people think that it is right. [RHQ] No, I am
[RHQ] saying it because it is what God said in the laws that he gave to Moses. 9 Moses
wrote in one of those laws, “While an ox is threshing grain, you must not tie its mouth
shut so that it cannot eat the grain.” ◄God was not only concerned about oxen when
he gave that law./Was God only concerned about oxen when he gave that law?► [RHQ]
10 No, he was [RHQ] concerned about us, also! Yes, God caused Moses to write those
words because he is concerned about us! Those who plow the ground confidently
expect to eat some of the crop that grows. Those who thresh grain confidently expect
to eat some of the grain that they thresh. Similarly, we who proclaim the message about
Christ have the right to confidently expect to receive financial help for our work. 11 And
because we have proclaimed God’s message to you, we certainly have the right to
receive from you the things that we need for our bodies [MET]! [MET, RHQ] 12 Since
other people who preached to you had that right, certainly Barnabas and I have the
same right. [RHQ]
However, neither of us insisted that you give us the things that we have a right to
receive from you. Instead, we were willing to endure anything in order that we not
hinder anyone from believing the message about Christ. 13 You should keep in mind
that the priests and servants in the Temple eat some of the food that people bring to
the Temple. [RHQ] Specifically, the priests who work at the altar eat some of the food
that the people bring to sacrifice on the altar. 14 So the Lord has commanded that those
who proclaim the good message about him should receive from those who hear that
message what they need to live on.
15 However, I have not requested that you give me those things that I have a right
to receive from you. Furthermore, I am writing this to you, not in order to request
you to begin giving me financial help now. I would rather die than to receive help
from you. I do not want anyone to prevent me from boasting about my proclaiming
God’s message to you without receiving financial help from you. 16 When I proclaim the
message about Christ, I cannot boast about doing it, because Christ has commanded
me to do it. I would be very miserable (OR, I am afraid that God would punish me)
if I did not proclaim that message. 17 If I had decided by myself to proclaim it, God
would reward me. But I did not decide by myself to do that. I am simply doing the
work that God entrusted to me. 18 So perhaps you wonder what my reward is. [RHQ]
I will tell you. When I proclaim the good message about Christ, I do not ask people
for financial help. It makes me very happy not to ask for help, and being happy is the
reward I get. I do not want to use the rights that I have when I proclaim the gospel.
I have adopted the code of conduct of whatever group I have been among, in order
to bring more people to Christ.
1 Corinthians 9:19-271 CORINTHIANS 9:19
1676
1 CORINTHIANS 10:5
19 I am not obligated to do what anyone else thinks that I should do. Nevertheless,
when I have been with any group of people, I have made myself do what they believed
that I should do, just like a slave does what his master wants him to do. I have done
that in order that I might convince more people to trust in Christ. 20 Specifically, when
I was with fellow Jews, I did the things that Jews think that people should do. I did
that in order that I might convince some of them to trust in Christ. Although I am
now not obligated to obey the Jewish laws and rituals, when I was with those who
believe that they are obligated to obey those laws, I did the things that they think
that people should do. I did that in order to convince some of them to trust in Christ.
21 When I was with ◄non-Jews/those who do not know those laws►, I did the things
that non-Jews think that people should do, in order that I might convince some of
them to trust in Christ. I do not mean that I disobey God’s laws. No, I obey the things
that Christ commanded us to do. 22 When I was with those who doubt whether God
will permit them to do certain things that others ◄disapprove of/think it is not right
to do►, I avoided doing those things, in order that I might convince some of them to
trust in Christ. In summary, I have done all the things that the people I have been with
think that others should do, in order that by every possible means I might convince
some of them to trust in Christ. 23 I do all these things in order that more people will
believe the message about Christ, and in order that I, along with other believers, may
receive the good things that God promises to give us.
24 When people run in a race, they all run, but only one of them wins the race and
as a result gets a prize. You certainly know that [RHQ]. So, just like runners exert
themselves fully to win a race [MET], you should exert yourselves fully to do the things
that God wants you to do, in order that you may receive the reward that God wants
to give you. 25 All athletes exercise their bodies strenuously in many ways. They do
that in order to receive a wreath as a reward to wear on their heads. Those wreaths
fade, but we will receive a reward that will last forever [LIT]. 26 For that reason, I try
hard to please God [MET], like a runner who runs toward the goal [LIT]. I try hard
to accomplish what God wants me to accomplish, like a boxer tries hard to hit his
opponent, not to miss hitting him. 27 I beat my body to make it do what I want it to
do [MET], as slaves obey their masters, in order that, after I have proclaimed God’s
message to others, he will not say that I do not deserve to receive a reward.
10
Our Jewish ancestors all experienced God’s power, but almost all of them died in the
desert because they sinned against him.
1 Corinthians 10:1-5
1 My fellow believers, I want to remind you about our(exc) Jewish ancestors. They
were all under the cloud by which God miraculously led them and protected them
when they left Egypt with Moses. All those ancestors crossed the Red Sea after God
miraculously made the water separate so that they could walk through it. 2 God caused
all of them to begin to live under the authority of [MTY] Moses when they walked under
that cloud and walked through the Red Sea. 3 All those ancestors of ours ate the same
food that God miraculously provided. 4 They all drank water that God miraculously
provided. That is, they all drank water that God miraculously made come out of the
rock. That rock was a symbol of [MET] Christ, who went with them. So we conclude
that God helped all of those people in many ways. 5 However, we also conclude that
God was angry [LIT] with most of those people because they sinned against him. He
caused almost all of them to die, and as a result their bodies were scattered in the
desert.1 CORINTHIANS 10:6
1677
1 CORINTHIANS 10:21
What happened to our Jewish ancestors was a warning of what will happen to us if
we give in to temptation.
1 Corinthians 10:6-13
6 Those things that happened long ago became examples to teach us the following
things: We should not desire to do evil things as those people desired to do. 7 We
should not worship idols as many of those people did. Remember that Moses wrote,
“The people sat down. They ate and drank to honor the golden calf that they had just
made. Then they got up to dance immorally.” 8 We should not have sexual relations
with someone to whom we are not married, as many of them did. As a result, God
punished them by causing 23,000 people to die in only one day. 9 We should not try to
see how much we can sin without the Lord punishing us. Some of them did that, and
as a result they died because poisonous snakes bit them. 10 We should not complain
about what God does. Some of them did that, and as a result an angel destroyed them.
So God will certainly punish us if we sin like they did.
11 All those things that happened to our ancestors long ago are examples for us.
Moses wrote those things to warn us who are living at this time which is near the end.
We are the people for whom God has done the things that he decided to do in the
previous periods of time. 12 So I say this to all those who confidently think that they
will always steadfastly continue to believe what God said and will never disobey what
he commanded: Be careful that you (sg) do not sin when you are tempted. 13 Remember
that your desires to sin are the same desires that other people have. But when you are
tempted to sin, you can trust God to help you. He will not permit you to be tempted
{anything to tempt you} more than you are able to resist. Instead, when you are
tempted {things tempt you}, he will also provide a way for you to endure it without
sinning.
God will punish us if we participate in demon worship by eating food sacrificed to
demons when we eat the Lord’s Supper.
1 Corinthians 10:14-22
14 So, I say to you people whom I love, avoid worshipping idols just like you would
run away from anything that is dangerous. 15 It is to people who think that they are
wise that I write. So, you, as wise people, judge whether what I am writing is true.
16 During the Lord’s Supper, after we ask God to bless ◄the wine/the juice► in the cup,
we give thanks for it and drink it. By doing that, we certainly are [RHQ] sharing in
what Christ did for us when his blood flowed from his body when he died. During the
Lord’s Supper, when we break the bread and eat it, we are certainly sharing in [MTY]
what Christ did for us when his body suffered for us on the cross. [RHQ] 17 Because it
is one loaf of bread that we break and eat during the Lord’s Supper, it symbolizes that
we who are many are one group, because we all eat from the one loaf.
18 Consider what happens when the Israeli people eat the food that the priests
sacrifice on the altar outside the Temple. They participate in what the priests do
at [MTY] the altar. [RHQ] Similarly, if you eat food that non-believers have offered
to an idol in a temple, you are participating in their worship of the idol there. 19 By
saying that, I do not mean that offering food to an idol makes it anything more than
just ordinary food [RHQ]. I do not mean that an idol is anything more than just an
idol. 20 No! Instead, I mean that what people sacrifice to idols, they are sacrificing
to demons, not to God. So, if you eat food that has been sacrificed to idols, you are
participating in worshipping the demons that the idols represent. And I do not want
you to participate in worshipping demons! 21 When you drink the grape juice/wine in
[MTY] the cup at the Lord’s Supper, you cannot participate in the blessings that the
Lord Jesus brought to us and at the same time drink the wine in the [MTY] cup that1 CORINTHIANS 10:22
1678
1 CORINTHIANS 11:4
people offer to demons! When you eat at the Lord’s table, you cannot participate
in the blessings the Lord provided [MTY] when he died for us and at the same time
participate in the things that represent demons by eating food that has been sacrificed
to idols 22 If you participate in honoring demons in that way, you will certainly make
the Lord very angry [RHQ]! ◄Remember that you are certainly not stronger than he
is./Do you think that you are stronger than he is?► [RHQ] Certainly not, so you will
not escape his punishing you if you honor demons in that way!
It is all right to eat food offered to idols, but we should not do so if it would offend
those who think that it is wrong.
1 Corinthians 10:23—11:1
23 Some people say, “God permits believers to do anything.” But I say that not
everything that people do benefits those who do it! Yes, some people say, “God permits
believers to do all things.” But not everything that people do helps them to become
spiritually mature. 24 No one should try to benefit only himself. Instead, each person
should try to benefit other people spiritually. 25 This is what you should do: Eat any
food that is sold {that people sell} in the market. Do not ask questions to find out if
that food has been offered {someone offered that food} to idols, just because you think
it would be wrong to eat such food. 26 Remember that the Psalmist wrote, “Everything
on the earth belongs to the Lord God because he created it!” So, food that has been
offered to idols belongs to the Lord, not to the idols, and you may eat it. 27 If a non-
believer invites you to a meal, go if you want to, and eat any food that is set {that he
sets} before you. Do not ask whether it was offered to idols, just because you think
that it would be wrong to eat such food. 28 But if someone says to you, “This is food
that was sacrificed to an idol,” do not eat it, for the sake of the person who told that
to you, and also because someone there may think that it is wrong to eat such food.
29 I do not mean that you should be concerned about whether it is all right to eat such
food. What I mean is that you should be concerned about others who may think that
it is wrong to eat such food. Since I know that I ◄am free/have the right► to eat
such food without God punishing me, no one should [RHQ] say that what I am doing
is wrong just because he himself thinks that it is wrong. 30 If I thank God for the food
when I eat food that has been offered to an idol, no one should criticize me for eating
food for which I have thanked God [RHQ]!
31 So I say to you in conclusion, when you eat food, or drink something, or do
anything else, do everything in order that people will praise God. 32 Do not do anything
that would hinder Jews or Greeks from becoming believers, and do not do things that
would encourage members of God’s congregations to sin. 33 Do as I do. I try to please
everyone in every way. I do this by not seeking to benefit myself. Instead, I try to
benefit many others, in order that they may be saved {that God may save them} from
the guilt of their sins.
11
1 Follow my example, just like I try to follow Christ’s example.
Women should wear a hair covering while praying or prophesying in a service, but
men should not do so.
1 Corinthians 11:2-16
2 I praise you because you remember all the things that I taught you and because
you follow the instructions that I gave you. You have done just like I told you to do.
3 Now, I want you to know that the one who has authority over [MTY] every man is
Christ, and the ones who have authority over women are men (OR, their husbands),
and the one who has authority over Christ is God. 4 So if any man wears a covering1 CORINTHIANS 11:5
1679
1 CORINTHIANS 11:22
over his head when he prays or speaks a message God gave him, he disgraces himself
[SYN]. 5 Also, if any woman does not wear a covering over her head when she prays
or speaks a message that God gave her, she disgraces herself (OR, she dishonors her
husband). That would be acting like [SIM] women who are ashamed because their
heads have been shaved. 6 So, if women do not wear coverings over their heads
when they pray or speak messages that God gave them, they should let someone shave
their heads so that they will be ashamed. But since women are ashamed if someone
cuts their hair short or shaves off their hair, they should wear coverings over their
heads when they pray or speak messages that God gave them. 7 Men should not wear
coverings over their heads when they pray or speak messages that God gave them,
because they represent what God is like [MET] and they show how great God is. But
women show how great men (OR, their husbands) are. 8 Remember that God intends
that men have authority over women. We know that because God did not make the
first man, Adam, from the first woman, Eve. Instead, he made that woman from a
bone that he took from the man. 9 Also, God did not create the first man to help the
woman. Instead, he created the woman to help the man. 10 For that reason, women
should wear something to cover their heads as a symbol of their being under their
husbands’ [MTY] authority. They should also cover their heads so that the angels will
see that and rejoice.
11-12 However, remember that even though God created the first woman from the
first man, all other men have been born from women. So men cannot be independent
of women, nor can women be independent of men. But all things, including men and
women, come from God. 13 Consider this for yourselves: Is it proper for [RHQ] women
to pray to God while they do not have coverings over their heads? 14 ◄Everyone
senses that it is disgraceful for men to have long hair./Doesn’t everyone sense that it
is disgraceful for men to have long hair?► [RHQ] 15 But it is very delightful if women
have long hair, because God gave them long hair to be like a beautiful covering for
their heads. 16 But whoever wants to argue with me about my saying that women
should have a covering over their heads when they pray or speak a message from God
should consider the fact that we apostles do not permit any other custom, and the
other congregations of God do not have any other custom.
When you gather to eat the Lord’s Supper, you act selfishly. I cannot praise you for
that.
1 Corinthians 11:17-22
17 Now I want to tell you about some other things. I do not praise you about them,
because whenever you believers meet together, good things do not happen. Instead,
bad things happen. 18 First of all, people have told me that when you gather together
as a group to worship God, you divide into groups that are hostile to each other. To
some extent I believe that is true. 19 It seems that you must divide into groups that
despise each other in order that it might be clear/evident which people among you
God approves of! 20 When you gather together, you [IRO] eat the meal that you say
is to remember the death of the Lord Jesus for us. 21 But what happens when you eat
is that each person eats his own meal before he thinks about sharing his food with
anyone else. As a result, when the meal is over, some people are still hungry and
others are drunk! So it is not a meal that honors the Lord. 22 ◄You act as though you
do not have your own houses in which you can eat and drink whatever you want to!/
Do you not have your own houses in which you can eat and drink whatever you want
to?► [RHQ] Do you not realize [RHQ] that by acting selfishly in this way, it is God’s
people whom you are despising, and it is the poor people in your group whom you
are treating as though they were not important? What shall I say to you about that1 CORINTHIANS 11:23
1680
1 CORINTHIANS 12:3
[RHQ]? Do you expect me to praise you about what you do [RHQ]? I certainly will not
praise you!
The Lord gave us instructions about the significance of the Lord’s Supper.
1 Corinthians 11:23-26
23 The Lord taught me these things that I also taught you: During the night that
Jesus was betrayed {Judas enabled the enemies of the Lord Jesus to seize him}, he
took some bread. 24 After he thanked God for it, he broke it into pieces. Then he gave
it to his disciples and said, “This bread represents [MET] (OR, is) my body, that I am
about to sacrifice for you. Eat bread in this way again and again to remember my
offering myself as a sacrifice for you.” 25 Similarly, after they ate their meal, he took a
cup [MTY] of wine. He thanked God for it. Then he gave it to his disciples, saying, “The
wine in [MTY] this cup represents [MET] (OR, is) my blood that will flow from my body
◄to put into effect/to establish► the new agreement that God is making with people.
Whenever you drink wine in this way, do it to remember that my blood flowed for
you.” 26 Remember that until the Lord Jesus returns to the earth, whenever you eat
the bread that represents his body and drink the wine [MTY] that represents his blood,
you are telling other people that he died for you.
God punishes those who eat the Lord’s Supper in a way that does not express the
unity of his people.
1 Corinthians 11:27-34
27 So, those who eat that bread and drink that wine [MTY] in a way that is not
proper for those who belong to the Lord are guilty of acting in a way that is contrary
to what our Lord intended when he offered his body as a sacrifice and his blood flowed
when he died. 28 Before any believer eats that bread and drinks that wine [MTY], he
should think carefully about what he is doing, 29 because if anyone eats the bread
that represents Christ’s body and drinks the wine that represents his blood without
recognizing that all God’s people should be united, God will punish him for doing that.
30 Many people in your group are weak and sick, and several have died [EUP] because
of the way they acted when they ate that bread and drank that wine. 31 If we would
think carefully about what we are doing, God would not judge and punish us like that.
32 But when the Lord judges and punishes us for acting wrongly, he disciplines us to
correct us, in order that he will not need to punish us when he punishes the people
who do not trust in Christ [MTY].
33 So, my fellow believers, when you gather together to eat food to remember the
Lord’s dying for you, wait until everyone has arrived so that you can find out who does
not have enough food. 34 Those who are so hungry that they cannot wait to eat until
everyone else has arrived should eat in their own homes first, in order that when you
gather together God will not judge and punish them for ◄being inconsiderate of/not
being concerned about► others.
And when I come to Corinth I will give you instructions about other matters
concerning the Lord’s Supper.
12
It is only God’s Spirit who enables people to say that Jesus is Lord.
1 Corinthians 12:1-3
1 Now, my fellow believers, I will answer your questions about the things God’s
Spirit enables believers to do. I want you to know clearly [LIT] about these things.
2 You know that before you became Christians, various things led you to worship
idols, which are unable to tell you any of God’s message. 3 So the first thing that I will1 CORINTHIANS 12:4
1681
1 CORINTHIANS 12:25
tell you now is that it is not the Spirit of God who would cause anyone to say, “Jesus
deserved to die,” and that the Holy Spirit is the only one who can enable anyone to
say, “Jesus is truly the Lord.”
God’s Spirit gives believers special abilities as he desires.
1 Corinthians 12:4-11
4 There are various things that God’s Spirit enables various believers to do, but it is
that same Spirit who enables us to do them. 5 There are many different ways to serve
the Lord, but it is the same Lord whom we all are serving. 6 We believers have the
power to do various tasks, but it is the same God who gives all of us the power to do
these things.
7 God’s Spirit gives his power to each believer in order to benefit all the other
believers. 8 To some, the Spirit gives the ability to speak very wise messages. To
others, the same Spirit gives the ability to know things that he reveals to them. 9 To
others, the same Spirit gives the ability to believe that God will work miracles. To
others, the Spirit gives the ability to heal sick people. 10 To others, he gives the power
to perform miracles. To others, he gives the ability to speak messages that come
directly from God. To others, he gives the ability to tell if a message is really from God
or not. To others he gives the ability to speak messages in languages [MTY] that they
have not learned. To others, he gives the ability to tell the meaning of those messages
[MTY]. 11 It is the same Spirit who gives all these abilities. He gives whatever abilities
he wants to give, to whatever person he wants to give them.
A congregation needs all the abilities that God’s Spirit gives to its members, but you
should especially desire the ones that help others the most.
1 Corinthians 12:12-31
12 Although a person’s body has many parts, all the parts form just one body [DOU].
It is like that with those who belong to Christ. 13 When we were baptized {When people
baptized us}, the one Holy Spirit caused us to become one group of believers. It does
not matter whether we are Jews or non-Jews. It does not matter whether we are
slaves or not slaves. When we believed in Christ, the one Spirit came to live [MET]
within all of us.
14 Our bodies do not have only one part. They have many parts with various
functions. 15 If our foot could talk and say to us, “Because I am not your hand, I
am not a part of your body,” it would still be a part of our body. 16 If our ear could
talk and say, “Because I am not your eye, I am not a part of your body,” it would still
be a part of our body. 17 If our body were only an eye, ◄we would not be able to
hear./how could we hear?► [RHQ] If our body were only an ear, ◄we would not be
able to smell anything!/how could we smell anything?► [RHQ] 18 But the truth is that
God has put all the parts of our bodies together exactly as he wanted to put them.
19 If our body had only one part, it would not be a body. [RHQ] 20 But the truth is that
there are many parts in our body, but it is still only one body. 21 That is why if our
eye could talk, it should never say to our hand, “I do not need you!” And if our head
could talk, it should not say to our feet, “I do not need you!” 22 Instead, the parts of
our body that seem to be weaker are the ones that are absolutely necessary. 23 And
the parts that we do not think highly of are the parts that we clothe carefully. And
we protect carefully those parts that we do not show to people. 24 The parts that are
all right to show people, we do not need to protect. Instead, God, who has put all the
parts of our bodies together, causes us to care for in a special way the parts that we
think are less important. 25 He does that in order that all the parts of our body will
work together harmoniously [LIT], and so that all the parts will care for all the other1 CORINTHIANS 12:26
1682
1 CORINTHIANS 13:8
parts equally. 26 If one part of our body hurts, it is as though all the parts of our body
are hurting. If we pay special attention to one part of our body, it is as though all the
parts of our body feel pleasure [MET].
27 Everything I have just said about how the parts of our bodies relate to each other
applies to how all of you who belong to Christ should relate to each other. Each of you
belongs to him, but you have not all been given the same abilities and work. 28 God has
placed apostles in our congregations. Apostles are first in rank. Next in rank are those
who speak messages which come directly from God. Next in rank are those who teach
spiritual truth. Then there are those who have the power to work miracles, those who
have the ability to heal sick people, those who have the ability to help others, those
who have the ability to govern the affairs of the congregation, and those who have the
ability to speak messages in languages [MTY] that they have not learned. 29 Certainly
not all believers are apostles. [RHQ] They all do not have the ability to speak messages
that come directly from God. [RHQ] They do not all have the ability to teach spiritual
truth. [RHQ] They do not all have the power to work miracles. [RHQ] 30 They do not
all have the ability to heal people. [RHQ] They do not all have the ability to speak
messages in languages [MTY] they have not learned. [RHQ] They do not all have the
ability to tell others the meaning of those messages. [RHQ] Certainly not! 31 But you
should eagerly desire to have the abilities that will help other believers the most (OR,
the abilities that God considers to be the most important). But now I will tell you the
best way to use the abilities that God’s Spirit has given you.
13
We should use the abilities that God’s Spirit has given us in ways that show that we
love others.
1 Corinthians 13:1-13
1 Supposing we could speak all the various languages [MTY] that people in the world
speak and even speak the language that angels speak. If we did not love others,
speaking those languages would be as useless as beating a brass gong or clanging
cymbals together. 2 Supposing we had the ability to speak messages that come directly
from God, and we could understand the plans that he has not yet revealed to others,
and we could know everything about everything, and we believed in God so strongly
that we could do impossible things like causing mountains to move. If we did not love
others, God would consider all that to be worthless. 3 And supposing we would give
everything that we own to poor people, and would let others kill us in order that we
could boast about sacrificing our own bodies. If we did not love others, we would not
get any reward from God.
4 Those who [PRS] truly love others act patiently and kindly toward them. Those
who [PRS] truly love others are not jealous of them, they do not boast about what
they themselves have done, and are not proud. 5 Those who [PRS] truly love others do
not act in disgraceful/disrespectful ways towards them. They do not ◄act selfishly/
think only of themselves and what they want►. They do not quickly become angry.
They do not keep remembering the bad things that others have done to them. 6 Those
who [PRS] truly love others do not rejoice when people do evil things, but they do
rejoice when people act righteously. 7 Those who truly love others patiently put up
withthe faults of others. They do not quickly assume that others have done something
bad. They confidently expect that others will act righteously. They patiently endure
all their own troubles.
8 We should never [PRS] let anything stop us from continuing to love others. As for
the ability to speak messages that come directly from God, some day that will come1 CORINTHIANS 13:9
1683
1 CORINTHIANS 14:8
to an end. As for the ability to speak languages [MTY] that we have not learned, that
will also come to an end some day. And as for the ability to know things that God
reveals to us, that will come to an end some day because it will not be necessary any
more. 9 God does not reveal everything to us, and we cannot know everything that
he knows. 10 But when everything is perfect after Christ returns, things which are not
perfect now, such as the abilities which God’s Spirit gives us, will ◄disappear/come
to an end►. 11 When we were children, we talked like children talk, we thought like
children think, we reasoned like children reason. But when we grew up, we got rid
of our childish ways [MET]. Similarly, you need to get rid of your childish thinking
about the abilities that the Spirit has given you. 12 In this life we do not understand
everything fully. It is like [MET] looking at something indirectly by seeing it in a
mirror. But when we get to heaven [MTY], we will understand everything clearly. It
will be like talking to someone face-to-face. Now we know only part of everything that
God wants us to know. Then we will know everything completely, just like God knows
us completely. 13 So now there are three things that we must continue to do: To trust
in God, to confidently expect to receive what he will give us, and to love others. But
the greatest of those three things is loving others.
14
Speaking messages that come directly from God will help believers much more than
speaking messages in unknown languages.
1 Corinthians 14:1-25
1 You must want to love others more than you want anything else. But you should
also eagerly desire the abilities that God’s Spirit gives to believers. And you should
desire most of all to have the ability to speak messages that come directly from God
[MTY]. 2-3 I say that because those who speak messages that come directly from God
are speaking in languages that they and the other believers in the congregation know,
and so they are able to strengthen them spiritually and to encourage and comfort
them. But those who speak in languages [MTY] that they have not learned are not
speaking to people. Instead, they are only speaking to God. No one understands them.
By the power/guidance of God’s Spirit (OR, From within their own spirit) they speak
things that others do not know. 4 Those who speak in languages that they have not
learned are receiving a blessing for themselves, but those who speak messages that
come directly from God are giving a blessing to all the believers in the congregation
because they are speaking in a language that the congregation knows.
5 I would like you all to have the ability to speak in languages [MTY] you have not
learned. But I would like even more for you to have the ability to speak messages that
come directly from God. People can speak messages in a language that they have not
learned, but if there is no one there who can explain the meaning, that situation is
not as helpful to the congregation as speaking messages that come directly from God
in the language that the congregation knows.
6 My fellow believers, suppose I came and spoke to you in a language that none of
you knows and I did not explain the meaning of what I told you. Even if I told you
something that God had revealed to me, or told you some message that had come
directly from him, or taught you something that you needed to know, ◄that certainly
would not help you!/how would that help you?► [RHQ] 7 It is like lifeless musical
instruments, like flutes and harps for example. When they are played, if the notes
are not played {if those playing those instruments do not play the notes} clearly, no
one will know what tune is being played {what tune they are playing}. [RHQ] 8 If
someone playing the trumpet wants to signal that the soldiers should prepare to fight1 CORINTHIANS 14:9
1684
1 CORINTHIANS 14:25
a battle, the soldiers certainly will not get ready if the call to battle is not played {he
does not play the call to battle} clearly. [RHQ] 9 It is the same with you! If you do
not speak words that other people can understand, ◄no one will know what you are
saying./how will anyone know what you are saying?► [RHQ] It will be as though you
are just speaking to the air! 10 There are many different languages in the world, and
all of them convey meaning [LIT] to the people who know those languages. 11 But
if we do not understand the language that others are speaking, it will be as though
they are foreigners to us, and we will be foreigners to them. 12 So I say this to you:
Because you are eager to have the abilities that God’s Spirit gives, earnestly desire
those abilities that will do the most to help all the believers in the congregation.
13 So, those who have the ability to speak in languages [MTY] that they have not
learned should pray that God will give them the ability to explain the meaning of what
they say. 14 If they pray in a language [MTY] that they have not learned, their spirits
are praying, but they are not using their minds. 15 So I will tell you [RHQ] what
we should do. At times we may pray, using only our spirits, in languages we have
not learned. And at other times we should pray using our minds, thinking about the
words that we are praying. Similarly, at times we may sing using only our spirits,
using languages that we have not learned, and at other times we should sing using
our minds, thinking about the words that we are singing. 16 Suppose that any one of
you praises God (OR, thanks God for what he has done), using only your (sg) spirit and
not using your mind. Maybe some people will be present who do not know about the
abilities that God’s Spirit gives to believers. Because they do not know what you are
saying, after you thank God, they will not [RHQ] know when to say “Amen!/I agree!”
17 You may be thanking God very well, but you are not helping them. 18 I thank God
that I speak in languages [MTY] that I have not learned more than any of you do.
19 But during a worship service, in order that others will understand what I am saying,
I would prefer to speak five words using my mind, in order that I may teach others,
rather than to speak 10,000 words in a language [MTY] that is not understood by the
congregation.
20 My fellow believers, stop being like little children in the way that you think about
these abilities that God’s Spirit gives. Instead, think about them in a mature way. If
you really want to be like little children, do as few wicked things as babies do! 21 When
the Jews long ago refused to obey God, he warned them about what would happen when
he allowed their enemies to punish them. In the Scriptures it is written {the prophet
Isaiah wrote} what the Lord God said about that,
They didn’t listen to prophets speaking their own language, so I will send people from
foreign lands to attack my people.
Those foreigners will speak languages that my people do not know [DOU].
In that way, I will warn my people,
but they will still not pay attention to what I say.
22 If we speak in languages [MTY] that we have not learned, unbelievers who are
there will realize that the Spirit of God is truly among us. That will warn them that
they need to fear God. But believers do not need such a warning. 23 Suppose during
the worship service everyone started to speak in languages [MTY] that they have not
learned. If unbelievers or people who do not know about the abilities that God’s
Spirit gives to believers come in and hear that, they will surely think that you are
crazy. [RHQ] 24 But if an unbeliever or someone who does not know about those
abilities comes in while all of you believers are one by one speaking messages that
come directly from God, everything that you say will show that person that he is a
sinner and that God will punish him if he does not turn from his sinful behavior. 25 He1 CORINTHIANS 14:26
1685
1 CORINTHIANS 14:40
will realize that God knows the evil things that he has done that, things that other
people do not know. Then he will kneel down and worship God and say, “God is truly
among you!”
Believers should all be prepared to participate in an orderly way during worship
services.
1 Corinthians 14:26-40
26 So, my fellow believers, I will tell you [RHQ] what I think that you should be doing.
When you come together to worship God, some of you may have a hymn to sing.
Others may have something to teach the congregation. Others may have something
to say that God has revealed to them. Others may give messages in languages that
they have not learned. Others will explain the meaning of those messages. Make
sure that all of these things that you do will make the congregation become more
mature spiritually. 27 It is all right if two people, or at the most three people, speak in
languages [MTY] that they have not learned. But they must speak one at a time, and
someone must explain the meaning of what the others have said. 28 If those who want
to speak in a language that they have not learned realize that there is no one there who
will be able to explain the meaning of what they will say, they should not speak in
that language during the meeting. Instead, they should speak to God by themselves,
somewhere else.
29 During a meeting, two or three people should speak messages that come directly
from God, and others who are there should think carefully about what those people
have said. 30 If someone receives a new message directly from God while someone
else is speaking, the one who is speaking should stop speaking and let the other person
tell what God has revealed to him. 31 You can all, one by one, speak messages that have
come directly from God, in order that you can teach others and all be encouraged
{encourage everyone}. 32 Those who speak messages that come directly from God are
in control of their own spirits, so they can wait for their turn to speak. 33 Remember
that God does not desire that things be done in a disorderly way during your worship
services. Instead, he desires that everything be done in an orderly way.
Just like it happens in all the other congregations of believers, 34 the women should
not be permitted {do not permit the women} to interrupt the meeting by asking
questions. They must keep quiet. They must be subject to their husbands. What Moses
wrote [PRS] about how God created the first two people suggests that the women should
do that. 35 If they want to know more about something that a speaker said, they should
ask their husbands when they get home, for it is disgraceful for women to interrupt
a service by asking such questions. 36 If you do not agree with these things that I have
been telling you, remember that [RHQ] the message from God did not first come from
you people in Corinth. Also, you are not [RHQ] the only ones who have heard it! Many
others have heard it and accepted it, so you should not act as though you are the only
believers who have heard the message from God. 37 Those of you who think that you
have the ability to speak messages that come directly from God, or think that you
have some other ability that God’s Spirit gives, should realize that the things that I
have written about in this letter are things that the Lord has commanded. 38 But if
they are not willing to accept my authority, God will not accept them (OR, they will
not be accepted by the congregation).
39 So, my fellow believers, be eager to speak messages that come directly from God,
and do not prevent anyone from speaking in a language that he has not learned.
40 But make sure that everything that you do during the worship services is done in
a proper and orderly way.1 CORINTHIANS 15:1
1686
1 CORINTHIANS 15:19
15
I was not worthy to become an apostle, but the Lord Jesus committed to me the
message about his death and resurrection.
1 Corinthians 15:1-11
1 Now, my fellow believers, I want to remind you about the message about Christ
that I preached to you. It is the message that you received and that you have
continued to trust firmly. 2 If you keep on firmly believing this message that I preached
to you, you will be saved {God will save you}. If you do not continue to believe it,
your believing in Christ was ◄all for nothing/useless►!
3 The most important part of the message that I received from the Lord Jesus, and
that I told you, was this: Christ died to take away the guilt of our sins, as the Scriptures
said that he would do. 4 His dead body was buried {They buried his body}. On the third
day after that, God caused him to become alive again, as the Scriptures said would
happen. 5 After that, Christ was seen by {appeared to} Peter. Then he appeared to
eleven of the original twelve apostles. 6 Later he was seen by {appeared to} more than
500 of our fellow believers. Most of those are still living, but some of them have died
[EUP]. 7 Then he was seen by {appeared to} his younger brother James, who became
the leader of the congregation in Jerusalem. Then he appeared to all of the apostles.
8 Finally, he was seen by {appeared to} me, but I became an apostle in a way that
was very unusual [MET]. 9 The fact is, I consider that I am the least important of the
apostles. I do not deserve to be an apostle, because I ◄persecuted God’s groups of
believers/caused God’s groups of believers to suffer► everywhere I went. 10 But it is
because God acted kindly toward me in ways that I did not deserve that I became
what I am now. And his acting kindly toward me produced a great result [LIT], which
is that I worked harder for Christ than all the other apostles. But it was not that I
was working with my own ability. Instead, God was helping me in a way I did not
deserve. 11 So it does not matter whether it was I who was preaching or whether it
was the other apostles who were preaching. We all preached the same message, and
that message is what you believed.
Christ has truly come back to life, and he will some day raise all believers.
1 Corinthians 15:12-34
12 So now let me ask you this: Since we have all preached to you that Christ was
raised again {that God caused Christ to become alive} after he died, ◄no one among
you should be saying that God will not cause believers to become alive again after
they die!/why do some of you say that God will not cause believers to become alive
again after they die?► [RHQ] 13 If it is true that God will not cause anyone to become
alive again, that situation would mean that Christ was not raised from the dead {he
did not cause Christ to become alive again}! 14 And if Christ was not raised from the
dead {if God did not cause Christ to become alive again}, then what we preached to
you was useless, and your believing in Christ is useless. 15 If it is true that no one
will be raised from the dead {that God will not cause anyone to become alive again
after he dies}, we (exc) have been guilty of lying to you about God, because we told
you that God caused Christ to become alive again. 16 But if it were really true that
no one who has died will be raised {that God will not cause anyone who has died to
become alive} again, then Christ was not raised {he did not cause Christ to become
alive} again either! 17 If it were true that Christ was not raised {that God did not
cause Christ to become alive} again after he died, you have believed in Christ for
nothing, because God will still punish you for [MTY] your sins. 18 And those people
who died [EUP] while they were trusting in Christ will go to hell. 19 In this life many of1 CORINTHIANS 15:20
1687
1 CORINTHIANS 15:34
us have suffered much for Christ because we confidently expect that he will reward us
in heaven. If we have confidently expected this in vain, people should pity us more
than they pity anyone else!
20 But the truth is that Christ has been raised from the dead {that God has caused
Christ to live again after he had died}, and ◄that guarantees/because of that, it is
certain► [MET] that he will also cause those believers who have died [EUP] to become
alive again. 21 What one man, Adam, did affects us all. We all die. Similarly, what one
man—Christ—did affects us(inc) all: God will cause all believers to become alive again.
22 Because of what Adam did, all of us who are descended from him die. Similarly,
because of what Christ did, all of us who have a close relationship with him will
be brought back to life {God will make alive all of us who have a close relationship
with Christ}. 23 But we must all take our turn. God raised Christ first [MET]. And
when Christ returns, God will cause those who belong to Christ to become alive again.
24 Then, after Christ has destroyed all [DOU] the evil powers that oppose God, the
world will end. Then Christ will give to God, his Father, his kingdom to completely
rule over it. 25 You must realize that Christ must rule here on earth until he has
completely defeated [MTY] all his enemies. 26 The last thing that he will get rid of
is death. But he certainly will get rid of death, which is like an enemy to us. 27 In
the Scriptures the Psalmist wrote that God will cause everything to be under Christ’s
authority [MTY]. But it is clear that the word ‘everything’ here does not include God,
because God is the one who will cause everything to be under Christ’s authority
[MTY]. 28 After everything is put under the authority of God’s Son, then Christ will put
himself completely under the authority of God, the one who gave him that authority.
Then God will be completely in control of everything [IDM], everywhere.
29 Now think about this: Some among you are being baptized (OR, are baptizing
people) on behalf of those who died before someone baptized them (OR, who died
before they became believers). If, as some people say, believers will not be raised from
the dead {God will not cause believers to become alive again}, ◄what is the value
in those people doing that?/there is no value in those people doing that!► [RHQ] If
God will not cause any believers to become alive again, it is senseless to be baptized
{baptize anyone} on behalf of someone who has died. [RHQ] 30 Furthermore, if God
will not cause us believers to become alive again, it is [RHQ] very foolish for me and
the other apostles to be constantly putting ourselves in danger because we tell people
the gospel. 31 My fellow believers, every day I am in danger of being killed {people
killing me}! That is as true as it is that I am pleased with you because of your close
relationship with Christ Jesus our Lord. 32 If God will not cause us believers to become
alive again after we die, ◄I will receive no benefit at all from having opposed those
who attacked me so strongly in Ephesus city./what will I gain from having opposed
those who attacked me so strongly in Ephesus city?► [RHQ] They were fighting me like
wild beasts! If we believers will not be raised from the dead {If God will not cause
us believers to live again}, we might as well say as people often say: “Tomorrow we
are going to die, so we might as well enjoy now everything that we can. We might
as well feast and get drunk!” 33 Do not let yourselves be deceived by those who say
that God will not cause believers to live again {Do not let people who say that God will
not cause believers to live again deceive you}. If you associate with evil people who
say such things, they will ◄influence you to do evil things/destroy your good moral
way of living►. 34 Start thinking correctly again about these matters, as you should,
and stop your sinful behavior which has resulted from your wrong thinking. I say that
because it seems that some among you do not know God, and as a result they are
thinking wrongly. I say that to make you ashamed.1 CORINTHIANS 15:35
1688
1 CORINTHIANS 15:54
In heaven we will have glorious indestructible bodies.
1 Corinthians 15:35-58
35 But some of you are asking, “How will dead people be raised {How will God cause
dead people to become alive} again? What kind of bodies will they have?” 36 Anyone
who asks such questions is foolish. You know that a seed that is planted in the ground
must completely change its form [MET] before it sprouts. 37 A seed, such as a wheat
seed, is very different from the plant that sprouts from it. 38 God gives everything
that lives the form that he desires. He gives each seed its own form. 39 Similarly,
people, animals, birds, and fish all have flesh, but each one has a different kind of
flesh. 40 Also, there are angelic beings in heaven (OR, stars and planets in the sky),
and there are people with bodies on the earth. The angelic beings (OR, stars and
planets) are beautiful in one way, and people on earth are beautiful in a different
way. 41 The sun is bright in one way, and the moon is bright in a different way, and
the stars are bright in a different way. And even the various stars are different from
each other in how bright they are.
42 And it is the same way with our bodies.
The bodies that we will have when God
causes us to live again after we die will not be the same as the bodies that we have now
[MET]. The bodies that we have now will die and decay. The new bodies that we will
have will never die. 43 We despise the bodies that we have now, before we die. But
our new bodies will be glorious. The bodies that we have before we die are weak. But
our new bodies will be strong. 44 The bodies that we have before we die are natural
bodies. But our new bodies will be ones that God’s Spirit ◄controls/gives us►. Just like
there are natural bodies, there are bodies that God’s Spirit completely controls (OR,
makes alive).
45 In the Scriptures it is written {we read} that when the first man, Adam, was
created, he became a living human being. Christ later also became a human being.
But he is different from Adam, because he became a person who gives us spiritual life.
46 But our bodies that God’s Spirit ◄will completely control/will give us► are not the
first bodies that we have. We have our natural bodies first. 47 The first man, Adam,
was created {God created the first man, Adam} from the dust of the earth. But Christ,
the one who came later, came from heaven. 48 Everyone on earth has a body like
the first man on the earth had. And in heaven, everyone will have a body like Christ,
the man who came from heaven, has. 49 And just like God gave us bodies like the
first man on earth had, so we believers will have bodies like Christ has, who is now in
heaven.
50 My fellow believers, I want you to know that we (inc) [SYN] cannot go to heaven,
where God rules over everything, with our physical bodies, because our bodies cannot
last forever. They will die and decay. 51 But I will tell you something that God has
not revealed before: Some of us believers will not die [EUP]. However, all of us will
be changed {God will change all of us}. 52 It will happen suddenly, as fast as someone
can blink his eye [MET], when we hear the sound of God’s trumpet for the last time.
When we hear that trumpet, all the believers who have died will come back to life
and will have bodies that are changed {that God has changed}, bodies that will never
decay. 53 And the bodies of us who are alive at that time will also be changed {And
God will also change the bodies of us who are alive at that time}. These bodies of ours
that die and decay must be transformed into new bodies that will never die; it will be
like someone [MET] getting rid of his old clothes and putting on new ones. 54 When
that happens, what is written {what ◄a prophet/Isaiah► wrote} in the Scriptures will
come true/happen:1 CORINTHIANS 15:55
1689
1 CORINTHIANS 16:12
God will completely get rid of [MET] death. Our dying will no longer have any
power to defeat us; 55 Death [APO] will not win a victory over us. Death will not be
able to hurt us.
56 It is because we sin [MET] that we die, and it is because we have God’s laws that
we know that we have sinned. 57 But because of what our Lord Jesus Christ has done,
he enables us to be free from having to obey God’s laws to be saved and to be free of
being afraid to die. We should thank God for that!
58 So, my fellow believers whom I love, continue to hold strongly to the things
that you believe. Do not let anything cause you to doubt them. Always be doing
enthusiastically the work that the Lord gives you. And remember that the work that
you do for the Lord is never ◄in vain/useless►, as it would be if God will not cause us
to live again after we die.
16
You should set aside funds each week for the offering to be sent to believers in
Jerusalem.
1 Corinthians 16:1-4
1 Now I will reply to another question that you asked. You asked about the money you
are collecting to send to God’s people in Jerusalem. Do what I told the congregations
in Galatia to do. 2 Every Sunday each of you should set aside at home some funds
[EUP] for this purpose, in proportion to how much God has prospered you. Then you
should save it up, so that when I arrive there, you will not need to collect any more
money. Choose some men whom you approve of, to take this money to Jerusalem.
3 Then, when I arrive, I will write letters stating that you have authorized these men
to take the funds there. 4 And if you (OR, I) think that it is appropriate, I will go with
them.
I plan to spend some time with you. Treat Timothy respectfully when he arrives.
Apollos plans to visit you later.
1 Corinthians 16:5-12
5 Now I plan to travel through Macedonia province. I plan to come to visit you,
but I want to go through Macedonia first. 6 Perhaps I will stay with you for a short
while, or I may stay with you for the whole winter, in order that you yourselves can
provide some of the things that I will need [EUP] for my next trip. 7 I do not want to
see you just for a short time and then continue my trip. I am hoping to stay with you
for a while, if the Lord Jesus allows me to do that. 8 But I will stay here in Ephesus
city until after the Pentecost festival. 9 I want to do that because God has given me a
great opportunity [MET] to proclaim his good message here. As a result of my work
here, God is producing great results. I also want to stay here because there are many
people here who oppose my work, and I need to refute them.
10 When Timothy arrives there in Corinth, treat him respectfully [LIT], because he
is working for the Lord just as I am. 11 Do not let anyone despise him. And when he
leaves there, give him some of the things that he needs for his trip [EUP] here, and
also ask God to bless him. I am waiting for him to come, along with the other fellow
believers who have been traveling with him.
12 You also asked about our fellow believer, Apollos. I urged him strongly that he
should go back to you with the three fellow believers who came here from Corinth.
He was not at all willing to go now, but he will go later, when he has an opportunity.
I give you my final instructions, greetings from others, and my final blessings.
1 Corinthians 16:13-241 CORINTHIANS 16:13
1690
1 CORINTHIANS 16:24
13 Be on guard against anything that would hinder you spiritually. You have believed
the true message; continue believing it firmly. Be courageous. Keep strong in your
relationship with God. 14 Act in a loving way in everything that you do.
15 You know that Stephanas and his family were the first ones there in Achaia
province to believe in Christ [IDM]. They have devoted themselves to helping God’s
people. 16 My fellow believers, I urge you to submit yourselves to them and to people
like them who do God’s work and who work hard. 17 I was glad when Stephanas,
Fortunatus, and Achaicus arrived here from Corinth, because they did things for me
that you were not able to do because you were not with me. 18 They comforted and
encouraged me [SYN], and I expect that this news from me will do the same for you.
You should honor them, and you should also honor others like them.
19 The congregations here in Asia province ◄send their greetings to/say that they
are thinking fondly of► you. Aquila and his wife Priscilla and the congregation that
meets in their house ◄send their warm greetings to/say that they are thinking fondly
of► you because both they and you belong to the Lord. 20 All your fellow believers
here ◄send their greetings to/say that they are thinking of► you. Greet each other
affectionately, as fellow believers should.
21 Now I, Paul, having taken the pen from the hand of my secretary, write with my
own hand to say that I am thinking fondly of you/to give you my greetings. I do this
to show you that this letter really comes from me.
22 ◄I pray that God will/May God► curse/cause bad things to happen to ◄anyone
who does not love the Lord Jesus. I pray that our Lord will come soon/May our Lord
come soon►!
23 I pray that our Lord Jesus will/May our Lord Jesus ◄continue to act toward you
all kindly/in ways that you do not deserve.►
24 I love all of you who have a close relationship with Christ Jesus.2 CORINTHIANS 1:1
1691
2 CORINTHIANS 1:11
This book is one of the letters that the Apostle Paul wrote
to the Christians at Corinth. We call this book
2 Corinthians
2 Corinthians 1:1-2
Paul and Timothy greet the Christians who are in Corinth.
1 I, Paul, who write this letter to you, became an apostle of Christ Jesus because God
chose me for that. Timothy, our fellow believer, is with me. I am sending this letter to
you who are God’s people in the congregations in Corinth city. I want the believers
who live in other places in Achaia province to also read this letter. 2 We(exc) desire that
you will experience God our Father and our Lord Jesus Christ acting kindly toward
you and causing you to have inner peace.
We thank God that he encourages us in all our troubles so that we are able to
encourage you when you suffer. We suffered so much in Asia province that we were
sure that we were going to die, but we learned to trust in God. He saved us from death
and he will continue to save us from death.
2 Corinthians 1:3-11
3 We should praise God, who is the father of our (inc) Lord Jesus Christ. He always
pities us and helps us because he is like [MET] a father to us and we are like his
children. He always encourages us (inc). 4 He has encouraged us (exc) whenever we
suffered hardships. As a result, we (exc) are able to encourage others whenever they
suffer hardships, just as/just like God has encouraged us (exc). 5 It is true that just
like Christ suffered, we who serve him also continually suffer because we belong to
him. But also, because we belong to Christ, God greatly strengthens us ◄just as/just
like► God strengthened him. 6 So, whenever we (exc) experience sufferings, we learn
how to encourage you when you experience sufferings. As a result, you will become
more and more the kind of people God wants you to be. Whenever God strengthens us
(exc) when we are suffering, he does that in order that you may see how he makes us
strong when we are suffering. Then, as God encourages you in that way, you will learn
to continue patiently trusting him when you suffer as we do. 7 As a result, we (exc)
strongly expect that because you suffer just as/just like we do, God will encourage
you ◄just as/just like► he encourages us.
8 Our fellow believers, we (exc) want you to know [LIT] about the trouble that we
suffered in Asia province. That trouble was so very great that it was much more than
we were able to endure. As a result, we (exc) thought that we would certainly die.
9 Indeed, we felt like a person feels when he has heard a judge say, “I condemn you to
die/be executed [MET].” But God allowed us to think that we were going to die so that
we would not ◄rely on/trust in► our own strength. He wanted us instead to rely only
on his strength, because he is the one who has power even to make those who have
died live again. 10 And even though we (exc) were in terrible danger and were about
to die, God rescued us. And he will continue to rescue us whenever we are in trouble.
We confidently expect that he will continue to rescue us time after time. 11 And we
are also relying on you to help us by praying for us (exc). If many people pray for us,
many people will also thank God when he kindly answers those many prayers and
delivers us from danger.2 CORINTHIANS 1:12
1692
2 CORINTHIANS 1:24
You can trust what I tell you. I did not visit you, because I wanted to give you the
opportunity to obey the instructions that I wrote to you. Now that you have punished
enough the man who caused those problems, I urge you to forgive him and to encourage
him.
2 Corinthians 1:12—2:11
12 I am happy to say that I have behaved toward all people [MTY] in an honest and
sincere way. My conscience assures me that this is true. Especially, I have behaved
toward you honestly and sincerely because that is what God wants us to do. As I
have done that, my thoughts have not been the thoughts that unbelieving people
[MTY] think are wise. Instead, I have behaved toward people only as God wants me to,
depending on God to help me in ways that I do not deserve. 13 I say that because in all
my letters to you I have always written [LIT] clearly in a way that you can easily and
completely understand when you read them. 14 Previously some of you, but not all of
you, have completely understood that I am always honest and sincere with you. But
I confidently expect that soon you will all be fully convinced about that. Then when
the Lord Jesus [MTY] returns, you will all be able to say that you are pleased with me,
just like I will be able to say that I am pleased with you.
15-16 It was because I felt sure that all of you were pleased with me that I was planning
to visit you on my way from here to Macedonia province. I also planned to visit you
again on my way back from there, so that I could spend time with you twice, and be
able to help you more, and I was hoping that you would give me things that I needed
[EUP] for my journey to Judea province. 17 So then, even though I changed my mind
later and did not do what I first planned to do, it was not because I did not have an
important reason for changing my plans. Surely you do not really think that I decide
what I am going to do like people who do not know God do! [RHQ] I am not like
that. I am not a person who says to people, “Yes, certainly I will do that,” and then
for no good reason changes his mind and says, “No, I will not do it.” 18 Just as surely
as God always does what he says he will do, it is true that I have never said, “Yes, I
will do this” when I really meant “No.” 19 I follow the example of God’s Son, Jesus
Christ. When I, along with Silas and Timothy, taught you about Christ, we told you
that he was not someone who said that he would do something and then did not do
it. Jesus Christ never said to anyone, “Yes, I will do what you desire,” and then did not
do it. 20 We(inc) know that is true, because everything that God promised to do for
his people, he has done completely by sending Christ to save us. That is why we say,
“Yes, it is true! God has done everything that he promised to do!” And we praise him
for that! 21 Now it is only God himself who causes us (exc), as well as you, to keep on
believing strongly in Christ. God is the one who chose us (inc) to belong to him and to
have a close relationship with Christ. 22 He also sent his Holy Spirit into our (inc) lives
to mark us as belonging to himself [MET]. Also, since he has sent his Spirit to live in
us (inc), he wants us to know by this that he guarantees [MET] to give us every other
◄blessing/good thing► that he has promised.
23 So now I will tell you why I changed my mind and did not visit you as I intended
to do: God himself knows that what I am telling you is true. The reason that I did
not return to Corinth was so that I might not have to speak to you severely about the
wrong that you had done. 24 It is not that Silas, Timothy and I want to boss you and
tell you that you must believe only what we say. Not at all! On the contrary, we (exc)
are working as partners with you in order to make you happy. We do not try to force
you to believe everything that we believe, because we are sure that you are continuing
to trust the Lord Jesus Christ and that you are remaining firmly committed to him.2 CORINTHIANS 2:1
1693
2 CORINTHIANS 2:14
2
1 Anyway, I definitely decided that I would not come to visit you again now.
If I
had come, I would have spoken severely to you again, and I would have made you
unhappy as I did the last time I visited you. 2 And if I make you unhappy, I will have
made unhappy the only people who can cheer me up, so ◄there will be none of you
to cheer me up!/who would cheer me up?► [RHQ] 3 So, instead of going to visit you
at that time, I wrote a letter and sent it to you. I wrote it the way I did so that you
would know what you should do. Then when I come to visit you, you will not make me
unhappy when you should be causing me to rejoice. I was quite sure that all of you
would do what I told you to do in that letter, and because of that I would be happy and
you would be happy, too. 4 I wrote to you the way I did because I felt very troubled
and distressed about you. I was even crying very much as I wrote. My purpose in
writing was not in order to make you feel bad, but, instead, in order that you might
know how deeply/much I love you.
5 Now I want to write about the man who caused all this anguish. What he did
was very wrong, but I know that it has caused you much more sorrow than it has
caused me, because what he did has affected all of you to some extent. I say, “to some
extent,” because I do not want to say that he has done more harm than he really has
done. 6 Since he has now stopped sinning in that way, the punishment that nearly all
of you decided was right for him has continued long enough. 7 So now, instead of
punishing him any longer, you need to forgive him and deal kindly with him. If you
do not forgive him, he may become so sad that he will begin to think that you will
never forgive him (OR, will stop believing in Christ).
8 For those reasons, I beg you to forgive him and accept him into your group again,
and by doing that assure him that you truly love him. 9 I feel sure that you will do as
I ask, because when I wrote severely to you before, I did it to test you by finding out
whether or not you really would do everything that I, as your apostle, asked you to
do. 10 So since you obeyed what I told you before, I feel sure that now you will obey
what I am writing in this letter and forgive the man, as I have done, because I indeed
have forgiven him for the wrong thing that he did. Anything he needed me to forgive
him for, I have forgiven, and Christ knows that I have forgiven him sincerely. I have
done that mainly to help you so that you and I will again have fellowship with each
other, and that you will accept him into your group again. 11 I want you to forgive him
so that Satan will not be able to take advantage of the problems among us and make
the situation worse. We know very well [LIT] that Satan is always planning to cause
problems among us.
I did not find Titus in Troas, so I went on to Macedonia province. Everywhere we
go, God causes people to know Christ through our teaching. We do not teach in order
to get money; we teach with sincere motives.
2 Corinthians 2:12-17
12 I will continue by telling you what I did after I wrote to you from Ephesus city. I
went to Troas city in order to tell people the message about Christ. When I arrived
there, I found many people who had been prepared by the Lord Jesus [MET] to listen
to what I told them about him. 13 But because my fellow believer Titus had not arrived
with a report from you, I still felt very anxious and concerned about you. So, after
spending only a short time at Troas, I said goodbye to the believers who were there and
came here to Macedonia province to find Titus. 14 However, before I tell you any more
about that, I want to thank God for what he is doing. As a great leader of fighting men
causes all his prisoners to take part in his victory parade [MET], God leads us who are
his workers to always be victorious over Satan because of our(exc) close relationship2 CORINTHIANS 2:15
1694
2 CORINTHIANS 3:6
with Christ. God causes people to come to know Jesus Christ as a result of our (exc)
teaching his message. That message is like [MET] the smell of perfume. 15 When
we(exc) tell God’s message about Christ, it spreads out among people like the smell of
perfume. Those who believe the message that we tell them are saved {Jesus Christ saves
them} from the guilt of their sin. But those who reject that message will be separated
from God forever. 16 To those who are on the way to hell, our message is like [MET]
a foul smell because it is about dying and being separated from God forever. But, to
those on the way to heaven, the message that we teach is like a pure fragrant smell,
because we tell them that they will live forever with God. As we think about that, we
think ◄no one is able to do such important work for God!/how can anyone be able to
do such important work for God?► [RHQ] 17 But perhaps God considers us(exc) able,
because we do not work/act like so many others whom you know. They teach God’s
message in a way that they think people will like, and they think that people will pay
them for teaching that way. We (exc) certainly do not do that. On the contrary, as
servants of Christ, and knowing that God is watching us (exc), we teach sincerely the
message that God sent us to proclaim.
3
The way you now live proves that we teach the truth about Jesus Christ.
2 Corinthians 3:1-6
1 As I write these things about myself, I am [RHQ] not doing it to boast about how
good I am, as some of you say I do. Some people always carry letters with them that
tell how well they work, that other people have written. But I do not [RHQ] need to
bring letters like that when I come to you. Nor do I need to ask you to write letters like
that for me when I go to other congregations. 2 You yourselves are [MET] like a letter
that recommends my work for God to everyone. People see how Christ changed your
lives when you believed the message that I taught you. Everyone who knows you can
see the result of my work for God. 3 You are [MET] like a letter that Christ himself has
written that says good things about my work for God in your lives. You show people
by the way you now conduct your lives that God has changed your lives as a result of
my work among you. People did not find out about you by reading a letter that was
written to them on paper with pen and ink. Instead, they saw how the Spirit of the
all-powerful God has changed your lives. Nor did people find out about you by reading
a letter that was carved on stone slabs like the stone slabs that God gave to Moses.
Instead, it was the change that God’s Spirit made in your lives [MET] that they saw.
4 I can very confidently write these things about the work that Silas, Timothy, and I
did among you, because God knows that what I write is true. We(exc) are true workers
for God because of what Christ has done for us. 5 We (exc), by ourselves, do not have
the ability to do this work. None of us apostles can say, “I have changed the lives of
these people.” God is the one who has given us this ability. 6 He is the one who enables
us (exc) to be his messengers. He has enabled us to tell people the message about the
new agreement that he is making with them. This is not a message about obeying all
the written laws of his old agreement that he made with the Jewish people. Instead, it
is a message about God giving us his Spirit. Previously, God condemned people to be
separated from him forever if they did not obey his laws. But by God’s new agreement
his Spirit enables people to live eternally.
Our work of teaching people about God’s New Agreement is much greater than the
work of teaching people about his Old Agreement.
2 Corinthians 3:7-112 CORINTHIANS 3:7
1695
2 CORINTHIANS 4:2
7 Moses taught the people that if they did not obey God’s laws completely they would
be separated from God forever. God wrote his laws on stone slabs. Then he gave them
to Moses to teach them to the people. Although God’s laws condemned the people to
die, when Moses brought those laws down from Sinai Mountain, God caused Moses’
face to shine Moses’ face to shine radiantly to show the people that these laws were
God’s laws. It shone. so brightly that the people of Israel could not keep looking at
Moses’ face. They had to look away. But the brightness was slowly fading away. 8 So,
since God showed in such a wonderful way that those laws that condemned the people
to die were from him, surely when we (exc) teach people about how God’s Spirit will
change their lives, God will show in an even more wonderful way that it is his message.
[RHQ] 9 The message that Moses taught them was wonderful, but when people heard
that message, they realized that they were sinners and that God would punish them.
But God’s message that we (exc) teach is a much more wonderful message. We teach
people that God will ◄erase the record of/declare people no longer guilty for► the
sinful things that they have done. 10 The truth is that, although the work of teaching
the people to obey God’s laws was once important, it is not as important now, because
the work of teaching people that God will forgive them and enable them to live to please
him is far more important. 11 Furthermore, the message that Moses taught was not
a lasting message, just like the brightness on his face was not lasting and soon faded
away. But when God gives his Spirit to people, the wonderful work that God’s Spirit
does in their lives is much greater because it lasts forever.
We teach a message that transforms people’s lives. So we teach it with great
confidence.
2 Corinthians 3:12-18
12 We (exc) know that the message that we teach is a much more wonderful message
than the message that Moses taught. So we can preach boldly. 13 We do not need
to put a veil over our faces when we teach people, as Moses did. Moses put a veil
over his face so that the Israelites would not see that the radiance on his face soon
faded away. Similarly, the glory of the old agreement has also faded away. 14 But the
Israelis stubbornly refused to understand that the old agreement would end. Even
now, when they read the old agreement, they still do not realize that it has ended. It is
as if [MET] that same veil that Moses put on his face is now over their minds, keeping
them from understanding God’s true message. They will understand that message only
when they come to trust in Christ. Then it will be as though God has removed the veil.
15 Throughout all these years, even until now, when the Israelis read what Moses write,
it is as though a veil is covering their minds. 16 But when any of them believes in the
Lord Jesus, God removes that veil from them. 17 It is by the power of his Spirit that
the Lord works in our lives, and the Lord’s Spirit has set us free from trying to obey
all the rules and rituals that God gave Moses. 18 It is as though God has removed the
veil from our faces [MET]. We realize how awesome Jesus is. As we realize that, we
are continually being changed {the Holy Spirit is continually changing us} to become
more and more like Jesus, so that people can see, more and more, how awesome Jesus
is. It is the Spirit of the Lord who does this.
4
We are servants of Jesus. It is Jesus who has shown us how great God is.
2 Corinthians 4:1-6
1 So, because God has acted so kindly toward me, enabling me to teach this great
message to people, I never get so discouraged that I stop teaching it. 2 And I have
determined that we (exc) will be honest [LIT] in everything that we do. We will not2 CORINTHIANS 4:3
1696
2 CORINTHIANS 4:15
do anything that would cause us to be ashamed if people found out about it. We never
try to deceive you with clever arguments, as some other people do. We never try to
deceive you by changing God’s message, as those same people do. Instead, we always
teach people only the truth about Christ, and we teach it clearly. Knowing that God is
watching what we do, we teach his message in an honest way, with the result that no
one can accuse us (exc) of being deceitful. 3 And if, as some of you say, some people are
not able to understand the message that we teach about Christ, it is not because we
do not teach it clearly. It is because those people do not want to believe it. They are
going to perish eternally. 4 Satan, who is the one who rules this world, controls the
thoughts of those unbelievers. He prevents them from understanding the message
about how wonderful Christ is. They are not able to understand that Jesus is like
God in every way. 5 That is why, when we(exc) teach people, we do not boast about
ourselves, as some people say that we do. Instead, we teach you that Jesus Christ is our
Lord. We ourselves are only your servants. We want to honor and obey Jesus. 6 When
God created the world, he commanded the light to shine where there was nothing but
darkness. He is the one who has made his message about Jesus to be like [MET] a light
shining into our (inc) minds. God has done that for all of us who believe in Jesus. He
has done that so that we will understand that when people saw Christ, they saw how
awesome God himself was.
As Jesus’ servants we suffer, but through our suffering many people will receive
eternal life and thank and praise God.
2 Corinthians 4:7-15
7 This work that God has given to us (exc) is [MET] like a very valuable treasure.
But we who have that treasure are as weak as fragile [MET] clay pots. God has
planned it like that in order that people will know that the power that changes lives is
God’s power, and not any power of our own. 8 We are continually oppressed {People
continually oppress us} in many ways, but we have not been prevented {God has not
allowed them to prevent us} from teaching the message about Jesus Christ. We often do
not know what to do in difficult situations, but we never say, “God has abandoned us.”
9 We are frequently persecuted {People frequently cause us to suffer}, but God never
abandons us. Sometimes we are badly wounded {people badly wound us}, but God
does not allow us to be killed {them to kill us}. 10 Wherever we(exc) go, we continually
realize that because people killed Jesus, people may kill us for teaching his message.
But we are willing to go on living this way in order that people will know that Jesus
is alive and that he is directing us [SYN]. 11 So, although we are still alive, we always
realize that we may be killed {that people some day may kill us} because we teach
about Jesus. God allows us to suffer in order that people will see that Jesus is alive and
that he is strengthening our bodies that are some day going to die. 12 So I conclude
that although we apostles are constantly suffering and may soon die, the result of that
is that all of you have now received eternal life.
13 We are not discouraged. We are like the person who wrote in the Scriptures,
“God, I trusted in you and so I continue speaking your message.” We (exc) also trust
in God, so we continue speaking his message. 14 We do this because we (exc) know
that although people might kill us, God, who caused the Lord Jesus to live again after
he died, will also cause us (exc) to live again after we die. God will do this because we
belong to Jesus. And then God will bring us (exc), together with you, to be with him.
15 So I say that all these things that we(exc) suffer happen in order to help you. We
have suffered all this in order that more and more people, as a result of hearing that
God will kindly/freely forgive their sins, will thank him and praise him. Then they will
greatly honor him and worship him.2 CORINTHIANS 4:16
1697
2 CORINTHIANS 5:10
As our bodies get weaker, God continually makes our inner lives stronger. He will
reward us for all that we have suffered.
2 Corinthians 4:16-18
16 So, because we know that as a result of our suffering many people will honor God,
we (exc) never get so discouraged that we stop teaching his message. Although our
bodies are getting weaker, God encourages us every day and strengthens us spiritually.
17 I know that all these troubles that happen to us in this life are not significant and
will not last forever. When we think of the glorious things that God is preparing for us
to enjoy forever in heaven, all our suffering now is not important. 18 That is why we
say, “We will not continue thinking about all the suffering that we are experiencing
now. Even though we cannot see all the things that God has prepared for us in heaven,
those are what we should be thinking about.” That is how we should think, because
all these troubles that we(exc) have now will last only a short time. But what we will
have in heaven, what we cannot see now, will last forever.
5
God will give all of us new heavenly bodies, and he will reward us according to what
we did while we were living in our earthly bodies.
2 Corinthians 5:1-10
1 We know that these bodies we live in here in this world are like [MET] tents. They
are like temporary living/dwelling places. So we should not be concerned about what
happens to our bodies. We know that if we are killed {if someone kills us}, God
will give us permanent living places. Those permanent living places [MET] will not be
houses that people have made. They will be new bodies in which we will live forever in
heaven. 2 While we are here on earth, we suffer. We often groan because we desire to
go to heaven where God will give us our new bodies [MET]. 3 When God gives us(inc)
our new bodies [MET], our spirits will have [LIT, MET] bodies to live in that will last
forever.
4 It is true that while we are still living in these bodies [MET] that do not last forever,
we often groan [DOU] because we desire to be free from them. We are not longing to
be without a body. Instead, we groan because we desire to receive our new bodies
[MET] in heaven. We long for this to happen so that these bodies that are going to
die some day will suddenly be changed into bodies that will live forever. 5 It is God
himself who has prepared us to receive these new bodies. He is also the one who has
guaranteed/assured us (inc) that this will happen. He has guaranteed it by sending
his Spirit to live inside us now.
6 So, because God’s Spirit lives in us, we are always confident that God will give us
new bodies. We know that as long as we have bodies here on earth, we are not yet
living together with the Lord Jesus in heaven. 7 While we (exc) live here, we do not
have our new bodies, but we are trusting that God will give them to us. 8 As I said,
we (exc) are confident that he will give us new bodies. We (exc) would much prefer
to leave these bodies which we have now, and be with the Lord Jesus in our home in
heaven. 9 Because of all that, we always want to please Jesus in everything that we do.
Whether we (exc) are still living here in these bodies or whether we have left them
and are living in our home in heaven, we want to please him. 10 And we need to try
hard to do that because each one of us believers must stand before Christ to be judged
by him {when he will judge his people}. At that time he will reward each one of us
according to what we have done while we lived in this world in these bodies. He will
reward us according to whether we have done good things or whether we have done
evil things.2 CORINTHIANS 5:11
1698
2 CORINTHIANS 6:1
Christ has shown me how much he loves people. That is why I teach his message
with all the strength that I have. Therefore, I plead with you to believe that God will
forgive you because of what Christ did for you.
2 Corinthians 5:11—6:2
11 It makes me fearful to think that some day I will stand before the Lord for him
to judge me. So I do everything that I can to convince people that they should believe
(OR, that I teach sincerely) God’s message. God knows very well how I conduct my life
and what I teach, and I really believe that you know it, too. 12 Once again I say, as I
write this, I am not just trying to make you think well/highly of me, as some people
will probably say that I am. Instead, I am telling you in this letter why you have good
reason to tell those who criticize me that you think highly of me. I am telling you this
so that you will know what to say to those teachers of false doctrine among you. They
are proud of what they have done, instead of making sure that they are right with God
and being pleased with that. 13 Some of them say that after God has enabled me to see
visions, I talk like a crazy person. If that is so, I want you to realize that I talk that
way in order to please God. On the other hand, if you think that I speak and act wisely,
that is good. I want you to know that I do speak and act wisely in order to help you.
14 I speak and act the way I do because the love that Christ has for people influences
me in everything that I say and do. When Christ died, he suffered the punishment for
the sins of all people. So, we should all think of ourselves as having died with him,
being as unresponsive to sinful desires as [MET] a corpse is. 15 When Christ died for
the everyone, he died in order that we believers who are alive now should not conduct
our lives in a way that will just please ourselves. Instead, we should conduct our lives
in a way that will please Christ, because he is the one who died for us and was brought
back to life {whom God raised} again.
16 So, because I realize how much Christ loves everyone, I no longer think about
people in the way that those who do not believe in Christ think about them. Before I
was a believer, I thought about Christ in the way that other non-believers did. But I
do not think of him that way any more. 17 The fact is that God makes every one of us
who trusts in Christ to be completely different than we were before. Our old way of
conducting our lives is gone. We now have a completely new way of conducting our
lives. 18 This complete change in our lives is all something that God does. It is God
who made it possible for us to have a peaceful relationship with him. He was able to
do that because of what Christ did for us. Now God has sent me, and those who work
with me, to tell people that they can have a peaceful relationship with him. 19 That
is, he sent us(exc) to tell them that when Christ died, God was making it possible for
everyone [MTY] in the world to have a peaceful relationship with him. He no longer
keeps a record of the sinful things that we believers have done. The message that God
has given to us to tell people is how we can have a peaceful relationship with him.
20 So, it is I and my companions who are Christ’s representatives in this world. When
we tell people the message about Christ, it is God himself who is pleading with them
by means of what we say. So, as true representatives of Christ, we plead with you:
Believe God’s true message about Christ in order that you may be reconciled to {have
a peaceful relationship with} him. 21 You must believe that even though Jesus never
sinned, God punished him for all the sinful things that people do, just as if Jesus had
done those sinful things himself. And because of our close relationship with Christ,
God has erased the record of our sins/declared us no longer guilty for our sins.
6
1 Therefore, because I am working together with God himself, I say this to you very2 CORINTHIANS 6:2
1699
2 CORINTHIANS 6:15
strongly: God has already kindly forgiven you because Christ died for you, so do not
now say “It does not matter if I live just to please myself.” 2 For God said long ago in
the Scriptures:
When it is the right time for me to help you, you will ask me to help you, and I
will hear you. Then I will send a Savior to help you.
So listen to what I am telling you: God has sent his Savior, so now is the time when
God is ready to save people from the guilt of their sins.
In spite of much suffering, we have lived as servants of God should live.
2 Corinthians 6:3-10
3 Neither I nor the men working with me do anything that would hinder people from
trusting in Christ, and so we cannot be accused {no one can accuse us} of not serving
God properly. 4 Instead, in everything that we(exc) say and do, we show people that
we serve God faithfully. We patiently endure all the things that happen to us. People
cause us many troubles and, as a result, we are anxious and often do not know what
to do. 5 Sometimes we have been beaten and bound {People have beaten us and tied
us} with chains in prison. Angry mobs have attacked us, wanting to kill us. We have
continued working for God until we had no more strength to work. We have had many
sleepless nights, and we have often been without food. 6 All that we think about and
all that we do is pure in God’s sight. Knowing how God wants us to conduct our lives,
we do what pleases him. We are patient with those who oppose us. We are kind to
everyone. We depend on the Holy Spirit to help us. We love people sincerely as God
wants us to love them. 7 We faithfully teach the true message about Christ, and God
gives us his power as we teach it. Like soldiers using weapons [MET] in a battle, we,
by living righteously, defend God’s message and refute those who attack it. 8 We serve
God faithfully, whether people praise us (exc) or whether they despise us, whether
people say bad things about us(exc) or whether they say good things about us. We
keep teaching the truth, even though some people say that we are deceiving people.
9 Some people know well that we are true servants of God, and yet others, who know
us, refuse to believe that. People have often tried to kill us (inc), yet we are still alive.
We have often been beaten, but we have not been killed {People have often beaten
us (exc), but they have not killed us}. 10 Although we (exc) are often very sad because
people have rejected our message, we are always joyful because of all that God has
done for us. Even though we (exc) are poor, we make it possible for many people to
be spiritually rich. It is true that in this world we (exc) have nothing valuable [HYP],
but because we belong to God’s family, all that God has belongs to us.
I ask you to accept us and love us as we love you.
2 Corinthians 6:11-13
11 You fellow believers in Corinth, I have been completely honest with you. I have
told you exactly how we(exc) feel about you, that we love you very much [IDM]. 12 We
are not treating you as though we do not love you, but you are treating us as though
you do not love us. 13 In return for our loving you, will you not love us [IDM] just as
much as we love you? I am writing to you as if you were my own children.
Do not get involved with people who do not honor God.
2 Corinthians 6:14—7:1
14 Do not ◄team up/have a close relationship► with anyone who does not trust
in Christ. I say this because we who trust in Christ and do what is right should not
[RHQ] want to do things with wicked people. Or to say it in another way, just like
light and darkness never join together, so those who belong to Christ and those who
belong to Satan should never join together [RHQ]. 15 There is no [RHQ] agreement of2 CORINTHIANS 6:16
1700
2 CORINTHIANS 7:8
any kind between Christ and Satan. So, believers have no [RHQ] common spiritual
interests with unbelievers. 16 Just as no one would dare to bring idols into the Temple
in Jerusalem, believers should never [RHQ] join with those who worship idols. I say
that because [MET] the Holy Spirit is in us, and so we are like the Temple of the
all-powerful God. It is as God himself said in the Scriptures:
I will live in my people.
I will always be with/helping them.
They will say to me, “You are our God,” and
I will say to them, “You are my people.”
17 In another place in the Scriptures we read that the Lord said:
Get away from those who do evil things;
keep yourselves separated from them.
Do nothing sinful that would make you unacceptable to me.
Then I will welcome you as members of my family.
18 The Lord also said:
I will care for you as [MET] a loving father cares for his children,
and it will be as though you are my own sons and daughters.
I, the all-powerful Lord, am saying this to you.
1 My friends,
7
whom I love, because God has promised to accept us(inc) as his
children, we (inc) must stop doing anything that is sinful. We must not do sinful
things with our bodies, and we must not think sinful thoughts. Because we greatly
revere God, we must strive to live a completely pure life. By doing that we will become
the kind of people that he wants us to be.
I love you all and I have great confidence in you.
2 Corinthians 7:2-4
2 So, as I just wrote, I want you to love me (OR, us [IDM] who are true apostles of
Christ). I/we (exc) have never done anything wrong to any of you. I/we have not done
anything to harm any one of you spiritually or financially. And I/we have not tried to
get money from you ◄for myself/for ourselves►. 3 It is true that some people among
you have said that I have done such things. Nevertheless, I am not trying to make you
all feel ashamed because, as I wrote before, I will continue to love you all very much
[IDM], whether I live with you or die with you. I am very confident about you. 4 I
am very pleased with you. You have greatly encouraged me, so that I am now very
joyful in spite of all the hardships that I have endured.
Titus told me that my letter caused you to repent, and so now I am very happy.
2 Corinthians 7:5-16
5 Now I will write more about what I was saying about Titus. When I left Troas
and came here to Macedonia province, I still did not get any rest. Everywhere we
(exc) went, people were constantly causing us trouble. And not only were people
constantly causing us trouble, but I was greatly concerned about you all. 6 But God,
who always encourages his people when they are discouraged, encouraged us by
sending Titus back to us. 7 I was encouraged by seeing Titus, but when I heard how
you had encouraged him, that encouraged me even more. He told me how much
you wanted to see me. He told me that you were very sorry that you had made me so
unhappy. He also told me that you are very eager for me to continue to serve as your
apostle. When Titus told me those things, I was very, very happy.
8 Even though what I wrote in my letter ◄distressed you/made you sad►, I am not
sorry that I wrote it. For a while I was sorry that I had written it, because I knew2 CORINTHIANS 7:9
1701
2 CORINTHIANS 8:4
that it would distress you. Now Titus has also told me that it did distress you when
you read it, but you were distressed only for a short time. 9 So now I am happy that
I wrote it. I am not happy that you were distressed {that I distressed you}, but I am
happy because, when you became distressed, you felt sorry for what you had done
and you asked God to forgive you. What I mean is that you felt sorry in the way that
God wanted you to feel sorry, so my making you feel sorry did not harm you at all.
10 The fact is that when God causes us to feel truly sorry for having sinned and we
turn from our sinful behavior, then God saves us and will not punish us for the sinful
things that we have done. And no one is ever sorry about that. However, the people
who do not trust in God [MTY] may be sorry for the sinful things that they have done.
But if they do not turn from their sinful behavior and ask God to forgive them, they
will remain separated from him forever. 11 But think about what happened when you
read my letter: God caused you to be truly sorry for what you had done. You eagerly
wanted to do what was right, and you wanted to show God (OR, me) that you had done
the right thing. You were angry about what had happened, and you were worried that
God would punish you if the situation continued. You also wanted me to visit you to
encourage and help you. You wanted me to know that you really do accept me as your
apostle, and that you punished the man who had sinned, as I told you to do. By doing all
of those things, you have shown me that you have done what is right in this matter.
12 So, even though I wrote that severe letter to you, I did not write it just so that you
would punish the man who had done what was wrong. Also, I did not write it for the
benefit of the person whom he had wronged. Instead, I wrote it so that, when you
read the letter, God would enable you to realize how much you really do respect my
authority. 13 So, because you listened to me and did what I asked you to do, ◄I was/we
(exc) were all► encouraged. Not only ◄was I/were we► encouraged, but ◄I was/we
(exc) were► also very happy to see how happy Titus was when he arrived here. He
told me/us that he did not need to worry any more, because he saw that you all had
a good attitude toward me. 14 I had told Titus that I was pleased about you. And I did
not need to be ashamed for feeling that way about you, because you did what I knew
that you would do. Just like everything that I have taught you and written to you has
been the truth, the good things that I told Titus about you were also true. 15 Now he
happily remembers how you all were willing to do what I asked you to do. He is also
happy about the way you treated him with great respect. When he thinks about those
things, it makes him love you even more than he did when he was with you. 16 As for
me, I am very happy because now I am certain that I can depend on you to do what
you know God wants you to do.
8
The believers in Macedonia have already collected the money that they are going to
send to the believers in Jerusalem. You should also finish collecting the money that you
are preparing to send, and have it ready to send to Jerusalem soon.
2 Corinthians 8:1-15
1 Now, my fellow believers, I want to tell you what happened because of God’s acting
kindly in the lives of the believers in the congregations here in Macedonia province.
2 Even though the non-believers here have been causing the believers to suffer severely,
the believers are always very joyful. Although they are very poor, they gave very
generously to help other believers. 3 I know that this is true, because I have seen
for myself that they not only gave money [EUP] that they were able to give, they
gave so much money that they did not even keep enough to buy what they needed for
themselves. Without anyone telling them to share their possessions, 4 they themselves2 CORINTHIANS 8:5
1702
2 CORINTHIANS 8:18
kept requesting us to let them participate in what other believers are doing in sending
a gift of money to [EUP] God’s people in Judea province. 5 I thought that they would
give only a little of their money, but they did much more than that. First, they told the
Lord Jesus that they wanted to do what pleases him. After that, they told me that they
wanted to do whatever I thought was good for them to do, because they were sure that
would be what God wanted them to do. 6 So, because Titus was the one who helped
you to begin gathering the money [EUP, MTY] for your gift, I urged him to also help you
finish collecting the rest of your generous and loving gift. 7 You are doing very well
in so many other ways. God’s Spirit enables you to believe that God will do miracles.
His Spirit has given you the ability to tell God’s message to others. His Spirit makes
you able to know things that he reveals to you. You eagerly want to help people, and
you love us (exc) very much. So now, try to also do well in getting your generous gift
of money [EUP] ready to send to the believers in Judea province.
8 I am not commanding you to do this. But because I have seen how believers in other
places are eager to help other believers who do not have ◄what they need/enough to
live on►, I want you similarly to show that you love others sincerely. 9 You already
know how much our Lord Jesus did for you that you did not deserve. Everything
in heaven belonged to him. But in order to benefit you, he left all of those things
behind and became a human being. Here on earth he had very few possessions of his
own. But because he became poor like that, he is able to cause you (pl) to become
spiritually rich. 10 So, as you think of our Lord’s example, I will tell you what I think
that you should do in this matter of giving money. As you know, last year, because
you desired to give money to help God’s people in Judea province, you began collecting
money [EUP]. 11 So now you should finish collecting the money [EUP] that you began
to gather. In that way, everyone will know that you are just as ready to finish collecting
this gift as you were to begin collecting it. Give what you are able to give. 12 Keep
in mind that if you really want to give something to help others, whatever any one
of you is able to give will be pleasing to God. God does not expect his people to give
more than they can afford to give. 13 I do not mean that you should give so much to
help others that you yourselves do not have what you need. No, what I want is that
both you and others will have what you need. 14 Right now, when you have ◄more
than you need/plenty► and the believers in Judea do not have ◄enough/all that they
need►, with your gift you will enable them to have enough. Maybe some day when you
do not have ◄enough/all that you need► and they have more than they need, they
will be able to help you. Then everyone will have enough (OR, In that way each will
share alike). 15 If that happens, the result will be like it is written {like someone/Moses
wrote} in the Scriptures about the time when God provided manna for his people,
If someone gathered a lot of manna, he still did not have more than he needed,
because he gave some to someone who did not have enough. And those who gathered
only a little manna still had all that they needed [LIT], because others who gathered
more than they needed gave some manna to them.
I am sending Titus to you, along with two other believers, to help you get your gift
ready. They are all well respected and trustworthy men, so treat them well. It will be
good if you have your gift ready to send to Judea province by the time I arrive in Corinth.
2 Corinthians 8:16—9:5
16 So now I am sending Titus to visit you again. God has caused him to be just
as eager to help you prepare your gift as I am. I thank God for that. 17 He is going
there, not only because we urged him to go, but because he himself is very eager to
visit you again. 18 I am sending with Titus another believer whom you know well.
All the groups of believers in this area think highly of him because he has faithfully2 CORINTHIANS 8:19
1703
2 CORINTHIANS 9:6
taught the good message about Christ. 19 Not only that, but he was appointed by the
congregations in this area {the congregations in this area appointed him} to go to
Jerusalem with us (exc). He will go with us when we take the generous gift of money
[EUP] to the believers in Jerusalem. We are taking this gift to honor the Lord Jesus and
to show them that we all very much want to help them.
20 The believers have given money [EUP] generously. So, by sending that fellow
believer along with Titus to take the money to Jerusalem, we are trying to make sure
that no one will be able to accuse us (exc) of taking some of the money for ourselves.
21 I say that because we (exc) want to make sure that the Lord God will see that what
we (exc) do is right, and other people will see it, too. 22 Furthermore, there is also
another believer here whom we are sending to you along with the two men whom I
have just mentioned. Many times I have seen his good work for the Lord, and I know
that he is eager to serve the Lord. Now, because he knows for sure that you want
to give this gift the same as other believers do, he is even more eager than he was
before to go with the two other men. 23 As for Titus, I have chosen him because he
is my partner, and he has worked faithfully with me to help you. As for the other
two men, the congregations in this area are sending them as their messengers. These
two men honor Christ by everything they do. 24 So then, show them that you truly
love others, and in that way help other congregations to understand why we (exc) are
always saying such good things about you.
9
You and I will be ashamed if your gift is not ready when I arrive.
2 Corinthians 9:1-5
1 Now I want to write more about the gift of money [EUP] that you and other believers
are preparing to send to the believers in Judea province. I do not really need to continue
writing to you about it, 2 because I already know that you really want to help them. In
fact, I have been boasting about you, telling the believers here in Macedonia province
that you people in Achaia province have been ready to help, since last year. As a result,
because you are very eager to help the believers in Judea province, you have made
most of the believers here in Macedonia province also want to give a gift. 3 However,
I am sending Titus and the other two believers in order that they will be able to help
you finish collecting the money. Then when I and others arrive later, the people with me
will see for themselves that the things that I have been boasting about you are true
[LIT]. I want you to have your gift ready for us(exc) to take to Jerusalem, just like I have
been telling others that you were ready. 4 When I come, if any of the believers from
Macedonia come with me, I do not want them to find that your gift is [MTY, EUP] not
ready. If that were to happen, I would be very ashamed, and you yourselves would
be even more ashamed. 5 So that is why I felt that it was necessary to urge these three
believers to go and visit you before I come. In that way, they would be able to help
you finish collecting the generous gift [EUP] that had been promised by you {you had
said you would give}. If you do that, not only will the gift be ready by the time that
we arrive, but everyone will see that you have given because you really want to give,
and not because anyone has forced you to give.
If you give generously and willingly, God will always continue to bless you so that
you will have enough to continue giving generously, and your generosity will cause
many other people to praise and honor God.
2 Corinthians 9:6-15
6 Do not forget this: “A farmer who sows only a few seeds will not gather/reap a
large harvest, but the one who sows a lot of seeds will gather/reap a large harvest2 CORINTHIANS 9:7
1704
2 CORINTHIANS 10:4
[MET].” Similarly, if you give just a little to help others, God will give you only a few
blessings. But if you give willingly and cheerfully to help people, you will receive in
return many blessings from God. 7 Each of you should decide how much you (sg)
should give, and then give that amount. You (sg) should not be thinking to yourself,
“I really do not want to give this money.” And you(sg) should not give just because
someone tells you to give. Instead, you should give willingly and cheerfully, because
God loves those who give cheerfully. 8 Moreover, God can enable you to give to others
cheerfully. If you give that way, God will in return give you many good blessings. He
will do that so that at all times you will always have everything that you need. Indeed,
you will have even more than you need. As a result, you will be able to do many more
good things to help others. 9 Those who give willingly and cheerfully will be rewarded
like the man about whom it is written {about whom ◄someone/the Psalmist► wrote}
in the Scriptures,
He generously helps others,
he gives to those who are poor.
God will remember the good things that he did,
and reward him with good things forever.
10 God always gives seeds to farmers to plant, and also gives them food to eat. So,
similarly, God will always make it possible for you to have enough money [MET], so
that you will be able more and more to generously help those who are needy. 11 God
will give you many blessings in many different ways as a result of your generously
helping others. Furthermore, the generous gift that you are getting ready for us (exc)
to take to the believers in Judea province will cause many people to thank God.
12 Also remember that when you give money to [EUP] help God’s people, you not only
give them what they need, but also, because of that, many people will thank God very
much for you and for what you have done. 13 As a result of your giving money to help
others, they will praise God, not only because you have believed the good message
about Christ, but also because you have generously given some of your possessions
so that they and other believers will all have ◄enough/their needs supplied►. 14 Also,
when they pray for you, asking God to bless you, they will remember how grateful they
are [IDM] that God caused you to give very willingly and cheerfully. 15 Finally, we
should all thank God because he gave us the greatest gift of all when he sent his Son to
save/rescue us(inc) ◄from the guilt of our sin/from being punished for our sin►. That
is a gift too wonderful for anyone to be able to tell about completely!
10
I Paul say to you, “Do not listen to those who say that I am afraid to rebuke you
when I am with you and that I behave like people do who are not believers.”
2 Corinthians 10:1-6
1 Now I myself, Paul, appeal to you in a gentle and humble way, like Christ would.
Certain people among you have falsely accused me by saying, “When Paul is with you,
he is humble and speaks gently to you, but when he is away from you, in the letters
he writes to you he threatens to punish you.” Those people claim that I do not have
authority over you as an apostle. 2 I strongly plead with you, “Please do not listen to
people who say things like that!” I strongly plead with you not to listen to them, so that
when I am there with you I will not need to speak severely to you in the same severe
way as I plan to speak to those people who think that I behave like people who are
not believers. 3 Remember that although I am human like everyone else in the world, I
do not fight against those who oppose me in the way that people who are not believers
fight those who oppose them. 4 I will tell you what I mean by that: Just like soldiers2 CORINTHIANS 10:5
1705
2 CORINTHIANS 10:16
use various weapons to fight their enemies [MET], I ◄fight against/oppose► those who
oppose God’s message, but I do it in a different way. I do not use human arguments
and clever/sweet talk, like unbelievers do. Instead, I fight against my opponents with
the powerful means that God has given me. With that power I destroy their arguments
against God’s message and against me, just like soldiers destroy [MET] the fortresses
of their enemies. 5 Specifically, I show that the human arguments that they use to
deceive people are completely wrong. When they proudly say things that keep other
people from knowing God, I show them that they are completely wrong. I also enable
people to change their ways of thinking so that they think about everything as Christ
wants them to think. 6 I am also ready to discipline everyone among you who has not
obeyed the things that Christ taught. I will do this as soon as you who truly want to
obey Christ show me that you are going to obey him completely.
Those who teach what is false must come to realize that I also belong to Christ and
that God has given me authority over you. I worry that they will deceive you and that
you will stop being faithful to Christ alone.
2 Corinthians 10:7—11:6
7 I want you to understand what is happening among you. There are certain people
there who are telling you that they know for sure that they are Christ’s representatives
and that I am not. Those people should realize that I represent Christ as much as they
do. 8 I say that because the authority that the Lord gave me as his apostle is to help
you to become mature believers, not to cause you to stop trusting in Christ. So even
if I were to boast a little more than I have already done (OR, proudly talk a little more
than I have already talked about the authority the Lord gave me as his apostle), no
one would be able to make me ashamed by proving that Jesus has not given me that
authority. 9 I do not intend to make you afraid of me by the letters that I write to you.
10 I say that because some people are saying, “When Paul writes letters, he says severe
things in order to make you obey him, but when he is here with you, people look at
him and say he is weak, and he certainly is not a skillful speaker.” 11 The people who
say such things should think carefully about this: The kind of severe person that you
think me to be when you read my letters is exactly the kind of person I will be when
I come. I will do what I wrote that I would do.
12 Those who oppose me tell others how good they are. If they really were superior
to me [IRO], I would not be so bold as to say that I was equal to them, or to compare
myself with them. But they are not superior to me. They make up their own standards
about what God’s servants should be like, and then they look at their own conduct and
decide whether or not they meet those standards. By doing that, they show that they
are foolish. 13 But as for me, I will not boast about working among people living in
areas outside of the areas that God sent/assigned me to work in. But it is right for me
to say that I have worked in the areas that God assigned to me. And since those areas
include the one where you live, 14 when I talk about working among you, I am not
boasting about working in an area where God did not give me the right to work. What
those who oppose me say about my not having authority as an apostle to you might be
true if I had not already come all the way to your area. But that is not true, because
I was the one who first brought the message about Christ to you. I came to Corinth
before they did!
15 Also, my opponents boast about work that others have done as if it were their
own work. It is improper for them to do that, but I do not do as they do. I confidently
expect that as you trust more and more in the gospel that I preach, you will more and
more agree that God has given me the right to work as Christ’s representative among
you. 16 Then I will be able to go to places beyond where you are. I will be able to2 CORINTHIANS 10:17
1706
2 CORINTHIANS 11:10
tell the good message about Christ to people in areas where no one has yet gone to tell
that message. And I will be able to talk about the work I myself have done in that area,
instead of boasting about work that someone else has already done as if it were my
work. 17 I try to do according to what someone/Jeremiah wrote in the Scriptures,
If anyone wants to boast about something, he should boast only about what the Lord
God has done.
18 You can realize, then, that it is not those who ◄praise themselves/tell you what
great things they have done►, as my opponents do, whom you should accept as
apostles. Instead, you should accept as true apostles only those whom the Lord
commends.
11
1 But now, because my opponents are saying that Christ sent them to you as his
representatives and that he did not send me, please be patient with me, too, while I
say a few things that may sound as if [IRO] I am praising myself, like a foolish person
would do. You have been ◄putting up with/tolerating► those who teach what is false;
now then, ◄put up with/tolerate► me too. 2 I really do care about what happens to
you, just as God cares about what happens to you. Just like a father wants his daughter
to be sexually pure when he presents her to the man she will marry [MET], I want you
to belong to Christ alone and to no other. I want to present you to him as people who
remain faithful to him only, and who have not believed the deceitful message of those
who are teaching what is false. 3 However, just like Satan, when he cunningly appeared
as a snake, deceived Eve and caused her to disobey the Lord God, I am concerned that
those teachers will cause you to think wrongly so that you will no longer be faithful
to Christ alone. 4 I say that because some people have come among you who are
teaching their own thoughts about Jesus. They are saying about him things that are
entirely different from what I taught you. They are urging you to receive a powerful
spirit who would come to live in you, but it is not the same Spirit that you received
from God when you believed in Christ. They preach what they call a good message, and
you accept their message, even though it is not the same as the good message about
Christ that you heard from me. And you have gladly accepted them and their message!
5 I consider that [LIT] none of those men, even though they think of themselves as being
[IRO] extra-special apostles, are in any way greater than I am. 6 I admit that I am not
an eloquent speaker, but I do know God’s message. I have made that clear to you by
everything that I have done among you and by everything that I have taught you.
You are mistaken if you think that I do not love you because I refused to accept
money from you for my teaching. I will go on doing that to prevent those false apostles
among you from boasting that they work just as I do.
2 Corinthians 11:7-15
7 I refused to accept money from you as pay for teaching you God’s message about
Christ. ◄It is ridiculous for you to think that what I did was wrong!/Was that wrong?►
[RHQ] I know that by teaching you without pay, I made myself seem [IRO] unimportant
to you. But I did it to honor you. 8 Some people might say that it was as though [IRO] I
was robbing other congregations because I accepted money from them in order that
I might work among you. 9 Furthermore, when I was there with you and had no
money to buy the things that I needed, I did not cause any of you ◄to have difficulties
by my depending on you/by asking you for money/support►, because our (inc) fellow
believers who came from here in Macedonia province brought enough money for me
to buy everything that I needed. So I have not caused you any difficulty at all by asking
you for money, and I never will ask you for money [EUP]. 10 And as sure as you know2 CORINTHIANS 11:11
1707
2 CORINTHIANS 11:25
that everything that Christ says is true, you can be sure that what I say to you now
is true. Wherever I go there in Achaia province, I do not let you believers pay me for
doing God’s work among you. And no one will be able to prevent me from boasting
about that. 11 No one should wrongly [RHQ] think that it is because I do not love you
that I do not take pay from you. God knows that you truly/really are very dear to me.
12 There are some men there among you who would like to be able to say boastfully
that they work among you just as I do. So, in order to make it impossible [IDM] for
them to say that, I have refused to accept pay from you, and I will continue doing that.
13 Those men are lying when they say that they are apostles. They work deceitfully.
Even though they say that they work for God, they are working only for themselves.
They try to make people think that Christ sent them as his apostles, but they do not
truly represent him. 14 I am not surprised that they act like that, because Satan himself
causes people to think that he has come as a shining messenger from God. 15 So it
should not surprise you if these men, who really serve Satan, do good things in order
to make you think they serve God. Some day God will punish them according to what
they deserve because of the evil things that they do.
You seem to listen to those who boast, so I too will boast. I will boast about being a
Jew (as those others do), and I will boast about having suffered greatly for Christ, and
about an extraordinary vision that God gave me. Although God caused me to suffer an
affliction, he promised that he would help me and strengthen me.
2 Corinthians 11:16—12:10
16 I say again: I do not want any of you to think that my boasting about myself is
like foolish people boast. But even if anyone thinks that I am boasting about myself
like a foolish person boasts, listen to what I have to say anyway, just like you listen
to those false apostles. They really speak foolishly! Listen to me while I also boast
a little. 17 About the things that I am going to tell you, boasting confidently about
myself, surely you know that they are not the kind of things that the Lord Jesus would
say. Instead, I will speak as a foolish person would speak. 18 Because many among you
are boasting about their own work, as unbelievers do, I will also boast about myself
and my work [MTY, IRO]. 19 I am sure that you, who think that you are so wise, will
accept what I say because you gladly accept the false teachers and the foolish things
that they say. 20 When people treat you as if they were your bosses, you gladly submit
to them. You think that it is all right when others force you to provide for their needs.
You think that it is all right when people take control over you, when they boast about
themselves, or when they insult you by slapping you in the face. 21 I agree that I was
not bold enough to treat you in such ways. Ha! Do you think that [IRO] I should feel
ashamed because I did not do that?
So now, talking like a person who does not have any sense, I will boldly tell you
some things about myself, just like those false apostles tell you things about themselves.
22 Do they tell you that they are Hebrews and can speak the Hebrew language? Well, I
can say the same thing about myself. Do they tell you that they belong to God’s people,
the nation of Israel? Well, I can say the same thing about myself. Do they tell you that
they are descendants of our great ancestor Abraham? Well, he is my ancestor, too.
23 Do they tell you how much work they have done for Christ? Now I am talking like a
crazy person talks [EUP]. Well, I work for Christ much more than they do. I have been
in prison many more times than they have. Many times I have been beaten {people
have beaten me} very severely because I believe in and obey Christ. Many times I
almost died because of serving Christ. 24 On five occasions Jewish religious leaders
beat me 39 times with a whip. 25 On three occasions I was beaten {Roman officials
beat me} with wooden sticks. On one occasion a large crowd of people threw stones2 CORINTHIANS 11:26
1708
2 CORINTHIANS 12:7
at me to kill me. On three occasions the ship that I was traveling on was wrecked and
sank. On one of those occasions I was floating in the water a night and a day before
I was rescued. 26 As I have often traveled to other places, I have often risked losing
my life. For example, sometimes I have been in danger crossing rivers. I have been in
danger traveling in places where there were bandits. At times I have been in danger
among people of my own nation, the Jews, and at other times I been in danger among
those who are not Jews. I have been in danger in cities, and I have been in dangerous
situations in barren areas. I have been in dangerous situations when I was traveling
in ships. I have been in danger among people who falsely claim to be fellow believers.
27 I have worked very hard [DOU] to earn ◄a living/what I need►, and often I did not
sleep. At times I was hungry and thirsty, and at times I did not have enough time
to eat. Sometimes I was cold because I did not have enough clothes to wear. 28 In
addition to all that, I am constantly and deeply concerned about all the congregations
that I have helped to begin. 29 Every time that I hear about fellow believers [RHQ] who
are not strong spiritually, I sympathize with them and try to help them. Every time
that I learn about a fellow believer [RHQ] who causes another believer to do something
wrong, that makes me very angry.
30 Because it seems that it is necessary for me to continue boasting about myself, I
will boast about things that caused some people to think of me as being weak. 31 God,
who is the Father of our (inc) Lord Jesus, and who is the one whom we should praise
forever, knows that I am not lying about this. 32 One time when I was in Damascus
city, the governor whom King Aretas had appointed to rule part of his area, told his
soldiers to guard the gates of the city so that they could seize me if I tried to leave
the city. 33 But my friends helped me to escape by putting me in a large basket and
lowering me to the ground by a rope through an opening in the city wall. That was
really humiliating!
12
1 It seems that I must go on boasting about myself. Although I do not think that my
telling you about this will help you to accept me as Christ’s representative to you, I will
say this anyway. I will tell you about visions that the Lord gave a certain man and
about things that he supernaturally revealed to that man. I will tell you this because
some of the people among you boast that it was in visions that they received the things
that they teach. 2 The man that I will tell you about is one who believes in Christ.
Fourteen years ago he was taken {Christ took him} up into the third heaven, the
highest heaven, the place where God is. I do not know whether he went there in his
physical body or whether he was outside of his body at that time and only his spirit
went. Only God really knows. 3-4 But he was suddenly taken {Christ suddenly took
him} up to a place called Paradise, that wonderful place where God lives. I repeat that
I do not know whether his body went there or only his spirit. Only God knows that.
While he was there, God told him some things that he does not allow human beings to
tell others about. 5 I will proudly talk about that man. However, I will not be boasting
as I say that I am the one who saw and heard those wonderful things. I will talk only
about the things that cause others to think of me as a weak human being like everyone
else. 6 But even if I should choose to boast to you about such wonderful things that
happened to me, I would not be speaking like a fool, because I would be telling you
the truth. But I will not talk proudly about such things, because I do not want any of
you to think highly of me because of the things that have happened to me. Instead, I
want you to decide what kind of person I am by the way you see me acting and by what
you hear me teach. 7 In order that I might not become proud because of those many2 CORINTHIANS 12:8
1709
2 CORINTHIANS 12:18
wonderful things that Christ revealed to me, God permitted Satan to send a messenger
to humble me (OR, to make me sick). What that messenger did to me was painful, like
[MET] a thorn pricking my body. 8 Three times I prayed to the Lord about it, begging
him to take this away from me. 9 But he said to me, “No, I will not take this away
from you. Instead, I will kindly help you, and that will be all that you need, because
it is when you are weak that I can best work powerfully to help you.” So, because of
what the Lord said to me, I will very gladly boast about the things that make me seem
weak, so that people may realize that it is Christ who gives me power to serve him.
10 For that reason, whenever I am weak, or when people insult me, or when I have
to endure hardships, or when I am persecuted {people cause me to suffer}, or when I
am in situations that distress me, I am content because I am serving Christ. I can say
that because at any time when I myself am weak, that is the very time when Christ
powerfully helps me.
When I was with you, I did things that showed you that I am truly Christ’s
representative. But I still will not take pay from you when I come to visit you again.
And those people are wrong who say that I tricked you by sending Titus to get money
for myself from you.
2 Corinthians 12:11-18
11 It has been foolish for me to talk about myself like this, but it is you who forced me
to do it. Truly if the Lord would not help me, I would be worthless, as my opponents say
that I am. But none of the men whom you wrongfully think [IRO] are great apostles
are greater in any way than I am. So it would have been right/proper for you to
say good things about me. 12 You should have done that, because when I was with
you I repeatedly did the things that showed you that I am truly an apostle, such as
performing many [DOU] miracles. 13 And I have certainly treated you as well as I
treated the other congregations that I helped to start. Or do you think that by not
asking you to pay me for my work, I was not treating you as well as I treated the
other congregations? ◄It is foolish for you to think that [IRO] it was wrong for me
not to ask for pay from you for my work, and therefore I should ask you to forgive me
for that!/Do you think that it was wrong for me not to ask for pay from you for my
work, and therefore I should ask you to forgive me for that?► [RHQ]
14 Now listen to me! It is time for me to come to you for a third visit. When I
come, I still will not insist that you pay me for my work, because I do not want any of
your money [EUP]! What I want is for you [MTY] to love and appreciate me. It is not
normally the duty of children to save money to provide for the needs of their parents.
Instead, it is the duty of parents to provide for their children [MET]. In the same way,
it is not your duty to provide for me. Instead, it is my duty to provide spiritual help
for you because you are my spiritual children. 15 So, for my part, as a good parent
would do, I will be very happy to use everything that I have, and do everything that I
possibly can, in order to help you. And because I love you very much, ◄I will be very
disappointed if you do not love me a little bit, too./will you not love me a little bit,
too?► [RHQ]
16 You all know that I did not depend on you to provide for my needs. However, there
are some who accuse me, saying that [IRO] I was very clever and got money from you
by tricking you. 17 But did I ever do that? No! I never [RHQ] asked any of the men
whom I sent to you to get money from you and bring it to me 18 Titus went and visited
you because I urged him to do so. I also sent the other believer, whom you know, to
go with Titus. You know that Titus did not [RHQ] trick you in order to get money from
you. And you certainly know that he and I have always [RHQ] acted in exactly the
same honest way towards you.2 CORINTHIANS 12:19
1710
2 CORINTHIANS 13:7
I am worried that when I visit you I will find that many of you are still sinning. I
pray that God will help you turn from your sinful behavior, so that I will not have to
discipline you when I come.
2 Corinthians 12:19—13:10
19 While you have been reading this letter, if you have been thinking that I have
just been saying these things to defend myself against those who accuse me, you are
wrong. I have been saying these things honestly, knowing that God is listening to me.
I also speak as one who has a close relationship with Christ. Everything that I do
and everything that I say is to help you whom I love ◄to grow spiritually/ to become
spiritually mature►. 20 I have written this way to you because I worry that when I
come to visit you, I will see that some of you are not conducting your lives the way
that I want you to. If that is so, when I get there you will see that I will have to act in
a very severe way toward you, and I am sure that you do not want that. Specifically, I
am afraid that some of you may be quarreling, or that you are being jealous of each
other, or that you quickly get very angry with them, or that you are acting selfishly,
or that some of you are saying bad things about others, or that you are ◄spreading
false rumors/saying false things► about each other, or that you are acting proudly, or
that you are doing things in a disorderly manner. 21 I ◄feel anxious/am concerned►
about you. I worry that when I visit you again, God, the one whom I serve, will
make me feel ashamed of you when I see that you still are not conducting your lives
as believers should. Then I will feel very sad about some of you who were sinning
previously and have not stopped your sinful behavior. Some of you may still have
impure thoughts. Some of you may be having sexual intercourse with those to whom
you are not married. And some of you may be doing other shameful things.
13
1 In the Scriptures it is stated that when one person accuses another of wrongdoing,
you must not believe his accusation right away. First, you must listen to at least two or
three people who actually saw what happened. So keep in mind that this will be the
third time that I will visit you! 2 When I visited you the second time, I warned you
that I was going to punish all the wrongdoers among you. And now I am warning you
again while I am still away from you. When I visit you this third time, I will punish
those who were sinning at the time when I visited you before and who are still sinning,
and I will punish the others who have been sinning since then, if they have not stopped
their sinful behavior. 3 Because you have demanded that I prove to you that Christ is
speaking to you when I speak to you, I will show you that I speak to you as his apostle.
Christ does not approve of your sinful behavior. On the contrary, he will powerfully
discipline you. 4 It is true that Christ seemed to be weak when he was crucified {when
people killed him by nailing him to the cross}. But it is also true that he now lives
because God worked powerfully to bring him back to life. Similarly, as I serve God,
I also am a weak human being as Christ was. But I also have a close relationship
with Christ who is now alive again. And with his authority I will use God’s power to
discipline you.
5 Each of you should ask yourself: “Do I believe God’s message about Christ?” Each
of you should examine yourselves to make sure that you truly do believe in Christ
and so truly belong to him, and that his Spirit lives in you (pl). When you examine
yourselves in that way, I am sure that you will [RHQ] say to me, “Yes, of course we
belong to Christ.” 6 I am also certain that you will know that I belong to Christ, just like
you do. 7 But because I do not want to have to punish you, I am praying to God that he
will help you not to do anything evil that would cause me to have to punish you. I pray2 CORINTHIANS 13:8
1711
2 CORINTHIANS 13:14
this, not in order that when people who say that I am not your apostle realize that
my ministry among you has been very successful, they will have to agree that I do have
authority from Christ. Instead, I pray this because I want you to do what is right, even
though that might mean that my opponents would think that I do not have authority
from Christ, since I would not have an opportunity to show my authority to discipline
you. 8 If you do what is right, I will not discipline you, because it would not be right
for me to do that if you are conducting your lives the way you should, like God’s true
message says that you should. What God asks me to do is to help people to know and
obey his true message. 9 I am happy whenever you are strongly trusting and obeying
Christ, and because of that I do not have to use my authority to discipline you. It does
not matter to me if that makes people think that I do not have any authority. Truly,
what I am praying for is that God will help you to completely change your conduct.
10 That is why I am writing these things while I am still away from you. What I want
is that when I visit you, you will already be conducting your lives as God wants you
to, and so I will not have to discipline you severely, as the Lord Jesus Christ gave me
the authority to do. The authority that I have from the Lord is to help you to become
spiritually mature believers, not to cause you to stop trusting in him.
I finish my letter with some advice. All of us here send you our greetings, and I pray
that God will bless you.
2 Corinthians 13:11-14
11 Finally, my fellow believers, I say to you, be joyful. Completely change how you
conduct your lives, and do what I have urged you to do. Be united in what you think
about the matters about which I have written to you. Live peacefully with each other.
If you do those things, God, who enables you to love each other and be peaceful, will
bless [MTY] you. 12 Greet each other affectionately as fellow members of God’s family
should. 13 All God’s people here send you greetings. 14 I pray that the Lord Jesus Christ
will act kindly toward all of you, in ways that you do not deserve, that God will show
all of you how much he loves you, and that the Holy Spirit will cause you to have good
fellowship with him and with each other.GALATIANS 1:1
1712
GALATIANS 1:12
This book is a letter that the Apostle Paul wrote to the
Christians in Galatia province. We call this book
Galatians
Galatians 1:1-5
I, Paul, as God’s chosen apostle, am sending this letter to the churches in Galatia
and asking God’s blessings on you.
1 I, Paul, write this letter to you. I remind you that I am an apostle. That is not
because a group of people appointed me, nor because a human being sent me to be
an apostle. Instead, Jesus Christ and God our heavenly Father, who caused Jesus to
become alive again after he died, have appointed and sent me to be an apostle. 2 All
the fellow believers who are here with me approve of this message that I am writing.
I am sending this letter to the congregations that are in Galatia province. 3 I pray that
God, our Father, and the Lord Jesus Christ will kindly help you and enable you to
have inner peace. 4 Christ offered himself as a sacrifice in order that he might remove
the guilt for our sins. He did that in order that he might enable us to not do the evil
things that people who do not know him do. He did this because God, who is our
Father, wanted it. 5 I pray that people will praise God forever. ◄May it be so!/Amen!►
I am disappointed that you are believing a message that is not the good news about
Christ, and I ask God to eternally punish those who are teaching such a message.
Galatians 1:6-10
6 I am very disappointed [IRO] that so soon after you trusted in Christ you have
turned away from God. He chose you in order that you might have what Christ freely/
kindly gives. I am also disappointed that so soon you are believing a different message
which some say is “good news.” 7 Their message is not a true message. What is
happening is that certain persons are confusing your minds. They are desiring to
change the good message ◄that Christ revealed/about Christ► and are creating another
message. 8 But even if we (exc) apostles or an angel from heaven would tell you a
message that is different from the good message that we told you before, I appeal to
God that he punish such a person forever. 9 As I told you previously, so now I tell
you this once more: Someone is telling you what he says is a good message, but it
is a message that is different from the good message that I gave you. So I appeal to
God that he severely punish that person. 10 I said that because [RHQ] I do not desire
that people approve me, contrary to what some have said about me. It is God whom
I desire to approve me. Specifically, I do not say and do [RHQ] things just to please
people. If it were still people whom I was trying to please, then I would not be one
who willingly and completely serves Christ.
It was Jesus Christ, not any human, who revealed the message that I proclaim.
Galatians 1:11-12
11 My fellow believers, I want you to know that the message about Christ that I
proclaim to people is not one that some person created/thought up. 12 I did not receive
this message from a human messenger, and no human being taught it to me. Instead,
Jesus Christ revealed it to me.
For 17 years after God showed his Son to me, I had no contact with the apostles.
Galatians 1:13-24GALATIANS 1:13
1713
GALATIANS 2:6
13 People have told you how I used to behave when I practiced the Jewish religion.
They told you that I continually did very harmful things to the groups of believers
that God established, and they told you that I tried to get rid of those people. 14 I
practiced the Jewish religion more thoroughly than many other Jews who were my
age practiced it. I much more enthusiastically tried to get others to obey the traditions
that my ancestors kept. 15 Nevertheless, before I was born, God ◄set me apart/selected
me►. He chose me to live eternally, something that I did not deserve. 16 He wanted me
to know that Jesus is ◄his Son/the man who is also God►, so that I would tell others
the message about him in regions where non-Jews live. But I did not immediately
go to any human beings [SYN] in order to gain an understanding of that message. I
received it directly from Christ!! 17 I did not immediately leave Damascus and go to
Jerusalem for that purpose to those who were apostles before I was. Instead, I went
away to Arabia region, a desert area. Later I returned once more to Damascus city.
18 Then three years after God revealed this good message to me, I went up to Jerusalem
in order that I might meet Peter. But I stayed with him for only 15 days, which was
not long enough for him to teach me thoroughly about Christ. 19 I also saw James, the
brother of our Lord Jesus and the leader of the believers there, but I did not see any
other apostle. 20 God knows that what I am writing to you is completely true [LIT]!
21 After I left Jerusalem, I went to the regions of Syria and Cilicia. 22 At that time,
people in the Christian congregations that are in Judea province still had not met me
[SYN] personally. 23 They only heard others say about me repeatedly, “Paul, the one
who was formerly doing harmful things to us, is now telling the same message which
we believe and which formerly he was trying ◄to destroy/to cause people to stop
believing►!” 24 And they praised God because of what had happened to me.
2
Finally, when I returned to Jerusalem and told Peter, James, and John what I always
proclaim, they agreed that Barnabas and I were preaching the same message and
serving the Lord just like they were.
Galatians 2:1-10
1 After 14 years passed, I went up again to Jerusalem with Barnabas. I took Titus
also. 2 But I tell you that I went up there because of what God revealed to me. It
was not because someone there asked me to come. I told people what was the good
message that I was preaching in regions where non-Jews live. But I talked privately
to those whom your new teachers highly respect. I did that in order that what I
was doing and what I had done [MET] might not become useless [MET] as a result of
people rejecting my message because they thought that I was teaching something that
was not true. 3 But even though the leaders of the believers usually insisted that when
non-Jews trusted in Christ someone must circumcise them, they did not even insist
that Titus be circumcised, even though he was a Greek man who was with me. 4 I
talked to them privately because some people successfully pretended that they were
fellow believers and associated with the true believers. They did that in order that
they might observe closely what we do because we are free from having to obey all
the Jewish laws and rituals because of our close relationship with Christ Jesus [MET].
Those people wanted to make us like slaves [MET] of those rituals by convincing us
that we cannot trust Christ solely but that we must also obey all the Jewish rituals.
5 But not even briefly did we (exc) do what they wanted about circumcision. We(exc)
resisted them in order that the truth of the message about Christ might continue to
benefit you. 6 The leaders in Jerusalem, whom your new teachers respect, did not add
anything to what I preach. And I would add that what status those leaders had didGALATIANS 2:7
1714
GALATIANS 2:17
not influence me, because God does not favor certain/important persons [IDM] more
than others. 7 Instead of those leaders adding to the message that I tell people, they
understood that I had been given the good message {God had given the good message
to me} so that I might proclaim it to the non-Jews [MTY], just like God had given the
good message to Peter so that he might tell it to those who are Jews [MTY]. 8 That is,
just like God had empowered/authorized Peter in order that he might be an apostle
to bring God’s message to the Jews [MTY], he also had empowered/authorized me in
order that I might be an apostle to bring his message to the non-Jews. 9 And those
leaders knew that God had kindly given to me this special work. So James, Peter, and
John, the ones whom your new teachers respect because they are leaders [MET] of the
believers, shook hands with us [IDM] to show that they agreed that Barnabas and I are
serving the Lord just like they are, and that we are preaching the same message that they
are preaching. They also agreed that we (exc) are the ones whom God was sending
to tell his message to non-Jews, but that God is sending them to tell his message to
Jews [MTY]. 10 They merely urged that we (exc) still remember to help the poor fellow
believers who live in Jerusalem. That is exactly what I have been eager to do.
Later I rebuked Peter for not behaving according to the gospel, in that he was
encouraging non-Jews to adopt Jewish laws and rituals.
Galatians 2:11-21
11 But later while I was at Antioch city, after Peter came there, I told him directly
[SYN] that what he was doing was wrong. 12 This is what happened: Peter went to
Antioch and started eating regularly with non-Jewish believers there. Later there were
certain Jewish believers who came to Antioch who claimed that James, the leader of
the congregations in Jerusalem, had sent them. But when those certain men came,
Peter gradually quit eating with the non-Jewish believers and would not associate
with them. He was afraid that the Jewish believers from Jerusalem would criticize him
for associating with non-Jews. 13 Also, the other Jewish believers who were in Antioch
[SYN] acted ◄insincerely/in a way that they knew was not right► along with Peter.
The result was that they convinced even Barnabas to stop associating with the non-
Jewish believers! 14 But when I realized that they were not acting according to the
truth of the message about Christ, when all the fellow believers there were present, I
told Peter the following: “Although you (sg) are a Jew, you often conduct yourself like
non-Jews do by disregarding Jewish laws about food. When you are among non-Jews,
you (sg) do not customarily conduct yourself at all like Jews do. So, ◄now it is wrong
that you (sg) are causing non-Jews to think that they must obey all the Jewish rituals
and customs!/why are you (sg) causing non-Jews to think that they must obey all the
Jewish rituals and customs?► [RHQ]” 15 Some of us believers were born as Jews. We
(exc) were not born as non-Jews. We Jews have always considered non-Jews to be
‘sinners’ because they do not obey the Jewish rituals and laws. 16 But we (exc) now
know that it is not because some person obeys the laws that God gave to Moses that
God erases the record of that person’s sins. God erases the record of a person’s sins
only if that person trusts in what Jesus Christ has done. Even we (exc) Jews trusted
Christ Jesus. We (exc) did that in order that God would erase the record of our
sins because of our trusting Christ, and not because of our obeying the laws that
God gave to Moses. God has said that he will never erase the record of people’s sins
just because of their obeying those laws. 17 Furthermore, because we (exc) Jews
desired that God would erase the record of our sins because of our relationship with
Christ, it means that we realized that we ourselves were sinners like non-Jews, whom
we called sinners, because we(exc) also were not obeying the Jewish rituals and laws.
But ◄we(inc) certainly cannot conclude that it is Christ who causes us to sin./shouldGALATIANS 2:18
1715
GALATIANS 3:8
we conclude that it is Christ who causes us to sin?► [RHQ] No, Christ certainly does
not cause anyone to sin.
18 So if I should again believe that God would erase the record of my sins because of
my obeying the laws that he gave to Moses [MET], I would be like a man who rebuilds
an old building that he tore down. It would soon be clear that I am one who disobeys
those same laws that God gave to Moses. 19 When I realized that I could not earn God’s
favor by obeying the laws that he gave to Moses, I decided not to respond to what those
laws demanded [MET], just like a dead person does not respond to anything. Now I
live to honor/serve God. 20 It is as though I was with Christ when he was crucified
{died on the cross} [MET] (OR, It is as though my old way of life ended when Christ
died on the cross.) No longer am I directing the way I behave as I did before I believed
in Christ. Now Christ is directing how I behave. And whatever I do now while I live,
I do it trusting in God’s Son. He is the one who loved me and offered himself as a
sacrifice for me. 21 I am not rejecting as useless what God did for me ◄kindly/that I did
not deserve►, as my opponents are doing. I fully accept that God saved me by acting
kindly towards me. If it is because people obey the laws that God gave to Moses that
God erases the record of their sins, then Christ died ◄for nothing/needlessly►.
3
Because you trusted in Christ, not because you obeyed the laws God gave Moses, you
received the Holy Spirit and now experience his working among you.
Galatians 3:1-5
1 You fellow believers who live in Galatia are very foolish! ◄Someone must have put
an evil spell on you!/Did someone put an evil spell on you?► [RHQ] I clearly explained
to you [SYN] what Jesus Christ accomplished when he was crucified {he died on the
cross}. 2 So, I want you to tell me one thing: Do you think that it was because you
obeyed the laws God gave Moses that you received the Holy Spirit? Do you not know
that [RHQ] it was because when you heard the good message concerning Christ, you
trusted in him? 3 ◄You are acting so foolishly/Why are you being so foolish?► [RHQ]!
You first became Christians as a result of God’s Spirit enabling you. So, ◄you should
not now think that it is by what you yourselves do that you will continue to grow
spiritually/do you now think it is by your own human efforts that you will continue
to grow spiritually?!► [RHQ] 4 Keep in mind that if what God has done for you was
because of your obeying the laws that God gave to Moses and not because of trusting
in Christ, when others caused you to suffer, you suffered many things needlessly!
[RHQ] I certainly hope that you did not suffer like that needlessly. 5 When God now
generously gives to you his Spirit and performs miracles among you, do you think
that it is [RHQ] because you obey the laws that God gave to Moses? Surely you know
that it is because when you heard the good message about Christ, you trusted in him
[RHQ]!
It is those Jews and non-Jews who trust Christ who are Abraham’s spiritual
descendants, because those who seek to be justified by obeying the laws that God gave
Moses are condemned by God.
Galatians 3:6-12
6 What you have experienced is as Moses wrote in the Scriptures about Abraham. He
wrote that Abraham trusted God, and as a result, he was considered as being righteous
{God erased the record of his sins}. 7 You must realize, therefore, that it is those who
trust in what Christ has done who are like Abraham’s descendants [MET] because
they trust in God as Abraham did. 8 Furthermore, God planned beforehand that it
was when non-Jews trusted him that he would erase the record of their sins. MosesGALATIANS 3:9
1716
GALATIANS 3:18
wrote in the Scriptures [PRS] this good message that God told Abraham: “Because
of what you did, I will bless people in [MTY] all nations.” 9 So, we can conclude that
it is those who trust in what Christ has done whom God blesses. That includes all
non-Jews and Jews who trust him, along with Abraham, the one who trusted him long
ago. 10 That is, God will eternally punish all those who mistakenly think that God will
erase the record of their sins as a result of their obeying the laws that God gave to
Moses. What is written in the Scriptures is that God will eternally punish everyone
who does not continuously and completely obey all the laws that Moses wrote. 11 But
God has declared that if he erases the record of anyone’s sins, it will not be as a result
of their obeying the laws God gave Moses. This is evident because the Scriptures say,
“Every person whose record of sins God erases because that person trusts God will
live spiritually.” 12 But when God gave his laws to the Jews, he did not say that a person
must trust him. Instead, God said that it is those who obey all God’s laws, continuously
and completely, who will live.
Christ was condemned instead of us, so that God might bless the non-Jews just as he
blessed Abraham, and so that we might receive the Spirit.
Galatians 3:13-14
13 Even though we humans have not continuously and completely obeyed God’s
laws, Christ rescued us from God punishing us eternally. Christ rescued us by
his being the one God condemned instead of God condemning us. What is written
{someone/Moses wrote} in the Scriptures shows that this is true. It is written {He
wrote}, “God has cursed anyone whom people have executed for his crimes and whose
body they have hung on a tree.” 14 Jesus Christ rescued us in order that as a result
of what he has done, God might bless the non-Jews, in a way similar to the way God
blessed Abraham. He also desired that as a result of our trusting Christ, we all might
receive the Spirit whom God promised to give to us.
By giving his laws to the Jews, God has not canceled what he promised to Abraham
much earlier concerning his descendant, Christ. Just like God gave his blessings to
Abraham just because he promised to do so, he freely gives his blessings to us.
Galatians 3:15-18
15 My fellow believers, I will now illustrate by referring to human relationships.
After an agreement is confirmed by two people {two people have signed an agreement},
no one can reject it or add to it. 16 God declared to Abraham and his descendant that
he was promising to give blessings to Abraham. The words that God spoke were not
“and your descendants.” He was not referring to many persons. Instead, he was
referring to one person, who is Christ, because the words that God spoke were, “and
your descendant.” 17 This is what I am saying: Since God gave the laws to the Jews 430
years after he declared to Abraham what he was promising to do for Abraham, those
laws do not cancel that agreement with Abraham that God himself had previously
agreed about [PRS]. 18 Remember that if it is because we obey God’s laws that he
gives to us what he has promised to give to us, then it is not just because he has
promised that he would give those things to us. God freely gave to Abraham what he
had promised to give to him, just because God had promised that he would give it to
him. Similarly, it is not because we obey God’s laws that God gives to us what he has
promised to give to us.
God gave his laws to supervise us sinful Jews until Christ, Abraham’s promised
descendant, would come.
Galatians 3:19-25GALATIANS 3:19
1717
GALATIANS 4:4
19 So, if someone should ask, “Why did God later give his laws to Moses?”
I would
reply that it was in order that people might realize how sinful they were. Those laws
were valid until Jesus came. He was the descendant that God was referring to when he
made the promises to Abraham. The laws were given {God gave his laws} to Moses
by God’s causing angels to speak to him. Moses was the mediator, the one who told
the laws to the people. 20 Now, when a mediator functions, one person is not speaking
with another directly; but God himself made his promises directly to Abraham.
21 If someone should ask, “When God gave his laws to Moses long after he told
Abraham what he was promising to give to him, was he changing his mind?” I would
reply that God certainly did not change his mind when he did that! If God had given
a law that could enable people to live eternally, then it actually would be because of
people obeying that law that God would erase the record of their sins. 22 But instead,
what we read in the Scriptures [PRS] is that God caused all people to be unable to
escape being punished for their sins [MET], just like people in prison are unable to
escape [PRS, MET]. God did that in order that he might give what he promised to those
who trust Jesus Christ, just because they trust him. 23 Before God revealed the good
message about trusting in Christ, the laws [PRS] that God gave to Moses were confining/
imprisoning us Jews [MET], as a prisoner in jail is confined. We were unable to escape
obeying those [MET] laws. This happened in order that we might believe the good
message concerning Christ, the message that God would reveal later. 24 Like a father
supervises his immature son by appointing a servant to take care of him [MET], God
was supervising us by his laws [MET, PRS] until Christ came. He did this in order
that he might erase the record of our sins only because we trust Christ. 25 But now
that God has revealed the message about trusting in Christ, the laws that God gave to
Moses are no longer supervising us Jews [PRS, MET].
Because of our relationship with Christ, we are Abraham’s spiritual descendants,
and God’s heirs, no longer like slaves.
Galatians 3:26-29
26 Now all of you Jews and non-Jews are as though you are God’s children because
you trusted Christ Jesus. 27 That is, you who began a relationship with Christ when
you were baptized identified yourselves [MET] with Christ. 28 If you are believers,
it does not matter to God if you are Jews or non-Jews; slaves or ones who are not
slaves; males or females, because all of you are as one sort of person because of your
relationship with Christ Jesus. 29 Furthermore, since you belong to Christ, you are like
Abraham’s descendants because you trust God as Abraham did, and you will possess/
receive all that God has promised [MET].
4
Each of you is no longer like a slave, but a child of God and an heir of what he has
promised.
Galatians 4:1-7
1 Now, I will further discuss children and heirs: An heir is a person who will later
control all that his father has. But as long as that heir is a child, others control
him, with the result that he is just like a slave [MET]. 2 Until the day that his
father previously determined, other persons supervise him and manage his father’s
property. 3 Likewise, when we (inc) (OR, we (exc) Jews) were like young children
[MET], we were controlled by the spiritual powers of this world. They controlled us
like masters control their slaves [MET]. 4 But exactly at the time [MTY] that God had
previously determined, he sent Jesus, who is ◄his Son/the man who is also God►, into
the world. Jesus was born to a human mother. He had to obey the laws that God gaveGALATIANS 4:5
1718
GALATIANS 4:20
to Moses. 5 God sent Jesus in order that he might redeem us who had to obey God’s
laws. God wanted us all to receive from God the status of being his children [MET].
6 Furthermore, we know that we are God’s children because God sent the Spirit, who
is intimately related to Jesus, to live in our ◄inner beings/hearts►. The Spirit enables
us to pray fervently, “Daddy, Father!” This shows that we are God’s children. 7 So,
because of what God has done, no longer is each of you like a slave. Instead, each
of you is a child of God. Furthermore, since each of you is God’s child, God has also
made you his heir, one who will receive all that he has promised.
I plead with you to do as I did when I was with you, and not obey all the Jewish
rules and rituals.
Galatians 4:8-20
8 When you did not have a relationship with God [MET], you served gods that really
did not exist [MET]. You were their slaves. 9 But now you have come to know God.
Perhaps it would be better to say that now God knows you. So now you are acting
foolishly! ◄You are again believing that by obeying rules and rites you will benefit
spiritually! [RHQ] Those rules are ineffective and inadequate! You are wanting to
obey them again [MET] like slaves obey their masters. [RHQ] 10 You non-Jews are
carefully practicing Jewish rules and rituals about what you should do ◄on Sabbaths/
on Jewish days of rest► and on the first day of each month and on special seasons and
years.
11 I ◄worry/am concerned► about your mistaken ideas. I do not want to have so
strenuously served you in vain. 12 My fellow believers, I strongly urge you that you
do as I do. Stop thinking that you have to obey ◄Jewish rules and rituals/ceremonial
laws►. When I was with you, I did not obey all the Jewish rules and rituals, just like
you did not obey them.
At that time you treated me entirely as you should have [LIT]. 13 You know that the
first time I preached to you, I went to your area to regain my health, because I was
physically weak. 14 Although you might have despised me because I was physically
weak, you did not despise me or act contemptuously/ disrespectfully toward me.
Instead, you welcomed me like you would welcome an angel from God. You welcomed
me like you would welcome Christ Jesus! 15 ◄I am disappointed that you have forgotten
that then you declared that you were pleased with me./Have you forgotten that then
you declared that you were pleased with me?► [RHQ] I can testify that you would have
done anything to help me. You would have gouged out your eyes and given them to me,
if that would have helped me! 16 So I am very disappointed that you now act as though
[RHQ] I have become hostile to you because I have kept speaking the true message
about Christ to you. 17 Those who are insisting on obeying Jewish rules are eagerly
showing interest in you, but what they are doing is not good. They even want you not
to associate with me and other true believers, because they want you to eagerly show
interest in them, not in us. 18 But just like it always feels good to have others show that
they appreciate you, I would like you always to appreciate me, and not only when I am
with you. 19 You who are like my children, once again I am very worried/concerned
about you [MET], and I will continue to be worried/concerned until Christ’s nature
becomes developed in you completely and wholeheartedly [MET] as a child becomes
developed in his mother’s womb. 20 But I do wish that I could be with you now and
that I might talk more gently with you, because I do not know what to do about you
while we are apart.
Because of our relationship with Christ, we are not subject to Mosaic law; being
Abraham’s spiritual descendants, we are free from such bondage.
Galatians 4:21-31GALATIANS 4:21
1719
GALATIANS 4:31
21 Some of you desire to obey all the laws that God gave Moses. I say that you should
consider [RHQ] the implications of what Moses wrote in the Scriptures. 22 He wrote that
Abraham became the father of two sons. His female slave, Hagar, bore one son, and
his wife Sarah, who was not a slave, bore the other. 23 Also, the sons differed. Ishmael,
the son born by the female slave, was conceived naturally. But Isaac, the son born
by his wife who was not a slave, was conceived miraculously as a result of what God
had promised Abraham. 24 I am telling you this as an illustration. These two women
symbolize two agreements. God made the first agreement, which involved obeying the
laws that God gave to Moses at Sinai Mountain. Because that agreement forces those
who accept it to keep obeying all its rules [MET], it is like a slave mother who gives
birth to slaves. So Hagar, the female slave, symbolizes that agreement. 25 Also, the
word ‘Hagar’ is associated with Sinai Mountain, which is in Arabia land. Hagar, the
female slave, also represents Jerusalem as it is today. Jerusalem is like [MET] a slave
mother, and those who live there [PRS] are like her slave children [MET] because they
all must obey the laws that God gave to Moses. 26 But there will be a new Jerusalem in
heaven [MTY], and we who will go there are free from having to obey Jewish laws. We
who belong to that city consider it to be our mother [MET] city because we are God’s
true children. 27 Our new city will have more people than those who live in Jerusalem
now. It will be just like Isaiah foretold about the people whom he expected would come
back to Jerusalem from exile. He expected that they would be more numerous than
those who were taken into exile. He wrote:
You who live in Jerusalem, you will rejoice! Now you have no children, like a
barren woman who does not give birth to children! But some day you will shout
joyfully, ◄without restraint/as loudly as you can►, even though now you are few
in number, like a woman who cannot give birth to children, and you feel deserted.
You will be very happy because you will have many children who will come to you.
Those children will be more than the children any woman with a husband could
have borne.
28 Now, my fellow believers, you have become children of God as a result of believing
God’s promise to us, as Isaac was born as a result of Abraham believing what God
promised to him [MET].
29 Also, long ago Abraham’s son Ishmael, the one who was conceived naturally,
caused trouble for Abraham’s son Isaac, who was conceived supernaturally [MET].
Similarly, now those who think that we must obey the laws that God gave Moses in
order that God will save us are causing trouble for those who are trusting Abraham’s
descendant, Christ. 30 But these are [RHQ] the words in the Scriptures [PRS]: “The
son of the woman who was not a slave will inherit what his father has. The female
slave’s son will certainly not inherit those things. So send away from this place the
female slave and her son [MET]!” That means that you should certainly expel from
your groups those who insist that we obey all the laws God gave Moses [MET]. 31 My
fellow believers, Hagar symbolizes the laws that God gave to Moses. But we are not
those who must obey all the laws that God gave to Moses [MET]. So we are not the
female slave Hagar’s spiritual descendants [MET]. But Sarah’s descendants are those
who were born as a result of believing what God promised to Abraham. So we are the
spiritual descendants of Sarah, the woman who was not a slave [MET].
5
Reject the false teaching that you must be circumcised, and do not become enslaved
to rules and rituals again, otherwise Christ will not benefit you at all.
Galatians 5:1-6GALATIANS 5:1
1720
GALATIANS 5:15
1 It is in order that we might live without ◄being obliged to/having to► obey all the
Jewish rituals that Christ freed us from God condemning us because of our disobeying
those rituals. So, firmly reject the false teaching that someone must circumcise you,
and do not live like slaves again [MET] by letting others force you to obey those rules
and rituals again. 2 Consider very carefully what I, Paul, an apostle, now tell you: If,
to fulfill Jewish ritual laws, you are permitting yourself to be circumcised {someone
to circumcise you}, what Christ has done for you will not benefit you at all. 3 Instead,
I solemnly declare again to every man who is circumcised {has someone circumcise
him} in order for God to accept him, that you must perfectly obey all of the laws that
God gave Moses, in order for God to save you. 4 Those of you who are sure that God
will erase the record of your sins because you obey the laws that God gave to Moses,
you have separated yourselves from Christ. You have abandoned/rejected God’s true
method of saving you, which was by kindly erasing the record of your sins, in a way
that you did not deserve. 5 But we who have a relationship with Christ and who
trust in Christ are eagerly waiting to receive what God’s Spirit assures us that we can
expect. We can expect to receive it because God has erased the record of our sins.
6 As for us who have a relationship with Christ Jesus, God is not concerned whether
we are circumcised or not circumcised. Instead, God is concerned about whether we
trust in Christ, with the result that we love other people.
Although someone has confused you, I am sure that you will not accept his false
teaching, and that God will punish him.
Galatians 5:7-12
7 You were progressing well spiritually [MET]. You should not have let someone
influence you so that now you are not believing the true message about Christ [RHQ]!
8 God, the one who chose you, is not the one who is persuading you to think like
this! 9 Remember that this false doctrine that someone is teaching you will affect all of
you, just like [MET] a little yeast causes all of the dough to swell up. 10 Nevertheless,
because of my relationship with the Lord, I am certain that you will think only as I do
about forcing people to obey rules and rituals. Furthermore, God will punish anyone
who is confusing you by teaching this false message, even if he is an important person.
11 But, my fellow believers, although someone claims that I am proclaiming that men
must be circumcised, I certainly am not still proclaiming that. Remember that the
Jews are still ◄persecuting me/causing me to suffer►. If I were still proclaiming that
men must be circumcised in order for God to accept them, ◄the Jews would not be
persecuting me./why would the Jews be persecuting me?► [RHQ] They would [RHQ]
not be persecuting me/causing me to suffer because then the Jews would no longer be
offended. They ◄are offended/do not want to accept what I teach► because I proclaim
that Christ, the Messiah, died on the cross [MTY]. 12 I would even wish that those who
are disturbing you by insisting that men be circumcised would also emasculate [EUP]
themselves, with the result that they would be expelled from your congregations!
Although you are free from having to obey Jewish rules, instead of doing what your
self-directed nature desires, love and serve each other.
Galatians 5:13-15
13 My fellow believers, God chose you in order that you might live without having
to obey rules and rituals. But do not assume that because you are free from having
to obey rules and rituals, God permits you to do whatever your self-directed nature
desires. Instead, constantly, as you love each other, serve each other. 14 Keep in mind
that we can sum up all of the laws that God has given us in one law, which is: “You
must love each person you come in contact with, just like you love yourself.” 15 SinceGALATIANS 5:16
1721
GALATIANS 6:3
you are attacking and injuring [MET] each other by the things that you say [MET], I
warn you that if you continue doing that, you will totally ruin each other spiritually.
Let God’s Spirit direct you, and then you will not do what your self-directed nature
desires.
Galatians 5:16-18
16 So I tell you this: Constantly let God’s Spirit direct you. If you do that, you will
certainly not do the things that your self-directed nature wants you to do. 17 Your
self-directed nature ◄opposes God’s Spirit/does not want you to do what God’s Spirit
wants you to do►, but also his Spirit opposes your self-directed nature. These two are
always ◄fighting with/opposing► each other. The result is that you do not constantly
do the good deeds that you truly desire to do. 18 But when you are led by God’s Spirit
{when God’s Spirit directs you}, you can do what pleases God, now that you are no
longer obligated to obey all the laws that God gave Moses.
Those who think evil thoughts and do evil things will not receive the blessings of
God’s rule, but God’s Spirit produces many good qualities in our lives.
Galatians 5:19-24
19 You already know how people think and act [PRS] because of their self-directed
nature. These are some of the things that they do: People are sexually immoral.
People commit unnatural sexual acts. People act indecently. 20 People worship false
gods and things that represent those gods. People perform ◄rituals in order that
evil spirits might act for them/sorcery►. People are hostile to others. People quarrel
with each other. People are ◄jealous/resent other people’s status►. People behave
angrily. People try ◄to get others to think highly of them/to exalt themselves► and
◄do not consider what others want/act selfishly►. People do not associate with others.
People associate only with those who agree with them. 21 People want what others
have. People get drunk. People ◄revel/participate in wild parties►. And people do
other things like these. I warn you now, just like I warned you previously, that the
ones who constantly act and think like that will not receive what God has for his own
people when he begins to rule over us. 22 But God’s Spirit causes us to do these things:
We love others. We are joyful. We are peaceful. We are patient. We are kind. We
are good. We are ones whom others can trust. 23 We are gentle. We control our
behavior. There is no law that says people should not think and act in such ways.
24 Furthermore, we who belong to Christ Jesus have stopped obeying our self-directed
nature and stopped doing all the evil things that we desire to do [MET]. It is as though
[MET] we nailed them to the cross!
25 Since God’s Spirit has caused us to be spiritually alive, we should conduct our
lives the way the Spirit directs us. 26 We should not be saying how great we are. We
should not be making ourselves more important than others. We should not envy
each other.
6
Gently correct anyone among you who is sinning, and help each other without
thinking you are better than others.
Galatians 6:1-6
1 My fellow believers, if you discover that a person among your congregation is
sinning, those of you whom God’s Spirit is directing and empowering should gently
correct that person. Furthermore, each of you who corrects another person should be
very cautious in order that you might not sin like that when you are tempted {when
something tempts you}. 2 When there are ones who have problems, you should help
each other. By doing that, you will complete what Christ requires. 3 Keep in mind thatGALATIANS 6:4
1722
GALATIANS 6:16
those who refuse to help others because they think that they are more important than
other people, although they are not really more important, are deceiving themselves.
4 Instead, each of you should constantly test/judge and decide if you can approve what
you yourself are doing and thinking. Then you can boast because of what you yourself
are doing and thinking, and not because what you are doing is superior to what other
persons are doing. 5 Keep in mind that you must each perform your own individual
tasks. 6 You who are being taught {whom others are teaching} God’s truth should
share your various material things [EUP] with your teachers.
We should not tire of doing good, but instead, we should do good to everyone,
especially to believers.
Galatians 6:7-10
7 You should not deceive yourselves. Remember that God is never outwitted {no one
ever fools God}. Just like a farmer will reap exactly the kind of crop that he plants
[MET], God will reward people according to what they have done [MET]. 8 God will
punish eternally those who do what their self-directed natures urge them to do. But
those who please God’s Spirit will live forever with God because of what God’s Spirit
does for them. 9 But we should not ◄tire of/become discouraged while► doing what
pleases God, because eventually, at the time that God has determined, we will receive
a reward [MET], if we do not stop doing the good things that we have been doing.
10 So, whenever we have opportunities, we should do what is good to all people. But
especially we should do what is good to all our fellow believers.
Some people want you to be circumcised only so that they will not be persecuted for
proclaiming what Christ accomplished for us on the cross, but that is the only thing
that I will boast about.
Galatians 6:11-16
11 I am now writing this last part of this letter to you in my own handwriting.
Notice the large letters with which I am now writing. I am doing this in order that
I might emphasize this: 12 Some Jewish believers are trying to force you to perform
certain rituals so that other Jews will think highly of them. They are insisting that
you be circumcised {that someone must circumcise you}. They are doing that only
in order that other Jews would no longer ◄persecute them/cause them to suffer► for
proclaiming that God will save us because of our trusting in what Christ accomplished
when he died on the cross [MTY, MET]. 13 The reason that I say that is that the ones
who are insisting that you be circumcised {that someone circumcise you} do not
themselves fully obey the laws that God gave to Moses. Instead, they desire that
you let someone circumcise you in order that they might boast to those Jews who
would ◄persecute them/cause them to suffer► that you did that because they insisted
[MTY] that you do it. 14 I myself, however, strongly desire that I never boast about
anything like that. The only thing I will boast about is what our Lord Jesus Christ
accomplished by dying on the cross [MTY]. Because of what Christ did on the cross, I
no longer am interested in the things that those who do not trust Christ [MTY] think
are important, and those people are no longer interested in the things that I [MET]
think are important. 15 I will boast about Christ dying on the cross because God is
concerned neither that people are circumcised nor that people are not circumcised.
Instead, he is concerned only that people conduct their lives in a completely new
way. 16 I pray that God will give inner peace and act kindly towards all who will act
according to this new way of life. It is all those who live according to this new way
of life who are now truly God’s people [MET], as the Israeli people were God’s people
previously.GALATIANS 6:17
1723
GALATIANS 6:18
I have suffered enough for declaring the truth about Jesus, so do not trouble me
again.
Galatians 6:17
17 Finally, I say that people have persecuted me/caused me to suffer for declaring
the truth about Jesus, and as a result I have scars on my body. Your new teachers do
not have scars like mine! So do not trouble/bother me about these matters again!
I pray that God may act kindly within you.
Galatians 6:18
18 My fellow believers, I pray that our Lord Jesus Christ will kindly accomplish what
he desires within you. ◄Amen!/May it be so!►EPHESIANS 1:1
1724
EPHESIANS 1:14
This book is a letter that the Apostle Paul wrote to the
Christians at Ephesus. We call this book
Ephesians
Ephesians 1:1-2
I am writing this to you people of God in Ephesus, asking that God will bless you.
1 I, Paul, am an apostle whom God appointed ◄to represent/to proclaim the message
about► Christ Jesus because that is what God wanted. I am writing this letter to you
who are the people of God in Ephesus city. You are people who ◄faithfully/continue
to► trust in Christ Jesus and who have a close relationship with him. 2 I pray that
God our Father and Jesus Christ our Lord will continue to act kindly toward you and
cause you to have inner peace.
We should praise God for having chosen and redeemed us, having revealed his plan
to unite all things under Christ, and causing Christ to rule over all his people.
Ephesians 1:3-14
3 Praise God, the Father of our Lord Jesus Christ! Because of our relationship with
Christ, he has blessed us spiritually in every way by giving us blessings that come
from heaven. 4 Before God created the world, he chose us to be his people because
of our ◄relationship with/union with► Christ, in order that God could consider us to
be completely holy [DOU]. Because God loves us, 5 he decided long ago that he would
adopt us to be as though we were his own children because of what Jesus Christ has
done. He decided to do that because it pleased him to do that. 6 He did it in order
that we would praise him for acting very kindly toward us in a wonderful way that
we did not deserve. He did it because of our relationship with his beloved Son {one,
who is also God, whom he loves}.
7 When the blood of Christ flowed when he died [MTY], it was as though he paid a
price to free/save us from the guilt of our sins. That ◄provided a way/made it possible►
for God to act very kindly toward us to forgive us for having sinned. 8 He acted very
kindly toward us and enabled us to become wise about many [HYP] things and to
understand his truth. 9 He has enabled us to know the things that he had planned
secretly (OR, that he had not revealed to anyone yet). He did that because he wanted
to do that, and because he planned to do that by means of the things Christ would do.
10 God planned that at the time that he appointed, he would unite all things/beings
in heaven and all things/beings on earth (OR, all beings in heaven and all things on
earth), and cause Christ to be the one who will rule them [MET]. 11 Because of our close
relationship with Christ, God has also chosen us (inc) (OR, us (exc) Jews) to receive
what he has promised to give us. He decided long ago to do that. It was exactly what
he planned. He accomplishes everything exactly as he plans and desires, 12 in order
that we(exc) Jews, who confidently expected the Messiah to do great things for us
before the non-Jews expected such things (OR, we (inc) who were already confidently
expecting Christ to do great things for us) will praise him for his greatness. 13 You
Ephesians also heard the true message, the good message about how God saves you.
People put their seal on something to show that it belongs to them. Similarly, when
you believed in Christ, God showed that you also belong to him by sending you the
Holy Spirit as he promised to do [MET]. 14 The Holy Spirit is like [MET] a ◄deposit/
down payment►. That is, he ◄guarantees/assures us► that we will receive all thatEPHESIANS 1:15
1725
EPHESIANS 2:6
God has promised to give us, at the time when God will give to those who belong to
him [MET] everything that Christ freed us to receive. God also assures you that you
belong to him, in order that you would praise him for his greatness.
I thank God for your faith, and pray that you will understand more about how
powerfully he works on our behalf, just like he did when he caused Christ to become
alive again and made him ruler over everything.
Ephesians 1:15-23
15 Because of what God has done for you, and because people told me that you
continue to trust in the Lord Jesus and that you love all those who belong to God,
16 I thank God for you constantly [LIT, HYP]. I ◄mention/pray for► you constantly,
whenever I pray. 17 I pray that God, who is the glorious/wonderful Father of our Lord
Jesus Christ, may cause his Spirit to make you wise, and that his Spirit will reveal
God to you so that you may fully know him. 18 And I pray that God would enable you
to understand [MTY] his truth, in order that in your ◄inner beings/hearts► you may
know the things that we believers should confidently expect to receive because he
chose us to be his people. And I pray that you will know how God will bless his people
in a very wonderful way when we finally receive all that he has promised to give us.
19 And I pray that you will know how very powerfully God helps us who continue to
trust in Christ. He works powerfully for us 20 just like he acted powerfully for Christ
when he caused Christ to become alive again after he died, and put him in the place
of highest/greatest honor [MTY] in heaven. 21 There, Christ is the supreme ruler over
every powerful spirit of every level of authority. His rank is much higher than any
powerful spirit can receive, not only now, but forever. 22 God has caused all beings
to be subject to Christ [MTY], and he has also appointed Christ, who rules over all
things, to rule [MET] over all believers. 23 We believers relate to Christ like the parts
of a person’s body [MET] relate to its head. Christ uses all his power among us just
like he uses his power throughout the whole universe.
2
Formerly we were all spiritually dead and were certain to be punished by God, but
he acted very kindly toward us and saved us freely as a result of our faith in Christ.
Ephesians 2:1-10
1 Formerly, because you were habitually sinning [DOU], you were ◄spiritually
dead/as unable to please God as a corpse [MET] is►. 2 You were acting in the same
evil way as those who oppose Christ [MTY] act. That is, you were behaving in the
evil ways that Satan wanted you to behave. He rules over evil spiritual beings that no
person can see [MTY]. He is the spirit who now powerfully controls the people who
disobey God. 3 Formerly, we all used to disobey God as they do. We did the things
that our self-centered nature wanted us to do. We habitually did those evil deeds
that our bodies and our minds wanted to do. When we were acting like that, it was
certain that God would punish [MTY] us, just like he will certainly punish all other
evil people.
4 But God always acts very mercifully, and he loves us very much. 5 As a result,
even when we were ◄spiritually dead/as unable to please God as a corpse [MET] is►
because we were habitually sinning, he enabled us to receive spiritual/eternal life
because of our relationship with Christ. Do not forget this: It is only because God has
acted so kindly toward you, in a way that you did not deserve, that you are saved
{that he saved you} from the guilt of your sin 6 And it is as though God gave us spiritual
life when he caused Christ Jesus to be alive again after he died [MET]. And it is asEPHESIANS 2:7
1726
EPHESIANS 2:20
though God caused us to sit and rule [MTY] with him in heaven, 7 in order that he
might show to everyone at all times in the future that he has acted toward us in an
extremely kind way because of what Christ Jesus did for us.
8 It is only by God acting [PRS] toward you in a way that you did not deserve that
you have been saved {that he has saved you} as a result of your trusting in Christ.
You did not save yourselves. His saving you was his gift to you. 9 He did not save any
of you because of anything you yourselves did. Because you have done nothing to
save yourselves, you cannot be proud of your efforts to save yourselves. 10 It is God
who has made us what we are now. Because of our relationship with Christ Jesus, he
has enabled us to receive spiritual/eternal life in order that we should conduct our
lives habitually doing the good deeds that God previously planned for us to do.
God brought you Gentiles into his family so that now you and Jewish believers both
share the same blessings and form one group; you now have peace with each other and
can come to God in prayer with the help of the Holy Spirit.
Ephesians 2:11-22
11 You Ephesians have been non-Jews from the time that you were born. The Jews
◄insult you/say that you are not God’s people► by calling you ‘those who are not
circumcised’. They proudly call themselves ‘we (exc) who are circumcised’. They
have allowed people to circumcise them to indicate that they are God’s people, but
that has only changed their bodies, not their ◄inner beings/hearts►. 12 You should
constantly remember these things: Formerly you did not have any relationship with
Christ. You did not belong to the people of Israel, the people whom God chose. You did
not know about the things God promised in his agreements with his people. You did
not confidently expect to go to heaven after you die (OR, that God would save you).
You lived in this world without knowing God. 13 But now, because of your relationship
with Christ Jesus, God has brought you, who had no relationship with him [MET], into
his family [MET]. He did that because you trusted in what Christ accomplished when
his blood [MTY] flowed from his body when he died on the cross.
14 Christ himself has caused us Jewish and non-Jewish believers to have peace with
each other. He has made both of our groups to become one group. Just like people
◄tear down/demolish► a wall that separates groups of people [MET], he has destroyed
the hatred between Jews and non-Jews. 15 By dying [MTY] for us on the cross he made
it no longer necessary for us to obey all the Jewish laws and rituals in order to be saved.
He did that in order to enable the two groups to become one new group because of
our relationship with him. The result was that he has caused us to have peace with
each other. 16 By dying on the cross [MTY] he caused both Jews and non-Jews to have
a peaceful relationship with God. That is how he caused us to no longer be [MET]
enemies with God (OR, with each other). 17 He came to earth and proclaimed that
you non-Jews, who did not have a relationship with [MET] God, and us(exc) Jews, who
considered that we(exc) belonged to [MET] God’s family, can all now have peace with
God. 18 We know that he has done that because we both, Jews and non-Jews, are now
able to approach God the Father in prayer by the help of his Spirit, because of what
Christ has done.
19 So God no longer treats you non-Jews as people treat [MET] foreigners and
strangers who live among them [MET]. Instead, along with all God’s people, it is as
though you have become citizens of a country that he rules over, and as though you
have become members of the family of which he is the father [MET]. 20 Just like a
building is built {as someone builds a building} on a foundation, God has joined you
into one group that originated/began from what the apostles and prophets taught.
Christ Jesus is the most important one in that group, just like a cornerstone is theEPHESIANS 2:21
1727
EPHESIANS 3:17
most important part of a building. And 21 just like a builder might join together all the
parts of a building to make it a temple that people will dedicate to the Lord [MET],
Christ is continually causing all of you who have a relationship with him to be united,
in order that you will become one holy group. 22 And because of your relationship
with Christ, God is joining you non-Jews together with Jewish believers to be like one
building [MET] in which his Spirit lives.
3
I am in prison because God appointed me to tell non-Jews that Christ is the source
of great spiritual blessings for them.
Ephesians 3:1-13
1 Because God has done all this for you non-Jews, I, Paul, pray for you. I want
you to know that it is because I serve Christ Jesus for your sake that I am in prison.
2 I ◄assume that/think that probably► someone has told you how God acted very
kindly toward me, appointing me so that I would proclaim the gospel to you non-Jews.
3 God revealed to me the message that he had not revealed to others. When you
read what I have already written briefly about that, 4 you will be able to understand
that I understand clearly that message about Christ. 5 Formerly, God did not reveal
that message to anyone, but now his Spirit has revealed that message to ◄his holy
apostles and prophets/people who tell messages that come directly from God►. 6 That
message, which he has now revealed, is that because of our (inc) relationship with
Christ Jesus, all of us, non-Jews as well as Jews [MTY], will receive the great spiritual
blessings that God has promised as we all form one group [MET] as a result of our
believing the good news about Christ. 7 By God powerfully enabling me, and because
God acted kindly toward me, doing what I did not deserve, and chose me to do that
work, I became someone who tells others this good message.
8 Although I am the least worthy of all God’s people, God kindly appointed me to
proclaim to the non-Jews the message about the great spiritual blessings that they
can receive from Christ, 9 and to enable everyone to understand clearly how God
accomplished what he planned. God, who created everything, has now revealed this
message, which he never revealed to anyone before. 10 What he planned was that all
◄believers/people who belong to Christ► would be the ones who would reveal to all
the ranks [DOU] of spiritual beings in heaven that what God had planned is wise in
every way. 11 That is what God had always planned, and it is what he accomplished
by what our Lord Jesus has done. 12 Because of what he has done and because of our
relationship with him, when we pray we can approach God confidently and without
being afraid. 13 So I ask that you do not be discouraged because of my suffering many
things for you here in prison. You should feel honored that I am willing to suffer these
things for your sake.
I pray that God’s Spirit will empower you, that you may experience how much Christ
loves you, and that God may make you all that he intends for you to be.
Ephesians 3:14-21
14 Because God has done all this for you, I kneel and pray [MTY] to God our Father.
15 He is the one who is like a father of all the believers who are now in heaven and
those who are still on the earth. 16 I pray that, using his unlimited resources, he will
cause you to be strengthened by his Spirit {cause his Spirit to strengthen you} in
your ◄inner beings/hearts► with all God’s power. 17 That is, I pray that because of
your trusting in Christ, his Spirit may live in your ◄inner beings/hearts► (OR, he may
live in your hearts). And I pray that because you love Christ firmly and faithfully/EPHESIANS 3:18
1728
EPHESIANS 4:14
continually [MET], you, 18 along with all other believers, may be able to know how
very [DOU] much Christ loves us(inc). 19 I want you to experience how very deeply
he loves us, even though it is not possible for us to understand fully how much he
loves us. And I pray that God will enable you to be filled with {have a full measure
of} all the qualities of his character that he himself has.
20 God is able to do much ◄greater things/more► than we could ask him to do, or
even that we might think that he can do, by his power that is working within us.
21 Because of our relationship with Christ Jesus, may all ◄believers/those who belong
to him► praise him forever. ◄Amen!/May it be so!►
4
Conduct your lives in a way that shows that you are God’s people; do all that you can
to keep all the believers united; and remember that Christ has given various abilities to
each of his people, in order that you all may be united and grow spiritually and become
like Christ.
Ephesians 4:1-16
1 Therefore I, who am in prison because I serve the Lord Jesus, urge you, whom
God has chosen to be his people, to do these things: Conduct your lives as God’s
people should. 2 Always be humble, and do not demand your own rights. Be patient
with each other, and, because you love each other, endure each other’s ◄irritating
behavior/behavior that you do not like►. 3 God’s Spirit has caused you to be united
with one another, so do all that you can to remain united with one another by acting
peacefully toward each other. 4 All we believers form just one group [MET], and we
have only one Holy Spirit. Similarly, you were chosen {God chose you} in order that
you all might confidently keep expecting one set of good things from God. 5 There is
only one Lord, Jesus Christ. We all believe the same teaching about him. It was to
show that we belong to him alone that we had someone baptize us. 6 There is one God,
who is the spiritual Father of all us believers. He rules over all his people; he enables
all his people to do powerful things (OR, he sustains all his people); and his Spirit lives
in all his people.
7 Christ has generously given to each one of us spiritual gifts, just like he decided to
give them. 8 When Christ gave gifts to his people, it was similar to what the Psalmist
said about God receiving tribute money from those whom he had conquered,
When he ascended to heaven, he gave as gifts to people the things that he had taken
from the people whom he captured:
9 The words ‘he ascended’ certainly imply/ indicate [RHQ] that Christ had also
previously descended to the earth. 10 Christ, who descended to earth, is also the
one who ascended to the most exalted position in heaven, in order that he might
show his power [MTY] throughout the universe. 11 He appointed some people to be
apostles. He appointed some people to be ◄prophets/ones who reveal messages that
come directly from God►. He appointed some people to be ◄evangelists/ones whose
work is to tell others the message about Christ►. He appointed some people to lead
and teach the congregations. 12 He appointed all of these in order that they would
prepare God’s people to do God’s work, so that all the people who belong to Christ
[MET] might become spiritually mature. 13 He wants all of us believers to be united
because we all believe in the Son of God (OR, the man who was also God) and because
we all know him. He wants us to become spiritually mature; that is, he wants us
to be ◄perfect/all that God wants us to be►, just like Christ was ◄perfect/all that God
wanted him to be►. 14 Then we will no longer be spiritually immature, like [MET] little
children are immature. We will no longer be constantly changing what we believe, likeEPHESIANS 4:15
1729
EPHESIANS 4:32
[MET] waves of the sea are constantly changing as the wind blows and tosses them
back and forth. We will not allow people who teach what is false and who scheme
to deceive/influence us. 15 Instead, by loving others as we behave as God’s truth
requires (OR, speak in a loving manner what is true), we will become more and more
like Christ in every way. He is the one who controls/guides all his people [MET], just
like a person’s head controls/guides his body. 16 He enables all those who belong to
him to mature spiritually. A person’s body grows stronger, as each part of the body is
joined to the others by the ligaments and as each part ◄functions properly/works as
it should►. Similarly, believers will become mature spiritually by loving each other
and by each of them doing the work that God wants them to do [MET].
You should conduct yourselves in a way that matches your new life; so stop doing
the harmful things that unbelievers do, and do good things to one another.
Ephesians 4:17-32
17 The Lord Jesus has authorized me to strongly tell you that you must no longer
conduct your lives like unbelievers do. The futile/worthless way in which they think
[MET] controls how they conduct their lives. 18 They are unable to think clearly [MET]
about what is right and what is wrong. Because they have decided that they do not
want to know about God and because they stubbornly [IDM] refuse to listen to his
message, they do not have the eternal life that God gives us. 19 The result is that
because they have ceased ◄to care/to be concerned► about what is right and what
is wrong, they have ◄deliberately committed themselves to doing/wholeheartedly
decided to do► the shameful things that their bodies want, and they commit all kinds
of immoral acts, and continually are eager to do more of those things.
20 But when you learned about Christ, you did not learn to behave like that. 21 I am
sure that you heard the message about Christ, and because you are people who have
a close relationship with him, you were taught {others taught you} the true way to
live that Jesus showed us. 22 You were taught {They taught you} that you must put
aside [MET] your evil nature; that is, that you must not behave like you formerly did.
Your evil desires deceived you, making you want to do evil things and causing you
to think that doing that was good for you; and your thinking like that was destroying
you spiritually. 23 Others taught you that instead, you must let God’s Spirit change
the way you think, 24 and that you must start being [MET] the new persons that God
made you to become. That is, your behavior must be righteous and truly/genuinely
devout.
25 Therefore, quit lying to one another. Instead, because we all belong to just one
group of believers, speak truthfully to each other. 26 If you get angry, do not sin as a
result of getting angry. Before the end of the day [MTY], stop being angry; 27 by doing
that, you will not allow the devil to make you do evil. 28 Those who have been stealing
must not steal any longer. Instead, they should work hard to earn ◄their living/what
they need► ◄by their own efforts/by what they do themselves► [MTY], in order that
they may have something to give to those who are needy. 29 Do not use [MTY] foul
language. Instead, say only things that are useful for helping people when they need
help, things that will help spiritually the people that you talk to. 30 God has given you
his Spirit ◄to confirm/to assure you► that some day God will claim all you people
whom Christ has redeemed [MET], just like people confirm that something belongs to
them by putting their seal on it. So do not cause God’s Holy Spirit to be sad ◄by the
way you talk/by the things that you say►. 31 Do not be resentful at all towards others.
Do not become angry in any way. Never shout abusively at others. Never ◄slander/
say bad things about► others. Never act maliciously/be mean in any way. 32 Be kindEPHESIANS 5:1
1730
EPHESIANS 5:14
to one another. Act mercifully toward each other. Forgive each other, just like God
forgave you because of what Christ has done.
5
Imitate God, do everything in a way that shows love, and do not let anyone persuade
you to live immorally, because God will punish those who disobey him.
Ephesians 5:1-6
1 ◄Imitate/Behave like► God, because he loves you who are as though you were
[SIM] his children. 2 Do everything in a way that shows that you love people, just
like Christ loved us and willingly died for us. He offered himself to God as a sacrifice
that was very pleasing to God, just like Jewish priests offered sweet-smelling animal
sacrifices to God [MET]. 3 Do not commit any kind of immoral act [DOU], and do not
desire more things than you need. Do not act in such a way that others could even
◄spread rumors/talk► about your acting in such ways, because it is not appropriate/
fitting for God’s people to do such things. 4 Do not use obscene/shameful language
when you talk to people. Do not talk foolishly. Do not use vulgar/indecent language,
because it is not appropriate/fitting that God’s people should talk like that. Instead,
tell people how much you thank God for all he does for you. 5 You can be sure of
this: No person who is sexually immoral or who acts indecently/shamefully will be
among those people whom God rules over [MET] in heaven. Neither will those who
desire more things than they need. Such people worship their possessions instead of
worshipping God. 6 Do not let anyone deceive you by suggesting that God will really
not punish people who commit such sins, because God certainly will punish [MTY]
those who habitually disobey him by doing such things.
Live righteously, and expose the evil deeds that evil people do, because when you do
that, those people who do those evil things will come to know the truth.
Ephesians 5:7-21
7 So, do not commit the same kinds of deeds that such people do, 8 because formerly
you did not know God’s truth [MET], as those who are in darkness do not know what
is around them. But now it is as though you are in the light [MET] because you know
God’s truth because of your relationship with the Lord Jesus. So do those things that
those who know God’s truth [MET] should do. 9 Keep in mind that as light [MET]
causes good things to grow, those who know God’s truth should do those things that
are good, righteous, and honest. 10 And as you do that, try ◄to find out/to discover►
what pleases the Lord. 11 Do not do the worthless deeds that the people ◄who are in
spiritual darkness/who do not know God’s truth► [MET] do. Instead, let others know
that those people’s deeds are worthless. 12 It is shameful for God’s people to even talk
among themselves about those evil deeds that evil people do secretly and habitually.
13 But when God’s people rebuke those evil people about their deeds, it will be clear/
evident how evil their deeds really are, just like everything exposed to the light becomes
visible {as light [MET] reveals everything that we cannot see in the darkness}. 14 Just
like something on which a light shines reflects that light [MET], whoever has learned
God’s truth reveals that truth to others. That is why we believers say this:
You who are not aware of your sins, become aware of them [MET]!
It is as though you are sound asleep, so wake up!
Be like dead people who are becoming alive again!
Christ will cause you to know God’s truth, just like a light [MET]
that shines causes people to know what is in the darkness.EPHESIANS 5:15
1731
EPHESIANS 6:2
15 So be very careful how you behave. Do not behave as foolish people do. Instead,
behave as wise people do. 16 Use your time carefully, because these days [MTY] people
do extremely evil deeds. 17 So do not be foolish. Instead, understand what the Lord
Jesus wants you to do, and do it!
18 Do not become drunk by drinking alcoholic drinks, since people are unable to
control their behavior when they are drunk. Instead, let God’s Spirit control your
behavior at all times [MTY]. 19 Sing to each other ◄Psalms/songs with words from the
Scriptures►, sing other songs that the congregation knows, and songs that God’s Spirit
gives you. Sing these Psalms and other songs sincerely to praise the Lord Jesus. 20 At
all times thank God, who is our heavenly Father, for everything, especially for what
the Lord Jesus Christ [MTY] has done for you. 21 Humbly submit yourselves to each
other because you reverence Christ, who is our example.
Instructions about how wives and husbands, children and parents, and slaves and
masters should behave toward each other.
Ephesians 5:22—6:9
22-23 Because husbands have authority over [MET] their wives, just as all of us
believers form one group under the authority of Christ, you women should submit
yourselves to the authority of your husbands just as you submit yourselves to the
Lord Jesus. He is the one who saves all his people from the guilt of their sins. 24 Just
like all believers submit themselves to the authority of Christ, the women must submit
themselves completely to the authority of their husbands.
25 Each of you husbands, love your wife as Christ loved all of us who would become
believers, with the result that he willingly died for our sake, 26 in order that he
might ◄set us apart for himself/cause us to belong to him►. That is, by revealing
his message to us, he wanted to remove the guilt of our sin, just like people remove dirt
from something by washing it [MET]. 27 Christ did that in order that he might cause
all of us believers to be a glorious group of people that belong to him, people that
do not have any moral flaws/imperfections, but instead might be completely pure
[DOU] when he gathers us ◄to his presence/to himself►. 28 In the same way, each
man should love his wife as he loves his own body. Men who love their wives, it is
as though they love themselves. 29-30 This is shown by the fact that no one ever hated
his own body. Instead, he feeds his own body and cares for it, just like Christ also
cares for all us believers. We have become one group of believers that belongs to him
[MET]. 31 What someone has written in the Scriptures about people who marry is this,
When a man and a woman marry, they should ◄permanently leave/no longer live
with► their fathers and mothers. They should be joined as husband and wife, and
the two of them shall become as though they were one [MET] person.
32 It is very difficult to understand the meaning of these things that God has now
revealed to me, but I am telling you that those words also refer to the relationship
between Christ and all those who belong to him. 33 However, as for you(pl), each
man must love his wife just as he loves himself, and each woman must respect her
husband.
6
1 You children, because you ◄belong to/have a close relationship with► the Lord
Jesus, obey your parents, because it is right for you to do that. 2 God commanded in
the Scriptures,
Greatly respect your father and mother.
That is the first law that God commanded in which he also promised something.
He promised,EPHESIANS 6:3
1732
EPHESIANS 6:17
3 If you do that, you will prosper, and you will live a long time.
4 You parents (OR, You fathers), do not treat your children so severely that they
become angry. Instead, bring them up well by instructing them and by disciplining
them in the manner that the Lord Jesus wants you to do.
5 You slaves, obey those who are your masters. Obey them very respectfully and
sincerely [DOU], just like you obey Christ. 6 Obey them, not only when they are
watching [MTY] you, and not only to cause them to think highly/well of you. Instead,
obey them as though you were [MET] slaves of Christ, not slaves of your masters.
Do enthusiastically what God wants you to do. 7 Serve your masters zealously/
wholeheartedly, as you would serve the Lord Jesus, not as you would serve ordinary
people. 8 Do this because you know that some day the Lord Jesus will reward each
person for whatever good deeds that person has done. He will reward people who
are slaves and people who are not slaves.
9 You masters, just like your slaves should serve you well, you similarly must treat
them well. Stop threatening to beat them if they do not do their work well. Do not
forget you and they have the same Lord who is in heaven. So he is the one who
will say to you and your slaves whether he approves of what you and they have done,
and when he judges people, he does not act more favorably toward some than he acts
toward others.
As you always rely on the Lord to strengthen you, make use of every spiritual
resource that God provides to resist the devil and all his powerful evil spirits.
Ephesians 6:10-20
10 Finally, at all times rely/depend completely on the Lord Jesus to strengthen you
spiritually by his own mighty power. 11 Just like a soldier puts on all his ◄armor/
things to help him fight► [MET], you should use every spiritual resource/help that God
provides for you, in order that you may successfully resist the devil when he cleverly
tries to oppose you. 12 You must do this because the fighting that we believers do is not
only against human beings [SYN]. Instead, we are also fighting against evil spirits who
rule and have authority over all that is evil [MET] in the world. And we are fighting
against evil spirits who are in heavenly places (OR, everywhere). 13 Therefore, just
like a soldier puts on all his ◄armor/things to help him fight► [MET], use well all the
spiritual resources/helps that God provides for you. Do that in order that you may be
able to resist successfully the devil and all his powerful evil spirits [MTY] every time
they ◄attack you/tempt you to sin or cause something bad to happen to you►. Do
it also in order that when you have done all that you can to resist them when they
attack you, you will still be ready to resist them when they attack you the next time.
14 You must be ready to firmly resist the devil and his evil spirits [MET], just like
soldiers must be ready to resist the enemy. Prepare for doing that by doing these things:
To be strong spiritually, hold firmly to God’s truth, just like soldiers prepare ◄to stand
firm against/to firmly resist► their enemies by fastening their belts around their
waists [MET]. Act righteously in order to protect yourself against demonic attacks, just
like soldiers put on breastplates to protect their chests against their enemies’ attacks
[MET]. 15 Hold fast the good message that gives us peace with God, just like soldiers put
on their boots firmly [MET] ◄to stand firm against/to firmly resist► their enemies. 16 In
addition, keep trusting firmly in the Lord. That will enable you to protect yourselves
from anything that Satan, the evil one, may do to harm you spiritually, just like soldiers
carry shields to protect themselves against the arrows that have flaming tips that their
enemies shoot at them [MET]. 17 And rely/depend on the fact that God has saved you, in
order to protect yourselves against demonic attacks, just like soldiers put on a helmet
to protect their heads from attacks by their enemies [MET]. And be ready to use theEPHESIANS 6:18
1733
EPHESIANS 6:24
weapon that God’s Spirit has given you, which is the message of God, in order to fight
against ◄demonic powers/Satan►, just like soldiers use their swords to fight against
their enemies [MET]. 18 As you are doing that, keep praying to God at all times, and
requesting him to do things for you and others; and let God’s Spirit direct what you
pray. For this purpose, always be spiritually alert/watchful, and ◄always be persistent
in/never quit► praying for all God’s people. 19 And specifically, pray for me. Pray that
God will tell me what I should say [MTY] whenever I speak, in order that I may boldly
tell others the good message about Christ. People did not know that message before,
but God has now revealed it to me. 20 I am ◄a representative of Christ/one who speaks
on behalf of Christ► as I tell this message to others, and I am in prison [MTY] because
of that. Pray that when I tell others about Christ, I may speak without being afraid,
because that is how I ought to speak.
I am sending Tychicus to tell you what is happening here and to encourage you. I
pray that God will give you peace and love for each other, and that he will continue to
act kindly toward you all.
Ephesians 6:21-24
21 In order that you may know about what is happening to me and what I am
doing, I am sending Tychicus to you with this letter. He will tell you everything that
is happening here. He is a fellow believer whom we all (inc) love very much, and
he serves the Lord Jesus faithfully. 22 That is the reason that I am sending him to
you; I want you to know ◄how my companions and I are/what is happening to my
companions and me►, and I want him to encourage you [SYN].
23 I pray that God our Father and the Lord Jesus Christ will cause all of you fellow
believers to have inner peace, and enable you to love each other and to continue
trusting in Christ. 24 I pray that God will continue to act kindly to you and to all others
who love our Lord Jesus Christ and will never quit loving him.PHILIPPIANS 1:1
1734
PHILIPPIANS 1:12
This book is a letter that the Apostle Paul wrote to the
Christians at Philippi. We call this book
Philippians
Philippians 1:1-2
I, Paul, write this letter to all of you who are God’s people at Philippi. May God our
Father and Jesus Christ our Lord bless you.
1 I, Paul, and Timothy, who is with me, are men who serve Christ Jesus. I am writing
this letter to all of you who are pastors and deacons in Philippi city and to the rest of
God’s people there who have a close relationship with Christ Jesus. 2 We both (OR, I)
pray that God, who is our Father, and Jesus Christ, who is our Lord, will continue to
be kind to you and will continue to cause you to have inner peace.
I thank God and rejoice because you have been working together with me to make
known the good message from when you first believed until now.
Philippians 1:3-8
3 I thank my God whenever I think about you. 4 Every time [DOU] I pray for you, I
joyfully pray [DOU] for all of you. 5 I thank God and rejoice because you have been
working together with me in order to make known the good message about Christ.
You started doing that when you first [MTY] believed it, and you have continued doing
it until now. 6 I am completely confident that God, who has begun to do in you what
is good, (OR, that since God has begun to do in you what is good, he) will continue to
do that until he finishes doing it on the day Christ Jesus [MTY] returns. 7 During this
time that I have been a prisoner [MTY] and during the times I was previously able to
defend the good message about Christ and proved/confirmed to others that it is true,
all of you have been sharing with me (OR, have helped me) in this work that God
kindly gave to me to do. So indeed it is right that I feel joyful about you all, because
you are very dear [IDM] to me. 8 God can verify that Christ Jesus causes me to love
and long for all of you very much, just like Christ loves you.
I pray that God will enable you to know how to love one another more and more
appropriately and to completely understand how you should believe and act.
Philippians 1:9-11
9 And what I pray for you is that God will enable you to truly know and learn how to
love one another more and more in every situation. 10 And I pray that he will enable
you to completely understand how you should believe and act. I pray this in order
that you might be spiritually pure and faultless (OR, completely faultless [DOU]) on
the day that Christ returns [MTY], 11 and in order that you might conduct your lives
[IDM] completely righteously as a result of Jesus Christ enabling you to do so, in order
that people will honor God and praise him (OR, people will praise God very much
[DOU]).
I want you to realize that as a result of my imprisonment many more people have
heard the good message about Christ.
Philippians 1:12-14
12 My fellow believers, I want you to know that the troubles I have experienced have
not prevented me from proclaiming the good message to people. Instead, these things
that I have experienced have enabled even more people to hear the good messagePHILIPPIANS 1:13
1735
PHILIPPIANS 1:27
about Christ. 13 Specifically, all the military guards who are stationed here in Rome
and many other [HYP] people in this city [HYP] now know that I am a prisoner [MTY]
because I proclaim the good news about Christ. 14 Also, most of the believers here now
proclaim the message from God more courageously and fearlessly because they trust
the Lord more firmly to help them. They trust the Lord more because they have seen
how the Lord has helped me while I have been a prisoner [MTY] here.
Even though some believers proclaim the message about Christ because they are
antagonistic toward me, at least they are proclaiming Christ, and so I rejoice.
Philippians 1:15-18a
15-16 Some people proclaim the message about Christ as I do because they are happy
with my work. They proclaim the message about Christ because they love me and
because they know that God has placed me here to defend the message about Christ
[CHI]. 17 Others proclaim the message about Christ because they envy me and oppose
me. They proclaim the message about Christ because they have wrong motives. They
wrongly assume that because they are causing many people to follow them, I will
be jealous, and as a result, I will feel more miserable while I am a prisoner [MTY]
here. 18 But it does not matter whether people proclaim the message about Christ
because they have wrong motives, or whether people proclaim the message about
Christ because they have right motives. The important thing in either case is that the
message about Christ is being proclaimed {people are proclaiming the message about
Christ}. And because of that I rejoice!
I will continue to rejoice because I know that I will remain completely victorious
spiritually. I earnestly expect to boldly honor Christ whether I live or die.
Philippians 1:18b-26
Furthermore, I will continue to rejoice, 19 because when I experience troubles, I
know that some day God will say that he approves of what I have done (OR, that the
Roman authorities will set me free). This will happen as a result of your praying for
me, and as a result of God’s Spirit, whom Jesus Christ gave me, helping me. 20 I know
that this will happen because I very confidently expect [DOU] that I will faithfully
honor Christ. I expect that like I always have done, Christ will be greatly honored {I
will continue now also to very boldly honor Christ} by means of all that I do [SYN,
MTY], whether by the way I live or by the way I die.
21 As for me, I live in order to honor Christ. But if I die, it will be better for me than
if I continue to live, because then I will be with him. 22 On the other hand, if I continue
to live, that will enable me to continue to serve Christ effectively. As a result, I do not
know which to choose. 23 That is, I am not sure which of those two I prefer. I long to
leave this world and go to be with Christ, because that will be very much better for
me. 24 Nevertheless, it is more important that I remain alive than that I go to be with
Christ because you still need me to help you. 25 Since I am convinced of this, I know
that I will remain alive and that I will go/come to be with you all. As a result, you will
believe in Christ more firmly, and as a result of that, you will rejoice. 26 That is, you
will be able to rejoice very greatly because of Christ Jesus bringing me to be with you
again.
Conduct yourselves just like you learned in the message about Christ, unitedly and
fearlessly resisting those who oppose you and the gospel, since God is helping you in all
your struggles.
Philippians 1:27-30
27 Most importantly, as fellow believers in Christ, conduct yourselves just like you
learned you should do when you heard the message about Christ. Do that in orderPHILIPPIANS 1:28
1736
PHILIPPIANS 2:12
that whether I come and see you, or whether I am away from you and people tell
me about you, what I hear or see will make me happy. They will tell me that you are
unitedly and cooperatively resisting those who oppose the message about Christ (OR,
oppose you). I will know that you are not allowing others to influence you to believe
a message that is different from the gospel about Christ. 28 And I will know that you
are not at all frightened by {afraid of} the people who oppose you. This will show/
prove to those people that God will destroy them, but this will show/prove to you that
God will save you eternally. It is God who is doing all this. 29 Remember that he has
not only kindly enabled you to believe in Christ, he has also kindly allowed you to
suffer for the sake of Christ. 30 As a result, you are having to resist those who oppose
the good message, just like you saw that I had to resist such people there in Philippi,
and just like you hear that I still have to resist such people here now.
2
Since Christ loves and encourages us and the Holy Spirit fellowships with us, make
me completely happy by agreeing with one another, loving one another, and humbly
serving one another.
Philippians 2:1-4
1 Since Christ encourages us, since he loves us and comforts us, since God’s
Spirit fellowships with us, and since Christ is very merciful [DOU] to us, 2 make me
completely happy by doing the following things: Agree with one another, love one
another, be closely united with one another, and live harmoniously with one another
[DOU]. 3 Never try to selfishly make yourselves more important than others nor boast
about what you are doing. Instead, be humble, and in particular, honor one another
more than you honor yourselves. 4 Each one of you should not only be concerned
about your own affairs. Instead, each of you should also be concerned ◄that you
help/about the needs of► one another.
You should think just like Christ Jesus thought. He willingly gave up his divine
privileges and humbled himself, willingly obeying God although it meant disgracefully
dying on a cross. As a result, God exalted him to the highest position, to be
acknowledged by the entire universe as the supreme Lord.
Philippians 2:5-11
5 You should think/act just like Christ Jesus thought/acted. 6 Although he has the
same nature as God has, he did not insist on keeping all the privileges of being equal
with God. 7 Instead, he willingly gave up divine privileges. Specifically, he became
a human being and took the attitude of a servant. When he had become a human
being, 8 he humbled himself even more. Specifically, he obeyed God even to the extent
of being willing to die. He was even willing to be nailed to a cross, to die as though
he were a criminal. 9 As a result, God promoted him to a rank that is above every
other rank. 10 God did that in order that every being [SYN] in heaven and on earth
and under the earth should worship [MTY] Jesus, 11 and in order that every person
[SYN] should declare that Jesus Christ is Lord. As a result of everyone doing that, they
will honor God, his Father.
Since you have always obeyed God, continue to try to do those things which are
appropriate for people whom God has saved, and he will enable you to do so.
Philippians 2:12-13
12 My dear friends, as you consider this, since you have always obeyed God, each
of you should very reverentially [DOU] try to do those things that are proper for
people whom God has saved. You should do those things not only when I am with you.PHILIPPIANS 2:13
1737
PHILIPPIANS 2:24
Instead, you should try even more to do them now when I am not with you. 13 You are
able to do these things, since God himself causes you to desire to do what he wants
you to do, and he also enables you to do what he wants you to do.
Always obey God and your leaders, and never complain about them or argue with
them, in order that you may be perfect children of God, witnessing by how you live and
what you say to the ungodly people among whom you live.
Philippians 2:14-16
14 Do everything God or your leaders ask you to do. Never complain about what
they want you to do, or argue with them. 15 Behave like that in order that you may be
completely faultless [DOU] and may be perfect children of God [DOU] while you live
in the midst of people who are wicked and do very wicked things [DOU]. As you live
among them, show them clearly [MET] the way they ought to behave, just like the sun,
moon, and stars show the road clearly to us [SIM]. 16 Tell them how to have eternal
life. I ask that you do that in order that on the day Christ returns I may be able to
rejoice [MTY], that I did not labor [DOU] so hard among you in vain.
Because you and I dedicate ourselves together to do God’s will, even if I am to be
executed, I will rejoice, and you should also rejoice.
Philippians 2:17-18
17 Perhaps the Roman authorities will execute me, and my blood will pour out [MET]
as the wine pours out when the priest offers it to God [MET]. For your part, you believe
in Christ firmly. As a result, you have given yourselves completely to God in order
that you might do what he wills [MET], just like a priest offers a sacrifice completely
to God [MET]. Because I dedicate myself wholly to God together with you, even if they
are about to execute me, I will greatly rejoice [DOU], because I am giving myself wholly
to God, and because you all are giving yourselves wholly to God. 18 Similarly, you too
should rejoice because you are giving yourselves wholly to God, and you should rejoice
because I am giving myself wholly to God.
I confidently expect that the Lord Jesus will enable me to send Timothy to you soon.
He genuinely cares for your welfare, not his own interests. I am confident that the Lord
will enable me also to come soon.
Philippians 2:19-24
19 My relationship with the Lord Jesus leads me to confidently expect that he will
enable me to send Timothy to you soon, in order that his telling you the news about me
will encourage you. But I also expect that his returning to me and telling me the news
about you will encourage me. 20 Keep in mind that I have no one else like him who
genuinely cares for you. 21 All the others whom I have considered that I might send
to you are concerned only about their own matters. They are not concerned about
what Jesus Christ considers important. 22 But you know that Timothy has proved that
he serves the Lord and others faithfully. You know that he has served the Lord closely
together with me in proclaiming to people the message about Christ as though he were
[SIM] my son and I were his own father. 23 So then he is the one I confidently expect
to send to you as soon as I know what will happen to me. 24 And I am confident that
I will soon be released {the authorities will soon release me} so that the Lord will
enable me also to come/go to you soon.
Since Epaphroditus longs to see you and is distressed, I am sending him back to you.
So welcome him very joyfully. Since he nearly died while serving me on your behalf,
honor him and all people like him.
Philippians 2:25-30PHILIPPIANS 2:25
1738
PHILIPPIANS 3:6
25 I have concluded that it is really necessary that I send Epaphroditus back to you.
He is a fellow believer and my fellow worker, and he endures difficulties together with
me [MET], just like soldiers endure difficulties together. You sent him to me in order
that he might help me when I was needy [EUP]. 26 But I have concluded that I must
send him back to you because he has been longing to see you all. Furthermore, he
has been very distressed because he knows that you heard that he had become sick.
27 Indeed, he was so sick that he almost died. However, he did not die. Instead, God
pitied him and he also pitied me, and as a result he healed him. God pitied me because
he did not want me to be even more sorrowful than I already was. 28 So, I am sending
him back to you as quickly as possible, in order that you may rejoice when you see
him again and in order that I may be less sorrowful than I was. 29-30 Welcome him
very joyfully just like believers in our Lord Jesus should welcome one another. While
he was working for Christ, he was helping me in place of you because you were far
away. He knew that he might die as a result of helping me, and truly he nearly did
die. So honor him, and honor all those who are like him.
3
As for the other matters, continue to rejoice and know that it is not tiresome for me
and it is safe for you to mention them again.
Philippians 3:1
1 Now there are other things that I want to write about. My fellow believers, continue
to rejoice because you belong to the Lord. Though I will now write to you about those
same matters that I mentioned to you before, this is not tiresome for me, and it will
protect you from those who would harm you spiritually.
Beware of those unholy people who will harm you spiritually by insisting that you
must be circumcised in order to become God’s people.
Philippians 3:2-4a
2 Beware of those people who are dangerous [MET] like wild dogs.
They are
dangerous evildoers [DOU]. Beware of them since they are like people who cut other
people’s bodies [MET]. They will harm you spiritually by insisting that you must let
someone circumcise you in order for you to become God’s people [MTY, MET]. 3 Those
people think that they are God’s people because someone has circumcised them. But
we, not they, are truly God’s people [MET], whether or not someone has circumcised
us. God’s Spirit enables us to [MTY] worship God; we praise Christ Jesus because he
has enabled us to become the people of God. We do not believe that God will consider/
make us his people as a result of what someone has done to our bodies [MTY, SYN].
4 We do not trust in those rituals to make us acceptable to God, although I could very
well do that if it would be useful for me.
Since I was circumcised properly and have a purely Hebrew ancestry, and since I
kept the Jewish laws blamelessly, I could rely upon what I have done and who I am
better than anyone else could, if it were beneficial for my salvation.
Philippians 3:4b-6
In fact, if I could benefit from it for my salvation, I could rely upon what I have
done and who I am [MTY, SYN] more than anyone else could! I will tell you why.
5 I was circumcised {Someone circumcised me} when I was one week old. I am from
the people of Israel. I am from the tribe of Benjamin. I am completely Hebrew in
every way. While I was a member of the Pharisee sect, I strictly obeyed the laws that
God gave Moses. 6 I was so zealous to make people obey those laws that I caused the
people who believe in Christ to suffer because I thought they were trying to abolishPHILIPPIANS 3:7
1739
PHILIPPIANS 3:16
those laws. Indeed, as far as my obeying those laws is concerned, no one could have
accused me by saying that I had disobeyed any of those laws.
I now consider all these advantages that I once supposed would help me to be
worthless, and I consider everything else as well to be worthless, because I want to
know Christ, to be united with him, and to be made righteous through trusting in Christ
alone.
Philippians 3:7-11
7 Nevertheless, all such things as those, which I used to consider to be useful to me,
those very things I now consider worthless, because I want to know Christ (OR, in
order that I may know Christ). 8 More than that, I consider all things to be worthless,
compared to how great it is to know Christ Jesus my Lord. Because I want to know
him better (OR, In order that I may know him better), I have rejected all things as
worthless. I consider them as useless as [MET] rubbish, in order that I may have a
close relationship with Christ [MET], 9 and in order that I may completely belong to
him. It was not as a result of my obeying the laws he gave Moses that God erased
the record of my sins. Instead, it is because I have trusted in Christ that God has
declared that I am no longer guilty for my sins, and he enables me to act righteously.
It is God himself who has erased the record of my sins, and he enables me to act
righteously, only because I have trusted in Christ. 10 I want to know Christ better and
better. Particularly, I want to continually experience his working powerfully in my
life, just like God worked powerfully when he caused Christ to become alive after he
died. I also want to be continually willing to suffer in order that I may obey God, just
like Christ suffered in order that he might obey God. I also want to be completely
willing to die for Christ, even as he died for me, 11 because I expect that, as a result of
God’s goodness, he will cause me to live again after I have died.
Since you desire to be perfected and since you have my example of not considering
that I am already perfect, but of constantly striving to become more and more like
Christ, follow my example.
Philippians 3:12-16
12 I do not claim that I have already become completely like Christ Jesus; that is, I
have not already become all that God intends me to be [DOU]. But I earnestly try to
become more and more like Christ, because he chose me in order that I might become
like him. 13 My fellow believers, I certainly do not consider that I have already become
completely like Christ. But I am like a runner. A runner does not look backward [MET].
Instead, he leans/stretches forward as he runs straight toward the goal in order that
he might win the race and get the prize. Similarly, I do not think about what I have
already done. 14 Instead, I concentrate only on continuing to become more and more
like Christ right up to the end of my life [MET]. As a result, because of my relationship
with Christ Jesus, God will call/summon me to receive a reward from him in heaven.
15 So, all of us who are spiritually mature should think this same way. If any of you
do not think this same way regarding what I have written here, God will reveal that
to you. 16 What is important is that we must conduct our lives according to what God
has already revealed to us.
Imitate me and those who live as I do. Remember that there are many people who
are bad examples, as shown by their lustful behavior, wanting to do what their bodies
desire. But as for us, Christ will transform our weak bodies to be like his glorious
heavenly body.
Philippians 3:17-21PHILIPPIANS 3:17
1740
PHILIPPIANS 4:7
17 My fellow believers, all of you should follow my example, and observe those
people who act as I do, in order that you may imitate them also. 18 Keep in mind
that there are many people who say that they believe in Christ, but who act in such a
way that shows that they are opposed to the teaching about Christ dying on the cross
[MTY]. I have told you about those people many times before, and now I am sad, even
crying, as I tell you about them again. 19 God will severely punish them. The things
their bodies desire [MTY] have become like gods to them [MET]. They are proud of
the things they should be ashamed of. They think only about what unbelievers [MTY]
think about. 20 But remember that we are citizens of heaven. And we eagerly wait for
our Savior, the Lord Jesus Christ, to return from there. 21 By the power that enables
him to put everything under his own control, he will change our weak bodies to
become like his glorious body.
4
On the basis of all that I have told you, continue to believe firmly in the Lord Jesus
Christ according to what I have just taught you, and act accordingly.
Philippians 4:1
1 My fellow believers, I love you, and I long for you. You make me happy [MTY],
and I am ◄proud of/pleased with► you. Dear friends, on the basis of all that I have
told you, continue to believe firmly in the Lord doing what I have just taught you.
I urge Euodia and Syntyche to be reconciled with each other; help them in this since
they have both proclaimed the good news faithfully together with me and my other
fellow workers.
Philippians 4:2-3
2 I urge you(sg), Euodia, and I urge you(sg), Syntyche, to again have a peaceful
relationship with each other, because you both have a relationship with the Lord.
3 And, my faithful comrade/partner, I request that you (sg) help them to again have
a peaceful relationship with each other, because they have faithfully proclaimed the
message about Christ together with me, even though many people have opposed us
(exc). They have faithfully proclaimed that message together with Clement and the
rest of my fellow workers, whose names are in the book in which God has written the
names of all those people who will live forever.
The Lord is coming soon. Always rejoice, be gentle to everyone. Do not worry about
anything, but pray to God instead. As a result, God will grant you profound peace.
Philippians 4:4-7
4 Because you have a relationship with the Lord, always rejoice! I’m saying it again,
rejoice! 5 Act in such a way that everyone can know that you are gentle. The Lord
is coming soon. 6 Do not worry about anything. Instead, in every situation, pray to
God, tell him what you need, and ask him to help you [DOU]. Also thank him for what
he does for you. 7 As a result, God will enable you not to worry about anything [MTY]
(OR, God will protect your minds in every way) [PRS]. That is, he will cause you to
have inner peace because you have a relationship with Christ Jesus. You will not be
able to understand [PRS] how you can be so peaceful in such difficult circumstances!!
Continually think about everything that is good and praiseworthy. Continually
practice whatever you have learned from me. As a result, God will be with you and
give you inner peace.
Philippians 4:8-9PHILIPPIANS 4:8
1741
PHILIPPIANS 4:20
8 My fellow believers, there is one more thing I want you to do. Whatever is true,
whatever is worthy of respect, whatever is right, whatever is morally pure, whatever
is pleasing, whatever is admirable, whatever is good, whatever deserves praise, those
are the things that you should continually think about. 9 Those things that I have
taught you and that you have learned from me, those things that you have heard me
say and that you have seen me do, those are the things that you yourselves should
continually do. As a result of your doing those things, God, the one who causes us to
have inner peace, will ◄be with/bless► you.
I rejoice greatly because you have once again demonstrated your concern for me by
giving to meet my needs, though it is true that Christ enables me to be content in every
situation.
Philippians 4:10-14
10 I rejoice greatly and thank the Lord because now, after some time, by sending
money to me you have once again shown that you are concerned about me [EUP].
Indeed, you were concerned about me all the time, but you had no opportunity to
show that you were concerned about me. 11 I am saying this not because I am concerned
that I lack things that I need. In fact, I have learned to be content in whatever situation
I am. 12 Specifically, I know how to be content when I do not have what I need, and I
know how to be content when I have plenty. I have learned how to be content in any
and every situation [DOU]. Specifically, I have learned how to be content when I have
enough to eat, and I have learned how to be content when I do not have enough to eat.
I have learned how to be content when I have plenty [DOU] of what I need, and I have
learned how to be content when I lack things. 13 I am able ◄to cope with/to handle►
every situation because Christ gives me the strength to do that. 14 Nevertheless, you
did very well by helping me (OR, giving me money) [EUP] while I have been suffering
hardship.
You Philippians know that in the early days of preaching the good news in your
region you were the only congregation that sent me money. I do not say this because I
desire your gifts, but I desire that God would abundantly bless you for aiding me.
Philippians 4:15-17
15 My friends there at Philippi, you yourselves know that when I first proclaimed
the message about Christ to you, and then left there to go to Macedonia province,
you were the only group of believers [LIT] who sent me gifts [EUP] in order that I
might proclaim that message to others just like I did for you. 16 Even when I was in
Thessalonica city, you sent money [EUP] to me two different times [IDM] in order to
supply what I needed. 17 I say this, not because I desire that you give me money now.
Instead, I desire that God will abundantly bless [MET] you as a result of your helping
me.
I have received your very generous gift; God is very pleased with this gift, and he
will abundantly supply your every need also. Let us praise him forever.
Philippians 4:18-20
18 But I have received a very generous gift [EUP] from you, and as a result, I have
plenty. I have an abundant supply of what I need because I have received from
Epaphroditus the money [EUP] that you sent to me. God considers that your gift is
very acceptable, and he is very pleased with it. Your gift is like a nice-smelling sacrifice
[MET]. 19 Moreover, God, whom I serve, has an unlimited supply of everything that
we(inc) need. And as a result, because of your relationship with Christ Jesus, he will
completely supply everything that you need. 20 So, praise God our Father forever and
ever! Amen!PHILIPPIANS 4:21
1742
PHILIPPIANS 4:23
All of God’s people here, including those who serve God with me and those who work
at the emperor’s palace, join me in greeting each one of God’s people there.
Philippians 4:21-22
21 Greet for me/ us(exc) all of God’s people there, that is, all those who have a
relationship with Christ Jesus. The fellow believers who serve God together with me
here send their greetings to you (OR, say they are thinking fondly of you). 22 All of
God’s people here send their greetings to you. Especially the fellow believers who
work in the palace of the emperor send their greetings to you.
May the Lord Jesus Christ bless you.
Philippians 4:23
23 My desire is that our Lord Jesus Christ will continue to act kindly toward you all
[SYN].COLOSSIANS 1:1
1743
COLOSSIANS 1:12
This book is a letter that the Apostle Paul wrote to the
Christians at Colossae. We call this book
Colossians
Colossians 1:1-2
I, Paul, am sending this letter to you, who are God’s people in Colossae. We pray
that God will bless you.
1 I, Paul, am writing this letter to you, and our fellow believer Timothy is with me.
I am an apostle who represents Christ Jesus, because that is what God wanted. 2 I
am sending this letter to you who are in Colossae city, and who are God’s people, and
our faithful fellow believers who have a close relationship with Christ. We pray that
God our Father will be acting kindly towards you, and that he will cause you to have
inner peace.
We thank God for you very often that you believe in Christ Jesus and that you love
all God’s people.
Colossians 1:3-8
3 Very often [HYP] we thank God, the Father of our Lord Jesus Christ, while we
are praying for you, 4 because we have heard that you believe in Christ Jesus, and
that you love all God’s people. 5 You do that because you confidently expect to
receive that which God is ◄reserving/keeping safe► for you in heaven, which you
heard about previously when you heard the true message, that is, the message about
Christ. 6 People proclaimed it [PRS] to you, just like people have proclaimed it in
many different countries [HYP, IDM]. The true message is changing more and more
people’s lives, just like it changed your lives because you heard it and you truly
experienced that God acts kindly towards us in ways we do not deserve. 7 That is
just what Epaphras taught you would happen. We love Epaphras. He serves Christ
together with us and works for Christ faithfully for your benefit. 8 He told us that you
love all God’s people, just like God’s Spirit has enabled you to (OR, spiritually).
We have also been praying very often to God for you. We pray that you will know
truly all that he wants you to do, in order that you will conduct yourselves as the Lord’s
people should.
Colossians 1:9-12
9 Because of what we heard about you, we have also been praying [LIT] very often
to God for you [HYP], ever since we heard this report about you. We pray that you
will truly know all that God wants you to do; that is, that you will become very wise,
and that you will understand spiritual matters well. 10 We have been praying like
that in order that you will conduct yourselves as the Lord’s people should conduct
themselves, in order that you will please the Lord in every way. Specifically, we have
been praying like that in order that you will be doing every sort of good deed [IDM]
and in order that you will be getting to know God truly, more and more. 11 And we
pray that God will greatly strengthen you spiritually with the mighty power that he
has shown to people, in order that you will always be steadfast and patient when you
experience difficulties, while at the same time you will be rejoicing. 12 And we pray
that you will be thanking God our Father, because he has enabled you/us to receive
the things that he will give to his people in heaven [SYN].COLOSSIANS 1:13
1744
COLOSSIANS 1:20
God our Father has caused you to be ruled by his Son, who existed before and ranks
above everything that has been created.
Colossians 1:13-20
13 God our Father rescued us spiritually so that the evil one no longer rules us
[MET, MTY], and he caused us now to be ruled by his Son,, whom he loves. 14 That is,
because of our relationship with his Son (OR, because of what the one who is also God
did), God has redeemed/bought us; in particular, he has forgiven our sins. 15 God’s
Son reveals perfectly what God, his Father, is like, whom no one can see. God’s
Son existed before and ranks above everything that God has created. 16 When God
created everything that is on the earth, he did it by having his Son do it. He created
everything that people can see, and also everything which is in heaven that people
cannot see. In particular, his Son created all ranks of important spirit beings. And
his Son ranks above everything, because God by the work of had his Son, and because
by his Son all things were created {because God had his Son create everything} in
order that everything might praise his Son, 17 and because it is his Son who existed
before anything else existed, and because God sustains everything by what his Son
does. 18 And God’s Son ranks above everything, because it is his Son who rules over
his people [MET] as a person’s head controls his physical body, because his Son causes
his people to live spiritually. God’s Son is the first one who became alive again, in
order that he should become more important than anything and everyone. 19 God’s
Son reveals perfectly what God his Father is like, because his Father chose to live
completely in him. 20 God our Father caused his Son to rule us, because he decided to
reconcile with himself everything that is on earth and that is in heaven by what his
Son did, in order that everything might honor his Son; that is, God our Father decided
to reconcile everything to himself as a result of his Son’s blood flowing when he died
on the cross.
An alternative arrangement of the sentences of Colossians 1:13-19
[The chiastic material is rearranged below so that the directly related propositional
clusters are joined together.]
13 God our Father rescued us spiritually so that we are no longer ruled by the evil
one, and God our Father caused us now to be ruled by his Son (OR, the man who
is also God) whom he loves. 14a That is, by means of what his Son did, we have
been redeemed by God, our Father. 14b In particular, our sins have been forgiven by
God, our Father. 20 God, our Father, has done this because he decided to reconcile
to himself, by means of his Son, everything that is on earth and that is in heaven,
in order that his Son might be honored; that is, God, our Father decided to reconcile
everything to himself by means of God’s Son’s blood flowing out when he died on the
cross. 15b God cannot be seen by anyone, 15a but his Son reveals perfectly what
God—his Father—is like, 19a because it is in his Son that the Father chose 19b that he
himself would dwell completely. 15c God’s Son ranks above everything 15d that has
been created, 16 because it was by means of God’s Son that God created everything
that is on the earth and that can be seen by people, and also everything that is in
heaven and that cannot be seen by people. In particular, all types of important spirit
beings were created by means of him, since everything has been created by God by
means of God’s Son. And his Son ranks above everything, because everything has
been created by God, in order that God’s Son might be honored by everything, 17
and because it is he who existed before anything else existed, and since everything is
sustained by God by means of God’s Son. 18 And God’s Son ranks above everything
because it is he who rules over all believers, just like a person’s head controls his
physical body, because he causes all believers to live spiritually. His Son is the first oneCOLOSSIANS 1:21
1745
COLOSSIANS 2:3
who rose from among those who have died, in order that he should become more
important than everything and everyone.
As for you, God our Father has now reconciled you to himself.
Colossians 1:21-23
21 As for you, although formerly God considered you his enemies (OR, God considered
you as alienated from him) and although you were formerly hostile to God because
you thought evil thoughts and because you did evil deeds, 22 nevertheless, God our
Father has now reconciled you with himself. He did that as a result of his Son dying
physically. He did it in order that you should be completely holy when he brings you
into his presence. 23 He wants you to continue [DOU] to believe the message about
Christ; specifically, he wants you to continue to be stable/steadfast and to continue
to confidently expect to receive that which you heard about when you heard that
message. That message has been proclaimed {They have proclaimed that message}
to people in very many places [HYP]; and I, Paul, also become someone who tells it
to people.
I am completing what Christ appointed me to do, that I should suffer physically
for the benefit of the church. And I proclaim the previously unrevealed message about
Christ to every class of persons.
Colossians 1:24-29
24 At the present time I am rejoicing that I am suffering for your benefit; that is, I
am completing what Christ decided that I should suffer physically for the benefit of all
believers, who are as dear to him as his own body. 25 I myself became someone who
serves God’s people, because I was appointed {God appointed me} to be responsible
to help you who are non-Jews. I became one who serves God’s people in order that
I should make known to you non-Jews the whole message from/about God. 26 We
did not know this message previously; that is, God concealed it from the people who
lived in all the previous ages, but he has now revealed it to his people. 27 That is,
God decided to reveal to them this message, which declares that he will greatly bless
the non-Jews. Specifically, this message declares that Christ, by his Spirit, will live
in you who are non-Jews, with the result that you confidently expect that you will
experience how glorious God is. 28 We tell about Christ to every class of persons; we
warn them, and specifically, we teach everyone very wisely. We do this in order that
every person who ◄has a close relationship with/is united to► Christ may be ◄all
that God wants them to be/perfect► when we present them to Christ. 29 In order that
I might achieve/accomplish this, I am also working very hard, depending on Christ to
empowering me very greatly.
2
I am exerting myself very greatly on your behalf in order that you might truly know
the message about Christ, in order that no one might delude you.
Colossians 2:1-5
1 In particular, I want you to realize that I am ◄exerting myself very greatly/working
very hard► on your behalf, on behalf of those who are in Laodicea city, and on behalf
of all those others who have not seen me personally. 2 I am doing this in order that
they and you [SYN] might be strengthened spiritually as you are united in loving one
another. And I am doing this in order that they and you might fully and thoroughly
[DOU] understand the message that God has now revealed; that is, in order that
they and you might truly know the message from God our Father and about Christ,
3 who alone is able to cause them and you to understand thoroughly [DOU] this veryCOLOSSIANS 2:4
1746
COLOSSIANS 2:17
important message. 4 I am telling you this in order that no one may deceive you by
persuasive arguments; 5 because, even though I am absent from you physically, I am
very concerned about you. At the same time, I am rejoicing because I know that you
are united with each other and that you believe firmly in Christ.
Conduct yourselves as those who are united to Christ Jesus our Lord should conduct
themselves.
Colossians 2:6-7
6 In a way that is ◄consistent/in harmony► with the message that you received
about Christ Jesus, who is our Lord, conduct yourselves as you should, since you
have a close relationship with him. 7 Specifically, continue believing and practicing
[MET, DOU] what you were first taught about Christ. Continue to do this more and
more; continue to fIrmly believe all the true teaching, just like Epaphras taught it to
you. And continue thanking God, our Father, very much for all that he has done for
you.
Make sure that no one makes you become his disciples by teaching you a false
religious philosophy, since you are spiritually complete because you are united to Christ.
Colossians 2:8-15
8 Make sure that no one forces you (pl) to become his disciples [MET] by his
teaching you a religious philosophy/doctrine that is worthless and false. Such a
philosophy is false because it teaches what mere human beings think, because it
teaches people elementary regulations/rules that are concerned merely with what is
external/physical, and because it teaches what is contrary to the true teaching about
Christ. 9 It is in Christ’s body that God lives completely. 10 And you are spiritually
complete because you have a close relationship with Christ, who rules over every
other ruler. 11 Specifically, because of your close relationship with Christ, it is as
though [MET] you were circumcised {Christ circumcised you} spiritually. This does
not mean that someone circumcised you physically [MTY], but it means that Christ
completely removed your self-directed nature. 12 And specifically, when you were
baptized, it was as though [MET] you had died and were buried with Christ, and it was
as though [MET] God caused you to live again with Christ as a result of your believing
that God acted powerfully; specifically, by your believing that God caused Christ
to become alive again. 13 And specifically, you who are non-Jews, because of your
sins, you were spiritually dead before you trusted in Christ. You were uncircumcised
spiritually; that is, your self-directed nature controlled you. Nevertheless, it was you
whom God caused to become alive spiritually because of their close relationship [MET]
with Christ. And specifically, God forgave us all our sins. 14 It is just as though he
canceled ◄the charges against us/the sins that we had committed► for which God will
punish us. And it was just as though [MET] it was the charges on that document/paper
that he canceled by nailing them to the cross when they nailed Christ on the cross.
15 And specifically, God defeated the evil spirit beings that rule, and he demonstrated/
showed that publicly; that is, he triumphed over them as a result of what Christ did.
Disregard those who condemn you because you do not obey certain regulations and
because you do not worship God as they insist that you should.
Colossians 2:16-19
16 So disregard anyone who says that God will punish you because you eat
certain foods and because you drink certain drinks or because you do not celebrate
special yearly festivals or celebrate the time when the new moon appears or weekly
◄Sabbaths/Jewish days of rest►. 17 Disregard such people because those regulations/
rules about food and drink and festivals are only like a shadow [MET] that is cast byCOLOSSIANS 2:18
1747
COLOSSIANS 3:6
something that is approaching; that is, they merely represent the real spiritual blessings
that Christ has given to you. 18 Disregard those who say that God will punish you
because you do not worship God in the way that they say that you should; that is,
they insist that you should humiliate yourselves and that you should worship the
angels. Disregard such people since they base their authority on things that they
have never seen, and since they are proud without reason because their self-directed
nature controls what they think, 19 and since they do not teach the true teaching about
Christ [MET]. Christ is the one who causes all of his people to develop/grow spiritually
as God plans that they should develop/grow, just like [MET] a person’s head directs
how his body grows, as it is held together by its joints and ligaments.
Do not submit to elementary regulations, which are concerned merely with what is
external.
Colossians 2:20-23
20 It is as though [MET] you died with Christ. So you no longer have to obey
elementary regulations/rules that are concerned merely with what is external/physical,
just like a dead person no longer has to do anything. So, do not submit to regulations/
rules 21 such as ‘Do not handle certain things’, ‘Do not taste certain things’, ‘Do
not touch certain things’, as if you still had to obey such regulations/rules. 22 All
those things are intended to cease to exist when we use them. And do not obey
such regulations/rules, because they are what mere human teachers command and
teach. 23 Do not obey such regulations/rules; they only cause people to do what their
self-directed nature wants to do. Those regulations seem to be wise because they
urge people to worship as mere human teachers have decided. They urge that people
should humiliate themselves, and that people should treat their bodies harshly. But
those regulations/rules do not help people at all to not do the sinful things that their
self-directed nature wants to do.
3
Be constantly wanting what is associated with heaven.
Colossians 3:1-4
1 You now are alive spiritually, and it is as though you were given new life {God
caused you to become alive} when he caused Christ to become alive again. So be
constantly wanting what is associated with heaven [MTY], where Christ is. There
God has given him supreme authority and the highest honor. 2 Be constantly wanting
the blessings that God has prepared for you in heaven [MTY]. Do not be constantly
wanting to do the evil deeds that people on earth do [MTY], 3 because you have ceased
to behave as you formerly did. You are like people who have died. You now live
spiritually together with Christ in the presence of God; and people cannot see that you
have a new life. 4 When Christ, who causes you to live spiritually, is publicly revealed,
then God will also reveal you publicly together with Christ, and you together with
Christ will be glorious.
Do not do what is evil.
Colossians 3:5-11
5 Get rid of your evil practices/deeds [MET, MTY] as though they were enemies whom
you were killing (OR, Stop doing evil things [MET, MTY], just as dead people do not do
what is evil). Specifically, do not practice sexual immorality. Do not commit unnatural
sexual acts. Do not desire to act like that, and do not desire to do anything that is evil.
Do not desire to have more things than you need, because, if you do that, you are
◄worshipping material things instead of worshipping God/making material things to
become your god►. 6 Do not behave like that since God will punish [MTY] those whoCOLOSSIANS 3:7
1748
COLOSSIANS 3:21
disobey him, because of their sins. 7 You also formerly did those things when you
were disobeying God. 8 Now, however, as for you, do not do any of these evil deeds:
Do not get angry in any way [DOU]. Do not act maliciously. Do not ◄slander/talk evil
about► people. Do not talk abusively to people. 9 Do not lie to one another. Do not
do those things, because you have ◄disposed of/stopped obeying► your former evil
nature and stopped doing what you did when you had that former evil nature, 10 and
because you have received a new nature. God is causing your new nature to become
more and more like his own nature. He created your new nature in order that you
might get to know God truly. 11 As a result of that, it is not important whether anyone
is a non-Jew or a Jew, or whether anyone is circumcised or not, or whether anyone is
a foreigner, or even uncivilized, or whether anyone is a slave or not a slave. But what
is important is Christ, who is supremely important in every way.
Do what is good; in particular, love one another.
Colossians 3:12-14
12 Because God has chosen you to be his people; and because he loves you, be
compassionate to one another. Be kind to one another. Be humble. Be meek (OR,
be considerate toward one another), be patient with one another, 13 and tolerate one
another’s flaws. Forgive one another, if one of you has a grudge/complaint against
another. Just like the Lord Jesus freely/willingly forgave you, you too must freely/
willingly forgive one another. 14 And what is more important than all of these is that
you love one another, because by doing that you will be perfectly united together.
Continue to be at peace with one another, be constantly thanking God, and continue
getting to know thoroughly the message about Christ.
Colossians 3:15-16
15 Because God chose you to live peacefully with one another in your local
congregations, let that peace which Christ gives control your ◄inner beings/hearts►,
and be constantly thanking God. 16 And continue to let the message about Christ
govern/direct all you think and do, as you very wisely teach and warn one another
with psalms and hymns and spiritual songs (OR, songs that God’s Spirit gives you),
while you sincerely and thankfully sing to God.
do.
Do everything in the manner that those who are the people of the Lord Jesus should
Colossians 3:17
17 Whatever you say, and whatever you do, do all of this in the manner that those
who are representatives [MTY] of the Lord Jesus should do, while you constantly
thank God, our Father, as you ask the Lord Jesus to take your prayers to God.
Wives, be subject to your husbands; husbands, love your wives.
Colossians 3:18-19
18 You women, be subject to your husbands, since that is what you should do
because you have a close relationship with the Lord Jesus. 19 You men, love your
wives; and, do not be harsh with them.
Children, obey your parents in every circumstance; parents, do not over-correct your
children.
Colossians 3:20-21
20 You children, obey your parents in every circumstance, because the Lord God
is pleased when you do that. 21 You parents (OR, you fathers), do not correct your
children more than you need to, in order that they do not become discouraged.COLOSSIANS 3:22
1749
COLOSSIANS 4:11
Slaves, obey your masters in every circumstance sincerely and wholeheartedly;
masters, provide for your slaves justly and fairly.
Colossians 3:22—4:1
22 You slaves, obey your earthly masters in every circumstance. Do not obey your
masters only when they are watching [MTY] you, like those who merely want to
impress their masters favorably. Instead, obey your masters sincerely. Do this
because you reverence the Lord Jesus (OR, God). 23 Whatever work you do, work
wholeheartedly. Work wholeheartedly, like those who are working for the Lord Jesus.
Do not work like those who are working merely for their masters, 24 because you know
that it is the Lord who will properly/justly repay you. That is, you will receive what
God has promised. Remember that it is Christ who is the real master whom you are
serving. 25 But God will judge everyone impartially. He will punish you according to
what you have done that is wrong.
4
1 You masters, treat your slaves justly and fairly, because you know that you have
a master who is in heaven who will say whether he approves of what you have done.
Pray to God persistently. And pray that God will give me opportunities to declare
the message about Christ.
Colossians 4:2-4
2 Pray to God persistently, and as you pray, be alert and be thanking God. 3 Since
I am in prison [MTY] because I declared the message about Christ that God has now
revealed, pray also for me that God will give me opportunities [MTY] to speak, in
order that I might declare it. 4 That is, pray for me that God will enable me to make
his message known publicly. I need to do this because I know that I should declare
it.
Always speak wisely and graciously to those who do not believe in the Lord Jesus.
Colossians 4:5-6
5 Act wisely towards those who do not believe in the Lord Jesus [MTY]; use every
opportunity to do that. 6 In particular, always speak graciously and in a pleasant way
to those who do not believe in the Lord Jesus. As a result, you will come to know in
what manner you should answer each one of them.
Tychicus will tell you all that has been happening to me.
Colossians 4:7-9
7 Tychicus will tell you all that has been happening to me. He is a fellow believer
whom I/we (exc) love and who helps me faithfully and who serves the Lord Jesus
together with me. 8 The reason that I am sending Tychicus to you with this letter is
that he might know how you are and in order that he might strengthen you spiritually.
(OR, in order that you might know about us (exc) and in order that he might comfort
you.) 9 I am sending him to you with Onesimus, who is a faithful fellow believer
whom I/we (inc) love and who is your fellow townsman. They will tell you all about
what has been happening here.
My fellow workers here greet you.
Colossians 4:10-14
10 Aristarchus, who is in prison with me, and Mark, who is Barnabas’ cousin, ◄say
that they are thinking fondly about you/send you their greetings►. I have instructed
you about Mark, so if he comes to you, welcome him. 11 Jesus, who is also called Justus,
also ◄says that he is thinking fondly about you/greets you/sends you his greetings►.
These three men are the only Jewish believers who are working with me in orderCOLOSSIANS 4:12
1750
COLOSSIANS 4:18
that people would submit to God as their king, and they have all comforted me.
12 Epaphras, who is your fellow townsman and who serves Christ Jesus, ◄says that
he is thinking fondly about you/greets you/sends you his greetings►.
Epaphras prays earnestly for you very often, that you might be spiritually mature
and that you might know fully all that God wills for you. 13 I can assure you that he
prays this because he is deeply concerned for you, for those who live in Laodicea city,
and for those who live in Hierapolis city. 14 Luke, the doctor, whom I/we (exc) love,
and Demas ◄say that they are thinking fondly about you/send you their greetings►.
Obey these instructions.
Colossians 4:15-17
15 Tell the fellow believers who live in Laodicea city and Nympha* and the
congregation that meets in her house that we ◄are thinking fondly about them/send
them our greetings►. 16 After someone reads this letter publicly to you, cause someone
to also read it to the congregation that is in Laodicea city. And as for the letter that
I wrote to the congregation that is in Laodicea city, make sure that it is also read
among you {you should also read that letter} publicly. 17 Say to Archippus, “Make
sure that you complete the task that God appointed you to do, because you have a
close relationship with the Lord Jesus.”
I, Paul, am penning this myself in order that you may know that this letter was sent
by me. Remember to pray about the fact that I am in prison.
Colossians 4:18
18 I, Paul, ◄am thinking fondly about you/send you my greetings►. Having taken
the pen from my scribe, I am now writing this myself in order that you may know
that I have truly sent this letter. Remember to pray about the fact that I am in prison
[MTY]. I pray that our Lord Jesus Christ would continue to act graciously towards you
all.
* 4:15 meets in his house. [Nympha is a name for a woman.]1 THESSALONIANS 1:1
1751
1 THESSALONIANS 1:10
This book is one of the letters that the Apostle Paul wrote
to the Christians at Thessalonica. We call this book
1 Thessalonians
1 Thessalonians 1:1
I, Paul, greet you believers who are in Thessalonica
1 I, Paul, am writing this letter. Silas and Timothy are with me. We(exc) are sending
this letter to you who are the congregation of believers in Thessalonica city. We (inc)
all worship (OR, trust in) God our Father [MET] and our Lord Jesus Christ. We three
desire/pray that God, our Father, and Jesus Christ, our Lord, will continue to act kindly
toward you and will continue to cause you to have inner peace.
We always thank God for you all. We continually remember the way you live as
believers and we know that God chose you. The Holy Spirit enabled us to powerfully
tell you the good message, and although people persecuted you greatly, you were joyful.
As a result, you inspired all the believers who are in Macedonia and Achaia to trust in
God firmly, as you do.
1 Thessalonians 1:2-10
2 We always thank God for you all when we mention you while we pray (OR, when
we pray for you). 3 We thank God because we continually remember that you work for
God because you trust in him and you earnestly/energetically help people because you
love them. You also endure it when people cause you to suffer. You endure it because
you confidently expect that our Lord Jesus Christ will soon return from heaven to
rescue you! 4 My fellow believers whom God loves, we also thank him because we
know that he chose you to become his people. 5 We know that he chose you because
when we told that message to you, we did not speak only words. The Holy Spirit
helped us to speak powerfully/effectively, and he strongly assured us that he was
powerfully working in you by means of the message about Christ that we told to you.
You yourselves know that, because you know how we spoke and how we conducted
ourselves when we were with you, in order that we might help you. 6 We also know
that God chose you because we have now heard that you have endured your troubles
when people caused you to suffer very much because you believed in Christ. You
endured just like the Lord Jesus Christ endured, and just like we did when people
caused us to suffer. At that time you were joyful because the Holy Spirit caused you
to be joyful. 7 As a result of your joyfully enduring your troubles, all the believers who
live in Macedonia and Achaia provinces have heard how firmly you trust God. So they
know that they should firmly trust in God as you do. 8 Other people have heard you
tell the message from the Lord Jesus. Then they also have proclaimed the message
to people who live throughout Macedonia and Achaia provinces. Not only that, but
people who live in many far-away places [HYP] have heard that you trust in God. As
a result, we do not need to tell people what God has done in your lives. 9 People who
live far from you are telling others what happened when we were with you. They also
report that you stopped worshipping things that ◄you/your ancestors► considered to
be gods and now you worship God. As a result, you serve the God who is all-powerful
and who is the real God. 10 They tell us that now you wait expectantly for his Son
to return to earth from heaven. You firmly believe that God caused him to live again
after he died. You believe also that Jesus will rescue all of us, who trust in him, from
God’s punishing us [MTY].1 THESSALONIANS 2:1
1752
1 THESSALONIANS 2:14
2
You and God know that it is true that we behaved in a very virtuous, upright,
and irreproachable manner toward you. You know also that we continually exhorted,
encouraged, and urged that you behave in the way that God’s people should.
1 Thessalonians 2:1-12
1 My fellow believers, you know that our time with you was very worthwhile/
effective [LIT]. 2 Although people in Philippi city previously mistreated us (exc) and
insulted us, as you know, our God caused us to be courageous. As a result, we told
you the good message that originates/comes from God, even though some people in
your city also strongly ◄opposed us/tried to prevent us from telling God’s message►.
3 When we exhorted/urged (OR, tried to convince) you to obey God’s message, we did
not tell you an untrue message. Instead, we told you a true message. We do not want
to get something for ourselves by immoral means. We do not try to deceive you or
other people. 4 On the contrary, we tell God’s message because he trusted us to do that,
because he examined us and considered us to be acceptable to tell people the message
about Christ. As we teach people, we do not say what they like to hear. Instead, we
say what God wants us to say, because he examines everything that we think and
what we desire. 5 We never ◄flattered you/said nice things about you insincerely►,
as you know. We were never greedy, so we never needed to use words to ◄hide
greediness from you/cause you to think that we were not greedy►. God knows that
this is true! 6 We never tried to get people to honor us, 7 although we could have
demanded that you should honor/respect us, because we are apostles who represent
(OR, speak for) Christ. On the contrary, we were gentle when we were among you, as
a mother gently takes care of her own children [SIM]. 8 So, because we love you, we
were delighted to personally tell you the good message that God gave us. But also we
were delighted to lovingly do all that we could do to help you [SYN] because ◄you had
become very dear to us/we had begun to love you very much►. 9 My fellow believers,
you remember that we worked very hard [DOU] in order to ◄support ourselves/earn
money to buy what we needed► while we were with you. We worked during the day
and also at night in order that we would not have to ask any one of you to give us
what we needed, while we proclaimed to you the good message that God gave us.
10 You know that it is true, and God knows that it is true, that we conducted our lives
in a very pure, right, and faultless [DOU] manner toward you believers. 11 You know
also that we lovingly behaved/acted toward each one of you, just like a father lovingly
behaves/acts toward his own children [SIM]. 12 Specifically, we kept strongly exhorting/
urging and encouraging you that you conduct your lives in the way that God’s people
should, because he has invited you to become his people over whom he will rule in a
wonderful way [HEN].
We continually thank God also that you accepted as true a message that does not
originate from human beings. Instead, you accepted as true the message that originates
from God, and the result was that people caused you to suffer as Christ did.
1 Thessalonians 2:13-16
13 We also continually thank God because when you heard the message that we told
to you, you accepted it as the true message, the good message that God gave to us. We
did not invent it. We also thank God that he is changing your lives because you trust
this message [PRS]. 14 My fellow believers, we know that you sincerely believed the
message from God, because the manner in which you acted was just like the manner
in which the congregations in Judea acted. They also worship God, and they ◄have a
close relationship with/are united to► Christ Jesus. Specifically, you endured it when
your own countrymen mistreated you because you believe the message from God, in1 THESSALONIANS 2:15
1753
1 THESSALONIANS 3:5
the same manner that those Jewish believers in Judea endured it when the Jews who
do not believe in Christ mistreated them. 15 Unbelieving Jews are the ones whom God
considers guilty for killing the Lord Jesus, as well as for killing many prophets. Other
unbelieving Jews forced us to leave many towns. They really make God angry; and
they are opposed to what is best for all human beings! 16 Specifically, when we tell
the good message to non-Jewish people in order that they can be saved {that God will
save them} spiritually, these unbelieving Jews try to stop/prevent us from doing that.
Because they continually sin more and more, they are almost reaching the limit that
has been set by God [MET]! God will soon punish them [MTY], at last, for all their sins!
It is because of you that we are pleased and joyful. So when people forced Silas,
Timothy and me to be separated from you for a short time, we strongly desired to be
with you.
1 Thessalonians 2:17-20
17 My fellow believers, when for a short time [IDM] those people forced us to be
separated from you, we felt like parents ◄who had lost all their children/ whose
children had died► [MET]. Although we were far away from you, we were still
emotionally concerned about you, and we strongly desired to be present with you.
18 You can know that we wanted to return to you. Indeed I, Paul, tried to return twice
[IDM]. But we did not return because each time Satan prevented us from returning.
19 We were strongly desiring to be with you, because truly you [RHQ] are the ones
about whom we are proud and joyful! It is because we are confident that you will
◄remain faithful/continue believing in God► that we will be joyful! You are the ones
who we confidently expect will keep strongly trusting in God! It is because you will
◄remain faithful/continue believing in God► that we will be proud of the work that we
have done [MET, RHQ] when our Lord Jesus examines what we all have done, at the
time when he comes back to earth! 20 Indeed, it is because of you that even now we
are pleased and joyful!
3
When I could no longer endure worrying about you, I sent Timothy to you in order
to find out whether or not you were still trusting in God.
1 Thessalonians 3:1-5
1 As a result of that, when I could no longer endure worrying about you, I decided
that Silas and I would stay behind alone in Athens city, 2 and we two sent Timothy to
you. You know that he is our close associate and also works for God by proclaiming
the message about Christ. Silas and I sent him in order that he would urge you to
continue to strongly trust in Christ. 3 We wanted none of you to consider turning
away from Christ as a result of people causing you to suffer. You know that God has
planned that we who trust in him will suffer like that when people do that to us who
trust in him. 4 Remember that when we were present with you, we kept telling you
that we would be persecuted {that people would cause us to suffer}. And because that
is what happened, you know that what we said was true! 5 I was afraid that Satan, the
one who tempts us, had caused you to stop trusting in Christ. If that had happened,
we would have worked uselessly while we were present with you! So I sent Timothy
to you in order to find out whether or not you were still trusting in Christ. I sent
him because I could no longer endure not knowing ◄about your spiritual condition/
whether or not you were still trusting in Christ►.
Now Timothy has just returned and has told us the good news that you still trust in
Christ. As a result, we have been cheered up, and we cannot thank God adequately for1 THESSALONIANS 3:6
1754
1 THESSALONIANS 4:7
what he has done for you. Very frequently we ask God that we will be able to visit you
and help you to trust him more strongly.
1 Thessalonians 3:6-10
6 Now Timothy has just returned to Silas and me from being with you, and he has
told us the good news that you still trust in Christ and that you love him (OR, each
other). He told us also that you always happily remember us and that you strongly
desire that we visit you, just like we strongly desire to visit you. 7 My fellow believers,
even though we are suffering very much [DOU] because of what people are doing to
us here, we have been cheered up because Timothy told us about your still trusting in
Christ. 8 Now we feel very encouraged [IDM] that you continue to strongly trust in the
Lord Jesus. 9 ◄We cannot thank God adequately for what he has done for you!/How
can we thank God enough for what he has done for you?► [RHQ] We greatly rejoice
concerning you when we pray to our God! 10 We constantly [HYP] and fervently/
earnestly ask God that we will be able to visit you [SYN] and that we will be able to
help you to trust in Christ/God more strongly!
We pray that God will help us to return to you and that the Lord Jesus will help you
to love each other and other people more and more, just like we love you more and
more.
1 Thessalonians 3:11-13
11 We pray to God, our Father, and to our Lord Jesus, that they will ◄clear the way/
make it possible► so that we can return to you. 12 As for you, we pray that the Lord
Jesus will help you to love each other and other people more and more, just like we
continue loving you more and more. 13 We pray that our Lord Jesus will strengthen
your resolve to do what pleases God (OR, strengthen you spiritually). We pray that
God our Father will enable you to conduct your lives in a way that is pure and that
no one can justly criticize, so that when Jesus comes back to earth accompanied by
all those who belong to him, he will be pleased with you.
4
Just like we told you previously, we strongly urge you to increasingly live in a way
that will please God.
1 Thessalonians 4:1-2
1-2 Now, my fellow believers, I want to write about some other matters. Because we
all have a close relationship with the Lord Jesus, we(exc) strongly urge you [DOU] to
live in a way that pleases God. We taught you to do that, and you know that we lived
that way as a result of what the Lord Jesus told us. We know that you are conducting
your lives that way, but we strongly urge that you do that even more.
God wants you, by your behaving in a sexually pure way, to show that you completely
belong to him.
1 Thessalonians 4:3-8
3 God wants you to live pure lives that will show that you completely belong to
him. He wants you to avoid doing any sexually immoral acts (OR, avoid being sexually
immoral in any way). 4 That is, he wants each one of you to know how to control your
own sexual desires [EUP]. He wants you to live pure lives that all people will see as
good. 5 You must not lustfully desire to do immoral acts as unbelievers [MTY] do who
do not obey God. 6 God wants each one of you to control your sexual desires, in order
that no one of you sin against your fellow believer and take advantage of him or her
by doing things like that. Remember that we strongly warned you previously [DOU]
that the Lord Jesus will punish all people who do sexually immoral acts. 7 When God
chose us believers, he did not want us to be people who behave in a sexually immoral1 THESSALONIANS 4:8
1755
1 THESSALONIANS 5:2
way. On the contrary, he wants us to be people who behave in a morally pure way. 8 So
I warn you that those who disregard this teaching of mine are not just disregarding
me. On the contrary, they are disregarding God, because God commanded it. Remember
that God sent his Spirit, who is holy, to live in you!
We urge you to increasingly love each other, to strive to work at your own
occupations, and not meddle in others’ affairs.
1 Thessalonians 4:9-12
9 I want to urge you again that you should love your fellow believers [MET]. You
do not really need that anyone write to you about that, because God has already
taught you how to love each other, 10 and because you already are showing that
you love your fellow believers [HYP] who live in other places in your province of
Macedonia. Nevertheless, my fellow believers, we urge you to love each other even
more. 11 We urge you also to eagerly strive/try to mind your own affairs and to
not meddle/interfere with the affairs of others. We urge you also to work at your
own occupations/jobs to earn what you need to live. Remember that we taught you
previously to live like that. 12 If you do these things, unbelievers will acknowledge/
see that you behave decently/properly, and you will not have to depend on others to
◄supply/give to you► what you need.
God will cause to live again those believers who died and will bring them to the sky
with Jesus. Encourage each other by telling this message.
1 Thessalonians 4:13-18
13 My fellow believers, we also want you to understand well [LIT] what will
happen to our fellow believers who now are dead [EUP]. You must not be/do like the
unbelievers. They grieve deeply for people who die because they do not confidently
expect people to live again after they die. 14 We believers know that it is true that
Jesus died and that he came back to life again. So we also know well that when Jesus
returns, God will cause those believers who died [EUP] to live again and to come with
Jesus. 15 I write this because the Lord Jesus revealed to me what I am now telling
you. Some of you may think that when the Lord Jesus comes back, he will consider
that we believers who are still living will be superior to those believers who have died
[EUP], because we will meet Jesus first. That is certainly not true! 16 It is the Lord
Jesus himself who will descend from heaven. When he comes down, he will command
all of us believers to rise from their graves. The chief angel will shout loudly, and
another angel will blow a trumpet for God. Then (OR, As a result), the first thing that
will happen is that the people who trusted in Christ before they died will live again.
17 After that, God will powerfully take up into the clouds all of us believers who are
still living on this earth. He will take us and those other believers who have died, in
order that we all might together meet/welcome the Lord Jesus in the sky. As a result
of that, we all will be with him forever. 18 Because all this is true, encourage/comfort
each other by reminding each other of this teaching.
5
We believers should be prepared for the time when the Lord Jesus returns and not
be as unbelievers who will be unprepared. We must not be like them. On the contrary,
we must be vigilant and self-controlled.
1 Thessalonians 5:1-8
1 My fellow believers, I want to tell you more about the time or period when the
Lord Jesus will come back. Really, you do not need me to you about that, 2 because
you yourselves know accurately what will happen! You know that the Lord Jesus will1 THESSALONIANS 5:3
1756
1 THESSALONIANS 5:13
return [MTY] unexpectedly (OR, when some people are unprepared). People will not
expect him, just like no one knows when a thief comes unexpectedly at night [SIM]. 3 At
a future time many people will say, “All is peaceful and we are safe!” Then suddenly
the Lord Jesus will come to punish people severely! Just like a pregnant woman who
experiences birth pains cannot stop those pains, those people will definitely not have
any way to escape their punishment. 4-5 Just like people in the dark are unaware of
what is happening around them, most people will not be aware of what is about to
happen to them [MET, PRS]. Just like a thief comes unexpectedly for people who are
unaware, that time of punishment will come when people are not expecting it [SIM].
But you, my fellow believers, are people who are very much aware [LIT] of what is
going to happen. As a result, you will be expecting [LIT] those things [MTY] to happen
[PRS]. All of us believers are people [IDM] who do what is right, as people usually do
in the daytime [MET] when their actions can be seen. We are not people who do evil
things, as some people do when it is dark [MET]. 6 So we believers must be aware of
what is happening. We must be watching carefully, as people who are awake watch
for a thief [MET]. We must be self-controlled, as people who are ◄sober/not drunk►
are able to control what they do [MET]. People who sleep [MET] are unaware of what
is happening, and unbelievers are like that. 7 It is at night when people become drunk
and they do very wrong actions/things, and are unaware of what is happening because
they are asleep. 8 But we believers are people who should do what is right [MET], so
we must be self-controlled, as people in the daytime are usually not drunk and are
able to control what they do [MET]. As Roman soldiers protect themselves by putting
on breastplates and helmets [MET], we believers must protect ourselves by continuing
to trust and love the Lord Jesus and by continuing to confidently expect that he will
save us from God’s punishing us at the time when he will punish other people.
God has destined us believers to be saved from future punishment and to be able to
live together with our Lord Jesus after he returns. Since this is true, encourage each
other.
1 Thessalonians 5:9-11
9 When God chose us, he did not plan for us to be people whom he will severely
punish [MTY]. On the contrary, he decided that he would save us because of our
trusting in what our Lord Jesus Christ has done for us. 10 Jesus died to atone/pay
for our sins in order that we might be able to live together with him, whether we are
alive [MET] or whether we are dead [EUP] when he returns to earth. 11 Because you
know that this is true, continue to encourage/comfort each other, as indeed you now
are doing.
Recognize as leaders those people who care for and instruct you; highly esteem and
love them. Live peacefully with each other.
1 Thessalonians 5:12-13
12 My fellow believers, we three ask that you recognize/honor as leaders those
people who work hard for you. Specifically, respect those who lead you as fellow
believers who ◄have a close relationship with/are united to► the Lord Jesus. They
warn you to stop doing what is wrong (OR, they teach you to do what is right). 13 That
is, we ask that you consider those leaders to be very important and that you love
them, because they work hard to help you. We also urge you to live peacefully with
each other.1 THESSALONIANS 5:14
1757
1 THESSALONIANS 5:28
Warn believers who will not work, and encourage and help those who need it. Be
patient with all people. Do good things for all of them, including those who do evil
things to you.
1 Thessalonians 5:14-15
14 My fellow believers, we urge that you warn believers who will not work in order
to ◄obtain/earn the money to buy► things that they need to live. Tell them that they
are behaving wrongly. We urge you that you encourage believers who are fearful (OR,
discouraged), and that you help all people who are weak in any way. We also urge
you to be patient with everyone. 15 Make sure that none of you does evil things to
anyone who has done evil to you. On the contrary, you must always try to do good
things for each other (OR, to fellow believers) and to everyone else.
Always rejoice, pray, and thank God.
1 Thessalonians 5:16-18
16 Be joyful ◄at all times/always►, 17 pray continually, 18 and thank God ◄in all
circumstances/regardless of what happens►. God wants you to behave like that because
of what Christ Jesus has done for you (OR, because you have a close relationship with
Christ Jesus).
Evaluate all messages that people claim that the Holy Spirit gave them. Accept
authentic messages and obey them.
1 Thessalonians 5:19-22
19 Do not refuse the urging from God’s Spirit when he is working [MTY] among you.
That would be like throwing water on a fire [MET]! 20 Specifically, do not despise
messages that the Holy Spirit reveals to someone, and reject them automatically. 21 On
the contrary, evaluate all such messages. Accept the messages that are truly from God,
and obey them. 22 Do not obey any kind of evil message.
We pray that God will cause you to be distinct people who behave right in every way,
and I am sure that he will do this.
1 Thessalonians 5:23-24
23 We pray to God that he will change you to become more and more like his people
should be. He is the one who causes his people to have inner peace. That is, we pray
that he will help you so that in all that you think, in all that you desire, and in all
that you do, you will be without fault. We ask him that he will keep doing that until
our Lord Jesus Christ comes back to earth. 24 Because God has invited you to be his
people, you can certainly trust him to keep on helping you to do that.
Pray for us. Affectionately greet all your fellow believers, and make certain that
someone reads this letter aloud to all of them. May the Lord bless you.
1 Thessalonians 5:25-28
25 My fellow believers, pray for me and for Silas and for Timothy. 26 When you
gather together as believers, greet each other affectionately, as fellow believers should.
27 Make certain that you read this letter to all the believers who may be absent when
you read it at first, knowing that the Lord Jesus wants you to do it. 28 I pray that our
Lord Jesus Christ will continue to act kindly toward you all.2 THESSALONIANS 1:1
1758
2 THESSALONIANS 1:10
This book is one of the letters that the Apostle Paul wrote
to the Christians at Thessalonica. We call this book
2 Thessalonians
2 Thessalonians 1:1-2
We, Paul, Silas, and Timothy, are sending this letter to the congregation of God’s
people in Thessalonica. We pray that God will continue to bless you with his kindness
and inner peace.
1 I, Paul, am writing this letter. Silas and Timothy are with me. We are sending
this letter to you. You are the congregation of God’s people in Thessalonica city. You
belong to God our Father, and you belong to Jesus Christ our Lord. 2 We pray that God
our Father, and Jesus Christ our Lord, will continue to act kindly toward you and will
continue to cause you to have inner peace.
We thank God very frequently that you are trusting in the Lord Jesus more and more.
2 Thessalonians 1:3-4
3 Our fellow believers, we thank God very frequently [HYP] for you because we
believers ought to thank God for each other, and specifically it is appropriate/right
that we should thank God for you. We thank him that you are trusting in the Lord
Jesus more and more, and that each one of you is loving each of the others more
and more. 4 As a result, we keep proudly telling about you to other congregations
who worship God. Specifically, we tell them that you are being steadfast and that you
continue believing in the Lord Jesus, even though you are frequently suffering [DOU]
as a result of people causing you trouble.
God will judge all people justly. Specifically, he will publicly declare that you are
worthy to enter that place where he will rule his people forever.
2 Thessalonians 1:5-10
5 Your being steadfast ◄shows/indicates to► us clearly that God will judge all people
justly. Specifically, he will publicly declare that you are worthy as his people to be
in that place where he will rule forever, because you also are suffering as a result
of telling others about letting God rule your lives. 6 God will certainly cause trouble
for those people who are troubling you, because he considers that it is just that he
should punish such people for doing that to you. 7 He also considers that it is the
right thing to do to reward you who are being troubled, by ◄giving you relief/causing
your suffering to end►. He will do that for both you and us when our Lord Jesus will
descend from heaven, together with his powerful angels and with blazing fire. 8 Then
he will punish those people who do not want to know him and those who refuse to
heed the message about our Lord Jesus. 9 Our Lord Jesus will forbid them from ever
coming near to him and near to the glory which he has because he is so powerful
(OR, the glory that is manifested by his power). He will cause those people to suffer
forever. 10 The Lord Jesus will do this when he comes back from heaven at the time
that God has decided. As a result, all we who are his people will praise him because
of what he has done for his own people, and all we believers will marvel at our Lord
because of what he has done. And you will be there, too, because you believed what
we testified to you.2 THESSALONIANS 1:11
1759
2 THESSALONIANS 2:8
We are praying very frequently for you that God will consider you worthy to receive
that to which he summoned you.
2 Thessalonians 1:11-12
11 In order that you might praise Jesus like this, we are also praying very frequently
[HYP] for you. We pray that you will be able to show our God that you are worthy to
receive that which he chose you to receive. We pray also that he would powerfully
enable you to do good in every way that you desire, and that he would also enable
you to do powerfully every good thing that you do because you believe in Jesus Christ.
12 We pray this because we want you to praise our Lord Jesus, and we want him to
honor you. This will happen because God, whom we worship/serve, and our Lord
Jesus Christ will keep acting kindly toward you in ways that you do not deserve.
2
Do not quickly get worried and alarmed by any message that the Day of the Lord
has already come.
2 Thessalonians 2:1-3a
1 Now I want to write to you about the time when our Lord Jesus Christ will return
and when God will gather us together to where Jesus is. My fellow believers, I urge
you 2 that you think calmly about any message that claims/says that the Lord has
already come again. Do not be shaken or alarmed/worried by any such message. It
does not matter if it is a message that someone claims God’s Spirit revealed to him, or
if it is some other message that someone has spoken, or whether it is a message that
someone claims that I wrote in a letter. 3 Do not allow anyone to deceive you in any
way with the result that you believe any such message.
The Lord will come only after that time when the man who will sin very greatly will
appear.
2 Thessalonians 2:3b-5
The Lord will not come [MTY] immediately. First, many people [PRS] will rebel
against God. The result of their rebelling will be that they will accept and obey the
man who will sin very greatly against God. 4 He will be the supreme enemy of God. He
will proudly exalt himself above everything that people consider to be some god and
above everything that people worship. As a result of wanting people to worship him,
he will even enter God’s Temple and sit down there to rule. He will publicly proclaim
that he himself is God! But God will certainly punish that man forever! 5 ◄I am sure
that you remember that I kept telling you these things while I was still with you there
in Thessalonica./Do you not remember that I continued telling you these things while
I was still with you there in Thessalonica?► [RHQ]
This man will be revealed by God when he who is now preventing him from being
revealed will have been removed by God.
2 Thessalonians 2:6-8
6 You also know that there is something (OR, someone) that is preventing this
man from being revealed {from revealing himself}. This man is being ◄held back/
restrained► now for him to be revealed {that he reveal himself} at the time that God
has planned [MTY]. 7 Although Satan is already secretly causing people to reject God’s
laws, ◄the one/God► who is preventing this man from revealing himself now will
continue to prevent him from doing that until he/God removes him. 8 It is then that
God will allow this man, who rejects God’s laws completely, to be revealed {to reveal
himself}. Then the Lord Jesus will destroy him, by simply commanding it [MTY].
Jesus, by his own glorious arrival, will cause him to become completely powerless.2 THESSALONIANS 2:9
1760
2 THESSALONIANS 3:3
When this man is present, he will completely deceive those who will perish.
2 Thessalonians 2:9-12
9 But before Jesus destroys him, Satan will make him very powerful. As a result, he
will do all kinds of supernatural miracles and amazing things [DOU] that will seem
as though God has enabled him to do them. 10 And by doing wicked things, he will
completely deceive those who will certainly ◄perish/go to hell►. He will deceive them
because they will have refused to love the true message. So they will not be saved
{God will not save them}. 11 So, God, by his power, will enable this man to easily
deceive people, so that they will believe what this man falsely claims/says that he is.
12 The result will be that everyone will be rightly condemned {that God will justly
condemn everyone} to be punished who did not believe the true message, but who
instead gladly chose to be doing what is wicked.
God chose you in order that you should be saved and share in Christ’s glory.
2 Thessalonians 2:13-14
13 Our fellow believers, whom our Lord Jesus loves, we thank God very frequently
for you. It is appropriate/right for us to do that, because God chose you ◄from the
beginning [MTY] of creation/before the world existed► in order that he might save you
as a result of your believing the true message and as a result of God’s Spirit setting
you apart for God. 14 We thank God that he chose you as a result of our proclaiming
the message about Christ to you, in order that you might ◄share in/have► some of
the glory that our Lord Jesus Christ has.
Continue believing the teaching that we gave to you.
2 Thessalonians 2:15
15 So, our fellow believers, continue to be firm concerning what you believe; that is,
continue believing the true teaching that we gave to you by our speaking to you and
by our writing a letter to you.
We pray that our Lord Jesus Christ himself will encourage you and cause you to
continue doing and speaking what is good.
2 Thessalonians 2:16-17
16 Our Lord Jesus Christ himself and God, our Father, loves us and encourages us
and causes us to confidently expect to receive the eternal things that he has promised
to give to us as a result of Christ acting kindly toward us in a way we did not deserve.
17 We strongly pray that God and Jesus together will encourage you! And we pray
that they will cause you to continue doing and saying things that God considers to be
good.
3
Pray that more and more people will believe the message about our Lord Jesus.
2 Thessalonians 3:1-2
1 As for the other matters, our fellow believers, pray for us that more and more
people will hear [PRS] our message about our Lord Jesus. Pray that they will believe
this message, as you have done. 2 Pray also for us that we will be rescued {that God
will rescue us} from those very perverse/evil people here who cause us to suffer. Pray
like that because they and many others refuse to believe [LIT] this message.
Our Lord Jesus will cause you to continue to be steadfast and he will protect you
from the evil one.
2 Thessalonians 3:3-5
3 Remember that our Lord Jesus is trustworthy! So we are sure that he will cause
you to continue to be steadfast. We are also sure that he will protect you from Satan,2 THESSALONIANS 3:4
1761
2 THESSALONIANS 3:16
the evil one (OR, from evil). 4 Because of your close relationship with our Lord Jesus,
we are confident that you are obeying what we have commanded you, and we are
confident that you will obey what we are commanding you in this letter. 5 We pray
that our Lord Jesus would enable you to continue knowing that God loves you. We
pray also that Christ will cause you to continue being steadfast (OR, being steadfast
as he was steadfast).
We command you to disassociate yourselves from every fellow believer who refuses
to work.
2 Thessalonians 3:6-11
6 Our fellow believers, we command you, with the authority [MTY] that our Lord
Jesus Christ has given to us, that you stop associating with every fellow believer who
is lazy and refuses to work. That is, you must stay away from those who are not
conducting their lives in the manner that we taught you. 7 We tell you this because you
yourselves know that you should behave like we behaved. We ◄did not just sit around
without working/were never lazy► while we were living among you. 8 Specifically, we
did not eat anyone’s food if we did not pay that person for it. Instead, we worked very
hard ◄to support ourselves/to earn the money to buy what we needed►. We worked
hard [DOU] during the day and during the night, in order that we would not have
to depend on any of you to supply what we needed. 9 We have always had the right
to depend on you for money, but instead we worked hard in order to make ourselves
examples for you, in order that you should behave like we behave. 10 Remember that
when we were there with you, we kept commanding you that if any fellow believer
refuses to work, you should not give him food to eat. 11 We are commanding the same
thing again now, because someone has told us that some of you are lazy and not
working at all, just interfering with what other people are doing!
We command those fellow believers who are not working to support themselves by
settling down and working.
2 Thessalonians 3:12
12 We command those fellow believers who are not working, and urge them by
the authority [MTY] of our Lord Jesus Christ, that they settle down and ◄support
themselves by working/work to earn money to buy what they need►.
You others, do not stop doing what is right because you are discouraged.
2 Thessalonians 3:13
13 Fellow believers! Do not ever get tired of doing what is right!
Publicly identify any fellow believer who does not obey what we have written in this
letter and do not associate with him.
2 Thessalonians 3:14-15
14 If any fellow believer refuses to work and does not obey what I have written in this
letter, ◄publicly identify that person/tell the congregation what that person is doing►.
Then do not associate with him, in order that he may become ashamed. 15 Do not
think of him as though he was your enemy; instead, warn him as you would warn
your other fellow believers.
I pray that our Lord Jesus himself will give peace to you always and in every situation.
2 Thessalonians 3:16a
16 I pray that our Lord Jesus himself, who gives inner peace to his people, will give
inner peace to you always ◄and in every situation/whatever happens►.2 THESSALONIANS 3:17
1762
2 THESSALONIANS 3:18
In closing, I pray that our Lord Jesus will continue to bless you all. I, Paul, am
greeting you and I am writing this myself in order that you may know that it is I who
have sent this letter.
2 Thessalonians 3:16b-18
I pray that our Lord Jesus will continue to help you all. 17 Now, having taken the pen
from my scribe, I, Paul, am sending this greeting to you as I write this myself [SYN].
I do this in all my letters in order that you may know that it is truly I who have sent
this letter. This is how I always end my letters. 18 I pray that our Lord Jesus Christ
will continue to act kindly to you all.1 TIMOTHY 1:1
1763
1 TIMOTHY 1:11
This book is one of the letters that the Apostle Paul wrote
to his assistant Timothy. We call this book
1 Timothy
1 Timothy 1:1-2
I, Paul, write to you, Timothy. May you be blessed by God and Christ Jesus with their
kindness and mercy.
1 I, Paul, am writing this letter. You know that I am an apostle. I represent Christ
Jesus because God and Christ Jesus commanded me to do it. God is the one who
saved us, and Jesus is the one for whom we are confidently waiting to return. 2 You,
Timothy, are like [MET] a true son to me because you trusted in Christ after I told you
about him.
I pray/desire that God, who is our Father, and Christ Jesus, who is our Lord, will
continue to act kindly and mercifully to you, and that they will give you inner peace.
Defend and promote the true Christian doctrine. Teach it and live by it. Also I
instruct you how to strengthen the congregation, which upholds the truth.
1 Timothy 1:3-20
3 I urge you now, just like I urged you when I was going to Macedonia province,
that you remain there in Ephesus city. Stay there so that you may command certain
persons who teach other believers that they not teach false doctrines. 4 And tell people
to not continually give their attention to stories that tell about our ancestors, stories in
which there are ◄genealogies/lists of our ancestors’ names► that seem to be endless.
You must command your congregation not to think that these stories are valuable,
because whenever people think that, they just start arguing about things uselessly,
instead of teaching God’s plan, which is concerned with what we believe (OR, which
we know because we trust in Christ). 5 Teach them to have pure desires [MTY] and so to
know that God approves of what they do, and to sincerely believe the true teaching.
By doing that, they will love God well. 6 There are some people who have turned
away from these true teachings. As a result, they just discuss what is useless. 7 They
desire to teach the laws that God gave to Moses, but they do not understand what
they are really saying, or the things about which they ◄confidently speak/say that
they understand well►.
8 We know that the laws that God gave to Moses are good if people consider correctly
what God intended them for. 9 We must remember that God did not give Moses those
laws in order to condemn righteous people. By those laws he condemns people who
act as though there were no laws and who refuse to obey anyone. He condemns those
who do not revere God and those who sin habitually. By them he condemns those
who refuse to perform rituals that are pleasing to God and who show no respect for
religion. He condemns those who murder their fathers and who murder their mothers
and who murder other people. 10 He condemns those who are sexually immoral and
those who are homosexuals. He condemns those who kidnap/steal people in order
to make them slaves. He condemns those who lie and those who promise something
strongly but do not do what they promised. He condemns every other action that
is contrary to our true teaching. 11 This is what we teach people when we tell them
the glorious/wonderful message about Christ that our awesome God has revealed and
that he gave to me to teach.1 TIMOTHY 1:12
1764
1 TIMOTHY 2:8
12 I am grateful to Christ Jesus our Lord who enabled me to do this work, because
he considered that I could be trusted. So he appointed me in order that I would serve
him. 13 Formerly I said evil things about him, I caused his people to suffer, and I acted
very cruelly toward them. But Christ acted in a kind way toward me since I ◄acted
ignorantly/did not know that I was doing wrong► because I did not believe in him.
14 Our Lord kindly did for me what I did not deserve, so that I now believe in Christ
Jesus and I love others (OR, him) because I belong to him.
15 Something that all we believers say is certainly true and is worthy for us to fully
accept is that Christ Jesus came into the world in order to save sinful people so that
God would not punish them for their sins. As for me, I consider that I have sinned
more than all others. 16 Yet Christ Jesus acted mercifully to me in order that he might
demonstrate to people that he is perfectly patient with them. He did that by his being
patient with me, one who has sinned worse than everyone else. He wanted what he
did for me ◄to be an example/to demonstrate his patience► to people who would
later believe in him, and as a result would live forever.
17 I desire that people will honor and praise the only true God forever! Even though
no one can see him, he is the King who rules for all time, who will never die! ◄Amen!/
That is true!► 18 Timothy, you are like [MET] a son to me. So, ◄based on/in accordance
with► what someone previously ◄prophesied/told what God revealed to them► about
you, I am instructing you to strongly oppose those who teach false doctrines. You
should oppose them like [MET] a soldier ◄fights strongly against/opposes► those who
attack his countrymen. 19 Continue to believe the true teaching and do only what you
know to be right! Remember that some people have ◄pushed aside/rejected► the
true teaching. As a result, they no longer believe [MET] what is true. 20 Among the
ones who have done that are Hymenaeus and Alexander, whom I put in the hands
of Satan, in order that when Satan punishes them they may learn not to teach wrong
teaching.
2
I instruct you how people who belong to God’s family and who hold fast to the truth
should conduct themselves.
1 Timothy 2:1—3:16
1 The first (OR, most important) thing that I urge you to tell your congregation is that
Christians should continually ask God for what they need. They should also pray to
God for all other people, and they should be thanking God. 2 Specifically, they should
pray for rulers and for all other people who ◄are in important government positions/
have authority►, in order that God will help them to rule. As God enables the rulers
to rule well, we can live very peaceably as we conduct ours lives doing all that God
and others consider to be right and proper. 3 It is good to pray like that, and it pleases
God, who saves us, when we pray like that. 4 He desires to save everyone. He wants
everyone to fully know and accept his true message. 5 He is the only one true God!
And there is only one person who talks to God on behalf of people. That person is
Christ Jesus, who himself is a man! 6 He gave ◄his life/himself► as a sacrifice in order
to ransom/redeem all people, which showed at the proper time that God desires that
all people be saved {to save all people}. 7 As for me, he appointed me to declare this
message and to be an apostle. I am telling the truth about God appointing me. I am
not lying! He appointed me to teach the non-Jews that they should believe God’s true
message.
8 I desire that in every place where believers worship, the men who pray publicly
[MTY] should be men who are not practicing sin. When they pray, they should not be1 TIMOTHY 2:9
1765
1 TIMOTHY 3:11
angry with anyone and they should not doubt that God will answer their prayers (OR,
should not quarrel with anyone). 9 I would like that the clothing that women wear
be ◄modest and sensible/proper and appropriate► [DOU]. I want them to not fix
their hair in fancy/elaborate ways, nor wear gold jewelry, nor pearls, nor expensive
clothing in order that they may make themselves attractive. 10 Instead, they should be
doing things that women who ◄claim to/say that they► worship God should do; that
is, they should be doing good deeds. 11 Women must learn to listen quietly during the
worship services and to fully subject themselves to the leaders of the congregation. 12 I
do not permit women to teach men spiritual truth publicly, and I do not permit them
to have authority over men. Instead, I desire that women listen quietly during the
worship services. 13 Keep in mind that God made Adam first, and afterwards he made
Eve, 14 and that it was not Adam whom Satan deceived. As a result of the woman
being deceived, she sinned. She did what God had told her not to do. 15 But even
though she did that, now women will be saved {God will accept women} as they bear
children if they continue to trust God and if they continue to love others, and if they
continue to live in a way that is more and more ◄acceptable to God/like God wants
them to►, and if they continue to be modest.
3
1 Anyone who aspires to be an elder in the congregation (OR, a bishop) desires a
noble/honorable task. 2 Since that is a task that others should respect, an overseer
must live in such a way that no one can truly ◄say that he has done anything that
is wrong/find fault with him►. Specifically, he must be faithful to his wife. He must
think clearly about what he does. He must be able to control his behavior. He must
be sensible. He must be dignified/respectable. He must welcome and care for guests.
He must be able to teach God’s truth well. 3 He must not be a drunkard. He must
not be ready/quick to fight those who make him angry. On the contrary, he must be
gentle and he must not be quarrelsome. He must not be greedy for a lot of money.
4 He must lead and care for his own household/family well. For example, he must
be a man whom his children obey and completely respect, 5 because if anyone does
not know how he should lead well and care for well the people who live in his own
house, ◄he certainly cannot care for God’s congregation!/how can he care for God’s
congregation?► [RHQ] 6 He must not be one who has just recently trusted in Jesus,
because if you choose a man like that, he might become conceited/proud because you
chose him so soon. As a result of his being conceited/proud, God will condemn him
like he condemned the devil because he was conceited/proud. 7 Moreover, an elder
must live in such a way that non-Christians speak well of him, because if he conducts
himself like that, people will not say evil things about him, and the devil will not
capture/trap him [MET] like people capture animals in a trap.
8 Those whom you choose to serve as deacons likewise must be ones who conduct
themselves suitably/appropriately. Specifically, they must be ◄serious/worthy that
people respect them►. They must ◄be sincere/mean what they say►. They must
not like to drink a lot of alcohol. They must not ◄be greedy/have a strong desire to
get money►. 9 They must sincerely believe the message that God has now revealed
to us. 10 Like you do for the elders, you must examine ◄their character/how they
conduct their lives► before you appoint them to serve. Then if they are without fault,
let them serve as deacons. 11 Their wives (OR, The women who are deacons) likewise
must conduct themselves suitably/appropriately. Specifically, they must be ◄serious/
worthy that people respect them►. They must not speak evil about people. They
must not drink a lot of alcohol. They must be faithful in everything that they do.1 TIMOTHY 3:12
1766
1 TIMOTHY 4:10
12 Deacons must be faithful to their wives, and they must lead well and care well
for their children and other people in their houses. 13 Because if deacons serve well,
people will respect them, and they will be able to speak very boldly/confidently about
what they believe concerning Christ Jesus.
14 Although I hope that I will come and visit you soon, I am writing these things
to you now 15 in order that if I ◄am delayed/things prevent me from visiting to you
soon►, you will know how believers should conduct their lives and you will be able to
teach that to them. I am talking about all those who are members of God’s family, all
the congregations that belong to the all-powerful God, all those who uphold/support
[MET] the true message. 16 It is certainly true that the message that God has now
revealed is very wonderful! From it, we learn this spiritual truth that we say/sing
about Christ (OR, We affirm this teaching to be true and very important.) It is what
shows us how to live ◄in a godly manner/in a manner that pleases God►. It is what
God has now revealed, even though it was not known before. We ◄affirm/say that it
is true► concerning Jesus Christ that,
He is the one who appeared on the earth in a human body.
God’s Spirit showed/demonstrated that he is/was truly the Messiah (OR, that he always
acted righteously);
Angels saw him; people preached about him in many nations;
People in many parts of the world believed the message about him.
God took him up into heaven.
4
Be sure that you conduct yourself well and that you teach the true doctrine.
1 Timothy 4:1-16
1 God’s Spirit has clearly told us that in later times some people will stop believing
the teaching that all of us believe. Instead, they will listen to evil spirits who deceive
people. They will also believe the false doctrines/teachings that they receive from these
evil spirits. 2 The people who teach those false doctrines/teachings are liars! And
they do not feel at all guilty [MET] when they teach such teachings! 3 For example,
they forbid believers to marry because they say that it makes us unacceptable to God.
They also command that people abstain from eating certain foods. But God created
such foods in order that we can eat them! We who believe in Christ know the true
teaching, and we thank God for the food that he gives us. That is why we can eat it.
4 We can eat all kinds of food because God has created all food, and it is all good. We
should not refuse to eat certain kinds of food if we thank God for it when we eat it.
5 It is acceptable to God because God long ago said that all things that he made are
good, and because we pray that God will bless it.
6 When you teach these things to your fellow believers, you will be showing that
you, whom Christ Jesus appointed, serve them well. You will have become strong
spiritually ◄by holding fast/by obeying► the true message that we all believe. 7 You
must completely reject godless, silly/foolish stories from your ancestors that old people
tell. Keep training yourself so that you have more ◄godly behavior/behavior that
pleases God►. 8 Some people say, “It helps us in some ways if we exercise our bodies.”
But I say that people benefit very much if they live ◄in a godly way/in a way that
pleases God►, because if people live in a godly way, that will benefit them both while
they live now and when they live in the future life in heaven. 9 Those are words that
are absolutely true, and everybody should believe them! 10 This is the reason why
we work so hard [DOU] for others, because we confidently expect that God, who is
all-powerful, will do the things that he has promised. He is the one who wants to1 TIMOTHY 4:11
1767
1 TIMOTHY 5:12
save all people, so he protects them. He certainly protects us who believe in Christ!
11 Command these things and teach these things.
12 Timothy, by the way you conduct your life, show the believers in your
congregation how they should conduct their lives. Specifically, speak good things,
conduct yourself well, love people, trust God, and be pure in every way. If you do all
that, no one will have any reason ◄to belittle/to treat you disrespectfully► because
of your being young. 13 Until I come, be sure that you read the Scriptures to the
congregation and that you exhort/urge them to obey the Scriptures, and teach them.
14 Do not forget to use the abilities that God gave to you as a result of people/us
◄prophesying/telling what God revealed to them► about you, and as a result of the
elders putting their hands on you to commission/appoint you to do God’s work. 15 Do
these things that I have told you to do! ◄Concentrate on them/Do them sincerely and
wholeheartedly► in order that everyone may see that you are improving in how you
do them.
16 Be careful that you conduct yourself well. By continuing to do that, you will save
yourself. And if you continue to teach the good doctrine/teaching, the result of your
teaching will be that God will save the people who listen to you.
5
I instruct you how to act toward various groups in the church.
1 Timothy 5:1-25
1 Do not rebuke/scold older men. Instead, exhort/advise them respectfully as you
would exhort/advise your father. Exhort/advise younger men gently as you would
exhort/advise your brothers. 2 Exhort/advise older women respectfully as you would
exhort/advise your mother. Exhort/advise younger women gently as you would exhort/
advise your sisters; but you must act in a completely proper way as you do that.
3 Make sure that the congregation takes care of widows who have no one to care
for them. 4 If a widow has children or grandchildren, these children or grandchildren
should learn that they are to take care of their own family first. By doing that they
can repay their parents and grandparents for all that they did for them when they
were young, because doing that pleases God. 5 The widows who are really alone and
have no one to help them confidently expect that God will help them. So night and
day they pray, earnestly asking [DOU] God that he will help them and others. 6 But
widows who just want to have a lot of pleasure are spiritually [MET] dead, although
they are physically alive. 7 And tell the congregation that the children or grandchildren
should do these things in order that no one can ◄criticize the believers/say that the
believers are doing anything that is wrong►. 8 If anyone does not take care of those
who live in his own house, and especially if he does not take care of his own family,
he has ◄denied/quit believing► what we believe and we should consider that he is
worse than a person who does not believe in Christ.
9 You have a list of widows who will do work for the congregation and receive money.
Put women’s names on the list only if they are more than 60 years old, and if they
were faithful to their husbands. 10 Put women’s names on that list only if it is known
that they have wholeheartedly done every kind of good deed, if they have helped
children who were afflicted/suffering, if they have ◄brought up/cared for► their
children properly/well, if they have welcomed and cared for guests, and if they have
humbly served [MTY] other believers. 11 As for younger widows, do not put their
names on that list, because they promise to do work for the congregation, but instead
of doing that, they usually want to marry again (OR, marry an unbeliever) when they
have a strong desire to get married. 12 If that happens, they may become guilty of1 TIMOTHY 5:13
1768
1 TIMOTHY 6:1
not having done what they had promised to do for the congregation (OR, promised
Christ that they would do.) 13 In addition, they generally become lazy. Specifically,
as they just go about from house to house, they also begin ◄to gossip/to talk about
people► and to meddle in other people’s affairs, saying what they should not say.
14 So I advise that instead of putting the names of younger widows on the list, they
marry again, that they bear/have children, that they manage their homes well, and
that they do nothing for which an enemy can say bad things about them. 15 I say this
because some younger widows have stopped obeying Christ in order to obey Satan.
16 If any woman who believes in Christ has widows in her household/family, she
should take care of them. The congregation should not be burdened by having {She
should not depend on the congregation} to take care of their needs. The congregation
should take care of the widows who truly have no one to care for them.
17 Each congregation should pay well the elders who lead well. They should greatly
honor them, especially those who preach and those who teach. 18 Long ago Moses
wrote in the Scriptures, “While an ox is threshing grain, you must not tie its mouth
so that it cannot eat the grain,” and Jesus said, “People should pay those who work
for their benefit.” So we know that congregations should support their leaders.
19 When some person accuses an elder about doing wrong, accept what he says only
if there are at least two or three persons who ◄testify/say that► they saw him do that
wrong.
20 But as for any elder who repeatedly sins, rebuke him before the whole
congregation, in order that the rest of the elders will be afraid to sin.
21 I solemnly tell you that as you keep in mind that God and Christ Jesus and the
holy angels know everything that you do, obey these commands about elders! As you
consider what others say about an elder doing wrong, do not easily/quickly decide that
what they say is true. And treat them all equally.
22 Do not be in a hurry to put your hands on a man ◄to set him apart/to appoint him►
as an elder. Wait until you have examined him to see how he conducts his life, because
God will consider that you are responsible if you approve a person who sins, saying
that he should become an elder. Keep your life pure in every way. 23 And Timothy, no
longer drink only water, but instead, drink a little wine also, because that may help to
cure your stomach’s frequent illnesses. 24 I tell you not ◄to set apart/appoint► elders
hastily, without seeing how they conduct their lives, because some people sin secretly,
so that it is not known what they have done until after someone examines them (OR,
before God judges them). But some people sin openly, so that people know what they
have done before anyone examines them. 25 Similarly, although some people do good
things openly, with the result that people know what they have done, some people
do good things secretly, yet the good things that they have done cannot remain secret
either.
6
Live in a way that agrees with Christian doctrine, and complete what I have
commanded.
1 Timothy 6:1-21
1 As for slaves [DOU] who are believers, teach them that they should consider that it
is right for them to honor their masters in every way. If they do that, people will not
speak ◄against/evil about► God [MTY] and they will not speak ◄against/evil about►
that which we apostles teach, because they will see that the slaves are being respectful
of their masters.1 TIMOTHY 6:2
1769
1 TIMOTHY 6:16
2 Slaves who have masters who believe in Christ must not be disrespectful to their
masters just because their masters are fellow believers. Instead, they should serve
their masters even better because their masters are fellow believers whom God loves
and who benefit when the slaves serve them well.
As you teach these things to your congregation, exhort/urge people that they do
them.
3 Some people teach things that are different. What they teach ◄does not agree
with/is not like► the correct teaching that our Lord Jesus Christ taught (OR, that is
about our Lord Jesus Christ). They do not say that we should conduct our lives ◄in a
godly manner/in a manner that pleases God►. 4 Such people are very proud and do not
understand anything [HYP]. Instead, they abnormally/wrongly desire to argue about
unimportant matters and about certain words. As a result, people who listen to them
◄envy others/desire to have what others have►. They quarrel with others and with
one another. They say bad things about others. They suspect/think that others have
evil ◄motives/reasons for doing what they do►. 5 Their whole way of thinking has
become completely wrong because they have rejected the true doctrine/teaching. As a
result, they mistakenly think that ◄by practicing religion/by saying that they believe
in God► they will gain a lot of money.
6 Well, we truly do gain great benefit when we conduct our lives ◄in a godly
manner/in a manner that pleases God► and we are content with what we have. 7 We
brought nothing into the world when we were born, and we cannot take anything out
of it when we die, 8 so if we have food and clothing, we should be satisfied with these.
9 But some people strongly desire to be rich. As a result, they do wrong things to get
money, and this will cause them to be caught/trapped [MET] as animals get caught in
traps. They foolishly desire many things, and those desires cause them to get hurt.
And God will completely reject them! 10 All kinds of bad things will happen to people
who [PRS] desire to have a lot of money. Because some people longed for money,
they have stopped believing the doctrine/teaching that all of us believe and they have
caused themselves much grief/sadness.
11 But as for you, who are a man who serves God, ◄keep completely away from
such love of money/do not be like the people who love money►. Decide that you will
do what is right, and that you will ◄be godly/do what pleases God►. Decide that you
will trust God, and that you will love others. Endure difficult circumstances. Always
be gentle with people. 12 Try earnestly and with all your energy/strength [MET] to
live in accordance with what you believe. Continue to do your tasks well in order that
you will know for sure that you will live eternally. Remember that God chose you to
live with him, and that when many elders were listening you said strongly ◄what you
believe/that you trust in Christ►.
13 God, who gives life to all things, knows everything that you do. Christ Jesus also
knows everything that you do. He strongly declared what was true when he was on
trial before Pontius Pilate. 14 I command you that as you keep all that in mind, in
every way you ◄hold fast/obey► to what Christ has commanded us [DOU]. ◄Hold
fast/obey► to those teachings in a way that our Lord Jesus Christ cannot ◄criticize
you about/say that what you did was wrong►, until he comes again. 15 Remember
that God will cause Jesus to come again at the proper time. God is awesome! He is
the only Ruler! He rules over all other people who rule! 16 He is the only one who
will never die, and he lives in heaven surrounded by light that is so bright that no
one can approach it! He is the one whom no person has ever seen and whom no
person is able to see! My desire is that all people will honor him and that he will rule
powerfully [MTY] forever! ◄May it be so!/Amen!►1 TIMOTHY 6:17
1770
1 TIMOTHY 6:21
17 Tell the believers who are rich here in this present world that they should not be
proud, and that they should not trust in their many possessions, because they cannot
be certain how long they will have them. Teach them that instead of trusting in their
wealth, they should trust in God. He is the one who generously gives us everything
we have in order that we may enjoy it. 18 Also, tell them that their good deeds must
be as plentiful as their money. Specifically, they should share very generously with
others what they have. 19 If they do that, Jesus will give them a great reward. It will
be as though they are piling up in heaven treasure for themselves that will ◄be a
good basis on which they may rely for/result in their► receiving a great reward in the
future (OR, which will be as solid as the foundation [MET] of a house). By doing this
they will experience what real life is like.
20 Timothy, faithfully proclaim/protect the true message (OR, do the work) that
Jesus has given to you. ◄Avoid/Do not listen to► people who want to chatter about
things that are not important to God. ◄Avoid/Do not listen to► people who claim/say
that they have ‘true knowledge’ but who say things that oppose/contradict our true
teaching. 21 ◄Keep completely away from/Reject completely► such teaching. Remember
that some people who claim to have this ‘knowledge’ have stopped believing what all
of us believe.
◄I desire that/May► God continue to act kindly toward you all.2 TIMOTHY 1:1
1771
2 TIMOTHY 1:10
This book is one of the letters that the Apostle Paul wrote
to his assistant Timothy. We call this book
2 Timothy
2 Timothy 1:1-2
This letter is from me, Paul, to you, Timothy.
I am an apostle whom Christ Jesus chose so that I
would do what God wanted. He chose me to tell people that God has promised that
they will live eternally as a result of their having a close relationship with Christ Jesus.
2 I am writing to you, Timothy, whom I love as if you were my own son. I pray that God
our Father and Christ Jesus our Lord will continue to act kindly to you, be merciful
to you, and cause you to have inner peace,
1 I, Paul, am writing this letter.
I thank God that you sincerely believe in Christ Jesus.
2 Timothy 1:3-5
3 I thank God for all that he has done for you. I serve him, and my ancestors
served him, too. I serve him in a manner that I know to be right. I thank him while
repeatedly I pray for you at night and during the day. 4 While I am thanking God for
you, I very much want to see you because I remember how you cried [MTY] when we
separated. I want to see you in order that I may be ◄filled with joy/very happy►. 5 I
thank God because I remember that you sincerely believe in Christ Jesus. First, your
grandmother, Lois, and your mother, Eunice, believed in him and, I am ◄convinced/
very sure► that you also believe in him.
So I remind you to do fervently what God has enabled and assigned you to do.
2 Timothy 1:6-7
6 Because I am sure that you believe in him, I remind you to do fervently/
wholeheartedly [MET] what God has ◄assigned for/appointed► you to do and what
he has enabled you to do. God ◄assigned for/appointed► you to do it as a result of
my putting my hands on you to show/indicate that he had chosen you to do his work.
7 Remember that God has put his Spirit within us. His Spirit does not cause us to be
afraid. Instead, he causes us to be powerful to work for God, and he helps us to love
others and to control what we say and do.
Never be ashamed either of the message or of me, but be willing to endure with me
whatever we suffer because we tell the good news.
2 Timothy 1:8-14
8 So never be ashamed/reluctant to tell others the message about our Lord. And
do not be ashamed of me, even though I am a prisoner because I preach about him.
Instead, be willing to suffer as I do as you proclaim the message about Christ. Endure
what you will suffer by letting God empower you to endure it. 9 God saved us and
chose us to conduct our lives in a pure way. It was not our doing good deeds/actions
that caused him to do this for us—something that we did not deserve. Instead, before
◄time began/he created the world► he purposed/planned to be kind to us as a result
of what Christ Jesus would do for us. 10 Now, as a result of our Savior Christ Jesus
having come, it has been revealed {he has shown} that he acts kindly toward us.
Specifically, Christ Jesus has declared that we will not remain dead after we die! He
has also revealed that, as a result of our hearing and accepting the message about2 TIMOTHY 1:11
1772
2 TIMOTHY 2:9
Christ, we will live forever in bodies that will not decay! 11 I was chosen {Christ chose
me} to go as an apostle to many places and proclaim that message to people. 12 So,
even though I suffer here in this prison, I am not ashamed of being here (OR, I am
very confident), because I know Christ Jesus, the one whom I have trusted, and I am
convinced/sure that he is able to keep safe the good message that he has entrusted to
me (OR, the things that I have entrusted to him), and that he will reward me at the
time [MTY] when he comes again.
13 Be sure that you tell others the same correct message that you heard from me.
And as you tell it, keep trusting in Christ Jesus and keep loving others as Christ Jesus
enables you to do. 14 Do not let anyone persuade you to change the good message that
God has entrusted/given to you. Allow the Holy Spirit who lives in us to direct what
you say.
Many people have turned away from me, but Onesiphorus often cheered me up and
was not ashamed of me.
2 Timothy 1:15-18
15 You know that almost all the believers in Asia province have ◄turned away from/
abandoned► me, including Phygelus and Hermogenes. 16 But I pray that the Lord will
be kind to the family of Onesiphorus for the following reasons: Often he cheered me
up and, even though I was a prisoner [MTY], he was not ashamed ◄of me/to admit
he was my friend►. 17 On the contrary, when he came here to Rome, he diligently
searched for me until he found me. 18 I pray that the Lord will be kind to him on that
day [MTY] when he, the Lord, will judge people. And how much Onesiphorus served
me in Ephesus city, you know very well.
2
Let God empower you; and entrust the message to loyal/trustworthy people.
2 Timothy 2:1-2
1 You are like a son to me. So I urge also that you let God empower you spiritually
as a result of Christ Jesus acting kindly toward you. 2 As you do that, remembering
that the message that you heard from me is the same message that other people have
affirmed/declared to you, you must entrust/give that message to people whom you
can trust, people who will be competent/able/qualified to teach others.
Endure with me what we suffer for Christ Jesus.
2 Timothy 2:3-13
3 Endure as I do what we suffer for Christ Jesus, like a good soldier endures what
he suffers. 4 You know that soldiers, in order to please their captain, do not ◄become
involved in civilian affairs/spend time doing other kinds of work► [MET]. So, like
soldiers, do not let other matters ◄distract you as you serve/hinder you from serving►
Christ Jesus! 5 Similarly, you know that athletes who do not obey the rules of the
contest will not be given {not win} the prize [MET]. So, like athletes, do all that Christ
Jesus has commanded so that God will reward you! 6 You also know that a hard-working
farmer should be the first to receive some of the harvest [MET]. So, like farmers, work
hard for Christ Jesus and expect that God will reward you! 7 Think about what I have
just written, because, if you do, the Lord will enable you to understand everything
that you need to understand. 8 Endure everything by remembering how Jesus Christ
endured it when he suffered. Remember that he came back to life {God raised him
from the dead} and God affirmed/declared him to be king as his ancestor King David
was. Those are things that I tell to people when I tell them the message about Christ.
9 I am suffering here in prison because some people oppose the good message that I tell.2 TIMOTHY 2:10
1773
2 TIMOTHY 2:20
They have even put me in chains as if I were a criminal. Nevertheless, the message
from God is not chained {nothing is preventing [MET] others from proclaiming the
message from God}. 10 Therefore I willingly endure all that I am suffering for the sake
of those whom God has chosen. I do this in order that Christ Jesus will save them,
too, and that they will be forever with him in the glorious place where he is. 11 Endure
everything as you remember that these words that we all say/sing (OR, that we teach
people) are trustworthy:
Since we have stopped behaving as we did in the past, as though we died when he
died,
we shall also live with him.
12 Since we are also patiently enduring what we suffer,
we shall also rule with him.
But if we say that we do not know him,
he also will say that he does not know us.
13 If we ◄are unfaithful/stop doing what he tells us to do►,
he will treat us just like he promised to do,
because he ◄can never be untrue to himself/always does what he says that he will
do►.
Remind teachers about the things that I have told you and command them not to
quarrel; and be sure that you yourself are the kind of person that God will approve of.
2 Timothy 2:14-15
14 Those whom you appointed to teach others God’s truth, keep reminding them
about these things that I have told you. Tell them strongly that, since God knows
what they are doing (OR, that God will judge them for everything that is wrong that
they do, and therefore) they must not quarrel ◄about words/about matters that are
not important►, because, when teachers quarrel, it helps no one, and because, when
they quarrel, they spiritually destroy those who hear them (OR, they cause those who
hear them to quit ◄being committed to Christ/believing in Christ►.)
15 ◄Do your best/Try hard► to be the kind of person that God will approve of. Be
like a good worker as you teach the true message accurately. If a worker works well,
he will not need to be ashamed of (OR, will be pleased about) what he does.
Have nothing to do with godless and foolish talk.
2 Timothy 2:16-19
16 ◄Stay away from/Do not talk with► those who talk foolishly and ◄godlessly/say
things that displease God►, because those who talk foolishly will become even more
◄ungodly/displeasing to God►, 17 and because their message will harm people [SIM]
like gangrene/cancer does. You know Hymenaeus and Philetus. They are two such
people who talk in this manner. 18 Specifically, they teach a wrong message; that
is, they say wrongly that God will not cause dead people to live again because he has
already given us spiritual life. They claim that our spiritual life is the only new life that
we will receive. By saying that, they cause some people 19 not to continue to believe
in Christ. However, the congregations of God are strong [MET]. They are like a strong
foundation on which is written: “The Lord knows the people who really belong to
him,” and “Every person who calls Jesus [MTY] ‘Lord’ must stop doing wicked things”.
Avoid the bad things that some young people desire to do. Do good instead.
2 Timothy 2:20-22
20 In a wealthy person’s house there are not only utensils made of gold and of silver,
but also utensils made of wood and of clay. The gold and silver utensils are used at
special occasions/events, and the others are used at ordinary occasions. Similarly, in2 TIMOTHY 2:21
1774
2 TIMOTHY 3:9
a congregation there are those who ◄are ready/desire► to do great things for the Lord
Jesus, and there are those like the teachers of false doctrines/teachings who are not.
21 Therefore, those who rid themselves of what is evil in their lives will be able to
work well for the Lord. They will be like utensils [MET] used at special occasions, set
apart for and especially useful to the owner of the big house. They will be like fine
utensils that have been prepared {are ready} to do any kind of good work. 22 Because
of that, you (sg) must avoid doing the wrong actions that many young people desire
to do. Instead, you must earnestly do right actions, believe the true teaching, love God
and others, and you must continually be at peace with those who ask the Lord to help
them and who are pure in every way (OR, who serve Jesus faithfully).
Do not discuss foolish questions but gently instruct those who oppose the true
message.
2 Timothy 2:23-26
23 Do not talk with anyone who foolishly wants to argue about matters that are not
important. Do not talk with them, because you know that when people talk about
foolish things, they begin to quarrel. 24 But those who serve the Lord must not
quarrel. Instead, they should be kind to all people, they should be able to teach
God’s truth well, and they should be patient with people. 25 That is, they should gently
instruct/teach people who oppose the true message. They should do that in order that
perhaps God will cause others to completely change what they think, so that they
may acknowledge/believe the true message. 26 In that way they may get free from
what is like [MET] a trap set by the devil. The devil has deceived them in order that
they might do what he wants them to do.
3
Realize that evil people will cause the last days to be difficult. Avoid such people.
2 Timothy 3:1-9
1 You need to realize that during the last days [MTY] before Christ returns, evil people
will make it difficult for believers to behave as they should. 2 This is because such evil
people will be habitually loving themselves and loving money. They will habitually
boast about themselves, they will be proud, and will often say bad things about others.
They will disobey their parents. They will not be thankful, nor will they respect
anything that is good. 3 They will not even love their own family, nor agree with
anybody (OR, they never forgive anyone). They will tell lies about people. They will
not control what they say and do, nor allow anyone to control them. They will not love
anything that is good. 4 They will ◄betray others/hand others over to their enemies►
and act foolishly. They will be overly/very proud of themselves, and they will love
to please themselves instead of loving God. 5 And, although they will pretend that
they worship God, they will not let God’s Spirit work powerfully in their lives. Do
not associate with such people (OR, Do not let such people join your congregation),
6 because some such people, even now, subtly/deceivingly persuade foolish women
to let them come into their houses, and then they deceive those women so that they
control what those women think. These women have been burdened with sins {have
sinned very much} and they have been led to do {they do} the many evil things that
they strongly desire to do. 7 Even though they are always wanting to learn new things,
they are never able to recognize what is true. 8 Just like Jannes and Jambres long ago
very much opposed Moses, so also some people now oppose the true message. Those
people think only what is evil. God rejects them because they do not believe what is
true. 9 Nevertheless, they will not continue to succeed, because most [HYP] people2 TIMOTHY 3:10
1775
2 TIMOTHY 4:5
will understand clearly that such people are foolish, just like people also realized
clearly that Jannes and Jambres were foolish.
Continue to believe what you have learned and been assured of.
2 Timothy 3:10-17
10 But as for yourself, you have fully known what I have taught. You have known
and imitated the way in which I conducted my life, and what I have been trying to do.
You have trusted God as I have. You have been patient as I have been. You have loved
people as I have, and you have endured as you suffered like I have suffered. 11 You
know how I endured many times when people harmed me. They caused me to suffer at
Antioch, Iconium, and Lystra cities. But although they caused me to suffer, I endured
it; and every time they did those things to me, the Lord rescued me. 12 ◄Indeed/You
know that►, for us (inc) who want to live ◄in a godly manner/in a manner that pleases
God►, we will always be persecuted {there will always be people who will cause us
to suffer} because we have a close relationship with Christ Jesus. 13 Evil people (OR,
And those) who deceive other people will ◄get worse/teach things that are more and
more wrong►. Specifically, they will deceive other people, and those who hear them
will deceive others. 14 But you, in contrast, must continue to believe what you have
learned and ◄been assured of/firmly believe►. I know that you are confident/sure that
it is true because you know that you have learned it from all of us who taught you
◄God’s truth/what is right►. 15 From the time when you were a child you have known
the holy writings/Scriptures. You now know that they enabled you to become wise
so that God saved you because of your believing in Christ Jesus. 16 God ◄inspired/
put into men’s minds► everything that is written in the Scriptures {they wrote in the
holy writings}, and those writings are all useful to teach us what is true, to cause us to
know when we are wrong and then ◄to correct us/to show us what we have done that
is wrong►, and to train/teach us to do what is right. 17 What is written {they wrote}
is useful to help us who serve God to be ready/prepared to do all that we should do.
By means of it, we are equipped {God gives us what we need} in order to do every
kind of good deeds.
4
I solemnly command you to preach the true message and do everything that you
ought to do.
2 Timothy 4:1-8
1 Christ Jesus is going to come back and judge those who are living when he comes
and those who will have died. He will judge them concerning what rewards they
deserve, and he will rule everyone. So, knowing that he and God are watching
everything that we do, I solemnly/earnestly command you 2 that you proclaim the
true message to people. Always be ready/prepared to proclaim it, whether people
want to hear it or not. Some people are saying things that are not correct; ◄refute
their teaching/show why their teaching is wrong►. Rebuke them when they are doing
wrong. Tell them what they ought to do. Be very patient while you teach them. 3 Do
these things because there will be a time when people will not listen to good teaching.
Instead, they will bring in many teachers for themselves who will tell them just what
they want to hear [IDM]. The reason that they will bring in such teachers is that they
want to do the evil things that they desire. 4 That is, they will not listen to [MTY] what
is true, but will listen instead to strange stories from our ancestors. 5 Furthermore,
I command that you always control what you think and do. Be willing to endure2 TIMOTHY 4:6
1776
2 TIMOTHY 4:22
hardships/suffering. Your work should be telling people the message about Christ
Jesus. As you serve the Lord, do everything that God has told you to do.
6 Timothy, I say these things to you because as for me, it is as though [MET] they
are now about to kill me. It is as though my blood will be poured out {they will kill
me} as a sacrifice on the altar; that is, I know that it is the time for me to die [EUP].
7 And as to telling people the good message and defending it, I have ◄exerted myself
thoroughly/done it with all my energy► [MET], like a boxer does. As to doing the work
that God gave me to do, I have completed it, like a runner who finishes [MET] the race.
As to what we believe, I ◄have been loyal to it/continue to believe it►. 8 So, like people
award a prize [MET] to the winner of a race, the Lord, who judges rightly, will give me
a reward because I have lived righteously. He will give me that reward when [MTY]
he judges people. And not only will he reward me, but he will also reward all those
who very much want him to come back.
Do your best to come to me soon.
2 Timothy 4:9-15
9 ◄Do your best/Try hard► to come to me soon. 10 I say that because Demas has left
me. He wanted very much the good things that he might enjoy [MTY] in this world
right now, and so he went to Thessalonica city. Crescens went to serve the Lord in
Galatia province, and Titus went to Dalmatia district. 11 Luke is the only one who is
still with me of those who were helping me. And when you come, bring Mark with
you, because he is useful to help me in my work. 12 Tychicus cannot help me because
I sent him to Ephesus city. 13 And when you come, bring the coat that I left with
Carpus in Troas city. Also, bring the books, but ◄most of all/especially► I want ◄the
parchments/the animal skins► on which important things are written.
14 Alexander, the man who makes things from metal, did many evil/harmful things
to me. The Lord will punish him for what he did. 15 So you, too, must beware of him.
He will try to destroy your work if he can, because he very much opposes the message
that we proclaim.
The Lord will rescue me from everything that is evil and bring me safely to heaven.
2 Timothy 4:16-18
16 When I first defended myself in court here, no one came along to help defend me.
Instead, they all left me. I pray that it will not be counted against {God will forgive}
them [LIT] for leaving me. 17 Nevertheless, the Lord was with me and strengthened
me. He enabled me to fully preach the message, and all the non-Jewish people in
the court (OR, people from many nations) heard it. And I was rescued by the Lord
{the Lord rescued me} from great danger, as if I were taken [MET] out of a lion’s
(OR, wild animal’s) mouth. 18 Therefore, I am sure that the Lord will rescue me from
everything that is truly evil and will bring me safely to heaven, where he rules. Praise
him forever! ◄Amen!/May it be so!►
Greet my friends there. Your friends here greet you. May the Lord bless you.
2 Timothy 4:19-22
19 Greet for me Priscilla and her husband Aquila and the family of Onesiphorus.
20 Erastus stayed in Corinth city. Trophimus, I left in Miletus city because he was
sick. 21 ◄Do your best/Try hard► to come to me before ◄the stormy season/winter►.
Eubulus, Pudens, Linus, Claudia, and many other fellow believers in this city ◄send
their greetings to/say that they are thinking affectionately about► you. 22 I pray that
the Lord will help you in your spirit, Timothy, and that he will act kindly toward all
of you believers who are there.TITUS 1:1
1777
TITUS 1:9
This book is a letter that the Apostle Paul wrote to his
assistant Titus. We call this book
Titus
Titus 1:1-4
I, Paul, have been appointed by God as his servant and as an apostle of Jesus Christ
in order that I might lead God’s people to know, believe, and practice the true teachings.
I write this letter to you, Titus. May God continue to bless you.
1 I, Paul, am writing this letter to you, Titus. God appointed me to be his servant
and to be an apostle who represents Jesus Christ. God appointed me in order that I
might teach those whom God has chosen to be his people to correctly believe in him.
He wants me to teach them the true teachings about God, in order that they will
learn to behave ◄in a godly manner/in a manner that pleases God►. 2 As a result of
my doing these things, his people confidently expect that God will cause them to live
forever. God, who never lies, promised before he created the world that his people
would live forever. 3 Then at the time that he chose, he revealed to us his message.
Specifically, God our Savior gave this message to me, and he trusted me to proclaim it
to people. 4 Titus, I am writing this letter to you because you are like a true son [MET]
to me because I led/helped you to believe the same teachings about Christ that I do. ◄I
pray that/May► God our Father and Christ Jesus our Savior will continue to act kindly
toward you and cause you to have inner peace.
I want you to teach the believers and to appoint elders.
Titus 1:5
5 When I asked you to stay on Crete island, I wanted you to do these things: Teach the
believers what they need to know so that they can understand correctly the spiritual
matters about which some are teaching wrongly. Appoint elders in the congregation
in each town in the manner in which I told you to do.
Appoint as elders men whom no one can justly criticize.
Titus 1:6-9
6 When you appoint men as elders, you must choose men whom no one can justly
accuse of habitually doing what is wrong (OR, whom everyone speaks well of).
Specifically, appoint men who have been faithful to their wives. Appoint men whose
children faithfully obey them. Do not appoint men whose children habitually do all
the things that their bodies urge them to do, or who refuse to obey their parents.
7 Leaders of the congregation must be men who, as everyone knows, habitually do
what is good (OR, whom no one can justly accuse of doing what is wrong), because it
is on God’s behalf that they will direct/serve the congregation. Specifically, they must
not be arrogant/proud. They must not easily become angry. They must not be men
who drink much alcohol. They must not be men who ◄act violently/fight► when they
are angry. They must not be men who are ◄greedy for/strongly desire to get► money.
8 Instead, they must be ones who welcome and take care of guests. They must ◄be
devoted to/like to do► what is good. They must do what God considers to be right.
They must be ◄holy/completely dedicated to God►. They must be men who do what
their minds tell them is right to do and not what their emotions/desires urge them to
do. 9 They must firmly believe in the message about Jesus Christ exactly as I/we(inc)
taught it, in order that they might be able to teach the believers what is correct andTITUS 1:10
1778
TITUS 2:5
to urge them to follow it well. If they firmly accept our message, they will be able to
convince those who oppose what is correct that they are wrong.
Since there are many deceivers teaching what is false, who do not even know God
themselves and are unable to do any good thing, rigorously convince those believers
who follow false teachings that they are wrong in order that they will firmly believe in
the correct teachings.
Titus 1:10-16
10 I say this because there are many people who oppose the correct teachings. They
refuse to obey people who have authority over them, they talk ◄on and on/without
stopping►, saying what helps no one, and they deceive people. The Jewish believers
[MTY] who insist we must obey all the Jewish rituals are especially doing this. 11 You and
the leaders whom you appoint should prevent such people from teaching the believers.
They are causing whole families to stop believing in the correct teachings [MET] by
means of their teaching people wrong ideas/teachings. They are teaching people only
in order that people will give them money, which is very shameful for them to do.
12 A man from Crete island whom they consider a prophet said, “My fellow Cretan
people are always lying to one another! They are like dangerous wild animals [MET]!
They are lazy and always eat too much food [SYN]!” 13 The words that this man said
about the Cretan people are still true, especially about their being liars. So, rigorously
convince/show those Cretan believers that those false teachings are wrong. Tell them
to firmly believe in the correct teachings. 14 Teach them that they should no longer
listen to the stories that the Jews ◄made up/invented►. Especially they should refuse
to obey those who reject our true teachings, because those people are teaching things
that only come from human beings, not from God. 15 Believers should reject what they
teach about food, because no food that we eat can make us unacceptable to God if we
are pure in our ◄inner beings/hearts►. But if people are evil and they do not trust in
Christ Jesus, there is no ritual that can make them acceptable to God. Such people’s
way of thinking has been ruined {Such people have ruined their way of thinking},
and they do not even feel guilty when they do what is evil. 16 Even though they claim/
say that they know God, by what they do they show that they do not know ◄God/his
true teaching►. They do not obey God, and they are unable to do anything that he
considers to be good. So God considers them to be absolutely disgusting!
2
Teach and urge the believers to behave in a manner that is consistent with the correct
teachings in order that people will perceive that the teachings about God our Savior are
very good.
Titus 2:1-10
1 But as for you (sg), teach the believers what agrees with the correct teachings.
2 Specifically, tell the older men that they should control themselves ◄in all situations/
whatever happens►, that they should behave in such a manner that all people will
respect them, and that they should control what they say and do. And tell them that
they should firmly believe in the correct teachings, that they should sincerely love
others, and that they should always be steadfast. 3 Similarly, tell the older women
that they should behave ◄in a reverent manner that shows that they are devoted to
God/in a manner that honors God►; specifically, they should not ◄slander others/talk
evil about others►, and they should not ◄be drinking much/habitually drinking►
alcohol. Tell them that they should teach the younger women what is good, 4 in order
that they may love their husbands and their children. 5 Older women should teach
younger women to control what they say and do and to be pure in every way, to beTITUS 2:6
1779
TITUS 3:2
good workers at home and submissive to their own husbands. The younger women
should behave like this in order that no one will speak against the message about
God. 6 As for the younger men, similarly, urge them to control themselves in all
that they say and do. 7 You yourself must continually do what is good in order that
others will see how they should behave. Teach the believers sincerely and seriously;
8 teach what is correct and what no one can justly criticize. Do this in order that
when the believers conduct their lives in a proper manner, anyone who opposes ◄us/
our message► will be disappointed because there will be nothing bad that they can
justly say about us. 9 As for slaves, specifically, urge them to be submissive to their
masters in everything. They should please their masters; specifically, they should not
◄contradict/refuse to obey► their masters. 10 They should not steal things that belong
to their masters. Instead, they should always be completely honest/reliable and thus
show their masters that their masters can completely trust them. They should behave
like this in order that as a result of all the slaves conducting themselves well, people
will realize that the teachings about God our Savior are very desirable.
God very kindly sent Jesus Christ to earth in order that God might save all people
and God graciously trains us to behave in a godly manner.
Titus 2:11-14
11 The believers should behave in a good manner, since God did for us what we did
not deserve, sending Jesus Christ to earth in order that he might save all people [PRS].
12 God teaches/tells us [PRS] how to stop doing what he dislikes, and to stop desiring
the things that ◄ungodly people/people who habitually do things that do not please
God► desire [MTY]. He wants us to control our behavior and to do what is right and
to do what pleases him while we live in this present age/time. 13 Do not forget that
we are waiting expectantly for that which will make us very happy indeed [MTY]! We
are expectantly waiting for our great God and Savior, Jesus Christ, to come gloriously!
14 He is the one who willingly gave himself ◄to die/as a sacrifice► on our behalf to set
us free from all sinful behavior! He wants ◄us to get rid of all our evil behavior/to
make our lives pure► [MET]. He wants us, who are his very own people, to be people
who are eager to do what is good.
With full authority, teach these things, urge the believers to do them, and correct
those believers who do not follow them.
Titus 2:15
15 Teach the believers these things! Urge them to do them! Correct those who do
not obey them! As you do this, you have my full authority; so do not allow anyone to
disregard you!
3
Remind the believers to act appropriately toward authorities and kindly toward
everyone.
Titus 3:1-2
1 Remind the believers that they should submit to all those who rule them or have
authority over them, and that they should obey them. They should be ready to do
anything that is helpful. 2 They should never say bad things about anyone, they should
not quarrel with people, they should be patient when others ◄irritate them/do things
that they do not like►, and they should always treat all people as important.
God acted kindly toward us and mercifully saved us, even though formerly we were
behaving sinfully.
Titus 3:3-7TITUS 3:3
1780
TITUS 3:14
3 Remind
your congregations about these things because formerly we believers
ourselves were also foolish, just like all people who do not believe in Christ are now.
We did not obey ◄God/God’s message►. We let others deceive us. We ◄spent all our
time doing/continually did► what is evil and could not stop ourselves from doing all
the things that our bodies liked [DOU]. We were ◄envying others/desiring to have
what others have►. We were causing people to hate us and we were hating one
another. 4-5 Even though we were behaving sinfully like this, God our Savior acted
kindly and lovingly to us [PRS], and saved us! He did this, not because we did things
that are right, but just because he wanted to be merciful to us! He washed us inwardly
and gave us a new way of living as a result of the Holy Spirit changing us inwardly.
6 Because we trusted in Jesus Christ our Savior, God put the Holy Spirit within us in
order to wonderfully change us. 7 He wanted to erase the record of our sins even
though we did not deserve that, and he wanted us to receive all that God desires to
give us. These are the things that we confidently expect to receive when we live with
him eternally.
I want you to confidently teach this trustworthy message to the believers in order
that they will be constantly concerned with doing what is good for others.
Titus 3:8a
8 These words that I have written are trustworthy. So, I want you to confidently
teach the things that I have written about in this letter to those who have trusted in
God, in order that they will be constantly devoted/attempting to do deeds that are
good and helpful for others.
Have nothing to do with foolish disputes about genealogies and about the Jewish
law; and do not allow divisive people who have turned away from the true teachings to
influence the believers.
Titus 3:8b-11
These teachings are beneficial and profitable for all people, 9 but there are people
who foolishly dispute/argue with you, wanting you to believe senseless ◄myths/stories
that came from your ancestors►, stories in which there are ◄genealogies/ lists of
your ancestors’ names►. They argue and quarrel with you, ◄insisting/telling you►
that you must obey the Jewish laws. ◄Stay completely away from/Do not talk with►
them, because arguing about such things is not profitable for anyone. It is completely
worthless! 10 Those people, by teaching things that are false, are causing others ◄to
turn away from/to quit believing► the true teachings. You must warn them that
God will judge them if they continue doing that. If they do not stop, warn them one
more time. If they still do not stop, then no longer have anything o do with them.
11 You will know clearly that such persons have deliberately ◄turned away from/quit
believing and obeying► the true teachings. They know that they are doing what is
sinful, but they deliberately keep on doing it.
Make every effort to come to me at Nicopolis. Help Zenas and Apollos on their
journey. All the believers should likewise learn to devote themselves to doing good
deeds for people who especially need help.
Titus 3:12-14
12 I expect to send either Artemas or Tychicus to you. As soon as one of them arrives,
◄make every effort/try hard► to come to me quickly at Nicopolis city, because it is
there that I have decided to go and stay during the stormy/winter season. 13 As for
Zenas ◄the lawyer/the expert in the law► and Apollos, when they are ready to leave
Crete Island, help them as much as you can in order that they may have everything
[LIT] that they need as they travel. 14 Moreover, our fellow believers also should learnTITUS 3:15
1781
TITUS 3:15
◄to devote themselves to doing/to constantly do► good deeds for people who need
help in order that they, our fellow believers, will live very useful [LIT] lives.
Everyone who is with me greets you and the other true believers there. May our
Lord Jesus Christ continue to act kindly toward all of you.
Titus 3:15
15 As I finish this letter, everyone who is with me ◄says that they are thinking
affectionately about you/wants me to send greetings to you►. Tell those who are
there who love us and believe as we do that we ◄are thinking affectionately about/
greet► them. I pray/desire that our Lord Jesus Christ will continue to act kindly
toward all of you.PHILEMON 1
1782
PHILEMON 15
This book is a letter that the Apostle Paul wrote to his
friend Philemon. We call this book
Philemon
Philemon 1-3
I, Paul, am writing this letter to you, Philemon, and to those with you. May God
bless you(pl).
1 I, Paul, am a prisoner who serves Christ Jesus. I am here with Timothy, our fellow
believer. I am writing this letter to you, Philemon, our dear friend and fellow worker.
2 I am also writing to your wife, Apphia, and to Archippus, who is like [MET] our fellow
soldier because he serves Christ steadfastly together with us. I am also writing this to
the congregation that meets/gathers in your (sg) house. 3 I pray that God our Father
and our Lord Jesus Christ will continue to act kindly toward you all and will continue
to cause you to have inner peace.
I thank God and rejoice greatly because you have shown that you love God’s people.
Philemon 4-7
4 I always thank my God when I pray for you (sg), because I hear people say that
you love all God’s people [CHI] 5 and that you continue to trust in the Lord Jesus. 6 I
pray that as a result of your knowing all the good things that God/Christ has done
for us, you may ◄be effective/influence many others► as you tell others what you
believe, in order that they may honor Christ. 7 I have rejoiced greatly and have been
greatly encouraged because you, my dear friend, have acted lovingly toward God’s
people by encouraging them [SYN].
Because I know that you love God’s people, I request, rather than command you, to
do what you ought to do for my spiritual son Onesimus.
Philemon 8-11
8 So I have a request/favor to ask of you. I am completely confident that I have
authority to command you to do what you ought to do, because I am an apostle of
Christ. 9 But because I know that you love God’s people, I request this instead of
commanding you to do it. It is I, Paul, an old man and now also a prisoner because
I serve Christ Jesus, who am requesting it. 10 I request that you do something for
someone who has become like my own son because I told him about Christ [MET]
while I have been a prisoner [MTY] here. His name is Onesimus. 11 Although his
name, as you know, means ‘useful’, formerly he was useless to you. But now he is
useful both to you and to me!
I am sending Onesimus back to you. He is as dear to me as my own self, and he will
now be even dearer to you than he is to me.
Philemon 12-16
12 Although ◄he is as dear to me as/I love him as much as I love► [MET] my own self
[MTY], I am sending him back to you. 13 I would like to have kept him with me, in
order that he might serve me on your behalf, while I am a prisoner [MTY] because of
my preaching the message about Christ. 14 Nevertheless, because I had not yet asked
you and you had not yet permitted me to keep him here with me, I decided not to keep
him here. I decided that I should not do anything without your permitting it. I decided
that you should help me only if you really want to help me. 15 Perhaps the reason that
God permitted Onesimus to be separated from {to leave} you for a little while wasPHILEMON 16
1783
PHILEMON 25
that he would believe in Christ, and as a result you would have him ◄back/with you►
forever! 16 You will no longer have him only as a slave. Instead, you will have him
as someone who is more than a slave. You will have him as a fellow believer! He is
especially dear to me, but he certainly will be more dear to you than he is to me (OR,
I love him very much, but you will certainly love him more than I do), because now
he not only belongs to you but he also belongs to the Lord.
If you consider me to be your partner, receive Onesimus as you would receive me. I
guarantee to repay you whatever Onesimus owes you.
Philemon 17-19
17 So, if you consider me to be your partner in God’s work, receive him as you would
receive me. 18 If he has wronged you in any manner or if he owes you anything,
◄charge that to me/tell me so that I can pay you►. 19 I, Paul, am now writing this in
my own handwriting: I will repay you what he owes you, although I might mention
to you that you owe me even more than Onesimus may owe you, because it was the
result of my telling you about Christ that God saved you.
Please encourage me in this matter as you encourage other believers in Christ.
Philemon 20
20 ◄Yes/I say it again►, my dear friend, because you and I both have a relationship
with the Lord, I want you to do this for me. Encourage me [SYN] by receiving Onesimus
kindly, just like you encourage others who believe in Christ.
I have written this letter to you confident of your compliance with my request.
Philemon 21
21 I have written this letter to you, confident that you will do what I am requesting
you to do. In fact, I know that you will do even more than what I am requesting you
to do.
Also, keep a guest room ready for me.
Philemon 22
22 Also, keep a guest room ready for me to stay in, because I confidently expect that
as a result of your prayers for me, I will be released from prison and will come to you
all.
My other fellow workers greet you(sg). May the Lord Jesus Christ bless you(pl)
spiritually.
Philemon 23-25
23 Epaphras, who is suffering with me in prison because of his serving Christ Jesus,
◄sends his greetings to you/wants you to know that he is thinking fondly about you►.
24 Mark, Aristarchus, Demas, and Luke, who are my other fellow workers, also ◄send
their greetings to you/want you to know that they are thinking fondly about you►.
25 I pray that the Lord Jesus Christ will ◄continue to work kindly in all your lives/
kindly keep accomplishing what he desires within you►.HEBREWS 1:1
1784
HEBREWS 1:12
This book is a letter that was written to Jewish believers.
We call this book
Hebrews
Hebrews 1:1-3
God formerly communicated with us through the prophets, but now he has
communicated with us through his son, who is just like God.
1 Long ago God communicated frequently to our ancestors in various ways by what
the prophets said and wrote. 2 But now when this final age is beginning, God has
communicated to us just once by means of what ◄his Son/the man who was also
God► said and did. God appointed him in order that he would possess everything
that truly belongs to God. God also appointed him in order that he would create the
universe. 3 He manifests God’s glory. He exactly represents what God is like. He
◄sustains everything by means of his powerful words. When he had enabled people
to be freed from the guilt of their sins [MET], he sat down in heaven [EUP] to rule at
the place of greatest honor [MTY] with God [MTY].
God’s son is greater than the angels.
Hebrews 1:4-14
4 By doing that, he showed that he was very much greater than the angels, to the
extent that his relationship [MTY] to God, as his Son, is more excellent than the
relationship the angels have to God. 5 We know that because in the Scriptures no
one [RHQ] ever reported that God said to any angel what he said to his Son,
You (sg) are my Son!
Today I have declared to all that I am your Father [DOU]!
And he said in another Scripture passage,
I will be his Father,
and he will be my Son [DOU].
6 And we know his Son is greater than the angels because in another Scripture passage
someone wrote this about God’s esteemed Son, when God was about to send him into
the world:
All God’s angels must worship him.
7 And in the Scriptures it is written that someone said this about the angels:
God makes the angels who serve him to be changeable like [MET] winds and flames
of fire.
8 But on the other hand, in the Scriptures it is written that God said this to his Son:
You (sg) who are also God will rule forever [MTY],
and you will reign righteously over your kingdom [MTY].
9 You have loved people’s righteous deeds and you have hated people’s lawless deeds.
So I, your God, have caused you to be more joyful [MTY] than anyone else.
10 And we also know that his Son is superior to angels because in the Scriptures the
Psalmist wrote that someone said to God’s Son,
Lord, it was you who created the earth in the beginning.
You also made the rest of the universe (OR, the things in the sky) [MTY].
11 Everything in the universe will disappear, but you will keep on living forever.
They will wear out as clothing wears out.
12 You will dispose of them as one rolls up an old coat before getting rid of it.
Then, you will exchange everything that is in the universe for what is new,HEBREWS 1:13
1785
HEBREWS 2:10
as someone puts on a new garment in exchange for an old garment [SIM].
But you are not like what you created;
You stay the same, and you live forever [LIT]!
13 We also know that his Son is superior to angels because no one ever stated [RHQ]
in the Scriptures that God said to any angel what he said to his Son,
Sit in the place of honor next to me and rule with me [MTY]
while I put all of your enemies completely under your control [MET]!
14 The angels are only spirits who serve God [RHQ]. God sends them to earth in
order to help those he has saved (OR, those whom he will save).
2
We will not escape God’s punishment if we ignore such a great message of salvation.
Hebrews 2:1-4
1 So, since that is true, we must pay very careful attention to what we have heard
about God’s Son, in order that we do not drift away from it, as a boat drifts off its
course when people do not guide it [MET]. 2 God’s laws that were given by angels were
valid, and God justly punished all who rejected them and all who disobeyed [DOU]
them. 3 So, we will certainly not escape God punishing us if we ignore such a great
message about how God [MTY] saves us! [RHQ] This new message was first spoken by
the Lord Jesus {The Lord Jesus first spoke this message}. Then it was confirmed to us
by those who heard what the Lord told them {those who heard what the Lord told them
confirmed it to us}. 4 God also confirmed to us that this message was true by enabling
believers to do many things that showed God’s power, to do other miraculous things
[DOU], and to do other things by the gifts that the Holy Spirit distributed to them
according to what God desired.
God has determined that Christ, not angels or people, will rule everything.
Hebrews 2:5-9a
5 God has determined that the angels will not rule over everything. Instead, he has
determined that Christ will rule in the new world that God will create. That is the new
world about which I am writing. 6 Someone spoke to God about this somewhere in
the Scriptures, saying,
◄No one is worthy enough for you to think about him!/Who is worthy enough for you
to think about him?► [RHQ]
◄No human is worthy enough for you to care for him!/Is any human worthy enough
for you to care for him?► [RHQ]
7 So it is surprising that you have caused people to be for a little while inferior in rank
to angels.
You have greatly honored [DOU] them [MET], as kings are honored with a crown.
8 You have put everything under people’s control [MET].
God has determined that people will rule over absolutely everything [LIT]. But
now, at this present time, we perceive that people do not yet have authority over
everything. 9 But we do know about Jesus, who truly has authority over everything!
Jesus, the creator of everything, is the one who died for us, makes us holy, and
proclaims us to be his brothers and sisters.
Hebrews 2:9b-13
Jesus, for a little while, became inferior in rank to angels in order to die on behalf
of [MET] everyone. He became inferior when he suffered and died, as God kindly
planned. But now he has been greatly honored [DOU] by being crowned as kings are.
10 It was fitting that God make Jesus ◄perfect/all that God intended him to be►. God
was enabling many people who would belong to him [MET] to share his glory. GodHEBREWS 2:11
1786
HEBREWS 3:7
is the one who created all things, and he is the one for whom all things exist. He
perfected Jesus by causing him to suffer and die. Jesus is the one whom God uses to
save people. 11 Jesus is the one who ◄makes people holy/sets people apart for God►,
and they all belong to God’s family. As a result, Christ gladly [LIT] proclaims them
to be like his own brothers and sisters. 12 The Psalmist wrote what Christ said to God
about us becoming his brothers, in these words:
I will proclaim to my brothers how awesome you are (OR, what you ◄are like/have
done►) [MTY].
I will sing praise to you in the presence of the congregation!
13 And a prophet wrote in another Scripture passage what Christ said about God,
I will trust him.
And in another Scripture passage, Christ said about those who are like his children,
I and the ones that God has given me are here.
It is Jesus, not angels, who became a human to help us as our Supreme Priest.
Hebrews 2:14-18
14 So, since those whom God calls his children are all human beings [MTY], Jesus
also became a human being just like them. The devil has the power to cause people to
be afraid to die, but Christ became human in order that by his dying he might make
the devil powerless. 15 Jesus did that to free all of us who are like slaves [MET] all
the time we live, because we are forced to be afraid to die. 16 Because Jesus became
a human being, it is not angels whom he wants to help. No, it is we who trust God
as Abraham did whom he wants to help. 17 So, since he came to help humans, not
angels, he had to be made exactly like us whom he calls his own brothers and sisters.
He wants to be a Supreme Priest who acts mercifully to all people and who faithfully
does what God wants, so that people who had sinned would be declared no longer
guilty. 18 Specifically, he is able to help those/us who are tempted to sin. He can do
that because he suffered, and he was also tempted to sin like we are tempted to sin.
3
Our Supreme Priest, Jesus, deserves more honor than Moses does.
Hebrews 3:1-6
1 My fellow believers, God has set you apart and has chosen you, just like he chose
me. So consider Jesus. He is God’s messenger to us. He is also the Supreme Priest
whom we say we believe in. 2 He faithfully served God, who appointed him, just
like Moses faithfully served God’s people [MTY]. 3-4 Just like every house is made by
someone {as someone makes every house}, Jesus made everything, and he is God/
Divine. So God has considered that Jesus is worthy that people honor him more than
they honor Moses, just like the one who builds a house deserves that people honor
him more than they should honor the house he built. 5 Moses very faithfully served
God as he ◄helped/cared for► [MET] God’s people, just like a servant faithfully serves
his master. The result was that Moses testified about what Jesus would say later.
6 But Christ faithfully serves God as he ◄helps/cares for► his own people [MTY, MET],
just like a son helps/cares for his own family. And we are God’s people [MTY] if we
continue to confidently believe in Christ and if we continue to confidently wait for
what God will do for us.
Do not stubbornly rebel against God as their Jewish ancestors did.
Hebrews 3:7-11
7 The Holy Spirit caused the Psalmist to write these words in the Scriptures to the
Israelites:HEBREWS 3:8
1787
HEBREWS 4:1
Now, when you (pl) hear God speaking to you [MTY], 8 do not stubbornly ◄disobey/
refuse to obey him► [IDM], as your Jewish ancestors stubbornly disobeyed him
when they rebelled against him in the desert.
At that time, God said to your ancestors, “They tried to determine how many things
that displeased me they could do in the desert without me punishing them. 9 Your
ancestors repeatedly tested whether I would be patient with them, even though for 40
years they saw all the amazing things I did.
10 So, I became disgusted with those people who saw those things, and I said about
them, ‘They are constantly disloyal to me, and they do not understand how I wanted
them to conduct their lives.’
11 As a result, because I was angry with them, I solemnly declared, ‘They will not
enter the land of Canaan where I would let them rest [MTY]!’ ”
Beware that you do not stop trusting in Christ.
Hebrews 3:12-15
12 So, my fellow believers, be careful that none of you is so evil that you stop trusting
in Christ. That would cause you to reject God who is all-powerful. 13 Instead, each of
you must encourage each other every day, while you still have the opportunity [IDM],
in order that none of you may stubbornly reject God by letting others deceive you
(OR, as you deceive yourselves), with the result that you (sg) sin [PRS]. 14 We must
encourage one another, because we (inc) benefit from all Christ has done only if we
firmly keep trusting in him from the time when we first confidently trusted in him
until the time when we die [EUP]. 15 We can do this by paying attention to what the
Psalmist wrote in that Scripture passage in which God said,
Now, when you hear me speaking to you(pl) [MTY], do not stubbornly disobey me as
your ancestors stubbornly disobeyed me when they rebelled against me.
It was your ancestors, ones for whom God did great things, who rebelled against
God.
Hebrews 3:16-19
16 ◄You must keep trusting in God because you must remember who it was who
rebelled against God although they heard him speaking to them./Do you remember
who it was who rebelled against God although they heard him speaking to them?►
[RHQ] It was people who had certainly experienced [LIT] God’s power. It was all
those people whom Moses led miraculously out of Egypt. [RHQ] 17 And ◄you must
remember who it was that God was disgusted with for 40 years./do you remember who
it was that God was disgusted with for 40years?► [RHQ] It was those same people who
had sinned like that, and who as a result died in the desert! [RHQ] 18 And ◄you must
remember about whom God solemnly declared, “They will not enter the land where
I would let them rest.”/do you remember about whom God solemnly declared, “They
will not enter the land where I would let them rest”?► [RHQ] It was those Israelites
who disobeyed God. 19 So, from that example we (inc) realize that it was because they
did not keep trusting in God that they were unable to enter the land where they would
rest.
4
The Israelites failed to enter the place where they would rest; we must be careful not
to act like them.
Hebrews 4:1-5
1 The Israelites did not enter the place where they would rest. But God has still
promised us that we can enter the place of resting in heaven eternally. So we must
beware of the possibility that God may consider that some of you have failed to enterHEBREWS 4:2
1788
HEBREWS 4:13
the place of resting eternally as the Israelites did not enter the place where they would
rest. 2 We have heard the message about Christ, just like the Israelites heard what God
promised. But just like the message did not benefit most of those who heard it because
they did not believe it as Joshua and Caleb did, it will not benefit us eternally if we do
not keep believing it. 3 We who have believed in Christ are able to enter the place of
resting eternally. We know there is a place where we will rest eternally because God
said,
Because I was angry with them, I solemnly declared, “They will not enter the land
where I would let them rest.”
God said that even though he ceased his work of creating things after he created
the world. 4 What someone wrote somewhere in the Scriptures about the seventh day
after he had spent six days creating the world, supports that:
Then, on the seventh day, God rested from his work of creating everything.
5 But note again what God said about the Israelites in the passage that I quoted
previously:
They will not enter the land where I would let them rest.
The Scriptures support the claim that there is a time when God’s people will rest
eternally.
Hebrews 4:6-10
6 Some people experience entering that place of resting eternally. But those Israelites
who first had the good message preached to them {first heard the good message}
about what God promised them did not enter that place of resting, because they refused
to believe God. 7 But God appointed another time when we may enter that place of
resting. That time is now! We know that is true because much later than when the
Israelites rebelled against God in the desert, he caused King David to write what I have
already quoted,
Now, when you understand what God is saying to you, do not stubbornly disobey
him.
8 If Joshua had led the Israelites to enter the place of resting, God would not
have spoken later about another time when we could rest [MET]. So we know God
was speaking about another time when some people would enter that place of resting
eternally. 9 So, just like God rested on the seventh day after he finished making
everything, there remains a time when God’s people will rest eternally. 10 Specifically,
whoever enters God’s place of resting has ceased doing things to gain God’s favor, just
like God ceased doing his work of creating everything.
We must be careful not to be insincere about trying to enter the place of eternal rest.
Hebrews 4:11-13
11 God severely punished the Israelites because they disbelieved his message. So we
must strive to experience entering that place of resting eternally, in order that he
will not severely punish any of us for not believing his message. 12 Beware of being
insincere about doing this, because the message God has given us very powerfully
penetrates our thinking more than a two-edged sword penetrates flesh [MET]. It
penetrates deeply into our souls and spirits, as a sharp sword can penetrate into our
joints and marrow. That is, by his message God [PRS] discerns all that we think about,
and he discerns all that we desire to do [MTY] (OR, His message exposes to us all our
thoughts and all our desires). 13 God knows everything about everyone. Everything
is completely exposed [DOU] to him, and he is the one [SYN] who will say whether he
approves of what we have done.HEBREWS 4:14
1789
HEBREWS 5:13
Let us come boldly to Christ, our Supreme Priest, to receive his gracious help.
Hebrews 4:14-16
14 We have a great Supreme Priest who ascended through the heavens when he
returned to God’s presence. He is Jesus, ◄God’s Son/the man who is also God►. So let
us firmly profess what we believe about him. 15 Our Supreme Priest can indeed [LIT]
compassionately deal with us who tend to sin easily, because he also was tempted to
sin in every way that we are tempted to sin, and yet he did not sin. 16 So, let us come
boldly to Christ [MTY], who rules [MET] from heaven and does for us what we do not
deserve, in order that we might experience his acting mercifully toward us, and in
order that we might experience his helping us in a kind way whenever we need help.
5
As Christ suffered, he learned to be a compassionate Supreme Priest by obeying God.
Hebrews 5:1-10
1 Every Jewish Supreme Priest was chosen by God {God chose every Jewish Supreme
Priest} from among ordinary men. They were appointed {He appointed them} in
order that they would come before him on behalf of the people. Specifically, God
appointed them in order that they would bring gifts to him on behalf of the people,
and in order to sacrifice animals to him for people who sinned. 2 The Supreme
Priests could deal gently with those who ignorantly sinned, since the Supreme Priests
themselves tended to sin easily. 3 As a result, they had to offer something to God
for their own sins, just like they had to offer something to God for other people who
sinned. 4 Furthermore, it is an honor to be a Supreme Priest so no one honors himself
by appointing himself to become a Supreme Priest. Instead, God chose each man to
become a Supreme Priest, as he chose Aaron to be the first Supreme Priest. 5 Similarly,
Christ also did not honor himself by appointing himself to become a Supreme Priest.
Instead, God appointed him by saying to him what he never said to any other priest,
what the Psalmist wrote in the Scriptures,
You (sg) are my Son! Today I have declared that I am your Father!
6 And he also said to Christ what the Psalmist wrote in another Scripture passage,
You are a priest eternally just like Melchizedek was a priest.
7 When Christ lived on the earth [MTY], he prayed [DOU] to God and tearfully cried
out loudly to him. Specifically, he asked God, who was able to help him, that he would
not fear the sufferings just before he died. As a result, God listened to him, because
Christ reverently submitted to what God wanted him to do. 8 Although Christ is God’s
own Son, he learned to obey God by suffering before he died. 9 By becoming ◄all that
God intended him to be/perfect►, he has now become fully qualified to be our Supreme
Priest. As a result, he is the one who saves eternally all who obey him. 10 Furthermore,
God has designated him to be our Supreme Priest in the way that Melchizedek was a
Supreme Priest.
You are not ready for more advanced spiritual truth.
Hebrews 5:11-14
11 Although there is much to say to you(pl) about how Christ resembles Melchizedek,
this is hard for me to explain to you because you now understand things so slowly.
12 You became Christians long ago. So by now you should be teaching spiritual truths
to others. But you still need someone to teach you again the truths that God has
revealed. I am talking about the truths that we teach people when they first believe
in Christ. You need those elementary truths like babies need milk [MET]. You are not
ready for advanced teaching, which is like the solid food which mature people need
[MET]. 13 Remember that those who are still learning these elementary truths [MET]HEBREWS 5:14
1790
HEBREWS 6:12
have not become familiar with what God says concerning becoming/being righteous.
They are just like [MET] babies who need milk! 14 But the more advanced spiritual
truth is for people who are spiritually mature, just like [MET] solid food is for people
who are physically mature. They can tell the difference between what is good and
what is evil, because they have trained themselves to keep doing that.
6
If you believers later reject the message about Christ, God will reject you.
Hebrews 6:1-8
1 So, we (inc) must not keep discussing the elementary principles about Christ.
Instead, we must proceed to the teaching that will make us spiritually mature [MTY].
We must not be people who always need someone to teach them the elementary truths
about Christ that are like [MET] a foundation. I am referring to the teaching that people
who do sinful things must turn away from their sinful behavior, things that those who
are spiritually [MET] dead do. I am referring to the teaching that people must believe
in God. 2 I am referring to the teaching about what various Jewish and Christian rituals
for purifying people signify. I am referring to the teaching about how elders enable
people to receive spiritual gifts by laying hands on them [MTY]. I am referring to the
teaching that God will ◄cause those who have died to live again/raise people from
the dead►. And I am referring to the teaching that God will judge some people and
punish them eternally. 3 Instead of continuing to discuss these elementary truths, we
(inc) (OR, I) will go on to give people mature teaching, if God allows it. 4 I will explain
why it is important to do that. Some people have at one time fully understood the
message about Christ [MET]. They have experienced a relationship with Jesus Christ
that God [EUP/MTY] gave to them. They have received the Holy Spirit the same as
others have. 5 They have experienced that God’s message is good. And by what they
have experienced now, they know how God will work powerfully in the future. If
those people reject the message about Christ, it will not be possible for anyone to
persuade them to turn away from their sinful behavior again! 6 What those believers
who later renounce the message about Christ do is as though [MET] they themselves
are nailing the Son of God to a cross again! They are causing others to publicly despise
Christ. 7 Think about this: It is land on which rain has frequently fallen [PRS] and
on which plants grow [PRS] that is useful for the people who prepare the land that
God has blessed. Similarly, it is those believers who have received many good things
from God and who do good deeds/things that please God, whom God will bless [MET].
8 But what will happen to believers who do deeds/things that do not please God will be
like what happens to land on which only thorns and thistles grow [MET]. Such land
is worthless. It has almost become land that God will curse, and eventually he will
burn its vegetation [MTY].
But God will not overlook all you have done for him.
Hebrews 6:9-12
9 Although I am writing to you like this as a warning, I am certain concerning you
whom I love that you are doing better than that. Specifically, I am sure that you are
doing the things that are appropriate for those whom God has saved. 10 Since God
always acts justly [LIT], he will not overlook all you have done for him. He will also
not overlook [MTY] your showing that you love him by the way you helped your fellow
believers and by the way you still help them. Instead, God will reward you for doing
good deeds. 11 I very much want each of you to diligently continue to fully expect to
receive what God has provided for you, until you finally receive everything that you
have confidently expected to receive. 12 I do not want you to be lazy. Instead, I want youHEBREWS 6:13
1791
HEBREWS 7:6
to imitate those who, because they patiently continued to trust in God, are receiving
what he promised them.
We are confident that God will bless us as he promised; he made an oath to confirm
that he would do that.
Hebrews 6:13-20
13 When God promised to do things for Abraham, he said that he would punish
himself if he did not do that, because there was no one of greater importance to ask
to punish him if he did not do it. 14 He said to Abraham, “I will certainly bless you
(sg), and I will certainly increase the number of your descendants [SYN].” 15 As a result,
after Abraham patiently waited for God to do what he promised, he received what God
promised him. 16 Keep in mind that when people promise something, they ask a more
important person to punish them if they do not do what they promise. Furthermore,
when people ask God to punish them if they do not tell the truth, that causes people
who are disputing to stop disputing. 17 So, when God wanted to demonstrate very
clearly ◄to us/to those people► who would receive what he had promised that he
would not change what he had purposed to do, he solemnly guaranteed that he would
declare himself guilty if he did not do what he promised. 18 He did that to strongly
encourage us as a result of our knowing that God has done two things that cannot
change. Namely, he promised to bless us, and he solemnly declared that he would
declare himself guilty if he did not bless us. We know that God, who did those things,
cannot lie. We have fled to him in order that we might continue confidently to expect
to receive what he promised us. 19 Our confidently expecting [SYN] to receive what he
has promised is like an anchor [MET] that very firmly [DOU] holds us fast. The one we
confidently expect to help us [SYN] is Jesus, who goes into God’s very presence, just like
the Supreme Priests went behind the curtain into the innermost part of the tent in the
barren area [MET]. 20 Jesus went into God’s presence ahead of us (inc) to help us when
he became a Supreme Priest eternally in the way that Melchizedek was a Supreme
Priest.
7
There are ways in which Melchizedek was like God’s Son.
Hebrews 7:1-3
1 Now I will say more about this man Melchizedek. He was the king of Salem city
and was a priest of God, the one who is greater than anyone else. He met Abraham
who was returning home after he and his men had defeated the armies of four kings
[SYN]. Melchizedek asked God to bless Abraham. 2 Then Abraham gave to him one
tenth of all the spoils he took after winning the battle. Melchizedek’s name means
firstly ‘king who rules righteously’, and since Salem means ‘peace’, he was the ‘king
who rules peacefully’. 3 In the Scriptures there is no record of who his father was, nor
is there any record of who his mother was, nor is there any record of who his ancestors
were. There is no record of when he was born, nor is there any record of when he
died. For these reasons, it is as though he continues to be a priest forever, and for this
reason he is like God’s Son.
Melchizedek was greater than Abraham.
Hebrews 7:4-10
4 You can realize how great this man Melchizedek was from the fact that Abraham,
our famous ancestor, gave him ◄a tithe/one tenth► of the spoils from the battle.
5 According to the laws God gave Moses, the descendants of Abraham’s great-
grandson Levi, who were priests, should take tithes from God’s people who were
their relatives, even though those people also were Abraham’s descendants. 6 ButHEBREWS 7:7
1792
HEBREWS 7:21
this man Melchizedek, who was not among the descendants of Levi, took tithes from
Abraham. He also asked God to bless Abraham, the man to whom God promised
many descendants. 7 We know for certain that it is the more important people who
ask God to bless the less important people. And Melchizedek blessed Abraham. So we
conclude that Melchizedek was greater than Abraham. 8 In the case of the priests who
are descendants of Levi, men who some day will die receive tithes. But in the case
of Melchizedek it is as if God testifies that he was still living, since there is no record
in Scriptures about his death. 9 And it was as though Levi himself, and all the priests
descended from him—who received tithes from the people—paid tithes to Melchizedek.
And when Abraham paid tithes, it was as though Levi and all the priests descended
from him acknowledged that the work Melchizedek did as a priest was greater than
the work Levi did, 10 since the sperm from which all those priests were eventually born
was still in Abraham’s body [EUP] when Melchizedek met Abraham.
The former Jewish priests were not adequate, so a new one like Melchizedek had to
come.
Hebrews 7:11-19
11 God gave his laws to his people at the same time he gave regulations about the
priests. So, if what the priests who were descended from Levi did could have provided
a way for God to completely forgive people for disobeying those laws, certainly no
other priest like Melchizedek would have been necessary. [RHQ] Instead, priests who
were descended from Aaron, Levi’s descendant, would have been adequate. 12 But
we know they were not adequate, because a new type of priest like Melchizedek has
come. And since God has appointed a new type of priest, he also had to change the
regulations concerning how priests were appointed {he appointed priests}. 13 Jesus,
the one about whom I am saying these things, is a descendant of someone else, not
a descendant of Levi. None of the men from whom Jesus descended ever served as
priests [MTY]. 14 We know that since it is obvious that it is from the tribe of Judah that
our Lord was descended. Moses never said that any of Judah’s descendants would
become priests. 15 Furthermore, we know that the priests who were descended from
Levi were inadequate, since it is even more obvious that another priest has appeared
who is like Melchizedek. 16 Jesus became a priest, but not because he fulfilled what
God’s law required about being a descendant of Levi. Instead, he has the kind of power
that came from a life that nothing can destroy (OR, enabled him to live again after he
was killed). 17 We know this since God confirmed it in the Scripture passage in which
he said to his Son,
You (sg) are a priest eternally just like Melchizedek was a priest.
18 On the one hand, God canceled what he commanded previously concerning the
priests because it failed in every way to enable anyone to become all that God intended.
19 Remember that no one was able to become all that God intended by obeying the
laws that God gave Moses. On the other hand, God caused that we could confidently
expect better things than we could expect by obeying God’s laws. He did that by his
establishing Christ as priest. Now by means of Christ sacrificing himself for us we can
come near to God.
Jesus lives eternally as a Supreme Priest to plead with God for us.
Hebrews 7:20-25
20 Furthermore, when God appointed Christ, it was when God solemnly declared that
Christ would be a priest [LIT]. When God appointed former priests, it was not by his
solemnly declaring that they would be priests. 21 However, when he appointed Christ
to be a priest, it was by these words that the Psalmist wrote in Scripture:
The Lord has solemnly declared to the Messiah,HEBREWS 7:22
1793
HEBREWS 8:7
—and he will not change his mind—
“You will be a priest forever!”
22 Because of that, Jesus guarantees that the new covenant will be better than the
old one.
23 And formerly, the priests could not keep serving as priests, because they all died
[PRS]. So there were many priests to take the place of the ones who died. 24 But because
Jesus lives eternally, he will continue to be a Supreme Priest forever. 25 So, he can
completely and eternally save those who come to God by trusting in what Jesus has
done for them, since he lives forever to plead with God to help them.
Jesus is the kind of Supreme Priest we need, because he was sinless.
Hebrews 7:26-28
26 Jesus is the kind of Supreme Priest that we need. He was holy; he did no wrong; he
was completely innocent. God has now taken him up to the highest heaven separated
from living among sinners. 27 The other Supreme Priests need to sacrifice animals day
by day as well as year by year. They do this, firstly, to atone for their own sins, and
then to atone for other people who have sinned. But because Jesus never sinned, he
does not need to atone for his own sin. The only thing he needed to do to save people
was to sacrifice himself once! 28 We need a Supreme Priest like him, because in the
laws that God gave Moses [PRS] the ones who would be appointed to be priests would
be men who tended to sin easily. But God solemnly declared [PRS] after he had given
his laws to Moses that he would appoint ◄his Son/the man who is also God► to be a
Supreme Priest. Now ◄his Son/the man who is also God► has forever become all that
God intends him to be.
8
The rituals that were performed by the Jewish high priests were only a model of
what Jesus our high priest does in heaven.
Hebrews 8:1-6
1 The main point of all that I have written is that we have a Supreme Priest like
that. He has sat down to rule [MTY] with God [EUP] at the place of greatest honor in
heaven. 2 He ministers in the Most Holy Place, that is, in the true place of worship in
heaven. That is a place that Moses’ tent represented. The Lord set up the true place
of worship. No human set it up.
3 Every Supreme Priest was appointed {God appointed every Supreme Priest} to
offer to God gifts and sacrifices for people who sinned. So, since Christ became a
Supreme Priest, he also had to offer something. 4 Since there are already Jewish priests
who offer gifts as God’s laws require, if Christ were now living on the earth, he would
not be a Supreme Priest. 5 The Jewish priests perform rituals which are only a model
[DOU] of what Christ would do in heaven [MTY]. What God told Moses when Moses
was about to set up the tent for worshipping him supports the idea that those rituals
were only a model. God said, “Be sure that you (sg) make everything according to the
model that I showed you on Sinai Mountain!” 6 But now as it is, Christ ministers in
a more excellent way than the Jewish priests do. Likewise, the new covenant that he
established between God and people is better than the old one. When the new covenant
was established {God established the new covenant}, he promised us better things than
the laws that God gave Moses did.
The first covenant was not adequate, so God needed a new one.
Hebrews 8:7-13
7 If that first covenant had been perfectly adequate [LIT], God would not have
thought that he needed another covenant/agreement to replace it. But it was notHEBREWS 8:8
1794
HEBREWS 9:7
adequate, so he needed a new one. 8 Because God declared that the Israelites were
guilty of not obeying the first covenant, he wanted a new covenant. This is what ◄a
prophet/Jeremiah► wrote about that:
The Lord says, “Listen! There will soon be a time
when I will make a new covenant with the people [MTY] of Israel and the people
[MTY] of Judah.
9 That covenant will not be like the covenant that I made with their ancestors
when I led them out of Egypt [MET] like a father leads a child by the hand.
They did not continue to obey my covenant,
so I rejected them,” says the Lord.
10 “This is the covenant that I will make with the Israelites [MTY],
after the first covenant has ended [MTY],” says the Lord:
“I will enable them to understand my laws [MTY],
and I will enable them to obey them (OR, truly know them) [MTY] sincerely.
I will be their God, and they will be my people [DOU].
11 As a result, no one will need to teach a fellow citizen
or tell his fellow kinsmen, ‘You need to know the Lord,’
because all my people will know me:
My people of every status will know me.
12 I will mercifully forgive them for the wicked things they have done.
I will no longer consider that they are guilty for [DOU] their sins.”
13 Since God spoke about a new covenant, he considered that the first covenant was
no longer in use, and that it would soon disappear, just like anything that gets old will
disappear [MET, DOU].
9
A description of the man-made sanctuary that accompanied the first covenant.
Hebrews 9:1-5
1 To continue: In the first covenant, God regulated how people should perform
rituals, and he told them to make [MTY] a sanctuary. 2 That sanctuary was a tent
that the Israelites set up. In its outer room there was the lampstand and the table on
which they put the bread that the priests presented to God. That room was called ‘the
holy place’. 3 Behind the curtain inside the holy place there was another room. That
was called ‘the very holy place’. 4 It had an altar, made from gold, for burning incense.
It also had the chest which they called the chest of the covenant. All its sides were
covered with gold. In it was the golden pot which contained pieces of the food they
called manna. That was the food with which God miraculously fed the people before
they entered the promised land. In the chest there was also Aaron’s walking stick
that budded to prove that he was God’s true priest. In the chest were also the stone
tablets on which God had written the Ten Commandments. 5 On top of the chest were
figures of winged creatures that symbolized God’s glory. Their wings overshadowed
the chest’s lid where the high priest sprinkled the blood ◄to atone for/to forgive► those
who had sinned. I do not need to write about these things in detail now.
Offerings that were made under the first covenant were not able to remove a sense
of guilt for sin.
Hebrews 9:6-10
6 After all those things were prepared {After they had prepared all those things
like that} in the two rooms of the tent, the Jewish priests habitually went into the
outer room of the tent to perform their rituals. 7 But into the inner room, only the
Supreme Priest went, once a year. He always took [LIT] the blood of animals that theyHEBREWS 9:8
1795
HEBREWS 9:19
had slaughtered. He offered them to God for his own sins and for the sins that other
people had committed. They included sins that they did not realize were sinful. 8 By
those things the Holy Spirit indicated that just like God did not reveal the way for
ordinary people to enter into the inner room while the outer room still existed [MET],
similarly he did not reveal the way for ordinary people to enter the presence of God
while the Jewish system of offering sacrifices was in effect. 9 The things that the priests
did inside the outer room [MTY] symbolized what was true during the time when the
first covenant was in effect. According to the first covenant (OR, In that outer room),
priests offered gifts and other sacrifices to God. But by offering them, the people who
brought them were unable to make themselves feel that they were no longer guilty
for having sinned. 10 They brought those gifts and made those sacrifices according to
regulations concerning things to eat and drink, and according to rules that required
people to wash various things. God declared that those regulations about our bodies
were to be in effect until he put into effect the new covenant; that was a better system.
Christ redeemed us by offering his own blood as a sacrifice.
Hebrews 9:11-14
11 But when Christ came as our Supreme Priest, he brought the good things that are
now available. When he appeared, he went into God’s presence in heaven. That is like
a [MET] very great and perfect tent not made by humans {which no human made}
[SYN]; that is, it is not part of the world God created. It was better than the tent Moses
set up here on earth. 12 When a Supreme Priest goes into the inner room in the tent each
year, he takes goats’ blood and calves’ blood to offer as a sacrifice. But Christ did not
do that. It was as though he went into that very holy place only once, taking his own
blood with him. By doing that, he eternally redeemed us. 13 The priests sprinkle on
people goats’ blood and bulls’ blood and the water that has been filtered through the
ashes of a red heifer that has been completely burned. By performing that ritual, they
can ritually cleanse the bodies of those who are ceremonially unclean. Furthermore,
performing those rituals enabled people to have fellowship with God again. 14 So,
because we know what Christ accomplished when his blood flowed when he died for
us [PRS, MTY], we will be very certain that we are not guilty of having done those
things that those who are spiritually dead do. As a result, we can serve God, who is
all-powerful. The priests always offer to God animals with no defects. Similarly, when
Christ offered himself as a sacrifice to God, he was sinless [MET]. He did that as a
result of God’s eternal Spirit helping him.
Christ has put the new covenant into effect with his own blood.
Hebrews 9:15-22
15 By dying for us, Christ ◄redeemed/set free from the penalty for their sins► even
those who disobeyed the conditions of (OR, during the time of) the first covenant.
So, because no one could be made perfect by obeying the old covenant, now Christ
establishes between God and people a new covenant. He does that in order that those
whom God has chosen may eternally have the blessings that God has promised them.
16 A covenant is like a will. In the case of a will, in order to put its provisions into effect,
someone must prove that the one who made it has died. 17 A will goes into effect only
when the one who makes the will has died. It is not in effect when the one who made
it is still alive. 18 And so God put the first covenant into effect only [LIT] by means of
animals’ blood that was shed when they were slaughtered. 19 After Moses had declared
to all the Israelites everything that God commanded in the laws that God gave him,
he took calves’ and goats’ blood mixed with water. He dipped into it scarlet wool that
he tied around a sprig of hyssop. Then he sprinkled with some of the blood the scroll
itself containing God’s laws. Then he sprinkled more of that blood on all the people,HEBREWS 9:20
1796
HEBREWS 10:7
20 saying to them, “This is the blood which brings into effect the covenant that God
commanded that you obey.” 21 Likewise, he sprinkled with that blood the tent and
every object that they used in performing rituals. 22 It was by sprinkling blood that
they ritually cleansed almost everything. That was what was stated in God’s laws. If
blood is not shed when people offer a sacrifice, God cannot forgive the person who is
making the sacrifice.
The Jewish priests kept offering the blood of animal sacrifices every year, but Christ
sacrificed himself once to take away our guilt.
Hebrews 9:23-28
23 So, by rituals like that, it was necessary for the priests to cleanse the things that
symbolized what Christ does [MTY] in heaven. But God has to consecrate the people
who will enter [MTY] heaven by means of better sacrifices than those. 24 Christ did not
enter a sanctuary that humans made. That one only represented the true sanctuary.
Instead, he entered heaven itself, in order to now be in God’s presence to plead with
God for us. 25 The Jewish Supreme Priest enters the very holy place once every year,
taking blood that is not his own, to offer it as a sacrifice. But when Christ entered
heaven, it was not in order to offer himself repeatedly like that. 26 If that were so, he
would have needed to suffer and shed his blood repeatedly since the time when God
created the world. But instead, in this final age, Christ has appeared once in order
that by sacrificing himself he could cause that people no longer will be punished for
their sins. 27 All people must die once, and after that God will judge them for their
sins. 28 Likewise, when Christ died, God offered him once to be a sacrifice, to punish
him instead of the many people who had sinned. He will come to earth a second
time, not in order to sacrifice himself again for those who have sinned, but in order to
complete his saving those who expectantly wait for him.
10
The blood of animals can never take away the guilt for sins.
Hebrews 10:1-4
1 Just like a shadow vaguely represents the thing that it is a shadow of, the laws that
God gave Moses only poorly represent [MET] the good things that were to come later.
Those laws were not all the good things themselves that God has promised. So, by
offering the same kinds of sacrifices every year, people [PRS] who approach God can
never become ◄perfect/all that God intends them to be►. 2 If God had removed the
guilt for having sinned of those who brought the sacrifices, they would not feel that
they were still guilty. So they would certainly have stopped offering those sacrifices!
[RHQ] 3 But rather, the fact that they offer those sacrifices each year reminds them
that they are still guilty for their sins. 4 The principle is that blood of animals such as
bulls or goats can never remove the guilt of those who have sinned.
Christ set us apart for God by offering his own body once as a sacrifice.
Hebrews 10:5-10
5 So, as Christ was coming into the world, he spoke to his Father about offering
himself as a sacrifice for people’s sin. The Psalmist wrote this that Christ said:
It is not sacrifices and offerings that you (sg) have wanted,
but you have prepared for me a body to serve you.
6 Animals that are completely burned up as sacrifices have not pleased you,
and other sacrifices that atone for those who have sinned have not pleased you.
7 Then because of this, I said, “My God, ◄listen!/here I am!►
I have come here in order to do what you want me to do,HEBREWS 10:8
1797
HEBREWS 10:23
just like has been written {as they have written} about me in the Scriptures.”
8 First, Christ said, “It is not sacrifices and offerings and animals that the priests
have completely burned up and other offerings to atone for those who have sinned
that you have really wanted. They have not pleased you.” Christ said that even though
those things were offered {they offered all those things} according to the laws God
gave Moses! 9 Then, concerning his offering himself as a sacrifice to atone for people’s
sin, he said, “Listen! I have come here to do what you want me to do!” In that way
Christ got rid of the first way of atoning for sin, in order to establish the second way
of atoning for sin. 10 Because of Jesus Christ doing what God wanted him to do, we
have been dedicated to {he has set us apart for} God by his offering his own body
only once as a sacrifice, a sacrifice that will not need to be repeated.
Scripture supports the claim that Christ made one sacrifice that will be adequate
forever.
Hebrews 10:11-18
11 As every Jewish priest stands daily in front of the altar, he performs rituals and
offers the same kind of sacrifices that could never remove the guilt from anyone who
sinned [MTY]. 12 But Christ offered a sacrifice that will be adequate forever, and he
offered it only one time! Then he sat down to rule with God at the place of highest
honor [MTY]. 13 From now on, he is waiting for God to completely subdue all Christ’s
enemies [MTY]. 14 By offering himself once, he has provided that those whom God
has set apart will be eternally made ◄perfect/all that God intends them to be►. 15 The
Holy Spirit also confirms to us that this is true. First the Lord says:
16 When the time [MTY] when the first covenant that God made with my people has
ended,
I will make a new covenant with them [MTY].
I will do like this for them:
I will cause them to understand my laws
and I will cause them to obey them (OR, enable them to know them sincerely).
17 Then the Lord said:
I will forgive them for their [DOU] sins,
and I will consider that they are no longer guilty for having sinned.
18 When God has forgiven someone’s sins, that person does not need to make any
more offerings to atone for his sin!
Let us come to God and let him make us pure and help us to keep believing his truth
and do things that please him.
Hebrews 10:19-25
19 So, my fellow believers, because we trust in what Jesus accomplished when his
own blood flowed for us, we can confidently go into God’s very presence that was
symbolized by the very holy place in the tent [MTY]. 20 Jesus enabled us to go into
God’s presence by making a new and effective way. Specifically, he offered his body
as a sacrifice for us in order that nothing would stop us from entering God’s presence,
just like [MET] the curtain of the very holy place prevented people from entering God’s
presence. 21 Christ is a great priest who rules over us, who are God’s people [MTY].
22 Just like the priests were sprinkled {as Moses sprinkled the priests} with blood [MET]
to symbolize that they were no longer guilty for having sinned, we also no longer are
guilty for having done evil. Just like the priests ceremonially washed their bodies with
pure water to prepare themselves to serve God, we are allowing God to continually
make us pure. So, we (inc) must approach God sincerely by confidently trusting in
him. 23 We must unwaveringly keep holding tight to what we believe. Since God
faithfully does all he promised to do, we must confidently expect him to keep doingHEBREWS 10:24
1798
HEBREWS 10:39
that. 24 Since God faithfully does all that he promised to do, let us consider how each
of us can motivate other believers, in order that believers will love each other, and in
order that each one will do good things. 25 We must not stop assembling ourselves to
worship the Lord, as some people have done. Instead, each one of us must encourage/
exhort other believers. Let us do that even more since we know that the day that the
Lord will return [MTY] is near.
us.
If we have known and then rejected the message about Christ, God will surely punish
Hebrews 10:26-31
26 We(inc) must do those things, because if we deliberately and habitually sin after
we have known the true message about Christ, no other sacrifice will remove our
guilt for having sinned in that way. 27 Instead, we must fearfully expect that God
will judge and angrily punish his enemies in a furious fire [MET]. 28 Everyone who
rejected the laws that God gave Moses was mercilessly killed when at least two or
three people testified that they had done that. 29 That was severe punishment. But
Christ is ◄God’s Son/the man who is also God►. His blood, by means of which he put
into effect the new covenant, is sacred. Because of Christ’s [MTY] blood flowing for us
when he died, God freed us from our guilt. So, you can be sure [RHQ] that anyone who
shows contempt for those truths and who insults the Spirit of God, the one who acts
with kindness toward us in a way we do not deserve, deserves to be punished even
worse than those Israelis were punished [MET]! 30 We can be sure of that (OR, need to
think about that carefully) since we know that God said, “I myself will get revenge on
those who sinned, and I will punish them as they deserve [DOU].” Moses wrote, “The
Lord will judge his people.” 31 It will be a terrible thing if God who is all-powerful
[MTY] seizes and punishes you [IDM]!
Remember how you accepted persecution because of your faith in Christ, and do not
be discouraged if you are persecuted now.
Hebrews 10:32-39
32 Recall previous times when you first understood [MET] the message about Christ.
You endured a hard struggle, but you continued to trust him when you suffered
because you believed in Christ. 33 At times you were publicly insulted {people publicly
insulted you} and you suffered {people persecuted you}. But you showed great
concern for those who were treated like that. 34 You not only were kind to those
who were in prison because they believed in Christ, but you also accepted it joyfully
when unbelievers took away your possessions. You accepted it because you yourselves
knew very well that you have eternal possessions in heaven that are much better than
those that they took from you! 35 So, do not become discouraged when they cause you
to suffer {you are persecuted}, because if you continue to trust in God, he will greatly
reward you. 36 You must patiently continue to trust in him in order that, because of
your doing what God wants you to do, he will give you what he has promised. 37 You
must do that since a prophet wrote in the Scriptures that God said about the Messiah,
In just a short time the one I promised would come will surely come;
he will not delay coming.
38 But those whom I have summoned, who act righteously, must continually live
trusting in me,
because if they, in a cowardly manner, cease to trust in me, I
◄will not be pleased/will be angry► with them.
39 But we are not ones who in a cowardly manner stop trusting in God, with the
result that God will severely punish us. Instead, we are ones who trust in him, with
the result that God will save us [SYN] eternally.HEBREWS 11:1
1799
HEBREWS 11:13
11
Because of our faith, we confidently expect to receive God’s promises.
Hebrews 11:1-3
1 It is because people trust God that they are sure that they will receive the things
that they confidently expect God to give them. They are also certain that they will see
those things, though no one sees them yet. 2 It was because our ancestors trusted in
God that they pleased him. 3 It is because we trust in God that we understand that
he formed the universe by commanding it to exist. The result is that the things that
we see were not made from things that already existed.
Because of his faith, Abel offered a better sacrifice than his brother Cain did.
Hebrews 11:4
4 It was because Adam’s son Abel trusted God that he sacrificed something better
to God than what his older brother Cain offered to God. Because Abel did that, when
God spoke well about what Abel sacrificed, God declared that Abel was righteous.
And although Abel is dead, we still learn from him about trusting God.
Because of their faith, God blessed Enoch, Noah, and Abraham.
Hebrews 11:5-12
5 It was because Enoch believed God that God took him up to heaven. The result was
that he did not die. No one found him, because he was taken up {God had removed
him} from the earth to heaven. Before God took him away, he testified that Enoch
pleased him well. 6 It is possible for people to please God only if they trust God,
because anyone who wants to come to God must first believe that God exists and that
he rewards those who seek to know him.
7 It was because Noah trusted God that after he was warned by God {after God
warned him} about a flood that had not yet happened, Noah showed that he revered
God by building a huge ship to save his family. By doing that, he showed all the people
who did not believe him [MTY] that they deserved to be condemned {that God would
condemn them}. He was someone whom God declared to be righteous because of his
trusting in God.
8 It was because Abraham trusted God that when he was told to go {when God told
him to go}, he obeyed God, he left his own country, and went to a place that God
would give him. Abraham left his own country, even though he did not know where
he would be going. 9 It was because Abraham trusted God that he lived as though he
was a foreigner in the land that God had promised to him. Abraham lived in tents,
and his son Isaac and his grandson Jacob did also. God promised to give to Isaac and
Jacob the same things that he promised to give Abraham. 10 Abraham was waiting to
live in a city in heaven that would exist forever [MET]. It was a city that God is building
[DOU]. 11 It was because Abraham trusted God that God gave Abraham strength so
that he was able to produce a son. Even though his wife Sarah was past the age
when women bear children, God promised that he would give her a son, and Abraham
considered that God would do what he promised to do. 12 So, although Abraham was
also too old to have children, so many people descended from that one man that they
were as numerous as the stars in the sky and are as countless as the grains of sand
along the seashore, just like God promised him.
All those people who trusted in God died without receiving what God promised.
Hebrews 11:13-16
13 It was while they still trusted in God that all those people died. Even though
they had not yet received the things that God had promised to give them, it was as
though they saw those things in a distance. They were glad to know about what GodHEBREWS 11:14
1800
HEBREWS 11:29
promised. It was as though they admitted that they were not from this earth, but
that they were only here temporarily. 14 As for those people who talk like that, they
clearly show that they long for a place that will become their true native land. 15 If
they had been thinking about that place being the place from which they had come,
they would have taken the opportunity to return there. 16 But, instead, they desired
a better place in which to live; that is, they desired a home in heaven. So God has
prepared a city for them to live with him, and he is pleased [LIT] for them to say that
he is their God.
It was because Abraham, Isaac, Joseph, Moses, the Israelite people, and Rahab
trusted God that he blessed them.
Hebrews 11:17-31
17 It was because Abraham trusted God that he was ready to kill his son Isaac as a
sacrifice when God tested him. This same man to whom God promised to give ◄a son/
many descendants► was going to sacrifice that same son, the only son whom his own
wife had borne! 18 It was to Abraham that God said, “It is only from Isaac that I will
consider your family to descend.” 19 Abraham considered that to fulfill that promise,
God could make Isaac live again even if he had died after Abraham sacrificed him!
The result was that when Abraham did receive Isaac back after God told him not to
harm Isaac, it was as though he received him back even after he died.
20 It was because Isaac trusted God that he prayed that after he died, God would
bless his sons Jacob and Esau.
21 It was because Jacob trusted God that, as he was dying, he prayed that God would
bless each of the sons of his own son Joseph. He worshipped God as he leaned upon
his walking stick before he died. 22 It was because Joseph trusted God that, when
he was about to die in Egypt, he anticipated the time when the Israelis would leave
Egypt; and he instructed that his people should carry his bones with them when they
◄left Egypt/returned to Canaan►.
23 It was because Moses’ father and mother trusted God that they hid their son for
three months shortly after he was born, because they saw that he was so beautiful.
They were not afraid of disobeying what the king of Egypt had commanded, namely,
that all the Jewish male babies must be killed. 24 The daughter of the king, whom
they called Pharaoh, raised Moses, but when he had grown up, it was because he
trusted God that he refused to accept the privileges that would have been his if people
considered that he was ◄the son of the king’s daughter/the king’s own grandson►.
25 He decided that it was better for others to mistreat him for a time along with the
Israeli people, than to temporarily enjoy living sinfully in the King’s palace. 26 This is
because he decided that if he suffered for the Messiah, it would be worth far more
in God’s sight than his owning all the treasures of Egypt that he would receive as
Pharaoh’s heir. He decided that because he looked forward to the time when God
would give him an eternal reward. 27 It was because he trusted God that he left Egypt.
He was not afraid that the king would be angry because of his doing that. He ◄kept
going/did not turn back► because it was as though he kept seeing God, whom no one
can see. 28 It was because Moses believed that God would save his own people that
he instituted the festival called Passover. He did that by commanding that the people
should kill lambs and sprinkle their blood on their doorposts. They did that in order
that the angel who causes people to die would not kill [EUP] the oldest male Israelites
when he killed the oldest sons in each Egyptian family.
29 It was because they trusted God that when the Israelite people walked through
where the Red Sea had been, it was as though they walked on dry land! But, when theHEBREWS 11:30
1801
HEBREWS 11:40
army of Egypt also attempted to cross that same water, they drowned, because the
sea came back and flooded them!
30 It was because the Israeli people trusted God that the walls around Jericho city
collapsed, after the Israelis marched around the walls for seven days.
31 Rahab had been a prostitute, but because she trusted God, she did not perish
with those inside Jericho who disobeyed God. Joshua sent some spies into the city in
order to find ways to destroy it, but God saved her because she welcomed those spies
peaceably.
Some who trusted God gained great victories and others were tortured and killed.
Hebrews 11:32-38
32 I do not know what more I should say [RHQ] about others who trusted in God.
It would take too much time to tell about Gideon, Barak, Samson, Jephthah, David,
Samuel, and the other prophets. 33 It was because they trusted God that some of them
did great things for him. Some conquered lands ruled by powerful men. Some ruled
Israel and justly punished those men and nations who rebelled against God. Some
obtained from God the things that he promised to give them [MTY]. 34 Some forced
lions to keep their mouths shut. Some escaped from being destroyed by fire. Some
of those people escaped from being killed with a sword [MTY]. Some of those people
who trusted God were made strong {became mighty} again after they had once been
weak. Some became powerful when they fought wars. Some caused armies that
came from foreign lands to run away from them. 35 Some women who trusted God
received their relatives back again when God ◄made them live again after they had
died/raised them from the dead►. But others who trusted God were tortured until they
died. They were tortured because they refused to agree when their captors said, “We
will release you if you deny that you believe in God.” They refused to do that, because
they wanted to live with God forever, which is better than continuing to live on earth
after having almost died. 36 Other people who trusted God were mocked; some had
their backs cut open by being struck with leaded whips. Some were chained and put in
prison. 37 Some of those believers were stoned to death {People killed some of those
believers by throwing stones at them}. Others were cut completely in two. Others
were killed with swords. Others of these people who trusted God wandered around
the land wearing garments made only of skins from sheep and goats. They did not have
any money. They were continually oppressed and tormented {People continuously
oppressed them and tormented them}. 38 The people on earth who caused those who
trusted in God to suffer were so bad that they did not deserve to live with people who
trusted God. Some who trusted God wandered in deserts and on mountains. Some
lived in caves and in other large holes in the ground.
Only when we are together with all these people who trusted God will we receive all
God has promised.
Hebrews 11:39-40
39 Although all these people were commended by God {God commended all these
people} because they trusted him, God did not give them all that he promised them
while they were alive. 40 God knew ahead of time that what he would give us and
them later would be better than giving them immediately what he promised. What
God intends is that only when they and we are together will we have all that God
intends us to have.HEBREWS 12:1
1802
HEBREWS 12:11
12
Since we know so many people with faith like that, we must put aside anything,
especially sin, which hinders us, and we must strive to achieve God’s will and
concentrate on Jesus.
Hebrews 12:1-2
1 We know about many people like that who showed they trusted in God. They are
like a crowd of spectators who are cheering for us inside a stadium [MET]. Knowing
that, we must put away all the things that hinder us, as a runner puts aside everything
that would hinder him because they are heavy [MET]. Especially we must put away
sinful actions that hinder us, as a runner sets aside clothes he does not need, clothes
that would entangle him [MET]. Let us wholeheartedly strive to achieve what God has
planned for us, as someone in a race wholeheartedly runs the course that is before
him [MET]. 2 And let us keep our minds on Jesus, as a runner keeps his eyes on the goal
[MET]. Jesus is the one we should imitate in the way he perfectly trusted God. When
he died on the cross he endured it as he suffered greatly [MTY], instead of thinking
about the things he would rejoice about later. He disregarded being disgraced by dying
that way. He is now sitting at the place of highest honor [MTY] at the throne where
God rules.
Do not become discouraged when you are suffering as you struggle against evil.
Hebrews 12:3-6
3 Jesus patiently endured it when sinful people acted so hostilely against him. Try
to act the way he did, so that you do not give up trusting God or become discouraged.
4 While you have struggled against being tempted to sin, you have not yet bled and
died because of resisting evil, as Jesus did. 5 Do not forget [RHQ] these words that
Solomon spoke to his son, that are the same as God would exhort you as his children:
My child, pay attention [LIT] when the Lord is disciplining you,
and do not be discouraged when the Lord punishes you [DOU],
6 because it is everyone whom he loves whom the Lord disciplines,
and he punishes everyone whom he accepts as his child.
Since our sufferings are to discipline us, if we have not experienced God’s discipline
we are not his true children. We should accept God’s discipline, because it is always to
help us.
Hebrews 12:7-11
7 It is in order that God may discipline you that he requires you to endure the
disagreeable things that happen to you. When God disciplines you he is treating you
as a father treats his children. All fathers [RHQ] discipline their children [LIT]. 8 So,
if you have not experienced God disciplining you just like he disciplines all his other
children, you are not true children of God [MET]. You are like illegitimate children;
no father disciplines them. 9 Furthermore, our natural fathers disciplined us when
we were young, and we respected them for doing that. So we should certainly more
readily accept God our spiritual Father disciplining us, with the result that we live
eternally [RHQ]! 10 Our natural fathers disciplined us for a short time in a way that
they considered right, but it wasn’t always right, but God always disciplines us in
a right way, to help us. He does it so that we may be holy as he is. 11 During the
time that God is disciplining us, that does not seem to be something about which we
should rejoice. Instead, it is something that pains us. But later it causes those who
have learned from it to be peaceful and to live righteously.HEBREWS 12:12
1803
HEBREWS 12:26
Renew yourselves spiritually; go forward in your Christian life; try to live peacefully
with everyone; seek to be holy; guard against bitterness; do not be immoral; and do not
refuse to listen to God.
Hebrews 12:12-17
12 So, instead of acting as though you were spiritually exhausted, renew yourselves
[MET] spiritually. 13 Go straight forward in your Christian life [MET], in order that
believers who are uncertain about their faith will imitate you and not ◄leave God’s
way/become useless to God► [MET]. Instead, they will be spiritually restored [MET]
as an injured and useless limb is restored. 14 Try to live peacefully with all people.
Seek to be holy, since no one will see the Lord if he is not holy. 15 Beware that none
of you stops trusting in God, who has done kind things for us that we did not deserve
(OR, Beware that you have never experienced God kindly saving you). Be on guard
lest any of you act in an evil way towards others, because your doing that will grow
like [MET] a root grows into a big plant, and the result of your doing that will be that
many believers will sin and become unacceptable to God. 16 Do not let anyone be
immoral, or be irreligious as Esau was. He exchanged the rights he had as a firstborn
son for only one meal. 17 You know that after he did that, he wanted to receive what
his father would promise to give him if he blessed him. But his father was unable to
change what he had already done. And Esau found no way to change things, even
though he sought tearfully to do that.
You have not experienced the terrifying things your ancestors did; you have come to
Christ and benefited from his blood flowing for you.
Hebrews 12:18-24
18 In coming to God you have not experienced things like what the Israeli people
experienced at Sinai Mountain. They approached a mountain that God told them they
should not touch. They approached a blazing fire, and it was gloomy and dark [DOU],
and there was a hurricane/cyclone. 19 They heard a trumpet sounding and they heard
God speak. The result was that those who heard it pleaded for God not to speak to
them like that again. 20 When God commanded them saying, “If a person or even an
animal touches this mountain, you must kill him/it by throwing stones at him/it,” they
were terrified. 21 Truly, because Moses was terrified after seeing what happened on
the mountain, he said, “I am trembling because I am very afraid!” 22 Instead, it is
as though you have come to the presence of God in heaven [MET]. That is like what
your ancestors did when they came to worship God on Zion Hill, in Jerusalem, in the
city of God who is all-powerful. You have come (OR, you are coming) to where there
are countless angels, who are rejoicing as they have gathered together. 23 You have
joined all the believers who have privileges like firstborn sons, whose names God has
written down in heaven. You have come to God, who will judge everyone. You have
come to where the spirits of God’s people are, people who lived righteously before
they died, and who now have been made perfect in heaven. 24 You have come to
Jesus, who arranged a new covenant between us and God. You have accepted what he
accomplished when his blood flowed when he died on the cross. His doing that made it
possible for God to forgive us. That is better than the blood of Abel, who just wanted
revenge because his brother Cain murdered him.
We should be in awe before God, who will punish us if we reject him.
Hebrews 12:25-29
25 Beware that you do not refuse to listen to God who is speaking to you. The Israeli
people did not escape God punishing them when Moses (OR, God) warned them here
on earth. So we shall surely not escape God punishing us if we reject him when he
warns us from heaven! [RHQ] 26 The earth shook [PRS] then when he spoke [MTY]HEBREWS 12:27
1804
HEBREWS 13:11
at Sinai Mountain. But now he has promised, “I will shake the earth again, one more
time, but I will shake heaven too.” 27 The words “again, one more time” indicate that
things on earth will be shaken {that he will shake things on earth}, meaning that he
will set aside all that he has created, in order that the things in heaven that cannot be
shaken {that nothing can shake} may remain forever. 28 So, let us thank God that we
are becoming members of a kingdom that nothing can shake. Let us worship/serve
God in a way that pleases him by being greatly in awe [DOU] before him. 29 Remember
that the God we worship/serve is like a fire that burns up everything that is impure
[MET]!
13
Love one another, be hospitable, and help imprisoned and other mistreated believers.
Hebrews 13:1-3
1 Continue to love your fellow believers.
2 Do not forget to be hospitable to
needy travelers [LIT]. You need to know that by being hospitable, some people have
entertained angels without knowing it. 3 Remember to help those who are in prison
because they are Christians, as though you were in prison with them. Remember those
who are being mistreated {whom people are mistreating} because they are believers.
As you do that, consider that you you could suffer as they do.
Respect the marriage relationship, and avoid covetousness.
Hebrews 13:4-6
4 You must ◄respect/keep sacred► the marriage relationship in every way, and you
must keep sexual relations [EUP] pure, because God will surely condemn those who
act immorally and those who act adulterously. 5 Live without constantly coveting
money, and be content with the things you possess, remembering what Moses wrote
that God has said about supplying what you need,
I will never leave you,
I will never stop providing for you [DOU].
6 So we can say confidently as the Psalmist said,
Since the Lord is the one who helps me, I will not be afraid! People can do nothing
to me that will deprive me of God’s blessings [RHQ].
Remember how your former spiritual leaders lived and imitate their faith; since
Christ never changes, do not be diverted to strange teachings.
Hebrews 13:7-9
7 Your spiritual leaders used to tell you the message from God before they died.
Remember how they conducted their lives. By considering ◄how they died/what
resulted from how they lived►, imitate how they believed in Christ/God. 8 Jesus Christ
is the same now as he was previously, and he will be the same forever. 9 So, do not let
yourselves be diverted {let anything divert you} so that you believe various teachings
that are contrary to God’s truth. It is good that God acts kindly toward us so that we
may be strengthened spiritually. Obeying rules about various foods, rules that have
not benefited those who obeyed them, will not benefit us.
We must stop practicing Jewish sacrifices and rituals, and go to Jesus to be saved,
since we do not have a city like Jerusalem where we must offer sacrifices, but instead
we wait for a future everlasting heavenly city.
Hebrews 13:10-14
10 We have Jesus [MTY]. All those who continue to observe the Jewish rituals [MTY]
of sacrifice have no right to obtain the benefits of his sacrifice [MET]. 11 After the high
priest brings into the most holy place the blood of animals that they have sacrificed toHEBREWS 13:12
1805
HEBREWS 13:22
atone for sins, the bodies of those animals are burned {they burn the bodies of those
animals} outside the camp. 12 Similarly, Jesus suffered and died outside the gate of
Jerusalem in order that he might make us, his people, holy by offering his own blood
as a sacrifice to atone for our sins.
13 So, we must abandon performing Jewish sacrifices and rituals [MET] in order to
be saved, and let us go to Jesus to be saved. As we do that, we must be willing to let
others reproach us just like people reproached Jesus. 14 Here on earth, we believers
do not have a city such as Jerusalem where we must continually offer sacrifices [MET].
Instead, we are waiting for a future heavenly city that will last forever.
Since Christ sacrificed himself for us, let our continual praise of God be our sacrifice.
Hebrews 13:15
15 With the help of Jesus, we must continually praise God. That will be something
we can sacrifice to him [MET] instead of our sacrificing animals only at specific times.
Specifically, we must say openly [MTY] that we have trusted in Christ [MTY].
Continually do good deeds and share with others, because this too will be a sacrifice
pleasing to God.
Hebrews 13:16
16 Be continually [LIT] doing good deeds for others, and be continually sharing with
others the things you have, because doing things like that will also be as though you
are offering sacrifices that will please God.
Obey your spiritual leaders.
Hebrews 13:17
17 Obey your spiritual leaders; do what they tell you, since they are the ones who
are looking out for your spiritual welfare [SYN]. Some day they will have to stand
before God so that he can say if he approves of what they have done. Obey them in
order that they can do the work of guarding you joyfully, and not have to do it sadly,
because if you cause them to do it sadly, that will certainly not help you at all (OR,
they will not be able to help you at all).
Pray for me that God will quickly remove the things that hinder my coming to you.
Hebrews 13:18-19
18 Pray for me. I am certain that I have not done anything that displeases God. I
have tried to act honorably toward you in every way. 19 I urge you earnestly to pray
that God will quickly remove the things that hinder my coming to you.
May God equip you with everything good that you need, and may Christ be praised
forever.
Hebrews 13:20-21
20 Jesus provides for us, protects us, and guides us as a great shepherd does for
his sheep [MET]. And God, who gives us inner peace, brought our Lord Jesus back
to life. By doing that, God ratified his eternal covenant with us by the blood that
flowed from Jesus when he died on the cross. 21 So I pray that God will equip you with
everything good that you need in order that you may do the things that he desires.
May he accomplish in our lives whatever he considers pleasing as a result of Jesus
Christ equipping us. May Jesus Christ be praised forever. ◄Amen!/May it be so!►
Patiently consider what I have written in this short exhortation.
Hebrews 13:22
22 My fellow believers, I appeal to you that you patiently consider what I have
written in this short letter, to exhort you.HEBREWS 13:23
1806
HEBREWS 13:25
Since Timothy has been released from prison, he will accompany me when I go to
see you.
Hebrews 13:23
23 I want you to know that our fellow believer Timothy has been released {the
authorities have released our fellow believer Timothy} from prison. If he comes here
soon, he will accompany me when I go to see you.
Greet your spiritual leaders and all other believers; the believers who are from Italy
send you their greetings.
Hebrews 13:24
24 Tell all your spiritual leaders and all the other fellow believers in your city that
◄I am thinking fondly about them/I am sending them my greetings►. The believers
in this area who have come from Italy want you to know they are ◄thinking about
you/sending you their greetings►.
May God act graciously to you all.
Hebrews 13:25
25 I pray that you will continue to experience God’s acting kindly toward you all.JAMES 1:1
1807
JAMES 1:11
This book is a letter that James, the brother of Jesus,
wrote to Jewish believers. We call this book
James
James 1:1
I, James, am writing this letter to Jewish people who trust in the Lord Jesus who are
scattered throughout the world. Greetings!
1 I, James, am a servant of God and the Lord Jesus Christ. I am writing this letter to
all the Jewish people who trust in Christ (OR, to all God’s people) who are scattered
throughout the world. I send my greetings to you all.
When you experience difficulties that test whether or not you will continue to trust
God, rejoice greatly and keep on bravely enduring them in order that you may become
all that God intends you to be.
James 1:2-4
2 My fellow believers, rejoice greatly, even when you experience various kinds of
difficulties/troubles. 3 God sometimes allows you to experience difficulties in order
to test whether or not you will continue to trust him. Whenever that happens, you
need to realize more and more that if you continue to trust him, you will be able to
bravely/patiently endure difficulties. 4 Keep on enduring difficulties bravely/patiently
by trusting God more and more firmly [PRS], in order that you may become all that
he intends you to be [DOU] (OR, spiritually mature and complete), not lacking ◄any
good quality/anything you need to conduct your lives as God wants you to►.
If you want to have wisdom to know what to do when difficulties come, ask God to
help you, and firmly trust him.
James 1:5-8
5 If anyone of you does not know how to act wisely in order to endure difficulties/
trials well, he should ask God to show him what he should do, because God
wholeheartedly/gladly helps all people who ask and does not scold anyone for asking.
Those who ask, God will give them wisdom to know what they should do. 6 But when
you ask God, you should firmly trust him. You should not doubt that he wants to help
you always, because people who keep doubting God are unstable/changeable [SIM]
like a wave of the sea that is blown back and forth by the wind {that goes back and
forth when the wind blows} [DOU, SIM]. 7 Indeed, people who doubt should not think
that the Lord God will do anything that they request him to do, 8 because they are
people who cannot decide whether they will commit themselves to God, and they are
unstable/undecided in everything that they do.
Believers who are poor and those who are rich should both value highly what God
has done for them, rather than focusing on their material resources that will disappear.
James 1:9-11
9 Believers who are poor should be happy that God considers them very valuable
(OR, has exalted them spiritually) [MTY]. 10 And believers who are rich should be
happy that they have humbled themselves in order to trust in Jesus Christ (OR, but
rich people can only take pride in the fact that God will humble them when he judges
everyone [IRO]), because they and their riches [MTY] will pass away, just like wild
flowers wither [SIM]. 11 When the sun rises, the scorching hot wind dries plants, andJAMES 1:12
1808
JAMES 1:24
their flowers fall and are no longer beautiful. Similarly, rich people will die [MET]
while they are busy working, leaving behind their riches.
God blesses those who bravely endure difficulties; he will reward them by causing
them to live eternally.
James 1:12
12 God is pleased with people who bravely/patiently endure difficulties. And when,
by bravely enduring difficulties, they have proved that they truly trust him, he will give
them eternal life. That is the reward [MET] that he has promised to give to those who
love him.
If people are tempted to do something evil, they should not think that it is God who
is tempting them. It is their own evil desires that are tempting them to do evil.
James 1:13-15
13 If people are tempted to do something that is evil, they should not think that it is
God who is tempting them, because God is totally/completely good. He never tempts
anyone to do what is evil, nor can he ever be tempted to do anything evil. 14 But people
strongly desire to do evil [PRS] things, and as a result they are tempted by those desires
{those desires stimulate them} to do something evil [PRS, DOU]. 15 Then, because they
have desired [MET] to do evil [PRS] things, they begin to [MET] do [PRS] them. And
when they have become ones who habitually do what is evil [MET], if they do not turn
away from their sinful behavior, they will be separated from God forever.
Stop thinking wrongly that God tempts you to do evil things, because God does only
good things for us.
James 1:16-18
16 My fellow believers whom I love, stop deceiving yourselves, thinking that God
does evil things. 17 The truth is that God, our heavenly Father [MTY], does only good
[DOU] things for us, in order to help us become all that he intends us to be. He is not
like all the things in the sky that he created to give light, because they change; that is,
they do not shine the same all the time. But God never changes. He is always good.
18 And because he wanted to help us, he gave us spiritual life as a result of our trusting
in his true message. So now we have become the first ones of all the people [MET]
that he created to ◄be totally dedicated to/completely belong to► him.
Every one of you should eagerly pay attention to God’s message and should not
speak hastily or get angry easily.
James 1:19-20
19 My fellow believers whom I love, you know (OR, I want you to now) that every
one of you should be eager to pay attention to God’s true message. Don’t speak without
thinking, nor get angry easily, 20 because when any one of you gets angry, you will not
be doing the righteous things that God wants you to do.
So stop doing all kinds of evil things, and do what God commands in his message,
instead of just listening to it. God approves of those who do what he wants them to do.
James 1:21-25
21 So stop doing all kinds of evil [DOU] things, and humbly obey (OR, submit to)
the message that God put in your ◄inner beings/hearts►, because he is able to save
you [SYN] if you accept his message. 22 Do what God commands in his message. Do
not only listen to it, because people who only listen to it and do not obey it are wrong
when they think that God will save them. 23 Some people hear God’s message but do
not do what it says [MET]. They are like someone who looks at his face in a mirror
[SIM]. 24 Although he looks at himself, he goes away from the mirror and immediatelyJAMES 1:25
1809
JAMES 2:11
forgets what he looks like. 25 But other people look closely at God’s message, which is
perfect and which sets people free to voluntarily do what God wants them to do. And
if they continue to examine God’s message and do not just hear it and then forget it,
but do what God tells them to do, God will bless them because of what they do.
Those who show compassion on people in need and who do not think or act
immorally are those who truly worship God and receive his approval.
James 1:26-27
26 Some people think that they worship God in the right way, but they habitually say
evil things [MTY]. Those people are wrong in thinking [SYN] that they worship God
rightly. The fact is that they worship God ◄in vain/uselessly►. 27 One of the things
that God has told us to do is to take care of orphans and widows who suffer hardship.
Those who do that and who do not think or act immorally like those who do not obey
God [MTY] truly [DOU] worship God, who is our Father, and God approves of them.
2
Stop honoring some people more than others, because by doing that, you are
disobeying God’s law that we should love one another.
James 2:1-11
1 My fellow believers, because you trust our Lord Jesus Christ, the one who is
glorious/wonderful, stop honoring some people more than others. 2 For example,
suppose that a person who wears gold rings and fine clothes enters your meeting
place. Then suppose that a poor person who wears shabby/ragged clothes also comes
in. 3 And suppose that you ◄show special attention to/treat better► the one who is
dressed in fine clothes by saying, “Sit here in this good seat!” and you say to the poor
one, “Stand there or sit on the floor [MTY]!” 4 Then you have obviously [RHQ] caused
divisions in the congregation (OR, you are clearly treating one better than the others,
and you are using evil motives/reasons to ◄evaluate people/decide whether people are
important or not►). 5 Listen to me, my fellow believers whom I love: God has chosen
[RHQ] poor people whom unbelievers consider to possess nothing of value, so that he
might bless them greatly because they trust in him, and in order that they will enter
the place where he will rule [MET] forever. That is what he has promised to those
who love him. 6 But you dishonor the poor people. Think about it! ◄It is rich people,
not poor people, who are causing you to suffer!/Isn’t it rich people, not poor people,
who are oppressing you?► [RHQ] ◄It is the rich people who forcibly take you to court
to accuse you in front of judges!/Is it not the rich people who forcibly take you to court
to accuse you in front of judges?► [RHQ] 7 ◄And they are the ones who say evil things
about Jesus Christ, the one who is worthy of praise, to whom you belong!/Are they
not the ones who say evil things about Jesus Christ, the one who is worthy of praise,
to whom you belong?► [RHQ] 8 In the Scriptures God has commanded each of you to
love other people like you love yourself. That commandment was also given by Jesus
our King [MTY]. If you are loving others, you are doing what is right. 9 But if you
honor some people more than others, you are ◄doing wrong/sinning►. And because
you do not do what God commanded us to do, he condemns you [PRS] because you
disobey his laws.
10 Do not forget that those who disobey only one of God’s laws, even if they obey
all his other laws, God considers them to be as guilty as anyone who has disobeyed all
of God’s laws. 11 For example, God said, “Do not commit adultery,” but he also said,
“Do not murder anyone.” So if you (sg) do not commit adultery but you (sg) murder
someone, you (sg) have become a person who disobeys God’s laws.JAMES 2:12
1810
JAMES 2:24
Continually act mercifully toward others, because God will not act mercifully to those
who do not act mercifully toward others.
James 2:12-13
12 Continually speak and act toward others as people should who will be judged
{whom God will judge} by the law that frees us from being punished {God punishing
us} for our sins. 13 Speak and act like that, because when God judges us, he will not
act mercifully toward those who do not act mercifully toward others. But when we
are merciful to others, we can rejoice, because our being merciful shows that we are
acting like people whom God has mercifully saved from being judged (OR, we can
rejoice because God will judge us mercifully).
Anyone who says that he trusts in Jesus Christ but does not act compassionately
toward others is not truly trusting in Jesus.
James 2:14-17
14 My fellow believers, there are some people who say, “I believe in the Lord Jesus
Christ,” but they do not do good things for other people. ◄Their saying that will
certainly not do them any good!/What good will their saying that do for them?►
[RHQ] God will certainly not save people like that who say that they believe, but do
not do good things! [RHQ] 15 To illustrate, suppose that fellow believers, either men
or women, don’t have enough clothing or food for each day. 16 And suppose that one
of you says to them, “May God bless you and supply the clothing and food that you
need!” but you (sg) do not give them the things that they need. ◄That would be no
help to them!/What help is that to them?► [RHQ] 17 Similarly, those who do not do
good things to help others, what they have said about their believing in Christ is as
useless [MET] as a dead person is useless. They do not really believe in Christ.
But someone may claim that some people are saved because they trust in God and
other people are saved because they do good things for others. In answer to that, the
inadequacy of faith without good deeds is demonstrated by the example of demons.
From the examples of Abraham and Rahab we can see that only by obeying God and
doing good things for others can people prove that they truly trust in God.
James 2:18-26
18 But someone may say to me, “God saves some people only because they trust in
him, and he saves others because they do good deeds to people.” I would answer that
person, “You(sg) cannot prove to me that people truly trust in God if they do not do
good things for others. But by doing good things for others I will prove to you that I
truly trust in God” 19 Think about it! You believe that there is only one God, and you
are right to believe that. But the demons also believe that, but they tremble with fear
because they know that God is going to punish them. 20 Also, you foolish person, I will
[RHQ] prove to you (sg) that if someone says, “I trust in God,” but he does not do good
things, what that person says will not benefit him. 21 ◄It was certainly because of what
our revered ancestor Abraham did, when he prepared to sacrifice his son Isaac, that he
was considered by God {that God considered him} to be a righteous, obedient person./
Was it not because of what our revered ancestor Abraham did, when he prepared to
sacrifice his son Isaac, that he was considered by God {that God considered him}
to be a righteous, obedient person?► [RHQ] 22 You (sg) can realize that he was not
only trusting in God, but he was also doing what God told him to do, and you(sg) can
realize that he was able to trust in God more completely because of having done what
God told him to do. 23 And so it happened as it is written in the Scriptures: “Because
Abraham truly trusted in God, he was considered by God to be {God considered that
he was} righteous.” And God also said about Abraham, “He is my friend.” 24 From theJAMES 2:25
1811
JAMES 3:12
example of Abraham, you can realize that it is because people do good things that God
considers them to be righteous, and not only because they trust in him. 25 Similarly,
it was certainly [RHQ] because of what Rahab did, that God considered her to be a
righteous, obedient person. Rahab was previously a prostitute, but she cared for the
Israelite men who came to ◄spy out the land/see what that area was like► and she
helped them to escape by sending them home on a different road from the one that
they came on.
26 Remember that when our spirits permanently leave our bodies, our bodies are
dead and useless. Similarly [SIM], if someone says, “I trust in God,” but does not do
things to help others, what that person says about trusting in God is useless.
3
Not many of you should become teachers, because God will judge teachers with
greater severity than he will judge others. You should all strive to speak what is right,
because what you say has a powerful effect on others, and it is often destructive and
hypocritical.
James 3:1-12
1 My fellow believers, not many of you should desire to become teachers of God’s
truth, because you know that God will judge us (exc), who teach others, more severely
than he will judge other people. 2 It is true that we all in many ways do things that are
wrong [MET]. But those who always [LIT] control what they say will be all that God
intends/wants them to be. They will be able to control all their actions [MTY]. 3 To
illustrate, if we put a small metal bit into the mouth of a horse in order to cause the
horse to obey us, we can cause the horse to turn and go where we want it to [MET].
4 Think also about ships. Although a ship may be very large and although it can be
moved by strong winds {strong winds can move it}, by turning a very small ◄rudder/
steering paddle► people can direct the ship wherever they want it to go. 5 Similarly,
although our tongues are very small, if we do not control them, we can harm many
people by what we proudly say [MTY]. Think also about how just a small flame of fire
can cause a large forest (OR, a large area of brushwood) to burn.
6 Just like a fire damages a forest [MET], when we say things that are evil, we
harm many people. What we say [MTY] reveals that we are very evil. What we
say contaminates/defiles everything that we think and do [PRS, MET]. Just like a flame
of fire easily causes the whole surrounding area [MET] to burn, what we say [MTY] can
cause others to want to do evil. It is the devil himself [MTY] who causes us to say evil
things. 7 Indeed, although people are able to tame/control all kinds of wild animals,
birds, reptiles and creatures that live in the water, and people have actually tamed/
controlled them, 8 no person ◄on his own/by himself► is able to control what he says
[MTY]. And when people say evil things, it shows that they are unstable/uncontrolled
and wicked [MTY]. As the poison of a snake kills people [MTY], we harm others [MET]
by what we say. 9 We use our tongue to praise God, who is our Lord and Father, but
we also use our same tongue to ask God to say evil things to people. That is very
wrong! God made people like himself, so we should speak as respectfully to others as
we speak to God. 10 We praise God, but with our same mouth we also ask for evil things
to happen to others. My fellow believers, this should not be! 11 Surely bitter water and
good water do not come out of the same spring! [RHQ] 12 My fellow believers, a fig
tree cannot [RHQ] produce olives. Nor can [RHQ] a grapevine produce figs. Neither
can a salty spring produce good water. Similarly, we should say only good things, and
we should not say evil things [MET].JAMES 3:13
1812
JAMES 4:5
If you are jealous of others and self-seeking, do not boast that you are wise. Instead,
demonstrate that you are truly wise by doing good things and by acting peaceably and
compassionately toward others.
James 3:13-18
13 If any of you thinks [RHQ] that you are wise and know a lot, you should always
act in a good way to show people that your good actions are the result of your being
truly wise. Being wise helps us to act gently toward others. 14 But if you are very
[MET] jealous/unhappy when you see that someone else is succeeding, and always
want to have what you want, regardless of what others want, you should not say that
you are wise, for by boasting like that, you are saying that ◄God’s message/what God
says about you► is not true. 15 Those who have such attitudes are not wise [MTY] in
the way that God wants them to be. Instead, they are only thinking and acting like
◄ungodly people/people who do not please God►. They think and act according to their
own evil desires. They do what the demons want them to do (OR, they think and act
as demons do). 16 Keep in mind that people who have such attitudes ◄are unruly/do
not submit to authority► and do all kinds of evil things. 17 But when people are wise
[PRS] in the way that God [MTY] wants them to be, they are pure in every way, which
God considers to be very important. They also act peaceably towards others, they
◄are considerate of/think about the rights and feelings of► others, they are willing
to yield to the wishes of others, they act compassionately toward others, and they do
all kinds of good things for others [MET]. How they treat others does not depend on
◄others’ status/whether others are important or not►, and they are sincere in all
they do. 18 Those who act peaceably toward others cause others to also act peaceably,
with the result that they all live together acting toward each other in a righteous way
[MET].
4
You are fighting among yourselves because of your evil desires, and you are never
getting what you want because you pray with wrong motives.
James 4:1-3
1 Now I will tell you why you are fighting among yourselves and quarreling with
each other [RHQ]. It is [RHQ] because each of you wants to do evil things [PRS]. You
keep on wanting to do things that are not what God wants you to do. 2 There are
things that you very much desire to have, but you do not get those things, so you want
to kill [HYP] those who hinder you from getting them. You desire what other people
have, but you are unable to get what you desire, so you quarrel and fight with one
another [HYP]. You do not have what you desire because you do not ask God for it.
3 And even when you do ask him, he does not give you what you ask for because you
are asking for the wrong reason. You are asking for things in order that you may use
them just to ◄enjoy yourselves/make yourselves happy►.
You are unfaithful to God and are behaving as evil people do, so you have become
God’s enemies, but he wants to help you. He opposes the proud, but he helps those who
are humble.
James 4:4-6
4 Like a woman who is unfaithful to her husband, you are being unfaithful to God
and not obeying him any more [MET]. Those who are behaving as evil people do [MTY]
(OR, Those who love the evil pleasures of this world) are hostile toward God. Perhaps
you do not realize that [RHQ]. So those who decide to act as evil people do [MTY]
become enemies of God. 5 ◄Surely you remember that God told us in the Scriptures
that he eagerly desires that his Spirit, who lives in us, will help us to love God only!/JAMES 4:6
1813
JAMES 4:17
Do you think that it is for no reason that God told us in the Scriptures that he strongly
desires that his Spirit, who lives in us, will help us to love God only?► [RHQ] God has
a reason for desiring that. 6 It is because he is kind to us and he wants very much
to help us. That is why ◄someone said/King Solomon wrote► in the Scriptures, “God
opposes those who are proud, but he helps those who are humble.”
So submit yourselves to God and resist the devil. Stop doing wrong things and
thinking wrong thoughts. Be sorry for having sinned. Humble yourselves before God,
and he will honor you.
James 4:7-10
7 So submit yourselves to God. ◄Resist the devil/Refuse to do what the devil wants►,
and as a result he will run away from you. 8 Come near spiritually to God, and as a
result he will come near to you. You who are sinners, stop doing what is wrong, and
do only what is good [SYN, MET]. You who cannot decide whether you will ◄commit
yourselves to God/obey God completely►, stop thinking wrong thoughts, and think only
pure thoughts [MTY]. 9 Be sorrowful and weep/mourn [DOU] because of the wrong
things that you have done. Do not laugh [DOU], ◄enjoying only what you selfishly/
enjoying only what you yourselves► desire. Instead, be sad because you have done
what is wrong. 10 Humble yourselves before the Lord, and as a result he will honor
you.
Stop saying evil things about one another and thus condemning each other. Only
God has the right to condemn people.
James 4:11-12
11 My fellow believers, stop saying evil things about one another, because those who
say something evil about a fellow believer and are therefore condemning one who is
like a brother to them are really speaking against the law that God gave us to obey.
In this law, God commanded [MTY] us to love others, and those who say evil things
about fellow believers, it is as though they are saying that we do not have to do what
God commanded. If you (sg) say that you do not have to do what God commanded,
you (sg) are not obeying God’s law. Instead, you (sg) are claiming that you have the
authority to condemn others. 12 But in fact, there is only one who has the authority to
tell people what is right to do and to condemn them, and that is God. He alone is able
to save people or to destroy people. So, ◄you (sg) certainly have no right to decide
how God should punish other people./who are you to decide how God should punish
other people?► [RHQ]
You should not boast about what you will do in the future, because life is transitory.
Instead, you should plan to do whatever God wants you to do, because boasting about
what you want to do, rather than considering the will of God, is sinful.
James 4:13-17
13 Some of you are arrogantly saying, “Today or tomorrow we will go to a certain
city. We will spend a year there and we will buy and sell things and earn a lot of
money.” Now, you listen to me! 14 You should not talk like that, because you do not
know what will happen tomorrow, and you do not know how long you will live! Your
life is short [MET], like a mist that appears for a short time and then disappears.
15 Instead of what you are saying, you should say, “If the Lord wills/desires, we will
live and do this or that.” 16 But what you are doing is boasting about all the things
that you arrogantly plan to do. Your boasting like that is evil.
17 So if anyone knows the right thing that he should do, but he does not do it, he is
sinning.JAMES 5:1
1814
JAMES 5:11
5
The rich people who oppress you should weep because they will suffer much. God
will punish them because they have unjustly caused others to suffer.
James 5:1-6
1 Now I have something to say to the rich people who do not believe in Christ and who
◄oppress you/cause you to suffer►. Listen to me, you rich people! You should weep
and wail loudly [DOU] because you will experience terrible troubles [PRS]! 2 Your
wealth of various kinds is worthless [MET], as though it were rotted. Your fine clothes
are worthless [MET], as though termites had ruined them. 3 Your gold and silver are
worthless [MET], as though they were corroded. When God judges you, this worthless
wealth [MTY] of yours will be evidence [PRS] that you are guilty of being greedy, and as
rust and fire destroy [MET, SYN] things, God will severely punish you [SIM]. You have
◄in vain/uselessly► ◄stored up/accumulated► wealth at a time when God is about to
judge you [MTY]. 4 Think about what you have done. You have not paid wages to the
workmen who have harvested your fields for you, with the result that [PRS] those
reapers are crying out to God for him to help them. And God, the all-powerful Lord,
has heard their loud cries. 5 You have lived luxuriously, just to have pleasure here
on earth. Just like cattle fatten themselves, not realizing that they will be slaughtered
[MET], you have lived just for pleasure [MTY], not realizing that God will severely
punish you. 6 You have arranged for others/judges to condemn innocent people. You
have arranged for others to kill some people. And even though those people had not
done anything wrong, they were not able to defend themselves against you. My fellow
believers, that is what I say to the rich people ◄who oppress you/cause you to suffer►.
So wait patiently for the Lord Jesus Christ to return and to judge all people fairly.
Do not complain about each other, lest Jesus judge you when he returns. From the
examples of the prophets and Job, we know that God blesses and rewards those who
patiently endure suffering.
James 5:7-11
7 So, my fellow believers, although rich people cause you to suffer, be patient until
the Lord Jesus Christ comes back. Remember that when farmers plant a field, they
wait for their valuable crops to grow. They must wait patiently for the rain that comes
at the planting season and for more rain that comes just before the harvest season.
They wait for the crops to grow and mature before they can harvest them. 8 Similarly,
you also should wait patiently and trust the Lord Jesus firmly, because he is coming
back soon and will judge all people fairly. 9 My fellow believers, do not complain about
each other, in order that you will not be condemned and punished by the Lord Jesus
{in order that the Lord Jesus will not condemn you}. It is he who will judge us, and
he is ready to appear. 10 My fellow believers, as an example of how to be patient,
◄consider/think about► the prophets whom the Lord God sent long ago to speak his
messages [MTY]. Although people caused the prophets to suffer a lot, they endured it
patiently. 11 And we know that God ◄approves of/is pleased with► those who endure
suffering for him. You have also heard about Job. You know that although he suffered
much, the Lord God finally caused things to turn out well for Job because he endured
that suffering (OR, because he continued to trust God). And from that we know that
the Lord is very compassionate and kind.
Do not say, “If I am lying, may God punish me.” Instead, always tell the truth, so
that God will not condemn you.
James 5:12JAMES 5:12
1815
JAMES 5:20
12 Also, my fellow believers, I want to say something important about how you talk.
If you say that you will do something, do not say, “If I do not do it, may God in heaven
[MTY] punish me.” Do not even say, “If I do not do it, may someone here on earth
[MTY] punish me.” Do not say anything like that. Instead, if you say “Yes,” then do
what you said that you would do. If you say “No,” then do not do it. Otherwise, God
will condemn you.
Whatever your circumstances are, pray, trusting in God, and he will certainly help
you, both physically and spiritually. So confess your sins to each other and pray for
each other, because God answers prayer.
James 5:13-18
13 Whoever among you is experiencing trouble [RHQ] should pray that God would
help him. Whoever is cheerful/ happy [RHQ] should sing songs of praise to God.
14 Whoever among you is sick [RHQ] should call the leaders of the congregation to
come to pray for him. They should put olive oil on him and, with the Lord’s authority
[MTY] (OR, calling on the Lord to heal him), pray. 15 And if they truly trust in the
Lord when they pray [PRS], the sick person will be healed. The Lord will heal him.
And if that person has sinned ◄in a way that caused him to be/and because of that he
became► sick, if he ◄confesses what he did/says that he did what is wrong►, he will
be forgiven {the Lord will forgive him}. 16 So, because the Lord is able to heal the
sick and to forgive sins, tell each other the sinful things that you have done, and pray
for each other in order that you may be healed {that God may heal you} physically
and spiritually. If righteous people pray and ask fervently for God to do something,
God will certainly do it in a powerful way. 17 Although the prophet Elijah was ◄an
ordinary person/just a human being► like us, he earnestly prayed that it would not
rain. As a result, it did not rain for three and a half years. 18 Then he prayed again,
asking God to send rain, and as a result God [MTY] sent rain, and plants grew and
produced crops again.
If anyone turns away from God’s true message, you believers should urge him to
once again obey God so that God will forgive his many sins.
James 5:19-20
19 My fellow believers, if anyone of you stops obeying the true message from God,
someone from among you should persuade that person to once again do what God
has told us to do. If he stops doing what is wrong, 20 the one who persuaded him should
realize that because he has enabled the person who was sinning to stop doing what
is wrong, God will save that person from ◄spiritual death/being separated from him
forever►, and will forgive his many sins.1 PETER 1:1
1816
1 PETER 1:11
This book is one of the letters that the Apostle Peter
wrote to his fellow believers. We call this book
1 Peter
1 Peter 1:1-2
I, Peter, am writing this letter to Jewish believers who have been scattered throughout
five provinces in Asia Minor. I wish that God will bless them.
1 I, Peter, who have been appointed by Jesus Christ {one whom Jesus Christ has
appointed} to be an apostle, am writing this letter to you believers whom God has
chosen to belong to him. You are living in the Roman provinces of Pontus, Galatia,
Cappadocia, Asia, and Bithynia. Just like the Jews who lived in Israel long ago were
scattered to other countries far from their homes [MET], you now live far from heaven,
which is your true home. 2 God our Father previously chose you, and his Spirit has
set you apart in order that you would obey Jesus Christ. He did that in order that just
like Moses sprinkled the Israelites with blood when God established the old covenant
[MET], Jesus would establish his new covenant with you with the blood that flowed
from his body when he died. May God act very kindly to you, and may he give you
much inner peace.
God has done great things for you. Although you are now enduring trials to test
your faith, you are rejoicing about your salvation. That salvation is something that the
prophets who lived long ago did not fully understand.
1 Peter 1:3-12
3 Praise God, who is the Father of our Lord Jesus Christ! Because he has been very
merciful to us, he has given us new life [MET]. Because he has caused Jesus Christ
to become alive again after he died, he has enabled us to live very confidently; that
is, to fully expect to receive the things that God/he has promised to give us. 4 He
has enabled us to expect to receive an absolutely imperishable/indestructible [TRI]
inheritance that has been {that God has} preserved in heaven for us. 5 God, by his
mighty power, is guarding you as you trust in Jesus. He is keeping you safe so that he
may, at the end of the time in which we now live (OR, when Jesus returns), completely
deliver you from Satan’s power. 6 You rejoice because of what will happen then, but
now you are grieving for a short time while God is allowing you to be tested {various
things to test you [MET]}, as precious metals are tested {someone tests precious metals}
to see if they are pure. These trials that you are experiencing are necessary 7 to prove
that you really do trust in Jesus. His proving that will be more valuable than gold,
which does not last forever even though it is purified by being put {someone tries to
make it pure by putting it} in a hot fire. As a result of your passing the test and
proving that you really do trust in Jesus, God will honor you very highly [TRI] when
Jesus Christ comes again. 8 You love Jesus, although you have not seen him. Although
you do not see him now, you rejoice very much [DOU] 9 because you are experiencing
the result of your believing in him; that is, God is saving you [SYN] from the guilt of
your sins.
10 As for those who long ago spoke messages that God had revealed to them about
how God would act kindly toward you in ways which you did not deserve, they
◄investigated very carefully/tried very hard to learn► [DOU] about how God would
save you. 11 They wanted to know whom the Spirit of Christ that was in them was
referring to, and what time he was talking about, when he told beforehand that the1 PETER 1:12
1817
1 PETER 1:25
Messiah would suffer and die, and that glorious/wonderful things would happen to
him and to us afterwards. 12 It was revealed to {God told} them that it was not for
their own sake that he was revealing these things to them, but that it was for your
sake. It was these things that were proclaimed to you by those who told you the
message about Christ {that those who told you the message about Christ proclaimed
to you}. They proclaimed these things to you because the Holy Spirit whom God sent
from heaven enabled them to do that. And even angels would like to know more
about these truths about how God saves us.
You must live holy and reverent lives and love each other, because Christ has bought
you and given you a new life.
1 Peter 1:13-25
13 Therefore, prepare your minds [MET] as people fasten their belts around their
waists to prepare to work. What I mean is that you should ◄discipline your minds/
control what you think about►, and by doing that conduct your lives fully and
confidently expecting to receive the good things that God will kindly do for you when
Jesus Christ returns from heaven. 14 And because you should obey your heavenly Father
[SIM], as children ought to obey their fathers here on earth, do not do the evil things
that you used to desire to do when you did not know God’s truth. 15 Instead, just
like God, the one who chose you to belong to him, is ◄holy/separate from evil►, you
also must be ◄holy/separate from evil► in everything that you do, 16 because it is
{someone/Moses has} written in the Scriptures that God said, “You must be ◄holy/
separate from evil► because I am ◄holy/separate from evil►.”
17 God is the one who ◄impartially/without favoritism► judges what each person
does. Since you call him ‘Father’, live ◄reverently/with great respect for him► during
the time that you are living here on earth. While you are living here, you are like exiles/
foreigners [MET] because you are away from heaven, which is your true home. 18 Live
reverently because you know that it was not with things that will not last forever,
things like gold and silver, that God bought you to free you from your useless life-
style that you learned from your ancestors. 19 Instead, it was with the precious blood
of Christ that flowed from his body when he died that God bought you. Christ’s death
was a perfect sacrifice for us [MET], like the lambs that the Jewish priests sacrificed
were perfect, without any blemishes/defects/flaws or spots [DOU]. 20 Christ was chosen
by God {God chose Christ} before the world was created {he created the world}. But
it was not until now, when the time in which we are living will soon end, that he was
revealed for your sake. 21 Because of what Christ has done, you are trusting in God,
who caused Christ to become alive again after he died, and greatly honored him. As
a result, God is the one in whom you are trusting and confidently expecting that he
will do great things for you.
22 Because you have been made pure by obeying the truth, with the result that
you sincerely love your fellow believers, continue to love each other earnestly and
sincerely/wholeheartedly. 23 I ask you to do this, because you now have a new life
[MET]. It was not by means of something that will perish that you received this new
life. Instead, it was by means of something that will last forever; that is, by believing
the life-giving and enduring message of God. 24 We know that this is true because, as
the prophet Isaiah wrote,
All people will die [SIM], like grass dies. And all the greatness/honor that people have
will not last forever,
like the flowers [SIM] that grow up in the grass do not last long.
The grass withers and the flowers die,
25 but God’s message endures/lasts forever.1 PETER 2:1
1818
1 PETER 2:10
This message that endures/lasts is the message about Christ that was proclaimed to
you.
2
Do not act maliciously or be hypocrites. God is joining you together into a holy
group in which his Spirit lives, to do things that are pleasing to him.
1 Peter 2:1-10
1 Therefore, do not act maliciously in any way or deceive others. Do not ◄be a
hypocrite/try to make others think that you have qualities that you do not really
have►, and do not ◄envy/be jealous of► others. Do not ever slander anyone. 2 Just
like newborn babies long for their mothers’ pure milk [MET], you should long for
God’s spiritual truth, so that by learning it you may become spiritually mature. You
need to do this until the day when God will free you completely from all the evil in
this world. 3 Also, you need to do this because you have experienced that the Lord
acts in a good way toward you.
4 You have come to the Lord Jesus. He is like an important stone [MET] put in the
foundation of a building, but he is alive, not lifeless like a stone. He was rejected by
many people {Many people rejected him}, but God chose him and considers him to be
very precious. 5 And like men build houses with stones [MET], God is causing you to
be joined together into a group in which God’s Spirit lives, in order that you, because
of what Jesus Christ did for us, might, like priests who offer sacrifices, do things that
are pleasing to God. 6 What Isaiah wrote in the Scriptures shows us that this is true.
He wrote these words that God said:
Note this well: I am placing in Jerusalem [MTY] one who is like [MET] an extremely
valuable [DOU] ◄stone/cornerstone, the most important stone in the structure
of a building►, and those who believe in him will never be disappointed.
7 Therefore, God will honor you who believe in Jesus. But those who refuse to
believe in him are like the builders that this Scripture talks about:
The stone that the builders rejected has become ◄the cornerstone/the most important
stone in the foundation of the building►.
8 And it is also written {Isaiah wrote} in the Scriptures:
He will be like a stone that causes people to stumble,
like a rock that people trip over.
Just as people are injured when they stumble over a rock,
people who disobey the message about Jesus are injured spiritually,
and that is what God determined would happen to them.
9 But you are people whom God has chosen to belong to him. You are a group that
represents God like priests do, and you rule with God [MET] like kings. You are ◄a
holy group of people/a group of people who are separate from evil►. You are people
who belong to God. This is in order that you might proclaim the virtues of God. He
has called you from your former ways, when you were ignorant of his truth, into the
marvelous understanding that he gives us [MET]. That is, he has called you out of
spiritual darkness into spiritual light. 10 What the prophet Hosea wrote is true of you
Formerly, you were not a people who had a relationship with God,
But now you are God’s people.
At one time God had not acted mercifully toward you,
But now he has acted mercifully toward you.
Avoid obeying your self-directed natures. Conduct your lives in a good way among
unbelievers.
1 Peter 2:11-121 PETER 2:11
1819
1 PETER 2:25
11 You people whom I love, I urge you to consider that you are like foreigners [MET,
DOU] whose real home is in heaven. As a result, avoid doing the things that your self-
directed nature desires, because those desires ◄fight against/always oppose► your
souls. 12 Keep conducting your lives in a good way among those who do not know
God. If you do that, although they may accuse you, saying that you are people who
do evil things, they will see your good behavior, and at the time when God comes to
judge people, they will ◄give honor to him/say that what he does is right►.
Submit yourselves to human authorities, and act as servants of God should.
1 Peter 2:13-17
13 For the sake of the Lord Jesus, submit yourselves to every human authority.
That includes submitting yourselves to the king, who is the most important authority,
14 and to governors, who are sent by the king {whom the king sends} to punish those
who do what is wrong and to commend/honor those who do what is right. 15 What
God wants is that by your doing only what is good you will cause foolish people who
do not know God to be unable to say things ◄to condemn you/to show you why you
should be punished►. 16 Conduct your lives as though you were free from having to
obey authorities, but do not think “Because I am free from having to obey authorities,
I can do evil things.” Instead, act as servants of God should. 17 Act respectfully toward
everyone. Love all your fellow believers. Revere God, and honor the king.
You slaves must submit yourselves to your masters, even if they mistreat you. Imitate
Christ in the way in which he suffered unjustly.
1 Peter 2:18-25
18 You slaves who are believers, submit yourselves to your masters and completely
respect them. Submit yourselves not only to those who act in a good and kind [DOU]
way towards you, but also submit yourselves to those who act in a harsh way towards
you. 19 You should do that because God is pleased with those who, knowing that he is
aware of what is happening to them, endure the pain that they suffer because of being
treated unjustly by their masters {their masters have treated them unjustly}. 20 God
will certainly not [RHQ] be pleased with you if you do something that is wrong and as
a result you are beaten {someone beats you}! But if, instead of doing something that
is wrong, you do what is good, and as a result of that, you suffer for doing something
that is good, and you endure that suffering, God will ◄commend/be pleased with►
you. 21 One of the reasons why God chose you is that you would suffer. When Christ
suffered for you, he became an example for you, in order that you would ◄imitate
what/do like► he did. 22 Remember how Christ conducted himself:
He never sinned,
And he never said [MTY] anything to deceive people.
23 When people insulted him, he did not insult them in return.
When people caused him to suffer, he did not threaten ◄to get revenge/to cause them
to suffer►.
Instead, he decided to let God, who always judges justly, prove that he ◄was innocent/
had done nothing that is wrong► (OR, he left his case in the hands of God, who
always judges justly).
24 He himself endured physically the punishment for our sins when he died on the
cross,
in order that we would stop sinning (OR, no longer respond to sinful desires) and
start living righteous lives.
It is because he was wounded {they wounded him} that your souls have been saved
[MET] from being sinful, as people’s bodies are healed from being sick. 25 Truly you1 PETER 3:1
1820
1 PETER 3:11
were like sheep that had gone astray [SIM], but now you have returned to Jesus, who
cares for your souls as a shepherd cares for his sheep [MET].
3
You women should submit yourselves to your husbands, even if they are not believers,
and make your inner beings/hearts beautiful with qualities that will not fade away.
1 Peter 3:1-6
1 You women believers, just like slaves should submit themselves to their masters,
submit yourselves to your husbands. Do that in order that if any of them do
not believe the message about Christ, they may become believers without it being
necessary for you to say anything to them about their relationship to God. 2 They
will believe in Christ when they see that you respect them and that your way of life
is pure. 3 Do not be trying to make yourselves beautiful by decorating the outside
of your bodies, such as ◄by the way you comb your hair/by your hair style► or by
wearing gold jewelry and fine clothes. 4 Instead, make your ◄inner beings/hearts►
beautiful with qualities/attitudes that will not fade away. Specifically, have a humble
and quiet/calm attitude, which is something that God considers to be very valuable.
5 ◄The devout women/The women who habitually worshipped God► who lived long
ago and who trusted in God made themselves beautiful by having attitudes like that,
and by being submissive to their husbands. 6 Sarah, for example, obeyed her husband
Abraham and called him ‘my master’. You will be as though you are [MET] her
daughters if you do what is right and are not afraid of what your husbands or anyone
else may do to you because you are believers.
You men must live in an appropriate way with your wives, so that nothing will hinder
your prayers.
1 Peter 3:7
7 You men who are believers, just like your wives should respect you, you should
conduct your lives in an appropriate way with them. Treat them respectfully,
realizing that they are usually weaker than you are, and realizing that ◄they share
with you/both of you have► the gift that God has kindly given to you, which is eternal
life. Do this so that nothing will hinder you from praying (OR, hinder God ◄from
answering/from doing what you ask for► when you pray).
Agree with each other, love each other, be humble, and bless those who do evil things
to you instead of retaliating.
1 Peter 3:8-12
8 To end this part of my letter, I say to all of you, agree with each other in what you
think. Be sympathetic toward each other. Love each other as members of the same
family should. Act compassionately toward each other. Be humble. 9 When people do
evil things to you or insult you, do not ◄retaliate/repay them by► doing evil things
to them or insulting them. Instead, ask God to bless them, because that is what you
have been chosen by God {what God called you} to do, in order that you may receive
a blessing from him. 10 Consider what the Psalmist wrote about the proper way of
conducting our lives,
As for those who want ◄to enjoy life/to live happily► and experience good things
happening to them every day,
they must not say [MTY] something that is evil or say [MTY] something that deceives
others.
11 They must continually turn away from doing anything that is evil, and must do
things that are good instead.
They must deeply desire to enable people to act peacefully toward each other;1 PETER 3:12
1821
1 PETER 4:3
they must zealously urge people to act in a peaceful way,
12 because the Lord sees [MTY] what righteous people do and he appreciates/likes what
they do.
He listens to righteous people when they pray, and he answers them.
But he is [MTY] opposed to those who do evil things.
Do good things to others, even if you suffer for doing it, as Christ did.
1 Peter 3:13-22
13 If you ◄are eager/try very hard► to do good things, most people will not harm you.
[RHQ] 14 But even if you suffer because of doing what is right, God will bless you. Do as
Isaiah wrote: “Do not be afraid of people who ◄threaten you/say things to cause you
to be afraid of what they might do to you►, and do not worry about [DOU] what they
might do to you.” 15 Instead, acknowledge that Christ is the one who is in complete
control of your lives. Always be ready to answer everyone who demands that you
tell them about what you confidently expect God to do for you. 16 But answer them
humbly and respectfully, and make sure that you ◄do/have done► nothing wrong, in
order that those who say evil things about you may be ashamed when they see the
good way in which you are conducting yourselves because of your relationship with
Christ. 17 It may be that God wants you to suffer. But it is better to do good things,
even if you suffer for doing them, than to do evil things and suffer for doing that. 18 I
say that because Christ died once for the sake of people who have sinned. He was a
righteous person who died for unrighteous people. He died in order that ◄he might
bring us to/we might begin an intimate relationship with► God. During the time that
he had an ordinary body, he was killed {people killed him}, but God’s Spirit caused
him to become alive again. 19 The Spirit also helped him as he went to proclaim God’s
victory to the evil spirits whom God had imprisoned in the heavens (OR, to the spirits
of those who had died, and who were in the place where the spirits of dead people
are). 20 Long ago, during the time that Noah was building a big boat, those evil spirits
disobeyed God when he waited patiently [PRS] to see if people would turn from their
evil behavior. Only a few people were saved {God saved only a few people} in that
boat. Specifically, God brought only eight persons safely through the waters of the
flood, while all the others drowned in it. 21 That water, by means of which eight people
were saved when God punished the other people [MET], represents the water in which
we are baptized to show that God has saved us from being punished. The water in
which we are baptized does not remove dirt from our bodies. Instead, it shows that
we are requesting God to assure us that he has removed our guilt for having sinned.
And because Jesus Christ became alive again after he died, we know that God accepted
his sacrifice for us and because of that he was able to remove our guilt. 22 Christ has
gone into heaven and is ruling [MTY] in the place of highest honor ◄next to God/
at God’s side►, after God caused all the evil and powerful spirit beings [DOU] to be
made subject to him.
4
Think as Christ did when he suffered, and conduct your lives as God wants you to,
not doing the immoral things that you used to do.
1 Peter 4:1-6
1 Therefore, because Christ suffered physically, you also must think the way that
he did when he was willing to suffer, because those who suffer physicallybecause of
belonging to Jesus have stopped sinning the way they used to sin. 2 As a result, during
their remaining time here on earth, they do not do the things that sinful people desire
to do, but instead they do the things that God wants them to do. 3 I say that to you1 PETER 4:4
1822
1 PETER 4:18
because [SAR] you have already spent too much of your time here on earth doing
what the people who do not know God like to do. In the past you committed all kinds
of sexually immoral acts [DOU], you got drunk and then participated in ◄orgies/wild
parties► and carousing/revelry, and you worshipped idols, which is very displeasing
to God. 4 Because you used to do those things, your friends are surprised that you do
not join them any more when they participate in that kind of wild behavior that ◄is
rushing to/will quickly► destroy them like [MET] a flood. As a result, they say evil
things about you. 5 But God is ready to judge the people who are living now and the
people who have died, and he is the one who will decide whether he approves of
what each of them has done. 6 That is the reason why the message about Christ was
preached {people preached the message about Christ} to believers who have now
died. That message was preached to them in order that even though sinful people
might judge them and say that they are guilty, God’s Spirit would enable them to live
eternally.
Keep thinking sensibly. Love each other earnestly. Provide hospitality to others. Use
your spiritual gifts well. Be kind to others with all the energy that you have.
1 Peter 4:7-11
7 It is almost the time when everything on this earth will come to an end. Therefore,
keep thinking sensibly/reasonably and control what you think [DOU], so that you
can pray clearly. 8 Most important of all, love each other earnestly/wholeheartedly,
because if we love others [PRS], we will just ignore many of the sinful things that they
do to us. 9 Provide food and a place to sleep for those who come to your community,
and do it without complaining. 10 Believers should all use the spiritual gifts that God
has given them to serve others. They should manage/use well the various gifts that
God has kindly given them. 11 Those who speak to the congregation should do that as
though they are speaking the very words of God. Those who do kind things to others
should do it with the strength that God gives them, in order that God may be honored
by all this {that all this may honor God} as Jesus Christ enables us to do it. I pray that
we will praise God (OR, Jesus) and allow him to rule over us forever. ◄May it be so!/
Amen!►
Do not be surprised when you suffer for being Christians, and do not be ashamed
when that happens. Instead, commit yourselves to God.
1 Peter 4:12-19
12 You whom I love, do not be surprised about the painful things that you are
suffering because you belong to Christ. Those things are testing you as metals are tested
by people putting them in a fire. Do not think that something strange is happening
to you. 13 Instead, rejoice that you are suffering the same kinds of things that Christ
endured. Rejoice when you suffer, in order that you may also be very glad [DOU]
when Christ returns and reveals how glorious/wonderful he is. 14 If you are insulted
{If people insult you} because you believe in Christ [MTY], God is pleased with you,
because it shows that the Spirit of God, the Spirit who reveals how great God is, lives
within you. 15 If you suffer, do not let that suffering be the result of your being a
murderer or a thief or as a result of doing some other evil thing, or as a result of
interfering in someone else’s affairs. 16 But if you suffer because of being a Christian,
do not be ashamed about it. Instead, praise God that you are suffering because of
belonging to Christ [MTY]. 17 I say that, because it is now time for God to begin judging
people, and first he will judge those who belong [MTY] to him. Since he will judge us
believers first, think about the terrible things that will happen to [RHQ] those who
do not obey the good message that comes from him! 18 That will be as it is written in
the Scriptures,1 PETER 4:19
1823
1 PETER 5:11
Many righteous people will have to suffer many difficult trials before going to heaven.
So ungodly and sinful people will surely have to suffer much severe punishment from
God!
19 Therefore, those who suffer because of its being God’s will that they suffer
because of being Christians should commit themselves to God, the one who created
them and the one who always does what he promises to do. And they should continue
to do what is right.
5
You elders must care for your congregations with enthusiasm, not being greedy for
money or acting like bosses. Instead, be examples to them.
1 Peter 5:1-7
1 Now I will say this to those among you who are elders in the congregations: I also
am an elder. I am one of those who saw Christ when he suffered, and I am also one
who will share some of the glory/greatness that Christ has in heaven. 2 I appeal to you
elders to take care of the people who are in your congregations [MET] as shepherds
take care of their flocks of sheep. Do this, not because you must do it, but instead do it
willingly, as God desires. Do not be greedy to get a lot of money for doing it, but instead
do it enthusiastically/wholeheartedly. 3 Do not act like domineering bosses over the
people [MET] whom God has assigned/entrusted to you, but instead be examples to
them by the way in which you conduct your lives. 4 If you do that, when Jesus, who is
like our chief shepherd [MET], appears, he will give each of you a glorious/wonderful
reward [MET]. That reward will be like the wreaths that are given to victorious athletes,
but your reward will never wither like wreaths do.
5 Now I will say this to you young men and women: Just like married men and women
are ◄to be subject/to submit themselves► to their spouses, you must ◄be subject/submit
yourselves► ◄to the older men/to the leaders► of the congregation. And all of you
believers should act [MET] humbly toward each other, because this proverb is true:
God opposes people who are proud, but he acts kindly toward those who are humble.
6 Therefore, realizing that God has great power [MTY] to punish proud people,
humble yourselves, in order that he may honor you at the time that he has determined.
7 Because he takes care of you, let him take care of all the things that you are worried/
concerned about.
Resist the devil by always being alert and trusting in Christ’s message, remembering
that believers everywhere are also suffering as you are.
1 Peter 5:8-11
8 Always be fully alert, because the devil, who is your enemy, is going/sneaking
around, looking for people to destroy. He is like [SIM] a lion who roars as it prowls
around, seeking someone to kill and devour. 9 You must resist him by continuing to
firmly trust in Christ and his message, remembering that your fellow believers all
over the world are experiencing similar sufferings that the devil is bringing to them.
10 God is the one who kindly helps us in every situation, and he is the one who chose
us to share his eternal glory/greatness in heaven because of our relationship with
Christ. And after you have suffered for a while because of things that people do to
harm you, he will remove your spiritual defects/imperfections, he will strengthen you
spiritually [DOU], and he will support you emotionally. 11 I pray/desire that he will
rule powerfully forever. ◄May it be so!/Amen!►
I have written this short message to encourage you. The believers here, including
Mark, greet you. May God give you inner peace.
1 Peter 5:12-141 PETER 5:12
1824
1 PETER 5:14
12 Silas has written this letter for me as I have ◄dictated it to him/told him what to
write►. I consider/know that he is a faithful fellow believer. I have written this short
letter to you to encourage you, and I want to assure you that what I have written is
a true message about the things that God kindly does for us, things that we do not
deserve. Continue to firmly believe this message.
13 In this city that is sometimes referred to as ‘Babylon’ [MET], the believers [SYN],
whom God has chosen to belong to him just like he chose you, ◄send you (pl) their
greetings/say that they are thinking affectionately about you►. Mark, who is [MET]
like a son to me, also ◄sends you his greetings/says that he is thinking affectionately
about you►. 14 Greet each other with a kiss on the cheek to show that you love each
other. I pray that God will give inner peace to all of you who have a relationship with
Christ.2 PETER 1:1
1825
2 PETER 1:9
This book is one of the letters that the Apostle Peter
wrote to his fellow believers. We call this book
2 Peter
2 Peter 1:1-2
I, Simon Peter, am writing this letter to you whom God has caused to believe in Christ
just like we apostles believe in Christ. I pray that God will bless you greatly.
1 I, Simon Peter, am writing this letter to you. I serve Jesus Christ, and am an
apostle appointed by him. I am sending this letter to you whom God has caused to
believe in Christ just like he caused us(exc) apostles to believe in Christ. You and we
have ◄equally been given the/both been given the same► privilege of believing in
Jesus Christ. He is God, he is righteous, he is the one whom we worship, and he is
our Savior. 2 I pray that God will continue to act very kindly towards you, and give
you ◄a deep/very much► inner peace, because you truly know God and Jesus, who is
our Lord.
God has given us everything that we need to receive eternal life and to live godly
lives.
2 Peter 1:3-4
3 God [PRS] has given us everything that we need in order that we might receive
eternal life and in order that we might live ◄in a godly way/in a way that pleases
him►. He gives us that by the power that he has because he is God, and he has also
given it to us as a result of our knowing him. He is the wonderful and perfect one
who chose us to be his people. 4 Being glorious and perfect, he has promised us that he
will do very great and ◄priceless/very precious► things for us. He has also promised
you that by believing what he has promised you will be able to act righteously, just
like God acts righteously, and that you will be free from being morally depraved/
corrupted, and that you will not be like those who do not believe in Christ and are
morally depraved because of their desire to do things that are evil.
Try your hardest to develop a stable Christian character.
2 Peter 1:5-11
5 Because God has done all that, by trying very hard, make sure that you not only
believe in Christ, but that you are also living morally good lives. And make sure that
you are not only living morally good lives, but that you also know what God desires
(OR, behave wisely). 6 And make sure that you not only know what God desires (OR,
behave wisely), but that you also control what you say and do. And make sure that
you not only control what you say and do, but that you are also steadfast/patient.
And make sure that you are not only ◄steadfast/patient when you suffer►, but that
you are also godly. 7 And make sure that you not only ◄are godly/live in a way that
pleases God►, but that you also have a concern for your fellow believers, as brothers
and sisters ought to have for each other. And make sure that you not only have a
concern for your fellow believers, but that you also love others. 8 If you do these
things, and if you do them more and more, that demonstrates that knowing our Lord
Jesus Christ ◄is very effective/produces good results► [LIT] in your lives. 9 If these
qualities are not present in people, it means they are not aware that these things are
important, just like a blind person is not aware of what is around him. They think only
about earthly matters, just like [MET] a shortsighted person sees clearly only things
that are near. It seems that they have forgotten that God has forgiven them for their2 PETER 1:10
1826
2 PETER 2:2
former sinful lives. 10 Instead of acting like those people, try to confirm/prove by the
way you conduct your lives that you are among those whom God has chosen [DOU]
to be his people. If you do that, you will certainly never become separated from God,
11 and God will very wholeheartedly welcome you into the place where our Lord and
Savior Jesus Christ will rule his people forever.
I intend to keep reminding you very frequently about these matters.
2 Peter 1:12-15
12 I intend to keep on reminding you very frequently [HYP] about these matters,
even though you already know them and are firmly convinced that they are true.
13 I consider it right that I should help you to continually think about these matters
by reminding you about them as long as I am alive [EUP], 14 because I know that I
shall die [EUP] soon, as our Lord Jesus Christ clearly has revealed to me. 15 Moreover,
I will ◄make every effort/try hard► by writing these things down to enable you to
remember them at all times after I have died [EUP].
You can be sure that these matters are true, because we apostles ourselves witnessed
that our Lord Jesus Christ is supremely great, and also because what the prophets say
about him is completely reliable.
2 Peter 1:16-21
16 We apostles told you that our Lord Jesus Christ acts powerfully and that he is
coming back some day. We were not basing what we told you on stories that we had
cleverly ◄invented/made up►. Instead, we told you what we ourselves saw with our
own eyes, that the Lord Jesus is supremely great. 17 God, our Father, greatly honored
him when God’s great glory/brightness surrounded him, and God [MTY] said, “This is
my Son, whom I love very much; I am very pleased with him.” 18 We (exc) ourselves
heard God [MTY] say that from heaven, when we were with Christ on that holy/
sacred mountain. 19 We also have the Scriptures that the prophets wrote about Christ
long ago, which are completely reliable/trustworthy. You should ◄pay attention to/
think carefully about► what they wrote, because what they wrote enables you to know
whether what is taught to you is true or whether it is false [SIM], like a lamp that is
shining in a dark place enables people to see where they are going [SIM]. You should
◄pay attention to/think carefully about► what they wrote until our Lord Jesus Christ
comes back and enables you [SYN] to know God fully, which will be like when [MET]
◄a day dawns/daylight comes► and the morning star rises and we can see it clearly.
20 It is important that you realize that no one can interpret/explain by himself the
meaning of what the prophets wrote in the Scriptures without the help of God’s Spirit
(OR, no part of the Scriptures originated with the prophet himself), 21 because no
human beings decided to make those prophecies. On the contrary, those who spoke
messages from God did that because it was the Holy Spirit who caused them to do it,
and therefore the Spirit must help us to interpret/understand their meaning.
2
There will be false teachers among you who will behave wickedly and who will entice
you to behave just like they do. God will certainly destroy them.
2 Peter 2:1-3
1 Just like there were false prophets among the Israeli people long ago, so there will
also be teachers who teach false things among you. They will enter your congregations
without you realizing what/who they are, and they will spiritually injure some people
by what they teach. Specifically, these teachers will even deny that the Lord Jesus
died to pay for the guilt of our sins. As a result, they will soon destroy themselves
spiritually, and God will also punish them. 2 And many people will behave in an2 PETER 2:3
1827
2 PETER 2:14
extremely immoral manner, imitating the extremely immoral way these teachers who
teach false things behave. As a result, unbelievers will ◄discredit the true message/say
the true message is false►. 3 Because the teachers of false teaching want a lot of things
that other people have, they think that by telling you stories that they themselves have
◄made up/invented►, they will get money from you. God decided long ago that he
would punish them, and he has not fallen asleep [LIT]! He will certainly destroy them!
It is certain that God knows how to rescue those who are godly, and that he knows
how to punish those who are unrighteous at the right time.
2 Peter 2:4-10c
4 God destroyed [LIT] the angels who sinned. He threw them into the worst place
in hell and imprisoned them there in darkness in order to keep them there until
he judges and punishes them. 5 He also got rid of [LIT] the people who lived in
[MTY] the world long ago. He saved only eight of them, including Noah, who was
a righteous preacher. God saved them when he destroyed in a flood all ◄the ungodly
people/the people whose lives were not pleasing to him► who were living then. 6 He
also condemned Sodom and Gomorrah cities; that is, he destroyed them by burning
them completely to ashes. By doing that he gave a warning to those who afterwards
would live in ◄an ungodly way/a way that is displeasing to him►. 7 But he rescued
Abraham’s nephew, Lot, who was a righteous man. Lot was ◄greatly distressed/very
sad► because the people in Sodom were doing very immoral things. 8 That righteous
man’s soul ◄was tormented/suffered great agony► day after day because he saw
and heard those wicked people behave in a very lawless/wicked manner when he
was living among them. 9 And since the Lord God rescued Lot, you can be sure that
he knows how to rescue ◄other godly people/people whose lives please him► from
their sufferings, and he is able to preserve ◄ungodly people/people whose lives do
not please him►, whom he has started to punish even now, until the time when he
will finish judging them and punish them. 10 He will punish especially severely those
ungodly teachers who teach false things who do the things that their self-directed
nature desires, things that ◄defile them/cause them to be completely impure►. Those
teachers of false teachings despise all beings who rule over them.
Because those teachers of false doctrine will behave wickedly and will entice people
to do the same things that they do, God will destroy them.
2 Peter 2:10d-16
Because those teachers of false doctrines are extremely arrogant/proud [DOU], they
◄are not afraid to insult/boldly speak evil about► glorious beings in heaven (OR,
glorious/wonderful beings who rule over people). 11 In contrast, angels do not insult
those teachers when those teachers accuse the angels of blasphemy while the Lord God
is watching, even though the angels are much more powerful [DOU] than the teachers
of false doctrines. 12 Because those teachers of false doctrines are like animals that
cannot think as humans do [DOU], they say evil things about spiritual things which
they know nothing about. As a result, God will destroy them like people destroy
animals, animals that are born only in order to be hunted and killed {in order that
people should hunt and kill them}. 13 God will punish those teachers in return for
the unrighteous actions/things that they have done. They even like ◄to carouse/to
drink and revel noisily► in the daytime as well as at night. And as they indulge/enjoy
themselves just like they want to while they are feasting with you, they cause you
to become impure, as [MET] stains and blotches [DOU] ruin a clean garment. 14 They
want to commit [MTY] adultery with every woman whom they look at. They never
stop seeking opportunities to sin. They entice/persuade those who are spiritually2 PETER 2:15
1828
2 PETER 3:2
unstable to join them in doing the sinful things that they do. Because of their ever-
increasing ◄greed/desire to have more and more things►, they are doomed to eternal
punishment. 15 They have ◄rejected good moral standards/quit doing what everyone
knows is right►. They have imitated what the prophet Balaam, the son of Bosor, did
long ago. He, acting very unrighteously, wanted the enemies of the Jews to pay him
if he asked God ◄to curse/to do bad thing to► the Jews. 16 But God rebuked him for
having done that which was wrong and for behaving very foolishly. And even though
donkeys do not speak, God used a donkey to hinder Balaam by enabling it to speak to
him with a human voice.
Because those teachers of false doctrine will entice people to behave wickedly, God
has reserved darkest hell for them.
2 Peter 2:17-22
17 These teachers who each false things mislead/deceive people by promising what
they cannot do, as [MET] dried-up springs mislead/deceive people by causing them to
expect to get water from them. They mislead/deceive people [MET] just like clouds that
are blown along by strong winds mislead/deceive people by causing them to expect rain,
but no rain falls. Therefore, God has reserved the darkness of hell for those teachers
of false doctrines. 18 By boasting proudly as they make speeches that are worthless,
they entice people who have recently become believers and have stopped doing the
things that wicked people do. Urged on by their self-directed nature, they entice them
into sin by encouraging them to do evil things. 19 The false teachers tell people that
they are free to do whatever they want to do, even though they themselves are like
slaves [MET] because their own self-directed nature forces them to do sinful things.
Think about these well-known words: “Whenever a person is controlled by something
{something controls a person}, it is as though that person has become a slave of what
controls him.” 20 Those who teach false truths learned about our Lord and Savior
Jesus Christ. As a result, they stopped doing those things that ◄defile people/cause
people to become impure► spiritually. Since they have begun to do those evil things
again, with the result that they are unable to stop doing them, they are in a worse
condition than they were in before they knew Jesus Christ. 21 Because God will severely
punish them, it would have been better for them if they had never known what it
means to live in a righteous way. It is too bad that although they knew how to live in
a righteous way, they stopped doing the things that God commanded people to do, the
things that were taught to them ◄by us apostles/by Christ► {that ◄we apostles/Christ►
taught to them}. 22 The way they are behaving again is just like ◄the proverbs/what
people often say►: They are like dogs that return to eat their vomit, and they are like
pigs that have been washed and then roll again in the mud.
3
I am writing this letter to you in order to help you remember what the holy prophets
said and what our Lord and Savior commanded.
2 Peter 3:1-2
1 This letter that I am now writing to you whom I love, is the second letter that I
have written to you. In both these letters I have reminded you about the things you
already know, in order that I may stimulate/cause you to think sincerely about those
things. 2 I want you to remember the words that were spoken by the holy prophets
{that the holy prophets spoke} long ago, and also to remember what our Lord and
Savior commanded, things that we, your apostles, told you about.2 PETER 3:3
1829
2 PETER 3:13
Although certain people will ridicule the idea that the Lord Jesus Christ is going to
come back, the reason why he has not yet come back to judge people is that God is being
patient with people; but Jesus will certainly come back and judge people.
2 Peter 3:3-10
3 It is important for you to understand that in the time immediately before Christ
comes back, there will be people who will ridicule the idea of his coming back. Those
people will do whatever evil things they wish to do. 4 They will say, “Although it was
promised that Christ will come back, ◄nothing has happened that would indicate that
he is coming back./what happened to the promise that he is coming back?► [RHQ]
We say that because ever since the Christian leaders who lived long ago died [EUP],
everything has remained the same. Things are as they always have been since God
created the world!” 5 They will say that because they ◄deliberately overlook the fact/
have decided to ignore what they know► that God, by commanding long ago that it
should be so, caused the heavens to exist, and he caused the earth to appear out of
water and to be separate from the water. 6 And God, by commanding that it should
be so, later destroyed the world that existed at that time, by causing the earth to be
flooded with water {water to flood the earth}. 7 Furthermore, God, commanded that
the heavens and the earth that exist now remain until the time when he will judge
◄ungodly people/people whose lives are not pleasing to him►. And at that time he
will destroy the heavens and the earth by burning them. 8 Dear friends, I want you
to understand well that the Lord God is willing to wait a long time to judge the people
in the world! How much time passes before the Lord God judges the people in the
world does not matter to him! He considers that one day passes no more quickly than
1,000 years, and he also considers that 1,000 years pass as quickly as one day passes
to us! 9 Therefore, you should not think that because Christ has not yet come back to
judge people, the Lord God is ◄delaying/slow to do► what he promised. Some people
think that this is so, and they say that Christ will never come back. But you should
understand that the reason why Christ has not yet come back to judge people is that
God is being patient with you, because he does not want anyone to be lost eternally.
Instead, he wants everyone to turn away from their sinful behavior. 10 Although
God is being patient, at the time [MTY] that he has chosen, the Lord Jesus Christ will
certainly come back to judge people. He will come back unexpectedly, like a thief [SIM]
comes unexpectedly. At that time there will be a great roaring sound. The heavens
will cease to exist. ◄The elements/The parts of which the universe consists► will be
destroyed by fire, and the earth that God made and everything on it that people have
made will disappear (OR, will be burned up).
You certainly ought to behave in a godly manner, because God will destroy
everything, and because only those people who are righteous will live in the new heavens
and on the new earth.
2 Peter 3:11-13
11 Because God will certainly destroy all these things like I just said, you certainly
know how you should behave. [RHQ] You should behave ◄in a godly manner/in a
manner that pleases God► 12 while you eagerly/expectantly wait for Christ to return
on the day that God has chosen [MTY], and you should try to make that day come soon.
Because of what God [PRS] will do on that day, the heavens will be destroyed. ◄The
elements/The parts of which the universe consist► will melt and burn up. 13 Although
all those events/things will happen, we rejoice because we are waiting for the new
heavens and new earth that God has promised. The only people who will be in the
new heavens and on this new earth will be people who are [PRS] righteous.2 PETER 3:14
1830
2 PETER 3:18
Do all you can to conduct your lives in a godly manner. Guard against those who
would entice you to doubt what you now firmly believe.
2 Peter 3:14-18a
14 Therefore, dear friends, because you are waiting for these things to happen, do
all that you can live ◄in a godly manner/in a manner that pleases God►, in order that
Christ will see that you are completely pure [DOU] and that you are living peacefully
with each other. 15 And think about this: Our Lord Jesus Christ is patient because he
wants people to be saved. Our dear ◄brother/fellow believer► Paul also wrote wise
words to you about these same matters, because God enabled him to understand these
◄events/things that will happen►. 16 In the letters that Paul wrote there are certain
things that are difficult for people to understand. People who are spiritually ignorant
and ◄unstable/do not believe firmly in Christ► interpret these things wrongly, as they
also ◄interpret/explain the meaning of► the other parts of the Scriptures wrongly.
The result is that they will destroy themselves spiritually, and God will punish them.
17 Therefore, dear friends, since you already know about those who teach what is false,
◄guard against them/beware►. Do not let those wicked people deceive you by telling
you things that are wrong, with the result that you yourselves begin to doubt what
you now firmly believe. 18 Instead, live in such a manner that you experience more and
more our Savior Jesus Christ being kind to you, and that you get to know him better
and better.
I pray that Jesus Christ will always be honored.
2 Peter 3:18b
I pray/desire that Jesus Christ will be honored both now and forever!*
* 3:18 Amen./So be it. At the end.1 JOHN 1:1
1831
1 JOHN 2:2
This book is one of the letters that the Apostle John
wrote to his fellow believers. We call this book
1 John
1 John 1:1-4
We apostles proclaim to you the message about the One who has lived eternally, so
that you may be joined together with us and we may be completely happy.
1 I, John, am writing to you about the one who existed before there was anything
else. He is the one whom we apostles listened to as he taught us! We saw him! We
ourselves looked at him and touched him! He is the one who taught us the message
that enables people to have eternal life (OR, live spiritually). 2 Because he came here
to the earth and we have seen him, we proclaim to you clearly that the one whom
we have seen is the one who has always lived. He was previously with his Father in
heaven, but he came to live among us. 3 We proclaim to you the message about Jesus,
the one whom we saw and heard, in order that you may have a close relationship
with us. The ones whom we have a close relationship with are God our Father and
his Son Jesus Christ. 4 I am writing to you about these things so that you ◄will be
convinced/believe► that they are true, and as a result we may be completely joyful.
We should continue to be morally pure, because God is morally pure, and he is able
to forgive our sins on the basis that Jesus died to acquit us of the guilt of all our sins.
1 John 1:5—2:2
5 The message that we heard from Christ and proclaim to you is this: God is pure
in every way. He never sins. He is like [MET] a brilliant light that has no darkness at
all. 6 If we claim to have a close relationship with God, but we conduct our lives in an
impure manner, that is like living [MET] in evil darkness. We are lying. We are not
conducting our lives according to God’s true message. 7 But living in a pure manner,
as God is living in a pure manner [MET] in every way, is like living in God’s light. If we
do that, we have a close relationship with each other. Not only that, but God ◄acquits
us/removes the guilt► of all our sins because he accepts what his Son Jesus did for us
when his blood flowed from his body when he died. So we should conduct our lives ◄in
a manner according to what God says is pure►. 8 Those who say they never behave
sinfully are deceiving themselves, and refusing to accept as true what God says about
them. 9 But God will do what he says that he will do, and what he does is always right.
So, if we confess to him that we have behaved sinfully, he will forgive us for our sins
and ◄will free us from/remove► the guilt of all our sins. Because of that, we should
confess to him that we have behaved sinfully. 10 Because God says that everyone has
sinned, those who say/claim that they have never behaved sinfully talk as though God
lies! They reject what God says about us!
2
1 You who are very dear to me, I am writing this to you to say, “Do not sin!”
But
if any of you believers sins, God can forgive you because we have Jesus Christ, who
is the righteous one, who speaks to the Father on our behalf and asks him to forgive
us. 2 Remember that Jesus Christ voluntarily sacrificed his own life for us, so that as a
result God forgives our sins. Yes, God is able to forgive our sins, but not only ours! He
is also able to forgive the sins of people everywhere!1 JOHN 2:3
1832
1 JOHN 2:14
We should conduct our lives as Christ did, obeying what God commands us to do.
We will then be loving God in the manner in which he wants us to.
1 John 2:3-6
3 I will tell you how we can be sure that we ◄know/have a close relationship with►
God. If we obey what he commands us to do, that shows us that we have a close
relationship with him. So we must always obey what he commands us to do. 4 Those
who say, “We ◄know/have a close relationship with► God,” and do not obey what
God commands us to do, are liars. They are not conducting their lives according to
God’s true message. 5 But those who obey what God commands them to do are the
people who love God in the manner in which he wants us to. I will tell you how we
can be sure that we have a close relationship with God: 6 If we say that we are living
as God wants us to, we should conduct our lives as Christ did.
We ought to love our fellow believers in order to continue behaving like people living
in the light.
1 John 2:7-11
7 Dear friends, I am not writing a new additional command to you. Instead,
I am writing to you a command which was given to you when you first [MTY]
believed in Christ. That command is part of the message that you have always heard.
8 Nevertheless, I can say that the command I am writing to you is a new command. It
is new because what Christ did was new, and what you are doing is new, because you
have been ceasing to conduct your lives in a morally impure manner and are now truly
conducting your lives in a pure manner. That is like [MET] no longer living in darkness.
Instead, it is like living where a brilliant light is already shining. 9 Those who claim
that they are pure in every way, like people [MET] living in the light, but hate any
of their fellow believers, are still behaving in an impure manner, like [MET] people
who are continually living in darkness. 10 But those who love their fellow believers
are continuing to conduct their lives like people who are living in the light. They are
people who please God [LIT]. So you should love your fellow believers. 11 But those
who hate any of their fellow believers are still conducting their lives in an impure
way, like [MET] people who are living in darkness. They do not know that they will
eventually destroy themselves eternally. They have become spiritually blind [PRS,
MET], unaware of spiritual truth.
I am writing all these matters to you because I know that God has forgiven your
sins and also because you have come to know the Father and Christ, who has always
existed, and because you have overcome the evil one.
1 John 2:12-14
12-13 I am writing this to you whom I love as though [MET] you were my little children,
to you who are spiritually mature people who are like [MET] fathers, and to you
spiritually vigorous/strong people who are like [MET] young men. Remember that
your sins have been forgiven {God has forgiven your sins} on account of what Christ
[MTY] has done. You now know Christ, the one who always existed. You have defeated
the evil one, Satan. 14 I will say it again: I have written this to you because you have
come to know the Father, because you now know Christ, the one who always existed,
because you are spiritually strong, because you continue to obey God’s word, and
because you have defeated the evil one, Satan.
Do not esteem the evil manner in which other people in the world live, since you
want to live forever.
1 John 2:15-171 JOHN 2:15
1833
1 JOHN 2:27
15 Do not desire to conduct you lives in the evil manner in which godless people in the
world [MTY] conduct their lives, and do not love anything that the evil people in the
world [MTY] consider to be good. Those who desire to conduct their lives in the evil
manner in which other people of the world [MTY] conduct their lives do not really love
God, their Father, at all. 16 Keep in mind that all the evil human desires in the world
are actions/things such as these: People desire to do what their self-directed nature
strongly desires. People desire to possess whatever ◄appeals to their senses/they see
or hear about►. People boast about the material things that they possess. Such evil
ways of living do not originate/come from the Father! Instead they originate/come
from the ◄godless people in the world/people in the world who conduct their lives
in a manner that displeases God► [MTY]! 17 The godless people in the world [MTY],
along with what they desire, will disappear, but those who do what God wants them
to do will live forever! You know that it is now the final period of this age when there
are liars who deny that Jesus is God’s Chosen One. But you have the power of God’s
Spirit and you know what is true and what is false. So continue to live according to
the true message that you heard when you began to believe in Christ, in order that
you may continue to live united both to God’s Son and to the Father.
1 John 2:18-25
18 You who are very dear to me, it is now ◄the final part [MTY] of this age/the
final period of time before Jesus returns►. Just like you heard from us apostles that
a person who opposes Christ will come/appear, even now there are many people
who oppose Christ. That is why we know that it is the final part of this age (OR,
before Jesus returns) [MTY]. 19 The people who oppose Christ refused to remain in our
congregations, but they never really ◄belonged with us/were fellow believers►. If
they had ◄belonged with us/been fellow believers►, they would have remained with
us. But because they left, everyone can clearly know that none of them ◄belongs with
us/is a fellow believer►. 20 But as for you, you have been given the power of God’s
Spirit, which comes from Christ (OR, God), the Holy One. As a result, you all know how
to ◄distinguish false teaching from/recognize what is false teaching and what is► the
true message. 21 I am writing this letter to you, not because you do not know what is
God’s true message, but because you do know what it is. You also know that no false
message originates/comes from God, who is the source of all truth. 22 The worst liars
are the ones who deny that Jesus is ◄the Messiah/the one whom God chose to rescue
us►. They are the ones that we told you about, the ones who oppose Christ. They
refuse to acknowledge/admit that God is the Father and that Jesus is his Son (OR, the
one who is also God). 23 Those who refuse to acknowledge/admit that Jesus is God’s
Son do not have a relationship with the Father. But those who acknowledge/admit
that Jesus is God’s Son not only have a relationship with God’s Son, but they have a
relationship with the Father also. 24 So, as for you, you must continue to conduct your
lives according to the true message that you heard when you began [MTY] to believe
in Christ. If you continue to do that, you will continue to have a close relationship
with both God’s Son and the Father. 25 And what God told us is that he will cause us
to live forever!
Continue to conduct your lives according to what you were originally taught by God’s
Spirit.
1 John 2:26-27
26 I have written this to you to ◄warn you about/tell you to beware of► those who
want to deceive you concerning the truth about Christ. 27 As for you, God’s Spirit,
whom you received from Christ, remains in you. So you do not need anyone to teach1 JOHN 2:28
1834
1 JOHN 3:10
you anything else that they claim/say is the truth. God’s Spirit is teaching you all of
God’s truth that you need to know. God’s Spirit is truthful and never says anything
that is false. So continue to conduct your lives in the way that he has taught you.
Continue to live united to Christ, so that you will be confident that he will accept you
when he returns.
1 John 2:28-29
28 Now, while some people are trying to persuade you to accept their false teaching,
I urge you, who are all very dear to me, to continue to have a close relationship with
Christ. We need to do that in order that we may be confident that he will accept us
when he comes back again. If we do that, we will not be ashamed when we stand
before him when he comes. 29 Since you know that Christ always does what is right,
you know that all those who continue doing what is right are the ones who have
become children of God.
3
Do not allow anyone to seduce you to sin, because you are God’s children, and his
children maintain themselves free from evil behavior by not continuing to sin as the
devil’s children do.
1 John 3:1-10
1 Think about how much our heavenly Father loves us! He allows us to ◄say that we
are/be called► his children! And it is indeed true that we are his children. But people
in the world [MTY] who are unbelievers have not understood who God is. So they do
not understand who we are, that we belong to God. 2 Dear friends, even though ◄at
present/now► we are God’s children, he has not yet ◄made clear/revealed► to us
what we will be like in the future. However, we know that when Christ comes back
again, we will be like him, because we will see what he is really like. 3 So, all those who
confidently expect to see Christ as he actually is/what Christ is like when he returns
must keep themselves pure in every way, just like Christ, who is pure in every way.
4 But everyone who continues sinning is refusing to obey God’s laws, because that
is what sin is, refusing to obey God’s laws. 5 You know that Christ came in order to
completely remove the guilt of our sins. You know also that he never sinned. 6 Those
who continue doing what Christ wants them to, do not continue sinning repeatedly.
But those who repeatedly sin have not understood who Christ is, nor have they had
a close relationship with him. 7 So I urge you, who are all very dear to me, do not let
anyone deceive you by telling you that it is all right to sin. If you continue doing what is
right, you are righteous, just like Christ is righteous. 8 But if anyone continues sinning,
he is like the devil, because the devil has always been sinning. And the reason why
God’s Son became a human being was to destroy what the devil has done. 9 People do
not continue sinning repeatedly if they have become children of God. Instead, they
continue to conduct their lives according to the character/nature that God produced in
them [MET]. They cannot continually sin because God has caused them to become his
children. 10 Those who are God’s children are clearly different from those who are
◄the devil’s/Satan’s► children. The way that we can know who are Satan’s children
is this: Those who do not do what is right are not God’s children. Specifically, those
who do not love their fellow believers are not God’s children Instead, they are Satan’s
children.
Because we have been changed from being spiritually dead people to being spiritually
alive people, we should love each other genuinely by helping our fellow believers who
are in need.
1 John 3:11-181 JOHN 3:11
1835
1 JOHN 4:2
11 The message that you heard when you first [MTY] believed in Christ is that we
should love each other. 12 We should not hate others as did Adam’s son, Cain, who
belonged to Satan, the evil one. Because Cain hated his younger brother, he murdered
him. ◄I will tell you about why he murdered his brother./Do you know why he
murdered his brother [RHQ]?► It was because Cain habitually conducted his life in
an evil way, and he hated his younger brother because his younger brother conducted
his life righteously. 13 You should not be amazed/surprised, my fellow believers, when
unbelievers [MTY] hate you. 14 We know that we have been changed from being
spiritually dead [MET] to being spiritually alive. We know this because we love our
fellow believers. Those who do not love their fellow believers are still spiritually [MET]
dead. 15 Those who hate any of their fellow believers, God considers [MET] them to be
murderers. And you know that no murderer has eternal life. 16 The way that we now
know how to truly love our fellow believers is by remembering that Christ ◄voluntarily
died/gave his life► for us. So, when our fellow believers need something, we should be
willing to help them. We should even be willing to die for them. 17 Many of us have
the things that are necessary for us to live in this world. If we become aware that
any of our fellow believers do not have what they need and if we refuse to ◄provide
for them/give to them what they need►, it is clear that we do not love God as we claim/
say that we do. 18 I say to all of you whom I love dearly, let us not merely say [MTY]
that we love our fellow believers! Let us genuinely/really love them by doing things
to help them!
We must believe in God’s Son and love each other in order to be confident that we
have a close relationship with God and that we will receive what we ask from him.
1 John 3:19-24
19 When we truly love our fellow believers, we can be sure that we are conducting
our lives according to the true message. As a result, we will not feel guilty/ashamed
when we talk [MTY] to God. 20 We can pray confidently, because although we might feel
guilty/ashamed about our sins, God is ◄greater/more worthy to be trusted► than what
we feel. He knows everything about us. 21 Dear friends, when we do not feel guilty
because of our sins, we can pray to God confidently. 22 And, when we confidently
pray to him and request something from him, we receive it because we do what he
commands us to do, and because we do what pleases him. 23 I will tell you what he
commands us to do: We must believe that Jesus Christ is ◄his Son/the one who is also
God►. We must also love each other, just like he commanded us to do. 24 Those who
do what God commands are ones who have a close relationship with God, and God
has a close relationship with them. I will tell you how we can be sure that God has a
close relationship with us: It is because we have his Spirit, whom he gave to us, that
we can be sure that God has a close relationship with us.
4
Continue to test the teachings you hear to know whether or not they are from God.
You should test those who teach them by whether or not they acknowledge that Jesus
Christ came in human form and also by what kind of people listen to that kind of
teaching.
1 John 4:1-6
1 Dear friends, many people who have a false message are teaching it to people
[MTY]. So do not trust every message that someone claims/says that God’s Spirit [MTY]
gave to him. Instead, ◄test/think carefully about► the teachings that you hear in order
to know whether they are from God or not. 2 I will tell you how to recognize teachings1 JOHN 4:3
1836
1 JOHN 4:18
that come from the Spirit of God: Those who affirm/say that Jesus Christ came from
God to become a human like us are teaching a message that is from God. 3 But those
who do not affirm/say that about Jesus are not teaching a message from God. They
are teachers who oppose Christ. You have heard that people like that are coming to
be among us. Even now they are already here!
4 As for you who are very dear to me, you belong to God, and you have refused
the false messages that those people teach, because God, who enables you to do what
he wants, is ◄greater/more powerful► than ◄Satan/the devil►, who enables ◄godless
people/people who conduct their lives in a way that displeases God► [MTY]. 5 As for
those who are teaching what is false, they are ◄godless people/people whose lives
are displeasing to God► [MTY]. Because of that, they teach what ◄godless people/
people whose lives are displeasing to God► [MTY] want to hear. That is why the
◄godless people/people whose lives displease God► [MTY] listen to them. 6 As for us
(exc), because we belong to God, whoever ◄knows/has a close relationship with► God
listens to us. But those who do not belong to God do not listen to us. That is how we
can know whether the things that people are teaching [MTY] are true or whether they
are false, and deceiving people.
We must love each other. God shows us what real love is.
1 John 4:7-11
7 Dear friends, we must love each other, because God enables us to love each other,
and because those who love their fellow believers have become God’s children and
◄know/have a close relationship with► him. 8 God’s nature is to love all people. So
those who do not love their fellow believers do not ◄know/have a relationship with►
God. 9 I will tell you how God has shown us that he loves us: He sent ◄his only Son/
the only one who was also God► to live on the earth to enable us to live eternally as
a result of our trusting in what he accomplished for us by dying for us. 10 And God
has shown us what it means to love another person: It does not mean that we loved
God, but it means that God loved us and sent ◄his Son/the one who was also God► to
sacrifice his life in order that our sins might be forgiven {he might forgive our sins}.
11 Dear friends, since God loves us like that, we certainly ought to love each other!
In order to be assured that we are conducting our lives according to God’s character,
we must love God and our fellow believers, because God loved us first.
1 John 4:12-21
12 No one has ever seen God. Nevertheless, if we love each other, it is evident that
God lives within us and that we love others just like he intends/wants us to do. 13 I will
tell you how we can be sure that we have a close relationship with God and that God
is within us: He has put his Spirit within us. 14 We apostles have seen ◄God’s Son/the
one who is also God►, and we tell people that the Father sent him to save the people
in the world [MTY] from being punished for their sins. 15 So those who affirm/say that
Jesus is the ◄Son of/one who is also► God, God is within them, and they have a close
relationship with God. 16 We have experienced how God loves us and we believe
that he loves us. As a result, we love others. Because God’s nature is to love people,
those who continue to love others have a close relationship with God, and God has
a close relationship with them. 17 We should love others completely. And if we do
that, when the time comes for him to judge us, we will be confident that he will not
condemn us (OR, that we have a close relationship with him). We will be confident of
that because of our conducting our lives in this world as Christ did. 18 We will not
be afraid of God if we truly love him, because those who love God completely cannot
possibly be afraid of him. We would be afraid only if we thought that he would punish1 JOHN 4:19
1837
1 JOHN 5:12
us. So those who are afraid of God certainly are not loving God completely. 19 We
love God and our fellow believers because God loved us first. 20 So those who say “I
love God” but hate a fellow believer are lying. Those who do not love one of their
fellow believers, whom they have seen, certainly cannot be loving God, whom they
have not seen. 21 Keep in mind that this is what God has commanded us: If we love
him, we must also love our fellow believers.
5
Those who believe that Jesus is God’s Chosen One are people who have been caused
to live spiritually, and they love their fellow believers. They obey God’s commands and
overcome the evils of human society.
1 John 5:1-5
1 All those who believe that Jesus is the ◄Messiah/person God sent to rescue us► are
ones who have truly become children of God. And everyone who loves a man who is
someone’s father will be expected to love that man’s children as well. Similarly, those
who love God, who has caused them to become his children [MET], should love their
fellow believers, whom God has also caused to become his children. 2 The way we can
be sure that we truly love God’s children is this: We are loving them when we love
God and do what he commands us to do. 3 I say this because our obeying what God
commands us to do is the same as loving him. And it is not burdensome/difficult for
us to do what God commands us to do. 4 All of us whom God has caused to become
his children have been able to successfully resist ◄doing what/conducting our lives
like► the people [MTY] who oppose God do. It is only by our trusting in Christ that
we are able to ◄resist doing what/conducting our lives like► people in the world who
are opposed to God [MTY] do. 5 ◄I will tell you who are the ones who are able to
resist doing what the people who are opposed to God do./Do you know who are the
ones who are able to resist conducting their lives like the people who are opposed to
God [MTY] do? [RHQ]► It is those who believe that Jesus is ◄God’s Son/the man who
is also God►.
Jesus came from God to earth. Those who believe in and live united to him have
eternal life.
1 John 5:6-12
6 Think about Jesus Christ. He is the one who came to earth from God. God showed
that he had truly sent Jesus when Jesus was baptized in water [MTY] and when Jesus’
blood flowed from his body when he died. God showed this not only when Jesus was
baptized [MTY], but also when Jesus’ blood flowed from his body when he died. And
God’s Spirit declares truthfully that Jesus Christ came from God. The Spirit always
speaks what is true. 7 There are three ways by which we know that Christ came from
God. 8 Those three ways are: What God’s Spirit tells us, what God said when Jesus
was baptized [MTY] in/with water, and Jesus’ blood that flowed from his body when he
died on the cross. These three things all tell us the same thing, that Jesus came from
God. 9 We usually believe what other people say. But what God says is more reliable/
trustworthy than what people say. So we must believe what God has said is true about
◄his Son/the one who is also God►. 10 Those who trust in the Son of God know within
their ◄inner beings/hearts► that what God says about his Son is true. But those who
refuse to believe that what God says is true are saying that God is a liar, because they
refuse to believe what God has said about ◄his Son/the one who is also God►. 11 This
is what God says to us: “I have given you eternal life!” We will live forever if we
have a close relationship with his Son. 12 Those who have a close relationship with
God’s Son (OR, who have accepted what God’s Son has done for them) have already1 JOHN 5:13
1838
1 JOHN 5:21
begun to live forever. But those who do not have a relationship with ◄God’s Son/the
one who is also God► (OR, who have not accepted what God’s Son has done for them)
have not begun to live forever.
We have a close relationship with God because we are united to his Son. Because of
that relationship, we have eternal life.
1 John 5:13-21
13 I have written this letter to you who believe that Jesus is [MTY] ◄God’s Son/the one
who is also God► in order that you may know that you have eternal life. 14 Because
we have a close relationship with him, we are very confident that he hears us when
we ask him to do anything that is in accordance with ◄his will/what he desires►.
15 And since we know that he hears whenever we ask him for something, we also
know that it is as though he has already done what we requested him to do.
16 Those who see one of their fellow believers sinning in a way that does not result
in being eternally separated from God should ask God to help that fellow believer; and
as a result God will help that fellow believer and enable him or her to live eternally.
But some people sin in a manner that causes them to be separated from God eternally.
I am not saying that you should ask God to help people who sin like that. 17 Everyone
who does what is wrong is sinning, but there are some sins that do not cause a person
to be separated from God. 18 We know that if a person has new life from God [MET],
that person does not continue sinning. Instead, the ◄Son of/one who is also► God
protects him so that Satan, the evil one, does not harm him spiritually. 19 We know
that we belong to God, and we know that the evil one controls all the evil people in
[MTY] the world. 20 We also know that ◄God’s Son/the one who is also God► has
come to us, and we know that he has enabled us to know God, the one who is really/
truly God. So now we have a close relationship with God because we belong to Jesus
Christ, the one who is the ◄Son of/man who is also► God. Jesus Christ is truly God,
and he is the one who enables us to have eternal life.
21 I say to you who are very dear to me, guard/keep yourselves from worshipping
gods that have no real power!2 JOHN 1
1839
2 JOHN 10
This book is one of the letters that the Apostle John
wrote to his fellow believers. We call this book
2 John
2 John 1-3
I, the Elder, write to the congregation and to all the members. I love you and know
that God the Father and his Son will bless us.
1 You all know me as the chief Elder. I am writing this letter to all of you [MET] in
your congregation. God has chosen you, and I love you truly! Not only do I myself
love you, but all those who know and accept the true message that Jesus taught also
love you! 2 All of us believe God’s true message. It is in our ◄inner beings/hearts► and
we will continue to believe it forever! 3 God the Father and Jesus Christ, who is ◄his
Son/the man who is also God►, will continue to act kindly and mercifully toward us
because they love us. They will enable us to have inner peace, because we believe their
true message.
I am happy that some of your members are living just like God commanded us to
live.
2 John 4
4 I am very happy because I learned about some of you [SYN] who are conducting
your lives in a manner that is ◄consistent/in accordance► with God’s true message.
You are doing that just like our Father God commanded us to do.
Continue to love each other just like God commanded us to love when we first began
to believe his true message.
2 John 5-6
5 And now, dear congregation [MET], there is something that I am requesting you
to do. I am writing this not to command that you do something new, but that you
continue to do what God commanded when we first began [MTY] to believe his true
message. What he commanded is that we love each other. 6 And we really/truly
are loving God when we are conducting our lives in accordance with whatever he
commands us to do. What he commands us to do is to continue to love one another.
That is exactly what you heard when you first began [MTY] to believe God’s true
message.
Be on your guard against teachers of false doctrine, so that you will receive your
complete reward of being with God eternally. Do not welcome or encourage any of these
false teachers in any way.
2 John 7-11
7 Many people who deceive others have left your congregation and have now gone
out among other people who are in your area [MTY]. They are the ones who ◄do not
acknowledge/refuse to say► that Jesus Christ became human. They are the very ones
who deceive people and oppose what we teach about Christ. 8 So be sure that you
do not let those teachers deceive you! If you let them deceive you, you will lose the
reward which we, together with you, have been working for, and you will not receive
the complete reward of being eternally united to God! 9 Those who change what Christ
taught and do not continue to believe what he taught do not have a relationship with
God. But those who continue to believe what Christ taught have a close relationship
with both God, our Father, and with ◄his Son/the one who is also God►. 10 So when2 JOHN 11
1840
2 JOHN 13
anyone comes to you who teaches something different from what Christ taught, do not
welcome him into your homes! Do not encourage him by ◄wishing him well/greeting
him as a fellow believer► in any way! 11 I say that because if you treat people like
that as you would treat a fellow believer, God will punish you along with them for the
evil that they do.
Instead of writing much more to you, I expect to come and talk directly with you.
The members of your sister congregation greet you.
2 John 12-13
12 Even though I have much more that I want to tell you, I have decided not to say
it in a letter [MTY]. Instead, I expect to be with you soon and talk directly with you.
Then we can be completely joyful together. 13 Your fellow believers here [MET], ones
whom God has also chosen, ◄send their greetings to you/say that they are thinking
affectionately about you►.3 JOHN 1
1841
3 JOHN 11
This book is a letter that the Apostle John wrote to Gaius,
a fellow believer. We call this book
3 John
3 John 1-4
I, the Elder, write to you, Gaius, whom I truly love. I ask God that you will do well
in all respects. I am happy because of the way you conduct your lives.
1 You(sg) know me as the chief Elder. I am writing this letter to you, my dear friend
Gaius, whom I truly love. 2 Dear friend, I ask God that things may go well for you in
every way, specifically, that you will be physically healthy just like you are spiritually
healthy [MTY]. 3 I am very happy because some fellow believers have come here and
told me that you conduct your life in a manner that is consistent with God’s true
message. 4 I am very happy when I hear that ◄people whom I helped to believe in
Christ/my spiritual children► are conducting their lives like you are!
Continue receiving the visiting fellow believers, as you have been doing.
3 John 5-6
5 Dear friend, you are serving Jesus loyally/faithfully whenever you do things to
help fellow believers, even those whom you do not know, who are traveling around
doing God’s work. 6 Some of them have reported before the congregation here how
you have showed that you love them. You should continue to help such people in
their travels in a way that is pleasing to God.
Especially provide for them financially.
3 John 7-8
7 When those fellow believers went out to tell people about Jesus [MTY], the people
who do not believe in Christ did not give them anything to help them. 8 So we who
believe in Christ ought to give food and money to such people to help them as they
teach others God’s true message.
Because Diotrephes does not recognize my authority, I will publicly expose what he
does in opposing us.
3 John 9-10
9 I wrote a letter to the congregation telling them to help those fellow believers.
However, Diotrephes does not ◄acknowledge my authority/pay any attention to what
I wrote►, because he ◄desires to be in charge/ wants to be the leader► of the
congregation. 10 So, when I arrive there, I will publicly tell what he does: He tells
others evil nonsense about us in order to harm us by what he says, and he is not
content with only doing that. He himself refuses to receive the fellow believers who
are traveling around doing God’s work, and he also stops those who want to receive
them by expelling them from the congregation.
Do not imitate a bad example; imitate good ones.
3 John 11
11 Dear friend, do not imitate a bad example like that. Instead, keep imitating good
examples. Remember that people who do good deeds ◄truly belong to God/are spiritual
children of God►, but those who do what is evil do not ◄know/have fellowship with►
God.3 JOHN 12
1842
3 JOHN 15
You will do well to receive Demetrius, who is highly recommended.
3 John 12
12 All the believers who know Demetrius say that he is a good person. The fact that
he conducts his life in a way that is consistent/in accordance with God’s true message
shows that he is a good person, and we also say the same thing about him. You know
that what we say about him is true. So it will be good if you welcome him and help
him. He is the one who will be bringing this letter to you.
Instead of writing more, I expect to visit you soon, and we will speak directly with
one another. Our mutual friends here send their greetings to all of you.
3 John 13-15
13 When I began to write this letter, I had much more that I intended to tell you. But
now I do not want to say it in a letter [MTY]. 14 Instead, I expect to come and see you
soon. Then we will talk directly with one another. 15 I pray that God will enable you
to experience inner peace. Our friends here ◄send you their greetings/say that they
are thinking affectionately about you► [MTY]. Tell our friends there that we ◄send
our greetings to/are thinking fondly about► them.JUDE 1
1843
JUDE 8
This book is a letter that Jude, a brother of Jesus, wrote
to his fellow believers. We call this book
Jude
Jude 1-2
I, Jude, a servant of Jesus Christ and brother of James, write to you who are chosen,
loved, and protected by God.
1 I am Jude. I serve Jesus Christ like a voluntary slave [MET]. I am a younger brother
of James, the leader of all the congregations. I am writing to you whom God has chosen
to belong to him. You are loved by God our Father and protected by Jesus Christ (OR,
whom God has protected to present to Jesus Christ). 2 I pray that you will continue
to experience very much God acting mercifully toward you, causing you to have inner
peace, and loving you.
it.
Proclaim the truth that we believe and strongly defend it against those who oppose
Jude 3-4
3 You whom I love, I ◄was very eager/very much wanted► to write to you about that
which we all ◄share/have in common►, which is how ◄God/Jesus Christ► has saved
us. But now I realize that it is necessary for me to write to you in order to exhort
you to defend the truth about Christ that we believe. Jesus and his apostles gave that
truth once and for all to us who belong to God, and we must not let it be changed
{anyone revise/change it}. 4 Some people falsely teach that because God kindly does
for us what we do not deserve, it ◄does not matter/is all right► if we continue to sin.
Those people show by the way that they conduct their lives that they do not want to
admit/accept that Jesus Christ is our only Master and Lord. It was written long ago
{Someone long ago wrote} that God would condemn ◄such ungodly people/people
like that whose lives are displeasing to him►. But some of those people have entered
[MET] like crawling snakes into your congregations and oppose the truth about Christ,
so you must resist/oppose them.
How God destroyed three groups illustrates that he will destroy these ungodly people
in your midst.
Jude 5-8
5 Although you previously knew all these things, there are certain things about which
I desire to remind you. Do not forget that although the Lord rescued his people from
Egypt, he later destroyed most of those same people, ones who did not believe in him.
6 And there were many angels to whom God assigned/gave positions of authority in
heaven. But many did not continue to rule with authority in those positions. Instead,
they abandoned the place that God gave them to live in heaven. So God has put those
angels in chains forever in the darkness in hell. They will stay there until the great
day when God will judge and punish them. 7 Similarly, the people who lived [MTY]
in Sodom and Gomorrah cities and the nearby cities committed sexual immorality.
They sought all kinds of sexual relations that differ from what God permits. So God
destroyed their cities. What happened to those people and those angels shows that God
will punish people, such as the ones who teach false doctrine, in the eternal fire of hell.
8 Similarly, these ungodly people in your midst also defile their own bodies by living
immorally, because they claim/say that God revealed in visions that they should actJUDE 9
1844
JUDE 15
that way. They refuse to allow anyone to have authority over them, and they ◄revile/
speak evil about► God’s glorious/wonderful angels.
Those teachers of false doctrine revile the spiritual beings that they do not
understand. But God will destroy them.
Jude 9-10
9 When ◄the devil/Satan► argued with the chief angel, Michael, about who would
take away the body of the prophet Moses to bury it, Michael did not do as these
teachers of false doctrine do. Even though Michael has much more authority than they
do, he did not disrespectfully ◄revile/say evil things to► Satan and accuse/condemn
him. Instead, he only said, “I desire that the Lord God will rebuke you!” 10 But the
ones in your midst who teach false doctrine ◄revile/speak evil against► the spiritual
beings that they do not understand. They also do the evil things that they desire,
things that they know about ◄naturally/without needing to think►, things that they
just do without considering the consequences/results, like animals. So they destroy
themselves. But they will also be punished by God {God will also punish them}.
Because the teachers of false doctrine do wicked things, God will condemn them to
hell. They are dangerous, useless, spiritually dead, restless, shameless, and unreliable.
Jude 11-13
11 God will do terrible things to those who teach false doctrine! They conduct
their lives wickedly like Cain, who murdered his brother because he was ◄jealous/
angry because God accepted his brother’s sacrifice and did not accept his►. These false
teachers ◄devote themselves to [MET] doing wrong things like Balaam, who tried to
induce God’s people to sin in order to get the money that was offered to him. They will
perish like Korah, who rebelled against the authority that God gave to Moses. 12 Those
teachers of false doctrine are as dangerous to you as [MET] ◄hidden rocks on a reef/
rocks underneath the surface of the ocean► are to a boat. When you gather together
to eat the meals that help you believers to love each other more and have a closer
relationship with each other, they join you and carouse shamelessly, caring only for
themselves and not for others. Because they do not do anything to help others [MET],
they are as useless as clouds that are blown along by the wind {that the wind blows
along} but that do not produce/give any rain. They are as disappointing as [MET] trees
that do not produce fruit in the autumn as we expect them to. They are not only
spiritually [MET] dead themselves, but they are not able to cause others to be alive
spiritually, just like [MET] trees that have been {that someone has} uprooted and as a
result are unable to produce any fruit. 13 They are restless [MET], like the pounding
waves of the ocean. Just like waves produce foul-smelling foam on the shore, those
teachers of false doctrine do shameful [MTY] deeds. We cannot depend/rely on them to
show us how to conduct our lives [MET], just like we cannot depend/rely on ◄meteors/
falling stars► to show us the way when we travel. God has reserved intense darkness
for them forever in hell.
Enoch prophesied that the Lord will condemn people like the wicked teachers of false
doctrine. They grumble, are discontent, and are arrogant flatterers.
Jude 14-16
14 Enoch, the sixth person in the line of people who descended from Adam, prophesied
this about those teachers of false doctrine: “Listen carefully to this: The Lord will
certainly come with a countless number of his holy angels in order 15 to judge
everyone, and to punish all wicked and ◄ungodly people/people whose lives are
displeasing to God► for all the ◄ungodly things/things that displease God► that they
did in ◄an ungodly way/a way that displeases God►, and for all the harsh things thatJUDE 16
1845
JUDE 25
ungodly sinful people have spoken against him.” 16 Those teachers of false doctrine
grumble about the things that God does. They complain about what happens to them.
They do the sinful things that their bodies desire. They talk boastfully. They ◄flatter/
say nice things to► people, only in order to get those people to give them the things
that they want.
The apostles predicted that wicked people like the teachers of false doctrine would
come. They divide believers, live according to what they desire, and are devoid of God’s
Spirit.
Jude 17-19
17 But you people whom I love need to remember the things that were predicted by
the apostles of our Lord Jesus Christ {that the apostles of our Lord Jesus Christ said
would happen}. 18 They told you, “In the final period of time in which we are now
living there will be people who will laugh at the truths that God has revealed. They will
do the ◄ungodly things/things that are displeasing to God► that their bodies desire.”
19 That describes the teachers of false doctrine well, because they are the ones who
cause divisions among believers. They do what their own minds tell them to do. The
Spirit of God does not live within them.
Believe the truth more firmly, pray by the power of the Spirit, and keep expecting
God to be merciful.
Jude 20-21
20 But you people whom I love, ◄hold/continue to trust► firmly to the very sacred
truths that you believe. Pray by letting the Holy Spirit enable/empower you. 21 Keep
conducting your lives in a way that is appropriate for those whom God loves. Keep
constantly expecting that our Lord Jesus Christ will act mercifully toward you. Keep
expecting that until the time when we begin living eternally with him.
Mercifully help those who are not certain what to believe, rescue those who are in
danger of being influenced by the teachers of false doctrine, and pity those completely
convinced by them.
Jude 22-23
22 Mercifully help those who are not certain what teaching they should believe.
23 Rescue others from the influence of those who teach what is false [MET], as you
would rescue things by snatching them from a fire. Pity those whom the teachers
of false doctrine have completely convinced, but beware that you yourselves are not
influenced by them {that they do not influence you}. Detest doing or even thinking
about the sins that those people commit, just like you would detest [MET] touching not
only filthy things but the clothes that were stained by those things {that those things
stained}.
God, who is able to keep you from being condemned for your sin and to present you
guiltless before him, was great and ruled before time began, is still like that, and will
remain so forever.
Jude 24-25
24 God is able to keep you from ceasing to trust in him (OR, from sinning), and he
is able to bring you into his glorious presence. As you stand before him, there will
be nothing for which you will be condemned {he can condemn you}, and you will be
rejoicing greatly. 25 He is the only true God. He has saved us as a result of what Jesus
Christ our Lord did for us. God was glorious and great and mighty and he ruled with
great authority before time began. He is still like that, and he will remain like that
forever! ◄Amen!/That is true!►REVELATION 1:1
1846
REVELATION 1:9
This book contains the account of Jesus giving the Apostle
John some visions. We call this book
Revelation
Revelation 1:1-3
John urged people to read this book, listen carefully to it, and obey it.
God revealed it to
him in order that he might reveal to his servants the things/events that must happen
soon. Jesus communicated this message to me, his servant John, by sending his angel
to me. 2 As I write it, I, John, am truthfully reporting everything that I saw and heard,
the message from God that Jesus Christ truthfully reported to me. 3 God is pleased
with those who read this book to the congregations, and he will be pleased with those
who listen carefully to it and obey what he has commanded in this prophetic message
that I am writing. So read this message to the congregations, listen carefully to it, and
obey it, because these things that Jesus has revealed will happen soon.
1 This book tells the message that God revealed to Jesus Christ.
John said that he was writing to believers in the seven congregations in Asia. He
prayed that God would bless them. He said that Christ is coming to judge rebellious
people and to start to rule as king.
Revelation 1:4-8
4 I, John, am writing this to you believers in the seven congregations that are located
in Asia province. I pray that God the Father, God’s Spirit, and Jesus Christ be kind to
(OR, bless) you and cause you to have inner peace. God the Father is the one who
exists, who has always existed, and who will always exist. The Spirit of God, who is
in front of God’s throne, has all kinds of power (OR, The Spirit of God is symbolized
by seven spirits who are in front of God’s throne). 5 Jesus Christ is the one who has
faithfully told people about God. He is the first one ◄whom God has raised from the
dead/who became alive again after being dead►, in order to show that God will raise
us who trust in Jesus. Jesus is the one who rules the kings of the earth. He is the
one who loves us. He is the one who has erased the record our sins. He did that by
shedding his blood when he died on the cross. 6 He is the one who has caused us to
become people whose lives God rules, and he has made us to be priests who serve
God his Father. As a result of this, we acknowledge that Jesus Christ is eternally divine
and eternally powerful. ◄Amen!/That is true!►
7 Listen carefully! Christ will surely come in the midst of the clouds in order that he
may judge the rebellious people of earth, and everyone [SYN] will see him come. Even
those who are responsible for piercing and killing him [MTY] will see him come. People
from all people-groups on earth will mourn because he will punish them. ◄Amen!/
May it be so.► 8 The Lord God declares, “I am the one who created everything, and I
am the one who will cause everything to end [MET].” He is the one who exists, who
has always existed, and who will always exist. He is the Almighty One.
Christ appeared to John and commissioned him to write down the vision that he was
about to give him and to send it to the seven congregations in Asia.
Revelation 1:9-20
9 I, John, your fellow believer, am suffering as you are because of our letting Jesus
rule our lives. We are steadfastly enduring trials because of our relationship with
him. I was punished by being sent/exiled to Patmos island because of my proclaimingREVELATION 1:10
1847
REVELATION 2:7
God’s message and telling people about Jesus. 10 God’s Spirit took control of me on one
of the days that we believers met to worship the Lord. 11 At that time, I heard behind
me someone speaking to me as loudly and as clearly [SIM] as a trumpet. He was saying
to me, “Write on a scroll what you see, and send it to seven congregations. Send it to
the congregations in Ephesus city, in Smyrna city, in Pergamum city, in Thyatira city,
in Sardis city, in Philadelphia city, and in Laodicea city.” 12 In this vision I turned in
order that I might see who had spoken to me [SYN]. When I turned, 13 I saw seven
golden lampstands. In the midst of the lampstands there was someone who looked
like he came from heaven. He wore a robe that reached to his feet, and he wore a
gold band around his chest. 14 The hair on his head was white like white wool or like
snow. His eyes were shining brightly [SIM], like a flame of fire. 15 His feet looked like
brass that glows as it is being purified {as people purify it} in a furnace. When he
spoke, his voice sounded like the sound made by a huge waterfall (OR, a great/wide
river of rushing water). 16 In his right hand he held seven stars. A sword that had
two sharp edges extended from his mouth. His face shone as bright as the sun shines
at midday [MTY]. 17 When I saw him, I fell down at his feet and was unable to move
or speak [SIM], as though I were dead. But he put his right hand on me and said
to me, “Don’t be afraid! I am the one who created all things and the one who will
cause all things to end. 18 I am the living one. Although I died, I am alive again and
will live forever! I have the power to cause people to die, and I have authority over
the place where all the dead people are. 19 So write the vision that you are seeing.
Write about the conditions that exist now, and the events that are about to happen
next. 20 The meaning of the seven stars that you saw in my right hand and the seven
golden lampstands that you saw is this: The seven stars in my hand represent the
leaders, who are like angels, who watch over the seven congregations, and the seven
lampstands represent the seven congregations.”
2
Christ exhorts the congregation at Ephesus to repent and to begin again to love him
and each other.
Revelation 2:1-7
1 He also said to me, “Write this message to the leader [MET] of the congregation
in Ephesus city: ‘I am saying these things to you: I am the one who firmly holds
the seven stars in my right hand. I am the one who walks among the seven golden
lampstands. 2 I know what you do: You labor for me intensely, and you continue to
serve me steadfastly. I know that you cannot tolerate people who teach what is evil
[MTY], and that you investigated people who falsely claimed that they are apostles,
and you found that they were lying. 3 I know also that you continue to serve me
steadfastly. Even when people ◄caused you to suffer/persecuted you►, you continued
to serve me because you believe in me, and you have not become too tired to keep
on serving me. 4 Nevertheless, I have this complaint against you: You no longer love
each other and me as you did when you first [MTY] trusted in me. 5 So, I tell you to
remember how you used to love me and each other, and to realize that you no longer
love as you did. I tell you to turn away from your sin of not loving me and each
other, and start loving each other and me again as you did at first. If you do not turn
away from your sinful behavior, I will come to judge you and cause your group to
cease to be a Christian congregation [MET]. 6 But you have the following good quality:
Those Nicolaitans teach you believers that you can worship idols and that you may act
immorally. However, you hate such teaching, just like I also hate it. 7 Everyone who
wants to understand my message [MTY] must listen carefully to the message thatREVELATION 2:8
1848
REVELATION 2:17
God’s Spirit speaks to the congregations. To everyone who overcomes Satan, I will
give the right to eat fruit [MTY] from the tree that gives eternal life, the tree that is in
God’s garden.’ ”
Christ exhorts the congregation at Smyrna not to fear what they will suffer, but to
trust in him, even if they must die because they trust in him.
Revelation 2:8-11
8 “Write this message to the leader [MET] of the congregation in Smyrna city: ‘I am
saying these things to you. I am the one who caused everything to have a beginning
and who will cause all things to end. I am the one who died and became alive again.
9 I know that you suffer because of what unbelievers do to you, and that you lack
material possessions. But I also know that you are spiritually [MET] rich. I know that
people ◄slander/say evil things about► you. They say that they are Jews, but I do
not consider that they are Jews. I consider that they belong to the group that Satan
controls! 10 Do not be afraid of any of the things that you are about to suffer. The truth
is that the devil is about to put some of you in prison, to tempt you to deny that you
believe in me. For a short period of time you will suffer because of what people will do
to you [MTY]. Continue to trust in me, even if they kill you because you trust in me. As
a result, I will reward you with eternal life, just like [MET] people reward a victorious
athlete by putting a wreath on his head. 11 Everyone who wants to understand [MTY]
must listen carefully to the message that God’s Spirit speaks to the congregations.
After those who conquer Satan die, they will live with God. They will never suffer
again, even though many others will suffer as though they died a second time.’ ”
Christ exhorts the congregation at Pergamum to stop listening to what the
Nicolaitans teach.
Revelation 2:12-17
12 “Write this message to the leader [MET] of the congregation in Pergamum city: ‘I
am saying these things to you. I am the one who has the sharp two-edged sword. 13 I
know where you live: It is where Satan controls [MTY] people. I know that you firmly
believe in me [MTY]. You did not deny that you believe/trust in me, not even in the
time when Antipas, ◄my faithful witness/who faithfully told people about me►, was
alive. He was killed {People killed him} in your city, a city where people habitually
obey Satan. 14 Nevertheless, I have this complaint against you: You permit some
of your members to teach things like Balaam taught long ago. He taught Balak to
persuade the Israeli people to sin. Specifically, he taught them to eat food that had
been offered to idols, and to practice sexual immorality. 15 In that way, you are also
permitting some of your members to practice what the Nicolaitans teach, which is like
what Balaam taught. 16 So you must stop doing this. If you do not stop doing it, I
will come to you suddenly. Using the words that I will say I will fight against those
who believe this false teaching [MTY], and I will ◄condemn them/say that they must be
punished►. 17 Everyone who wants to understand [MTY] must listen carefully to the
message that God’s Spirit speaks to the congregations. To everyone who conquers
Satan, I will give blessings that will be like the food called manna that is in a jar that
is {that someone has} hidden. I will also give them a white stone on which I will
engrave a new name, a name that no one but the ones who receive it will know.’ ”
Christ rebukes the congregation at Thyatira for tolerating a teacher who encourages
sexual immorality and eating food offered to idols. He warns those who participate in
these things that he will punish them unless they repent, and he exhorts the rest of the
members to remain loyal to him.
Revelation 2:18-29REVELATION 2:18
1849
REVELATION 3:4
18 “Write this message to the leader [MET] of the congregation in Thyatira city: ‘I,
◄the Son of God/the one who is also God►, am saying these things to you: I am the
one whose eyes shine [SIM] like a flame of fire, and whose feet shine [MET] like fine
brass. 19 I know that you love me and each other, and that you trust in me. I know
that you serve others and that you steadfastly endure a lot of difficulties/trials. I
know that you are doing these things more now than you have done them in the past.
20 Nevertheless, I have this complaint about you: You tolerate that woman among your
members who is like [MET] that wicked queen Jezebel who lived long ago. She says that
she ◄is a prophetess/proclaims messages that come directly from God►, but through
what she teaches she is deceiving my servants. She is urging them to commit sexual
immorality and to eat food that they have offered to idols. 21 Although I gave her time
to stop her sexual immorality and pagan practices, she did not want to stop doing them.
22 As a result, I will cause her to become very ill [MTY]. I will also cause those who
act immorally as she does [MET] to suffer greatly, if they do not stop doing what she
does. 23 Some have become like her children by doing what she teaches [MET]; I will
certainly get rid of them. As a result, all the congregations will recognize that I am
the one who finds out what everyone thinks and desires [MTY]. I will reward each of
you according to what you have done. 24 But I have something good to say about the
rest of you believers in Thyatira. It is good that you do not accept that false teaching.
It is good that you reject what those teachers call their ‘secret practices’, practices that
Satan inspired (OR, what those teachers facetiously call the secret, profound practices
that Satan inspires). I will not burden you with any commands other than that which
you already have been told. 25 Just keep believing firmly in me, and obey me until
I return. 26 As for those who conquer Satan and who (OR, because they) keep on
doing what I command until they die, I will give them authority, just like I myself
received it from my Father. They will exercise that authority over the nations that
rebel against God. 27 They will rule them severely as if they were striking them [HYP]
with an iron rod. They will destroy those who do evil things just like people shatter
clay pots [MET]. 28 I will also enable everyone who conquers Satan to shine gloriously
like the morning star does [MTY, MET]. 29 Everyone who wants to understand [MTY]
must listen carefully to the message that God’s Spirit speaks to the congregations.’ ”
3
Christ exhorts the congregation at Sardis to wake up and repent. But the members
who are worthy will live with him.
Revelation 3:1-6
1 “Write this message to the leader [MET] of the congregation in Sardis city: ‘I am
saying these things to you. I am the one who can give to people all the power of God’s
Spirit (OR, in whom is the Spirit of God who has all kinds of power; OR, who has God’s
Spirit, who is symbolized as seven spirits), and I am the one who has the seven stars.
I know everything that you have done. You (pl) appear to be alive spiritually, but you
are so weak spiritually it is as though you are dead [MET]. 2 Become aware of your
spiritual need as though you were awaking from sleep [MET], and strengthen yourself
spiritually, because you are so useless that you are like someone who is about to die
[MET]. You must do this because I know that my God considers that nothing that you
do is satisfactory. 3 So then, keep remembering God’s message, what you accepted
when you heard it. Obey it continually, and turn away from your sinful behavior.
If you do not become aware of your spiritual need and turn away from your [MET]
sinful behavior, I will come to you when you are not expecting me, as a thief comes
[SIM]. You will never know at what time I will come to judge you. 4 Nevertheless,REVELATION 3:5
1850
REVELATION 3:14
there in Sardis you have a few members who have not been doing what is wrong. It
is as though they have not soiled their garments [MET]. As a result, because they are
worthy to live with me, they will live with me and will be pure in every way [MET], like
people who are dressed in pure white clothing. 5 Everyone who conquers Satan I will
dress in these same white garments [MET] (OR, will be pure in every way as though
they are dressed in these white garments), and I will never erase their names from
the book that contains the names of the people who have eternal life. Instead, as my
Father and his angels are listening, I will acknowledge that they [MTY] belong to me.
6 Everyone who wants to understand [MTY] must listen carefully to the message that
God’s Spirit speaks to the congregations.’ ”
Christ exhorts the congregation at Philadelphia to continue to obey his word and to
be faithful; he promises that some Jews will acknowledge that he loves the congregation,
and he also promises that he will keep the congregation from spiritual harm during the
period of testing.
Revelation 3:7-13
7 “Write this message to the leader [MET] of the congregation in Philadelphia city:
‘I am saying these things to you. I am God’s Holy One, the True One. Just like King
David had authority [MTY] to allow people to enter the ancient city of Jerusalem, so
I have the authority to allow people to enter my kingdom. I am the one who opens
doors so that no one can close them, and who closes doors so that no one can open
them. 8 I know everything you have done. Be aware that I have opened a door before
you, a door that no one can close. I know that although there are not many believers
(OR, much spiritual strength) [MTY] in your congregation, you have obeyed what I say,
and you have not denied that you believe in me [MTY]. 9 I am aware that some of your
people meet together with those who follow/worship Satan. They claim to be Jews,
but I know that they are not true Jews. They are lying. I will cause them to come to
you and to bow down humbly at your feet and to acknowledge that I love you.
10 Because you have paid attention to the message to endure patiently when you
suffered, I will keep you safe from those who will try to harm you spiritually during
the period/time that is about to come. At that time God will cause rebellious people
on the earth to suffer, in order that I can determine whether they will turn away from
their sins or not. 11 I am coming soon. So continue believe firmly the message that
you have received, in order that no one may cause you to lose the reward that God
has reserved for you. 12 I will make everyone who conquers Satan secure. They will
stand in the temple of my God, they will stand firm like [MET] pillars, and they will
remain there forever. I will mark them with the name of my God, showing that they
belong to him. I will also mark them with the name of the city of my God, showing that
they will live there. That city is the New Jerusalem, the city that my God will cause to
descend down from heaven. I will also mark them with my new name, showing that
they belong to me. 13 Everyone who wants to understand [MTY] must listen carefully
to the message that God’s Spirit speaks to the congregations.’ ”
Christ exhorts the congregation at Laodicea to repent of their neglect of fellowship
with him and of their failure to accept his provision for their spiritual needs. He waits
to restore fellowship with any member of the congregation who will respond to his call.
Revelation 3:14-22
14 “Write this message to the leader [MET] of the congregation in Laodicea city: ‘I
am saying these things to you. I am the one who ◄guarantees everything that God’s
promises/confirms that he will do all that he has promised► [MET]. I am the one who
testifies about God reliably and accurately. I am the one who God used to createREVELATION 3:15
1851
REVELATION 4:7-8
everything. 15 I know everything that you have done: You neither deny that you trust
in me nor love/obey me zealously/wholeheartedly. You are like water that is neither
cold nor hot. I wish that you were either cold or hot! 16 Because you are neither
enthusiastic about me nor concerned about your lack of spiritual growth [MET], I
am about to reject you [MET], as if I were spitting lukewarm water out of my mouth.
17 You are saying, “Because we have all that we need spiritually, we are like rich people
who have acquired a lot of wealth. We lack nothing!” But you do not realize that you
are lacking in so many ways spiritually that you are like [MET] people who are very
wretched and pitiful, poor, blind, and naked. 18 I advise you to obtain from me all that
you need spiritually, as though you were buying from me gold that has been refined by
fire {that fire has refined}, in order that you may be truly rich [MET] spiritually. Let
me make you righteous, as though you were [MET] buying from me white garments
in order that you might wear clothes instead of being naked and ashamed. Let me
help you to perceive spiritual things, as though [MET] you were buying from me eye
salve to put in your eyes in order that you might see. 19 Since I rebuke and correct
all those whom I affectionately love, earnestly stop your sinful behavior. 20 Be aware
that I invite each one of you to respond to me as though [MET] I was standing waiting
at your door and knocking. I will come to all those who hear my voice and respond to
me, and I will fellowship with them as friends do when they eat together [MET]. 21 I will
permit everyone who conquers Satan to sit and rule with me on my throne, just like
I conquered Satan and now sit and rule beside my Father on his throne. 22 Everyone
who wants to understand [MTY] must listen carefully to the message that God’s Spirit
speaks to the congregations.’ ”
4
A throne was in heaven with someone sitting on it. He was in the midst of every
creature and object in heaven. The elders and the living creatures worshipped him as
God, the mighty Creator.
Revelation 4:1-11
1 After these things I, John, saw in the vision that there was a door open in heaven.
The one whose voice was like [SIM] a loud trumpet, the one who had spoken to me
previously, said to me, “Come up here! I will show you events that must happen later.”
2 Immediately I experienced that God’s Spirit was specially controlling me. There was
a throne there in heaven, and on the throne someone was sitting and ruling. 3 He
shone like [SIM] a brilliant crystalline jasper jewel and like a brilliant red carnelian
jewel. Around the throne was a rainbow that shone like a brilliant green emerald
jewel. 4 Around the throne there were 24 other thrones. On these thrones 24 elders
were sitting. They were wearing pure white garments and had golden crowns on
their heads. 5 From the throne there came lightning and rumblings and thundering.
Seven torches of fire were burning in front of the throne. Those represent the Spirit
of God, who has all kinds of power (OR, who is also symbolized as seven spirits). 6 In
front of the throne there was what looked like an ocean made of glass. It was clear,
like crystal. On each of the four sides of the throne there was a living creature. Each
one was covered with eyes in front and behind. 7-8 The first living creature was like
a lion. The second living creature was like an ox. The third living creature had a face
like a man’s face. The fourth living creature was like an eagle that was flying. Each
of the four living creatures had six wings. They were covered with eyes, all around
their bodies and under their wings. Day and night they continually [LIT] sing:
Holy, holy, holy is the Lord God, the Almighty One.
He is the one who has always existed,REVELATION 4:9-10
1852
REVELATION 5:10
who exists now, and who will always exist.
9-10 The living creatures praise, honor [DOU], and thank the one who sits on the
throne, the one who lives forever. Whenever they do that, the 24 elders ◄prostrate
themselves/kneel down► before the one who sits on the throne, and they worship
him, the one who lives forever. They lay their crowns in front of the throne and sing:
11 Our(exc) Lord and God,
you are worthy that all beings praise you,
you are worthy that all beings honor you, and
you are worthy that all beings acknowledge
that you are the powerful one,
because you alone created all things.
Moreover, because you planned that they should exist,
you created them, and so they exist.
5
When the Lamb took the scroll from the one on the throne, the whole created
universe worshipped him who is the worthy Redeemer. The 24 elders and the four
living creatures acknowledged that he alone was worthy to open the seals on the scroll.
Revelation 5:1-14
1 I saw that there was a scroll in the right hand of the one who was sitting on the
throne. The scroll was written on its outside as well as on its inside, and it was sealed
{Someone had written on the outside as well as on the inside of the scroll and sealed
it} with seven seals. 2 I saw a strong angel who was announcing in a loud voice, “◄The
person who is worthy to break the seals of the scroll and then to open it should come
to do it!/Who is worthy to break the seals of the scroll and then to open it?►” [RHQ]
3 But no created being in heaven nor any created being on the earth nor any created
being under the earth was able to open the scroll and see what was written on it. 4 I
cried loudly because there was no one worthy to do that. 5 But one of the elders said
to me, “Do not cry any longer! Look, the one who is called the Lion from the tribe of
Judah, the Messiah who is the descendant of King David, has overcome Satan! As a
result, he is worthy to break the seven seals on the scroll and open it!” 6 Then I saw
Jesus, the one who is like a [MET] sacrificial lamb, standing there. He stood near the
throne, in the midst of the four living creatures and the elders. It appeared that he
had been killed {that people had killed him}, but he was alive again. He had seven
horns on his head, and he had seven eyes that symbolize the Spirit of God who has all
kinds of power (OR, who is also symbolized as seven spirits). He sends God’s Spirit
out into all the earth. 7 He came and took the scroll from the right hand of the one
who sits on the throne. 8 When he took the scroll, the four living creatures and the 24
elders ◄prostrated themselves/knelt down► before Jesus, the one who is like a lamb,
to worship him. They each had a harp, and they had golden bowls full of incense that
represents the prayers of God’s people. 9 The living creatures and the elders sang a
new song. They sang:
You are worthy to receive the scroll and to open its seals,
because you were killed, and because you redeemed/bought people for God from
every tribe, language [MTY], people-group, and nation with the blood that
flowed from your body when you died.
10 You have caused them to become a people over whom our God rules,
and to become priests who serve him, and they will rule on [MTY] the earth.REVELATION 5:11
1853
REVELATION 6:9
11 As I continued to look, I heard the voices of many angels around the throne and
around the living creatures and the elders. There were millions of them, a crowd so
large that no one could count them. 12 They were singing in a loud voice:
“The one who is like a lamb was killed {whom his enemies killed}
but he became alive again.
He is worthy that all created beings acknowledge that he is infinitely powerful,
infinitely rich, infinitely wise, and infinitely strong!
He is worthy of being honored and praised by all created beings!”
13 I also heard every creature that is in heaven and on the earth and under the
earth and on the ocean, every creature in all those places, saying (OR, singing):
“We must forever praise and honor the one who sits on the throne
and the one who is like a lamb,
May they reign with complete power forever!”
14 The four living creatures said, “◄Amen!/ May it be so!►” Then the elders
prostrated themselves and worshipped God and Jesus.
6
When the Lamb opened each of the first four seals of the scroll, each of the four
living creatures called forth a mounted horseman who brought judgment to people on
the earth.
Revelation 6:1-8
1 I saw that Jesus, the one who is like a lamb, opened the first of the seven seals
of the scroll. Then I heard one of the four living creatures say in a voice as loud as
[SIM] thunder, “Come!” 2 Then I saw a white horse come out. The one who sat on it
had a bow and arrows. God gave him a crown to show that he was the king. Then
the one who conquers people went out to continue to conquer people. 3 When the
one who was like a lamb opened the second seal, I heard the second living creature
say, “Come!” 4 Then a red horse came out. The one sitting on it was allowed {God
allowed the one sitting on it} to cause people to no longer live peacefully, but instead
to be killing each other. For this purpose he was given {God’s agent gave to him} a
large sword. 5 When the one who is like a lamb opened the third seal, I heard the
third living creature say, “Come!” This time, I saw a black horse come out. The one
who sat on it had a pair of scales in his hand. 6 I heard a voice that sounded like it
was coming from among the four living creatures. It was saying ◄to the horseman/to
the man who was sitting on the black horse►, “A quart of wheat will cost so much that
a man must work a whole day to earn enough money to buy it, and three quarts of
barley will sell for the same price. But do not cut off the supply of olive oil or the wine
[MTY]!” 7 When the one who is like a lamb opened the fourth seal, I heard the fourth
living creature say, “Come!” 8 This time I saw a pale horse come out. The one who sat
on it is named ‘The one who causes death [PRS]’, and the one that is named ‘The place
where dead people go’ accompanied him. God gave them authority over one quarter
of the people on earth to incite them to kill each other with weapons [SYN], and also
authority to kill them ◄by causing them to starve, by their causing them to become
sick from epidemics, and by their causing them to be attacked by wild animals.
When the Lamb opened the fifth seal, the souls of dead believers appealed to God to
judge those who killed them, but God told them to rest a bit longer.
Revelation 6:9-11
9 When the one who is like a lamb opened the fifth seal, I saw under (OR, at the base
of) the altar in heaven the souls of God’s servants who had been killed {whom people
had killed} because of their believing God’s message, and because they told others theREVELATION 6:10
1854
REVELATION 7:8
message about Jesus. 10 They spoke loudly to God saying, “Sovereign/Almighty Lord,
you are holy and faithful. How long will it be before you judge and punish the people
on earth who murdered us(exc)?” 11 God gave to each of them a long white robe, and
he told them to rest a little longer until people killed all the believers who served the
Lord with them. They were believers whom God wanted to die in just the same way
that these others had been killed.
When the Lamb opened the sixth seal of the scroll, the upheaval in the sky and on
the earth caused all the rebellious people on earth to hide because they knew God’s time
to judge people had come.
Revelation 6:12-17
12 I saw that when the one who is like a lamb opened the sixth seal, the earth
shook violently. The sun became as black as cloth made ◄of black wool/of pitch►.
The whole moon became red [SIM] like blood. 13 The stars fell to the earth in great
numbers, just [SIM] like immature figs fall when a fig tree is shaken by a strong wind
{when a strong wind shakes a fig tree}. 14 The sky split open and rolled up on either
side just [SIM] like an old scroll rolls up when it is split in two. Every mountain and
island moved out of its place. 15 As a result, all the rebellious people of the earth,
including kings, high-ranking people, generals, the rich people, the powerful people,
along with everyone else, both slave and free, hid themselves in caves and between
the mountain rocks. 16 They shouted to the mountains and to the rocks, “Fall on us
(exc) and hide us (exc) in order that the one who sits upon the throne will not be able
to see us (exc) [MTY], and in order that the one who is like a lamb will not be able to
punish [MTY] us (exc). 17 This is the terrible day on which they will punish [MTY] us
(exc), and when that happens, no one will be able to survive! [RHQ]”
7
An angel came up from the east and commanded the four angels stationed in four
directions to continue restraining the destructive winds until angels had sealed God’s
servants.
Revelation 7:1-8
1 After this I saw four angels. One was standing at the north, one at the east, one
at the south, and one at the west. They were restraining the winds that blew from
all directions [MTY] to keep them from blowing destructively on the earth or on the
ocean or even on any tree. 2 I saw another angel come up from the east. He was
carrying God’s seal. With this seal God, who is all-powerful, marks his own people to
protect them. The angel called out with a loud voice to the four angels to whom he
had given power to harm the earth and the ocean. He said 3 to them, “Do not harm
the earth or the ocean or the trees until we (exc) have marked the servants of our
(inc) God on their foreheads.” 4 Then the angel and his fellow angels marked all God’s
servants. I heard the number of people who were marked {whom the angels marked}
because of their being God’s servants. The number was 144,000. They were from all
the tribes of Israel. They symbolized the complete number of people whom God would
protect. 5 The angels marked 12,000 people from the tribe of Judah, 12,000 from the
tribe of Reuben, 12,000 from the tribe of Gad, 6 12,000 from the tribe of Asher, 12,000
from the tribe of Naphtali, 12,000 from the tribe of Manasseh, 7 12,000 from the tribe
of Simeon, 12,000 from the tribe of Levi, 12.000 from the tribe of Issachar, 8 12,000
from the tribe of Zebulun, 12,000 from the tribe of Joseph, and 12,000 from the tribe
of Benjamin.REVELATION 7:9
1855
REVELATION 8:5
The triumphant crowd stood before the throne in heaven and acknowledged that
God and the Lamb had rescued them. Then the angels, the elders, the living creatures,
and a huge crowd of people worshipped God and praised him.
Revelation 7:9-12
9 After these things I saw a huge crowd. There were so many people that no one
would be able to count them. They were from every nation, every tribe, every people-
group, and every language [MTY]. They were standing before the throne and before
Jesus, the one who is like a lamb. They were wearing white robes and held palm
branches to wave them in order to celebrate. 10 They shouted loudly, “O our (exc) God,
you who sit on the throne, and Jesus, you who are like a lamb, you two have delivered
us(exc) from Satan’s power!” 11 All the angels were standing around the throne and
around the elders and the four living creatures. They all bowed down before the
throne with their faces to the ground and worshipped God. 12 They said, “May it be
so! We(exc) praise, thank, and honor you, our (exc) God, forever! We(exc) acknowledge
that you are completely wise, the powerful one, who is forever able to accomplish
everything he wants to. ◄May everyone acknowlege that it is so!/Amen!►”
One of the elders explained to John about the saints who are dressed in white robes.
Revelation 7:13-17
13 Then one of the elders asked me, “These people who are wearing white robes,
do you know who they are, and where they come from?” 14 I answered him, “Sir, I
do not know. Surely you know who they are!” He said to me, “These are the people
◄whom others have caused to suffer greatly/who have been persecuted►. Because
they believed that Jesus, the one who is like a sacrificial lamb, atoned for our sin when
his blood flowed from his body when he died, it is as though [MET] they have washed
their robes and have made them clean and white. 15 Because of this, they are in front
of God’s throne, and they serve him day and night in his heavenly temple. God, the
one who sits on the throne, will shelter/protect them [MTY]. 16 As a result, they will
never again be hungry. They will never again be thirsty. The sun will never again
◄beat on/burn► them, nor will any heat scorch them. 17 This is because the one who
is like a lamb who is at the throne will take care of them, just like a shepherd takes
care of his sheep [MET]. He will guide them to the source of eternal life, just like a
shepherd leads his sheep to springs of water, which enable the sheep to live [MET]. God
will cause them to no longer be sad. It will be as if he were wiping away all tears from
their eyes [MTY].”
8
When the Lamb opened the seventh seal, it thundered, lightning flashed, and the
earth shook.
Revelation 8:1-5
1 When Jesus, the one who is like a lamb, opened the seventh seal, there was no
sound at all in heaven for ◄a very short time/about half an hour►. 2 I saw the seven
angels who stand in front of God. A trumpet was given {◄God/An angel► gave a
trumpet} to each one of them. 3 Another angel, who had a golden container for
burning incense, came and stood at the altar. He was given {An angel gave to him} a
large quantity of incense, in order that he might offer it, with the prayers of all God’s
people, upon the golden altar that is in front of God’s throne. Then he burned this
incense on the altar. 4 From the pot in the angel’s hand, the smoke of the incense,
along with the prayers of God’s people, went up to God. 5 In response, the angel took
the golden incense burner and filled it with coals of fire from the altar. He threw theREVELATION 8:6
1856
REVELATION 9:9
contents of the [MTY] incense burner onto the earth. Thunder sounded and rumbled,
lightning was flashing, and the earth shook.
The successive trumpet blasts by each of the first four angels resulted in great
catastrophes on the earth and in the sky.
Revelation 8:6-12
6 The seven angels, each of which had one of the seven trumpets, prepared to blow
them. 7 When the first angel blew his trumpet, hail and fire mixed with blood poured
down onto the earth. As a result, a third of everything on the surface of the land was
burned up {the fire burned up a third of everything on the surface of the land}. A
third of the trees were also burned up {It also burned up a third of the trees}, and a
third of all the green grass was burned up. 8 When the second angel blew his trumpet,
something that was like a huge burning mountain fell into the ocean. As a result, a
third of the ocean became red like [MTY] blood, 9 a third of the living creatures in
the ocean died, and a third of the ships in the ocean were destroyed. 10 When the
third angel blew his trumpet, a huge star, which was burning like a torch, fell from
the sky into a third of the rivers and into a third of the springs. 11 The name of the
star is Bitterness. As a result, the water in a third of the rivers and springs became
bitter, and many people died from drinking the water because it had become bitter.
12 When the fourth angel blew his trumpet, God struck the sun, the moon, and the
stars, so that they lost a third of their light. The sun also did not shine during a third
of the day, and the moon and stars did not shine during a third of the night.
An eagle announced that rebellious people on earth would suffer greatly.
Revelation 8:13
13 As I watched, I heard an eagle that was flying high in the sky, shouting in a loud
voice, “Terrible things will happen to rebellious people who live on the earth! Terrible
things will happen when the three remaining angels blow their trumpets! And they
are about to blow them!”
9
When the fifth angel blew his trumpet, locusts with stings like scorpions appeared
on the earth and attacked rebellious people.
Revelation 9:1-12
1 The fifth angel blew his trumpet. Then I saw an evil angel. He was like a star that
had fallen from the sky to the earth. He was given {Someone gave him} the key to the
shaft that descended ◄to the underworld/to the deep dark pit►. 2 When he opened
that shaft, smoke arose from it like smoke from a huge burning furnace. The smoke
prevented anyone from seeing the sky and the light of the sun. 3 Locusts came out of
the smoke onto the earth. They were given {God gave them} power to sting people,
like scorpions sting people. 4 God told the locusts that they should not harm grass,
nor any plants, nor any tree. God said that they should harm only those people who
did not have a mark on the forehead to show that they belonged to God. 5 God did not
allow the locusts to kill those people. Instead, he allowed them to continue torturing
people for five months. When they tortured people, the pain those people felt was
like the pain a scorpion causes when it stings someone. 6 During the time when the
locusts torture rebellious people, the pain will be so bad that people will want to find
a way to die, but they will not be able to [PRS]. 7 The locusts looked like horses that
are ready for battle. They had on their heads what looked like golden crowns. Their
faces were like the faces of people. 8 They had long hair like the long hair of women.
Their teeth were strong, like lions’ teeth. 9 They wore metal breastplates. When theyREVELATION 9:10
1857
REVELATION 10:6
were flying, their wings made a noise like the roar when many horses pull chariots as
they are rushing into battle. 10 They had tails like scorpions have. With their tails they
stung people for five months. 11 The king who ruled over them was the angel of the
underworld. His name in the Hebrew language is Abaddon. In the Greek language it
is Apollyon. Both of those names mean ‘Destroyer’.
12 That was the end of the first terrible event. Be aware that two tragic events are
still to come.
When the sixth angel blew his trumpet, a third of the rebellious people on earth died.
But the rest of the rebellious people did not repent of their false worship or of their evil
practices.
Revelation 9:13-21
13 The sixth angel blew his trumpet. Then I heard a voice from the four corners of
the golden altar that is in God’s presence. 14 It was saying to the sixth angel, the one
who had the trumpet, “Release the four angels whom I have bound at the great river
Euphrates!” 15 The four angels were released, those who had been {He released the
four angels, whom God had} kept ready for that exact hour of that day, of that month,
of that year. They were released {He released them} in order that they might enable
their soldiers to kill a third of the rebellious people. 16 The number of the soldiers
riding on horses who did that was 200 million. I heard someone say how many there
were. 17 In the vision I saw what the horses and the beings that rode them looked like.
They wore breastplates that were red like fire, dusky blue like smoke, and yellow like
sulfur. The heads of the horses were like the heads of lions. From their mouths came
fire, smoke, and fumes of burning sulfur. 18 Those three things—the fire, the smoke,
and the burning sulfur from the horses’ mouths—killed a third of the rebellious people.
19 The horses had power with their mouths and with their tails. Their tails have heads
like snakes by which they harm people. 20 The rest of the rebellious people, those who
were not killed by these plagues of fire and smoke and burning sulfur, did not turn
from their sinful behavior. They did not stop worshipping the idols that they had made
with their own hands. They did not stop worshipping demons and idols that were
made of gold, of silver, of bronze, of stone, and of wood, even though they are idols
that can neither see nor hear nor walk. 21 They did not stop murdering people, or
practicing sorcery, or acting in sexually immoral ways, or stealing things.
10
John saw a mighty angel coming down out of heaven and holding a small open scroll.
When the angel shouted, it thundered several times, but a voice from heaven prohibited
John from recording what the thunder said. The angel affirmed that the living Creator
of the universe would no longer delay in completing what he planned for his creation.
Revelation 10:1-7
1 In the vision I saw another mighty angel that was coming down out of heaven. A
cloud surrounded him. There was a rainbow over his head. His face shone [SIM] like
the sun. His legs looked like pillars of fire. 2 He had in his hand a small scroll that was
open. He set his right foot on the ocean and his left foot on the land. 3 He shouted
something with a loud voice, a voice like the roar of a lion. When he shouted this, it
thundered seven times, speaking words that I could understand. 4 When it thundered
like that, I was about to write the words that I heard, but a voice from heaven said
to me, “Keep secret what the thunder said! Do not write it down!” 5 Then the angel
whom I had seen standing on the ocean and the land raised his right hand toward
heaven, 6 and he asked the one who lives forever, the one who created heaven and
everything that is in it, who created the earth and everything that is in it, and whoREVELATION 10:7
1858
REVELATION 11:10
created the ocean and everything that is in it, to affirm that what he said was true. He
said that he would surely no longer delay what he had planned to do. 7 He said that
when the time came for the seventh angel to blow his trumpet, he would complete
what God had secretly planned, just like he announced long ago to his servants, the
prophets.
The heavenly voice told John to take the open scroll from the angel and eat it. When
he had eaten it, he was commanded by God to prophesy again about all people.
Revelation 10:8-11
8 The one whose voice I had heard from heaven spoke to me again. He said, “Go
and take the open scroll from the hand of the angel who is standing on the ocean and
on the land.” 9 So I went to the angel and asked him to give me the little scroll. He said
to me, “Take it and eat it. In your mouth it will taste sweet like honey, but it will make
your stomach bitter.” 10 I took the little scroll from the angel’s hand and ate it. In my
mouth it tasted sweet like honey, but when I had eaten it, it made my stomach turn
sour. 11 The one whose voice spoke from heaven said to me, “You must ◄prophesy
again/proclaim again what I will reveal to you► about many people-groups, many
nations, speakers of many languages [MTY], and many kings.”
11
Christ told John to count his worshipers from the nations, and he appointed two
witnesses to prophesy to the nations for a limited time. When they finished witnessing,
the beast from the underworld killed them, causing the nations to enjoy temporary
victory. God resurrected his witnesses, took them to heaven, and punished the nations.
Survivors feared and acknowledged God as awesome.
Revelation 11:1-14
1 An angel gave to me a reed similar to a measuring stick. He said to me, “Christ
says this: ‘Go to the temple where people worship God, measure it and the altar in it,
and count the people who worship there. 2 But do not measure the courtyard outside
of the temple [DOU], because it has been given {God has given it} to the non-Jewish
people. As a result, they will trample Jerusalem city for 42 months. 3 I will appoint
my two ◄witnesses/men who will tell others about me►. They will proclaim what I
reveal to them for 1,260 days. They will wear rough clothes made from goat’s hair
to show that they are sad about people’s sin.’ ” 4 Those witnesses are the ones that are
represented by the two olive trees and the two lampstands that are in the presence
of the Lord who rules the earth [SYM]. 5 If enemies try to harm those witnesses, fire
will come from the mouths of the witnesses and destroy them. If people want to
harm them, the two witnesses will certainly kill them similarly. 6 Those witnesses will
have authority to keep rain from falling during the time that they are proclaiming
what God reveals to them. They also will have authority to cause water everywhere
to become red like [MET] blood, and authority to cause all kinds of plagues to occur.
They will do this as often as they want to. 7 When they have finished proclaiming to
people the message from God, the beast that comes up ◄from the underworld/from the
deep dark pit► will attack them, overcome them, and kill them. 8 The dead bodies of
the two witnesses will lie in the street of the great city where their Lord was crucified,
the city that is symbolically named Sodom or Egypt because its people are very evil,
like the people who lived in Sodom and Egypt. 9 Individuals of many people-groups,
tribes, language groups [MTY], and nations will look at their dead bodies for three
and a half days. But these individuals will not allow anyone to bury their bodies.
10 When the rebellious people who live on the earth see that the witnesses are dead,
they will rejoice and celebrate. They will send gifts to each other, because these twoREVELATION 11:11
1859
REVELATION 12:3
prophets had caused plagues to occur which tormented the rebellious people on the
earth. 11 But after three and a half days, God will cause those two witnesses to breathe
again and live. They will stand up, and those who see them will be terrified. 12 The
two witnesses will hear a loud voice which came from heaven saying to them: “Come
up here!” Then they will go up to heaven in a cloud. Their enemies will see them
as they ascend. 13 At that same time there will be a terrible earthquake, which will
cause a tenth of the buildings in [MTY] the city will collapse, and 7,000 people will
die. The rest of the people will be afraid and acknowledge that the God who rules in
heaven is awesome.
14 That will be the second terrible event. Be aware that the third tragic event will
happen soon.
When the seventh angel sounded his trumpet, voices from heaven declared that the
Lord God and his Messiah now govern everyone, and the elders declared that the time
had come for God’s final judgment. With the heavenly sanctuary open, lightning flashed,
thunder reverberated, the earth shook, and large hail fell.
Revelation 11:15-19
15 Then the seventh angel blew his trumpet. Angels in heaven shouted loudly, “Our
Lord God and the Messiah whom he has appointed can now govern everyone in [MTY]
the world, and they will continue to rule people forever!” 16 The 24 elders who sit
on their thrones in God’s presence ◄prostrated themselves/bowed down low► and
worshipped him. 17 They said:
Lord God, you are the Almighty One!
You are the one who exists now!
You are the one who has always existed!
We thank you that you have defeated by your power everyone who has rebelled
against you,
and you now rule over everyone in the world.
18 The unbelieving people of [MTY] the nations were raging at you.
As a result you have become very angry with them.
You have decided that this is the appropriate time for you to judge all the dead people.
You have also decided that it is the time for you to reward all your servants,
both the prophets and the rest of your people who reverence you [MTY],
whether they were considered socially significant/important or socially insignificant/
unimportant.
It is time for you to reward all of them!
You have also decided it is the time for you to destroy the people who are destroying
others on the earth.
19 Then God’s temple in heaven was opened {was open} and I saw in the temple
the sacred box/chest that contains God’s commandments. Lightning was flashing, it
was thundering and rumbling, the earth shook, and large hailstones fell from the sky.
12
When a royal woman gave birth to a royal son, she fled to safety and care in a place
in the wilderness that was prepared by God.
Revelation 12:1-6
1 Then something very unusual appeared in the sky. It was a woman, whose
appearance and clothing were [MET] as bright as the sun. The moon was under her
feet. On her head was a crown that was made of twelve stars. 2 She was pregnant.
Then, as she was about to give birth, she cried out because she was suffering pain.
3 Something else very unusual appeared in the sky. It was a huge red dragon. It hadREVELATION 12:4
1860
REVELATION 12:17
seven heads and ten horns. On each of its heads was a royal crown. 4 The dragon’s
tail dragged a third of the stars from the sky and threw them to the earth. The dragon
set himself in front of the woman who was about to give birth, in order that he might
eat her child as soon as it was born. 5 The woman gave birth to a son, who is destined
to rule all the nations with complete authority as if he was using [MET] an iron rod
[MET]. God snatched away her child and took him to rule from his throne. 6 The
woman fled to a desert. She has a place there that God has prepared for her, in order
that the angels may take care of her for 1,260 days.
There was a battle in heaven in which Michael and his angels fought the dragon. The
dragon and his angels were thrown out of heaven to earth. A loud voice from heaven
declared the victory and the sovereignty of God, and lamented the tragic struggle coming
to people on earth.
Revelation 12:7-12
7 In the vision I saw that there was a battle in heaven. Michael and the angels that
he commanded fought against the dragon. The dragon and his angels fought back
against Michael and his angels. 8 But the dragon did not win the battle, so God did not
allow the dragon and his angels to stay in heaven any longer. 9 The huge dragon was
thrown {Michael and his angels threw the huge dragon} out of heaven. The dragon
is the ancient serpent, the one who is called the Devil and Satan. He is the one who
deceives people all over the earth. He was thrown down to the earth, along with all
his angels. 10 Then I heard someone in heaven shout loudly, saying,
Now our God has saved his people by his power, and he rules everyone!
Now the Messiah, the one who is the supreme ruler whom God appointed,
has authority to rule all people, because our God has thrown out of heaven the
one who accuses our fellow believers!
The dragon is the one who accuses them day and night before our God,
saying that they have sinned and that God ought to punish them.
11 Our fellow believers overcame the dragon because they never stopped trusting
(OR, never stopped telling people about) Jesus,
and because they trusted in what Jesus, the one who is like a lamb, accomplished
when his blood flowed when he died.
Even though those believers wanted to live,
they were willing to let people kill them for speaking the truth about him.
12 So, all you angels living [MTY] in heaven, rejoice!
But terrible things will happen to you ungodly people who [MTY] live on the earth
and on the ocean, because the devil has come down to you!
He is very angry because he knows that he has only a short time during which he
can harm people.
When the dragon pursued the woman who had given birth to a son, he was thwarted,
so he prepared to fight against her other offspring.
Revelation 12:13-18
13 When the dragon realized that he had been thrown {that the angels had thrown
him} down to the earth, he pursued the woman who had given birth to a son. 14 But
the woman was given two wings like the wings of a very large eagle, in order that
she might fly to a desolate place. That is a place that God has prepared for her. There
she was taken care of {God’s angels took care of her} for three and a half years. The
serpent, that is, the dragon, was not able to reach her there. 15 The serpent spewed
water like a river from his mouth in the direction of the woman, in order that the
water might sweep her away. 16 But the ground helped the woman by opening up and
swallowing the river that the dragon spewed out from his mouth! 17 Then the dragonREVELATION 12:18
1861
REVELATION 13:14
was very angry with the woman, so he went away to fight against the people who are
like the rest of her descendants. They are the people who obey God’s commandments
and who tell other people about Jesus (OR, hold fast to what Jesus taught them). 18 The
dragon stood on the ocean shore.
13
A beast rose from the ocean. It received power and authority from the dragon.
Everyone worshipped it; that is, all people whose names were not recorded in the book
of life worshipped the beast for 42 months.
Revelation 13:1-10
1 I saw a beast that was coming up out of the ocean. It had ten horns and seven
heads. On each of its horns there was a royal crown. On each of its heads there was
a name that insulted God. 2 The beast that I saw was like a leopard. But its feet were
like the feet of a bear, and its mouth was like the mouth of a lion. The dragon gave the
beast power. From his own throne he also gave it authority to rule people [DOU]. 3 One
of the heads of the beast had been wounded {The Lord had wounded one of the heads
of the beast}, causing the beast to almost die. But its wound was healed. As a result,
nearly all the people of the earth [HYP, MTY] marveled at the beast and became his
disciples. 4 They worshipped the dragon, because he had given to the beast authority
to rule people. They also worshipped the beast, saying, “No one is as powerful as the
beast!/ [RHQ] ◄No one would dare to fight against it!/Who would dare to fight against
it?►” [RHQ] 5 The beast was allowed {God allowed the beast} to speak [MTY] in a
boastful way and to insult God. It was also allowed {God also allowed it} to rule over
people for 42 months. 6 It [MTY] insulted God, insulted the place where he lives, and
insulted everyone who lives with him in heaven. 7 It was allowed {God allowed it}
to fight against God’s people and to conquer them. It was allowed {God allowed it}
to have authority to rule over every tribe, over every people-group, over speakers of
every language [MTY], and over every nation. 8 Most of [HYP] the people living on
earth worshipped it. They were people whose names were not written in a book by
the one who is like a lamb, the one who had been killed. Since the beginning of the
world he wrote in it the names of the people who will have eternal life. 9 Everyone
who wants to understand [MTY] must listen carefully to this message from God: 10 If
God has determined that some people will be captured by their enemies, they will be
captured. If God has determined that some people will be killed with a sword, they
will be killed with a sword. So God’s people must be steadfast, and remain faithful to
him.
Another beast appeared, having the same authority to rule people that the first beast
had, and it caused people on earth to worship the first beast. People made an image
of the first beast, and the beast had everyone killed who refused to worship the image.
It caused all people to be marked with the name of the first beast. The number of the
beast’s name is 666.
Revelation 13:11-18
11 I saw another beast, which was coming up from the earth. It had two small horns
on its head like a sheep has. But it spoke things to deceive people, like the dragon does.
12 While the first beast watched, it used all the same authority to rule people that the
first beast had. It forced the people who live on the earth [MTY, DOU] to worship the
first beast, that is, the one who was healed of the wound that had caused it to almost
die. 13 The second beast performed awesome miracles, even causing fire from the sky
to fall to earth while people watched. 14 He performed miracles ◄on behalf of/with the
authority of► the first beast. By doing that he deceived the unbelieving people on theREVELATION 13:15
1862
REVELATION 14:8
earth so that they believed that they should worship the first beast. But this happened
only because God allowed it to happen. The second beast told the people living on
earth to make an image of the first beast, the one that people had almost killed with
a sword and that then came back to life again. 15 The image of the first beast was
allowed to breathe, in order that it might speak and in order that it might command
that whoever refused to worship its image should be killed {that people should kill
whoever refused to worship its image}. 16 The second beast required also that the first
beast’s name be marked {its agents mark the first beast’s name} on the right hand
or on the forehead of everyone, those of little social importance and of great social
importance, the rich and the poor, free people and slaves. Everyone! 17 They did this
in order that people could not buy anything or sell anything if they did not have the
mark, which represents the name of the beast or the number of its name, on their
foreheads. 18 You must think wisely to understand the meaning of the mark. Anyone
who thinks wisely should calculate from the number of the beast what the man’s
name is. That number is 666.
14
John saw the Lamb standing on Zion Mountain with 144,000 redeemed people, who
were marked with God’s seal. They were singing a new song that only the redeemed
could sing.
Revelation 14:1-5
1 But then I saw the one who is like a lamb standing on Zion Hill in Jerusalem. With
him were 144,000 people. His name and his Father’s name had been written {He
had written his name and his Father’s name} on their foreheads. 2 I heard a sound
from heaven, which was as loud [SIM] as the sound of a huge waterfall (OR, a great/
wide river of rushing water) and which was also as loud as [SIM] mighty thunder.
The sound that I heard was like the sound that people make when they are playing
their harps. 3 The 144,000 people were singing a new song while they stood in front
of the throne, in front of the four living creatures, and in front of the elders. Only
the 144,000 people, the ones who have been {whom the one who is like a lamb has}
redeemed/bought from among the people on the earth, could learn that song. No
one else could learn the song that they sang. 4 Those 144,000 are the people who are
spiritually pure, like virgins are morally pure. They have not ◄defiled themselves/
made themselves impure► [MET] by worshipping any false god. They are the ones
who accompany Jesus, the one who is like a lamb, wherever he goes. They represent
all those whom he has redeemed/bought for God from among the people of earth, in
order that he might offer them to God and to himself. 5 Those people never lie when
they speak [MTY], and they never act immorally.
An angel announced that after God judged and then destroyed the wicked cities
symbolized as Babylon. Another angel declared individual judgment on worshipers of
the beast, who symbolizes the head of this world power. The saints are called to remain
steadfast.
Revelation 14:6-13
6 I saw another angel that was flying between the sky and heaven. He was bringing
God’s eternal good message to earth, in order that he might proclaim it to people who
live on the earth. He will proclaim it to every nation, to every tribe, to speakers of every
language [MTY], and to every people-group. 7 He said in a loud voice, “Revere God
and honor him, because it is now time for him to judge people! Worship God, because
he is the one who created the heaven, the earth, the ocean, and the springs of water.”
8 A second angel came after him saying, “The very evil cities (OR, city) representedREVELATION 14:9
1863
REVELATION 14:20
by Babylon are completely destroyed! God has punished their people because they
have persuaded people of all the nations to forsake God, just like a prostitute [MET]
persuades men to drink strong wine and as a result commit sexual immorality.” 9 A
third angel came next, saying in a loud voice, “If people worship the beast and its
image and allow its mark to be put {its agent to put its mark} on their foreheads or
on their hands, 10 God will be angry with them and punish them very severely [MET].
They will be tormented {God will torment them} in burning sulfur in the presence
of his holy angels and in the presence of the one who is like a lamb. 11 The smoke
from the fire that torments them will rise forever. They will be tormented {God will
torment them} continually, day and night. That is what will happen to the people who
worship the beast and its image and who allow its name to be marked on them {allow
its agent to mark them with its name}.” 12 So God’s people, those who obey what God
commands and who trust in Jesus, must faithfully continue obeying and trusting him.
13 I heard a voice from heaven saying, “Write this: God will now abundantly bless the
people who have a close relationship with the Lord Jesus for the rest of their lives.”
God’s Spirit says, “Yes, after they die, they will no longer have to work hard. Instead,
they will rest, and the record of the good deeds [MTY] that they have done will go with
them (OR, God will reward them for the good deeds that they have done).”
Someone like the One who came from heaven sat on a cloud, holding a sharp sickle.
An angel from the sanctuary commanded him to harvest the earth. Another angel was
commanded to reap fruit that grows on vines. He threw the fruit that he harvested into
the place where God angrily crushes people like a winepress crushes grapes. When the
winepress was trodden, the flow was like a flood of blood on the earth.
Revelation 14:14-20
14 Then I was surprised to see a white cloud, and on the cloud someone was sitting
who looked like the one who came from heaven. He was wearing a golden crown on
his head. In his hand he held a sharp sickle. 15 Another angel came out of the temple
in heaven. In a loud voice, speaking figuratively about gathering people for God to judge
them, he said to the one who was sitting on the cloud, “The time has come to reap the
grain on the earth, so with your sickle reap the grain, because the grain on the earth
is ripe.” 16 The one who was sitting on the cloud forcefully gathered together all the
people on earth, as [MET] a farmer reaps grain with his sickle. 17 Another angel came
out of the sanctuary in heaven. He also held a sharp sickle. 18 From the altar came
another angel. He is the one who takes care of the fire of the altar. Also speaking
figuratively about gathering the wicked people for God to judge and punish them, he
said in a loud voice to the angel who held the sharp sickle, “With your sharp sickle
cut off the clusters of grapes in the vineyards on the earth! Then gather the clusters of
grapes together, because its grapes are ripe!” 19 So, just like a man would cut off with
his sickle the clusters of grapes in his vineyard [MET], an angel forcefully gathered
the wicked people on the earth. Then he threw them into the huge place where God
will angrily punish them. 20 The wicked people were trampled on {God’s agent trod
on the wicked people} in the winepress outside the city. The blood that came out from
the winepress flowed in a stream so deep that it reached to the bridles of the horses,
and extended ◄180 miles/300 kilometers►.
15
John saw in the sky a marvelous sign of the seven angels who were responsible for
inflicting people with the seven last plagues.
Revelation 15:1REVELATION 15:1
1864
REVELATION 16:3
1 Something else very unusual appeared in the sky. I saw seven angels, whose duty
it was to punish (OR, inflict hardship upon) rebellious people with seven different
plagues (OR, in seven different ways). God is so angry with rebellious people that this
is the last time that he will punish them with the purpose of giving them an opportunity
to turn away from their sinful behavior.
John saw those who had been victorious over the beast respond to God’s judgment
of rebellious people on earth by singing praise to God for his mighty deliverance and
righteous judgment.
Revelation 15:2-4
2 I saw what looked like an ocean that was made of glass and mixed with fire. And I
saw the people who overcame the beast by not worshipping it or its image, or allowing
its agent to mark them with the number that corresponds to the beast’s name [PRS].
They were standing by the ocean that looked like it was made of glass. They had harps
for praising God. 3 They were singing a song like God’s servant Moses sang long ago.
They sang like this to praise Jesus, the one who is like a lamb:
Lord God Almighty,
whatever you do is powerful and marvelous!
You always act righteously and truthfully.
You are king forever!
4 O Lord, you alone are holy!
People of [MTY] all nations will come and worship you,
because you show everyone that you have judged everyone righteously.
So, everyone will fear you and honor you! [RHQ].
John saw angels being given the seven bowls of judgment in the heavenly sanctuary,
which became filled with the smoke of God’s unapproachable glory.
Revelation 15:5-8
5 After this, in the vision I saw in heaven the temple that ◄corresponds to/was
represented by► the tent that the Israelites pitched in the desert. That was the tent that
contained the Ten Commandments. The temple door was opened {was open}. 6 The
seven angels who had the bowls containing the seven plagues came out of the temple.
The angels were dressed in clean, white linen garments, and they wore gold bands
around their chests. 7 One of the four living creatures gave each of the seven angels a
golden bowl, filled with wine/liquid. That wine/liquid symbolized that God, who lives
forever, would severely punish rebellious people. 8 The temple was filled with smoke
that symbolized the presence of the glorious and all-powerful God. No one was able
to enter the temple until the seven angels finished pouring out the seven plagues.
16
Four angels emptied their judgment bowls.
Revelation 16:1-9
1 In the vision I heard someone in the temple speak in a loud voice to the angels
who had the seven bowls. He said, “Go from here and pour out on the earth the wine/
liquid in [MTY] the seven bowls. This will show that God is angry with rebellious
people and will punish them.” 2 So the first angel went and poured out on the earth
the wine/liquid that was in [MTY] his bowl. As a result, horrible and painful sores
broke out on God’s enemies who had allowed the beast’s agents to mark them and
who worshipped the image of the beast. 3 The second angel poured out on the ocean
the wine/liquid that was in [MTY] his bowl. As a result, the water in the ocean stank
like the blood of a person who has died. And [MTY] every living creature that wasREVELATION 16:4
1865
REVELATION 16:21
in the ocean died. 4 The third angel poured out on the rivers and water springs the
wine/liquid [MTY] that was in his bowl. As a result, the water in the rivers and springs
turned into blood. 5 I heard the angel who has authority over the waters say to God,
“O God, you exist and have always existed. You are the holy one. You judge people
justly. 6 The rebellious people murdered your holy people and prophets. So you are
just in punishing them by giving them blood to drink. This is what they deserve!”
7 Then I heard an angel respond from the altar [PRS], “Yes, Lord God, you who are
almighty, you punish people rightly and justly!” 8 Then the fourth angel poured out
on the sun the wine/liquid that was in [MTY] his bowl. He enabled the sun to scorch
people with fiery heat. 9 Because people were severely burned by the intense heat
{the intense heat severely burned people}, they said evil things about God [MTY],
because he had the power to strike people with plagues like those. But they refused
to stop their evil behavior and refused to honor him.
Two more angels emptied their judgment bowls on the earth. Demons gathered
armies to fight against God. But Jesus warned his people to watch faithfully for his
imminent coming. The battle was ready to begin at Armageddon.
Revelation 16:10-16
10 When the fifth angel poured out on the throne of the beast the wine/liquid that
was in [MTY] his bowl, it became dark in the kingdom that the beast ruled. As a result,
the beast and the people whom it ruled were biting their tongues because they were
suffering intense pain. 11 They insulted God who rules in heaven, because their sores
were so painful. But they refused to stop doing the evil things that they were doing.
12 The sixth angel poured out on the huge river Euphrates the wine/liquid that was
in [MTY] his bowl. As a result, the water in the river was dried up so that the rulers
from the eastern [MTY] countries could cross it with their armies [SYN]. 13 I saw evil
spirits that looked like frogs. One came out of the mouth of the dragon, one from
the mouth of the beast, and one from the mouth of the false prophet. 14 Those spirits
were demons who were able to perform miracles. They went out to the rulers of the
whole world, in order to gather their armies [SYN] together to the battle that they will
fight on the wonderful day when Almighty God punishes his enemies [MTY]. 15-16 The
evil spirits will gather the rulers at a place that is called in the Hebrew language
Armageddon.
I heard the Lord Jesus say, “You must listen carefully to me: I am coming
unexpectedly [SIM], like a thief. So, I will be happy with those who stay alert and
keep on living righteously so that they will not be ashamed, just like [MET] a person
keeps his clothes on so that he will not be ashamed like a person who is naked.”
After the seventh angel emptied his bowl, God punished the very evil city symbolized
by Babylon, and destroyed other cities, and terrible disasters followed.
Revelation 16:17-21
17 The seventh angel poured out into the air the wine/liquid that was in [MTY] his
bowl. As a result, someone said with a loud voice from the throne in the temple,
“The time for God to finish punishing rebellious people is about to be start.” 18 When
the angel emptied his bowl, lightning flashed, there were rumblings and thunder, and
the earth shook. It shook more violently than it has ever shaken since people first
lived on earth. 19 And as a result, the very evil city that is symbolized by Babylon split
into three parts. God also destroyed cities in other nations. God did not forget that
the people of [MTY] the very evil city symbolized by Babylon had sinned very much.
So he caused the people with whom he was furiously angry [MET] to drink a cup of
very poisonous wine/liquid that represented his punishment. 20 Also as a result of the
earthquake, every island disappeared, and the mountains became flat land. 21 AlsoREVELATION 17:1
1866
REVELATION 17:9
as a result of the angel’s emptying his bowl, huge hailstones, each weighing about 100
pounds, fell from the sky onto the people. Then people insulted God because he had
caused the destructive hail to fall on them in that terrible plague.
17
One of the seven angels offered to show John how God will punish the very evil city
represented by a prostitute, with whom the rulers of people on earth have been seduced
to act immorally and idolatrously.
Revelation 17:1-2
1 One of the seven angels, who had one of the seven bowls, came to me. He said to
me, “Come with me, and I will show you how God will punish the very evil city that
is represented by [SYM] a prostitute, a city in which there are many canals of water.
2 It is as though the rulers of earth have acted immorally and idolatrously with the
people of that city [MET], and they have persuaded people who live on the earth to
act immorally and idolatrously with them [MET], just like a prostitute persuades men
to drink the strong wine she gives them, resulting in their becoming drunk and then
committing sexual immorality. with her.”
When the angel took John to a wilderness, he saw an immoral woman who was
drunk with the blood of God’s people. The sight caused John to react with great
bewilderment.
Revelation 17:3-6
3 Then, as God’s Spirit controlled me, the angel carried me away to a desolate area.
There I saw a woman who was sitting on a red beast. The beast had names written
all over itself. They were names that ◄insulted/spoke evil against► God. The beast
had seven heads and ten horns. 4 The woman that I saw was wearing purple and red
clothes; and gold, precious stones, and pearls were fastened to her clothes and her
body. She held in her hand a golden cup. The cup was full of a liquid that represents
[SYM] the detestable/disgusting, idolatrous things and filthy immoral things that she
does. 5 This name, that has a hidden/secret meaning, was written on her forehead:
“This woman is Babylon, the very evil city! She acts like the mother of the prostitutes
on the earth. She teaches them to act immorally and to worship idols.” 6 I saw that
the woman had become drunk as a result of drinking the blood of God’s people, those
who had told others about Jesus. When I saw her, I was very bewildered/perplexed.
The angel revealed the meaning of what John had seen, identifying as ruling entities
both the beast which amazed people and his seven heads and ten horns, and the angel
declared that they would be overcome by the Lamb and defeated. The angel identified
the prostitute as representing the very evil city that dominates people, and he declared
that it would be destroyed.
Revelation 17:7-18
7 The angel said to me, “Do not be bewildered [RHQ]! I will explain to you the
hidden/secret meaning of the woman and of the beast on which she rides, the beast
that has the seven heads and the ten horns. 8 The beast that you saw lived previously.
Eventually God will destroy him, but now he is dead. He is about to come up ◄from
the underworld/from the deep dark pit►. When the beast who had previously lived,
and who then had died, reappears, the people who live on the earth will be amazed.
They are people whose names were not in the book in which are written the names
of people who will have eternal life. The angels have been writing those names in a
list ◄from the beginning of the world/from the time when the world began►. 9 Those
who think wisely can understand this: The seven heads of the beast on which the
woman sits symbolize the seven hills of the city that the woman represents. They alsoREVELATION 17:10
1867
REVELATION 18:5
symbolize seven rulers. 10 Five of those rulers have died. One is still alive. The seventh
ruler has not yet come. When he comes, he must remain on earth for only a short
time. 11 The beast that lived before and then was not alive will be the eighth ruler. He
will be evil like the seven rulers were, but God will surely destroy him. 12 The ten horns
that you saw represent ten rulers who have not yet begun to rule. They, together with
the beast, will be authorized to rule people for only a short time, as if it were [MET] for
one hour. 13 Those rulers will all agree to do the same thing. As a result they will give
to the beast their power to rule people as well as their authority to rule people [DOU].
14 The rulers and the beast will fight against Jesus, the one who is like a lamb. He
will defeat them, because he is Lord who rules over all other lords and the King who
rules over all other kings. Those people who are with Jesusand helping him are the
ones whom God has chosen, and who keep serving him faithfully.” 15 Then the angel
said to me, “The waters that you saw in the city where the prostitute sits represent
people-groups, multitudes of people, nations, and speakers of many languages [MTY].
16 The ten horns that you saw represent rulers [SYM]. They and the beast will hate
the people in the city [MTY] that the prostitute represents. As a result, they will take
away everything that is in the city, as if they were [MET] leaving it naked. They will
destroy it as if [MET] devouring flesh/meat, and they will burn it with fire. 17 They
will do that because God has caused them to decide to do what he wants them to do.
As a result, they will let the beast have their power to rule until what God has said
is fulfilled {until they fulfill what God has said} [MTY]. 18 The prostitute that you saw
represents the very evil city whose leaders [MTY] rule over the kings of the earth.”
18
A powerful angel descended from heaven and announced that the cities represented
by Babylon were about to be completely destroyed because of their immorality and
idolatry.
Revelation 18:1-3
1 After this, in the vision I saw another angel, who had great authority, coming down
from heaven. The earth became bright because he was shining so intensely/brightly.
2 He shouted with a very loud voice, “God is about to completely destroy [DOU] all the
very evil cities (OR, the very evil city) that Babylon represents. As a result, all kinds
of evil spirits [DOU] will live there, and all kinds of foul and detestable [DOU] birds
will live there. 3 God will destroy those cities because their rulers have persuaded the
people of [MTY] all nations to act very immorally and idolatrously with the people of
[MET] those cities, just like a prostitute persuades men to drink strong wine and then
commit fornication with her. The rulers of the earth have also acted immorally and
idolatrously with the people of [MTY] those cities. The merchants of the earth have
become rich because the people of those cities strongly desired and bought from the
merchants many ◄luxuries/expensive things►.”
John heard Jesus tell God’s people to flee from those cities.
Revelation 18:4-5
4 I heard Jesus speak from heaven. He said, “My people, flee from those cities, in
order that you do not sin as the people of those cities do. If you sin as they do, I will
punish you as I will punish them. 5 It is as though their sins have been piled {have
piled} up to heaven, and God remembers them [DOU], so now he will punish them
[MTY].”
Jesus sentenced the cities represented by Babylon to destruction.
Revelation 18:6-8REVELATION 18:6
1868
REVELATION 18:19
6 To the angels whom God assigned to punish those cities, Jesus said, “Pay back/
Punish the people of those cities to the same extent that they harmed other people.
Cause them to suffer twice as much as they caused other people to suffer [DOU, MET].
7 To the same extent that they have boasted about themselves and done the things
that they wanted to do, to that extent torment them and cause them to grieve. Do
that because in their minds they think, ‘We rule as queens! We are not widows, and
we will never mourn as widows do’! 8 So in one day terrible calamities/troubles will
come upon them. The people in those cities will die, others will mourn for them,
people will be hungry because there will be no food, and their cities will be burned up.
The Lord God is able to punish those cities like that, because he is very powerful.”
Earth’s kings, merchants, and maritime traders mourned the loss of those cities.
Revelation 18:9-19
9 “The kings of the earth who have acted immorally with people of those cities and
have lived with the people of those cities, doing just what they wanted to do, will weep
and mourn [DOU] for them when they see the smoke of the fire that is burning those
cities. 10 They will stand far away from those cities, because they will be afraid that
they will suffer just like the people of those cities are suffering. They will say, ‘Terrible
things will happen to the awesome and mighty cities represented by Babylon! God will
punish them suddenly and swiftly [MTY]!’ 11 The merchants of the earth will weep and
will mourn [DOU] for those cities, because no one will ever again buy the things that
they have to sell to the people in those cities. 12-13 They sell ornaments made of gold,
silver, precious stones, and pearls. They sell expensive cloth made of fine linen and
silk, expensive cloth that is dyed purple and crimson. They sell all kinds of rare wood,
all kinds of items made of ivory, costly wood, bronze, iron, and marble. They sell
cinnamon, spice, perfume, frankincense, wine, olive oil, fine flour, and grain. They
sell cattle, sheep, horses, and chariots. They even sell human beings [SYN, DOU] to
become slaves. 14 The merchants will say, ‘The good things you people longed to have
are gone! All your luxurious and splendid [DOU] possessions have vanished!! They
will be gone forever/You will never have them again [LIT]!’ 15 The merchants who sold
these things and who had become rich by supplying them for those cities will stand far
away, because they will be afraid that they will suffer just like the people of those cities
are suffering. They will weep and mourn [DOU], 16 and they will say, ‘Terrible things
[DOU] have happened to the awesome/great [MET] cities! They were like queens who
dressed themselves in clothes made of [MTY] fine linen cloth and expensive cloth dyed
purple and crimson, and who were adorned with gold, precious stones, and pearls.
17 But suddenly and swiftly [MTY] God has destroyed these expensive things.’ Every
ship captain, all people who travel by ship, all ◄sailors/those who work on ships►,
and all others who earn their living by traveling on the ocean will stand far away from
those cities. 18 When they see the smoke of the fire that is burning those cities, they
will shout, ‘No other cities have ever been so awesome!’ [RHQ] 19 They will throw
dust on their heads to show that they are sad, and they will shout, weep, and mourn
[DOU]. They will say, ‘Terrible things have happened to the awesome/great cities, the
cities that made all people who own ships that sail on the ocean become rich by
carrying their costly ◄things for them to sell/merchandise►! God has suddenly and
swiftly destroyed [MTY] those cities!’ ”
All of God’s people are called to rejoice because God has pronounced judgment on
the cities represented by Babylon.
Revelation 18:20-24REVELATION 18:20
1869
REVELATION 19:7
20 Then someone spoke from heaven saying, “All you who live in heaven, rejoice
over what has happened to the cities represented by Babylon! You who are God’s
people, including you apostles, you ◄prophets/who speak messages that come directly
from God►, rejoice, because God has justly punished the people of those cities because
they acted in an evil way toward you!”
21 Then a mighty angel picked up a boulder the size of a large stone for grinding
grain, and threw it into the ocean. Then he said, “O you people in [APO] the awesome/
great cities represented by Babylon, your cities will be destroyed so that they will
disappear just like that stone disappeared in the ocean! Your cities will be gone
forever [LIT]! 22 In your cities there will never again be anyone playing harps, singing,
playing flutes, and blowing trumpets. There will no longer be any ◄skilled workers/
craftsmen► making things. There will never again be people grinding grain at [MTY]
the mills. 23 No lamplight will ever again shine. There will never again be the
happy voices of a bridegroom and his bride. God will destroy your cities because
your merchants were the most deceitful men in the world. You persuaded them to
deceive people of [MTY] all nations. 24 You are also responsible for killing [MTY] the
prophets and others of God’s people. Indeed, you are the ones who are guilty for the
deaths of all those who have been {whom others have} killed on the earth!”
19
After the destruction of Babylon, John heard a huge crowd praising God for saving
his people and announcing the marriage of the one who is like a lamb.
Revelation 19:1-8
1 After these things I heard what sounded like a huge crowd in heaven. They were
shouting things like,
“◄Hallelujah!/Praise our God!►” “He has saved us!”
“He is glorious and mighty!”
2 “Praise him because he judges truly and justly!”
“He has punished the very evil cities that are like a prostitute,
because their people persuaded the other people of earth [MTY] to act immorally
and idolatrously like they do.”
“Praise him because he has punished them for murdering his servants [MTY]!”
3 The crowd shouted a second time saying:
◄Hallelujah!/Praise God!► The smoke of the fire that is burning the cities will rise
forever!
4 The 24 elders and the four living creatures ◄prostrated themselves/ knelt
down► and worshipped God, who sits on the throne. Then they said, “It is true!
◄Hallelujah!/Praise God!►” 5 Someone spoke from the throne and said, “All you
who are our God’s servants, praise him! All you who reverence him, whether you
are socially significant or insignificant, praise him! Everyone!” 6 I heard something
like the noise of a huge crowd of people, like the sound of a huge waterfall (OR, a
great/wide river of rushing water), and like the sound of loud thunder. They were
shouting:
◄Hallelujah!/Praise God!► Because the Lord God, the Almighty One, reigns!
7 We should rejoice, we should be extremely glad, and we should honor him,
because it is now time for Jesus, the one who is like a lamb, to be united
permanently with his people, which will be like a man [MET] marrying his bride,
and
because those who belong to him have prepared themselves to be united with
him.REVELATION 19:8
1870
REVELATION 19:20
8 God has permitted them to be completely pure, like a bride who [MET] dresses
in fine linen that is bright and clean.
Fine bright and clean linen represents the righteous acts of God’s people.
God will abundantly bless the people who have been invited to celebrate the marriage
of the Lamb. Only God should be worshipped. All his servants are on an equal basis.
Revelation 19:9-10
9 Then the angel said to me, “Write this: God will abundantly bless the people who
are {whom he has} invited to the feast that celebrates Jesus, the one who is like a lamb,
permanently uniting with his people, like someone [MET] marrying a wife.” He also said
to me: “These words that God declares are true!” 10 I immediately ◄prostrated myself/
knelt down► at his feet in order to worship him. But he said to me, “Do not worship
me! I am just your (sg) fellow servant and the fellow servant of your (sg) fellow
believers who tell people about Jesus. God is the one whom you should worship,
because it is the Spirit of God who gives people the power to tell others about Jesus
(OR, those who tell others about Jesus are truly declaring the words that the Spirit of
God has given them)!”
John saw heaven open and saw the one whom he described as King of kings and
Lord of lords mounted on a white horse.
Revelation 19:11-16
11 In the vision I saw heaven opened {open}, and I was surprised to see a white
horse. Jesus, the one who was riding on the horse, is called ‘Trustworthy and Genuine/
True’. He judges all people according to what is right, and fights righteously against
his enemies. 12 His eyes shone like [MET] a flame of fire. There were many royal
crowns on his head. A name had been written on him. Only he knows the meaning
of that name. 13 The robe he was wearing was drenched with blood. His name is
also “◄The one who expresses what God is like/The Word of God►.” 14 The armies
of heaven were following him. They were also riding on white horses. They were
wearing clothes made of clean white linen. 15 The words that Jesus speaks are like
[MTY] a sharp sword with which he will strike the rebellious people of the nations. He
himself will rule them powerfully, as though he had [MET] an iron rod. He will crush
his enemies just like [MET] a person crushes grapes in a winepress. He will do this for
God Almighty, who is extremely angry with them because of their sins. 16 On his cloak
close to his thigh a name had been written {he had written a name}, which is “King
who rules over all other kings and Lord who rules over all other lords.”
An angel invited all flesh-eating birds to feast on the flesh of people who would be
killed by the Rider on the white horse. When the beast and the false prophet gathered
kings with their armies to fight against the Rider and his army, the beast and the false
prophet were thrown into the lake of fire. The Rider killed rebellious people with his
sword, and the birds gorged themselves on their flesh.
Revelation 19:17-21
17 I saw an angel who was standing in the light of [MTY] the sun. He called loudly
to all the flesh-eating birds flying high in the sky, “Come and gather for the wonderful
feast that God is providing for you! 18 Come and eat the flesh of all God’s enemies who
are dead— the flesh of kings, army commanders, people who fought powerfully, horses
and the soldiers who rode them, and the flesh of all other kinds of people, whether they
were free or slaves, socially insignificant or significant. All kinds!” 19 Then I saw the
beast and the kings of earth with their armies gathered together to fight against the
Rider on the horse, and against his army. 20 The beast and the false prophet were
captured {He captured the beast and the false prophet}. The false prophet is the oneREVELATION 19:21
1871
REVELATION 20:9
who had performed miracles in the beast’s presence. By doing that he had deceived
the people who had accepted the beast’s mark on their foreheads and who worshipped
its image. The beast and the false prophet were thrown {He threw the beast and the
one who falsely said that he spoke messages that came directly from God} alive into
the lake of fire that burns with sulfur. 21 The rider on the horse killed the rest of their
armies just by speaking words, which were like [MTY] a sword that extended from his
mouth. All those birds gorged themselves on the flesh of the people whom he had
killed.
20
John saw an angel coming down from heaven. He seized, bound, and imprisoned the
dragon for 1,000 years.
Revelation 20:1-3
1 I saw an angel coming down from heaven. He had the key to the deep dark pit,
and he was carrying a large chain in his hand. 2 He seized the dragon. That dragon
is the ancient serpent, the devil, that is, Satan. The angel bound him with the chain.
That chain could not be loosed {No one could loose that chain} for 1,000 years. 3 The
angel threw him into the deep dark pit. He shut the door of the pit, locked it, and
sealed it to prevent anyone from opening it. He did that in order that Satan might
no longer deceive the people of the nations [MTY], until those 1,000 years are ended.
After that time, Satan must be released {God/God’s angel must release Satan} for a
short time in order that he can do what God has planned.
John saw the thrones of the martyrs who lived again and had authority to judge
people. Those martyrs are the first people whom God will cause to live again. They will
reign with Christ during the 1,000 years.
Revelation 20:4-6
4 I saw thrones on which people were sitting. They were given {God gave those
people} authority to judge other people. I also saw the souls of people whose heads
had been {whose heads others had} cut off because of their telling people about Jesus
and declaring God’s message. They were people who refused to worship the beast
or its image, and who did not allow the beast’s agents to put the beast’s mark on
them, either on their foreheads or on their hands. They became alive again, and they
ruled with Christ during those 1,000 years. 5 They were the ones who lived again the
first time that God caused dead people to live again. The rest of the believers who had
died did not live again until after those 1,000 years. 6 ◄God will be pleased with/How
happy will be► those who live again that first time. God will consider them holy.
They will not die [PRS] a second time. Instead, they will be priests who serve God and
Christ, and they will rule with Christ during those 1,000 years.
When Satan is released, he will deceive the nations in order to assemble them to
fight against God and his people. God will send fire to burn up the rebellious nations.
He will cause Satan to be thrown into the lake of fire for everlasting punishment.
Revelation 20:7-15
7 When the 1,000 years are ended, Satan will be released {God’s angel will release
Satan} from the deep pit in which he was imprisoned. 8 He will go out to deceive
rebellious people in nations [IDM] all over the earth. These are the nations that the
prophet Ezekiel called Gog and Magog. Satan will gather them to fight against God’s
people. There will be so many of them fighting against God’s people that no one will
be able to count them [SIM], just like no one can count the grains of sand on the ocean
shore. 9 They will march over the whole earth and surround the camp of God’s people
in Jerusalem, the city that God loves. Then God will send fire down from heaven, andREVELATION 20:10
1872
REVELATION 21:6
it will burn them up. 10 The devil, who had deceived those people, will be thrown
{God’s angel will throw the devil, who had deceived those people} into the lake of
burning sulfur. This is the same lake into which both the beast and the false prophet
had been thrown {he had thrown both the beast and the false prophet}. As a result,
they will continually suffer severely forever.
11 Then I saw a huge white throne on which God was sitting. He was so awesome
that the earth and the sky disappeared from his presence completely; they were
completely destroyed {God completely destroyed them}. 12 I saw that the people who
had died but now lived again were standing in front of the throne. They included
people of every social status! The books in which God records what people do were
opened {God/God’s angel opened the books in which God records what people do}.
Another book was opened {He opened another book}, which is called the Book of
Life, in which God has written the names of people who have eternal life. God judged
the people who had died and now lived again according to what they had done, just
like he had recorded it in the books. 13 The people whose bodies were buried in the
sea became alive again in order to stand before God’s throne. Everyone who had been
buried on the land (OR, Every person who was waiting in the place where dead people
stay) became alive again, in order to stand before the throne. God judged each one of
them according to what each one had done. 14 All the unbelievers [PRS, MTY] —those
who had been in the place where they waited after they died— were thrown into the
burning lake. The burning lake is the place in which people die the second time. 15 The
people whose names [MTY] are not in the book, the one where God has written the
names of people who have eternal life, were also thrown {◄God/God’s angel► threw
them also} into the lake of fire.
21
John saw a new heaven, a new earth, and a New Jerusalem, the city where God will
dwell permanently with his people.
Revelation 21:1-4
1 Then in the vision I saw a new heaven and a new earth. The first heaven and
the first earth had disappeared, and the oceans no longer existed. 2 I saw God’s holy
city, which is the new city of Jerusalem. It was coming down out of heaven from
God. The city had been prepared and decorated {God had prepared and decorated the
city} as [SIM] a bride is decorated {decorates herself} beautifully in order to marry
her husband. 3 I heard a loud voice that spoke from the throne of God. It said, “Listen
to this! Now God will live with people. He will live right in the midst of them [DOU]!
They will be his people. God himself will be with them, and he will be their God. 4 As
a result, he will cause them to no longer be sad. It will be as though he will [MTY] wipe
every tear from their eyes. None of them will ever again die or mourn or cry [DOU]
or suffer pain, because the former things that make us sad will have disappeared.”
God declares that he has made everything new and has accomplished everything he
intended to do. He declares himself to be the beginning and the end, and so he will give
abundant eternal life to all who seek him, but will punish all the wicked in the lake of
fire.
Revelation 21:5-8
5 Then God, who sits on the throne, said, “Listen to this! I am now making
everything new!” He said to me: “Write these things that I have told you, because
you can trust that I will certainly cause them to happen.” 6 He said to me, “I have
finished doing all the things I needed to do. I am the one who began all things [MET]
and the one who will cause all things to end [MET]. To everyone who is spirituallyREVELATION 21:7
1873
REVELATION 21:20
thirsty [MET], I will ◄freely give/give as a free gift► water from the spring that causes
people to live forever. 7 I will give this to every person who is victorious over the evil
powers (OR, over Satan). I will be their God, and they will be my children. 8 But those
who are cowardly, those who do not believe in me, those who do detestable things,
those who are murderers, those who sin sexually, those who commit sorcery, those
who worship idols, and every liar, will all suffer in the lake that burns with fire and
sulfur. Anyone who suffers in that lake will be dying the second time.”
One of the seven angels who had the seven bowls offered to show John the Bride of
the Lamb.
Revelation 21:9
9 One of the seven angels who had one of the seven bowls that had been full of the
wine/liquid causing [MTY] the seven last plagues came and said to me, “Come with me
and I will show you the people who have permanently united with Christ, the one who
is like a lamb! They will be like [MET] a bride for him.”
An angel showed John the city of God, the New Jerusalem, that was coming down
out of heaven from God, shining with his glory, having a huge wall with twelve gates
and twelve huge foundation stones.
Revelation 21:10-14
10 Then, while God’s Spirit controlled me, the angel took/carried me to the top of a
very high mountain. He showed me God’s holy city, the New Jerusalem. It was coming
down out of heaven from God. 11 It was shining with his glory. The city was shining
like a very precious jasper stone shines, and it was clear like crystal. 12 Around the
city was a very high wall. The wall had twelve gates. An angel was at each gate.
The names of the twelve tribes of Israel were written {God had written the names
of the twelve tribes of Israel} over the gates. Each gate had the name of one tribe.
13 Three gates were on the east side, three gates were on the north side, three gates
were on the south side, and three gates were on the west side. 14 The wall of the city
had twelve foundation stones. On each foundation stone was the name of one of the
twelve apostles of Jesus, the one who is like a lamb.
The angel guide measured the city and its wall.
Revelation 21:15-17
15 The angel who was speaking to me carried a golden measuring rod, in order to
measure the city, its gates, and its wall. 16 The city was square in shape; it was as long
as it was wide. After the angel measured the city with his rod, he reported that it was
◄1,500 miles/2,400 kilometers► long, and that its height was the same as its length
and width. 17 He measured its wall and reported that it was ◄216 ft./70 meters► thick
(OR, high). The angel used the measure that people normally use.
John described the composition of the city, its wall, its foundations, its gates, and its
street, emphasizing the great value of each part.
Revelation 21:18-27
18 The city wall was made of something like the green stone that we call jasper. The
city itself was made of something like pure gold that looked like clear glass. 19 The
foundations of the wall of the city were beautifully made with wonderful stones
that are like precious stones on earth. The first foundation stone was a crystalline
stone like jasper, the second foundation stone was a blue stone like sapphire, the third
foundation stone was a green stone like agate, the fourth foundation stone was a green
stone like emerald, 20 the fifth foundation stone was a brown and white layered stone
like sardonyx, the sixth foundation stone was a red stone like carnelian, the seventh
foundation stone was a yellow stone like chrysolite, the eighth foundation stone wasREVELATION 21:21
1874
REVELATION 22:7
a green stone like beryl, the ninth foundation stone was a yellow stone like topaz, the
tenth foundation stone was a green stone like chrysoprase, the eleventh foundation
stone was a blue stone like hyacinth, and the twelfth foundation stone was a purple
stone like amethyst. 21 The twelve gates of the city were something like huge pearls.
Each gate was like it was a single pearl. The ground of the main plaza of the city (OR,
The streets of the city) appeared to be pure gold that looked like clear glass.
22 There was no temple in the city. The Lord God Almighty himself, and the one who
is like a lamb, are there, so there was no need for [MET] a temple. 23 The city will not
need the sun or the moon to light the city, because the glory of God will illuminate
the city, and Jesus, the one who is like a lamb, will also be its light. 24 The people of
[MTY] the nations will live with the light of the city shining upon them. And the kings
of the earth will bring their wealth into the city to honor God and the one who is like
a lamb. 25 The gates of the city will not be shut {No one will shut the gates of the
city} at the end of each day as they usually are shut, because there will be no night
there. 26 The people of the world will also bring their wealth into the city to honor
God and the one who is like a lamb. 27 No one who is morally impure, no one who
does things that God considers detestable, and no one who tells lies, will ever enter
that city. Only those people whose names are written in the book of the one who is
like a lamb {whose names the one who is like a lamb has written in his book}, the
names of people who have eternal life, will be there.
22
God will cause there to be abundant life in the city, his servants will worship him
face-to-face, no one will be there whom God would curse, and his servants will reign
forever and ever.
Revelation 22:1-5
1 The angel showed me the river of water that causes people who drink from it to
live forever. The water was sparkling and clear like crystal. The river was flowing
out from the throne where God and the one who is like a lamb were sitting. 2 It flowed
down through the middle of the main street of the city. On each side of the river were
trees bearing fruit that causes people who eat it to live forever. The trees bear twelve
crops (OR, twelve kinds) of fruit; they produce one crop each month. The people of
the nations [MTY] use the leaves of these trees as medicine in order that they may feel
stronger 3 There will never be anyone or anything there that God will be under God’s
curse. The throne of God and the one who is like a lamb will be in the city. And God’s
servants will worship him there. 4 They will see him face-to-face, and his name will
be written {he will write his name} on their foreheads. 5 There will never again be
night. God’s servants will not need the light of a lamp or the light of the sun, because
the Lord God will shine his light upon them. And they will rule forever.
God revealed to his servants his message in which he showed them what must
happen soon.
Revelation 22:6-7
6 The angel said to me: “These words that God has revealed to you are true, and
he will certainly do what he has promised to do. The Lord God who ◄inspires the
prophets/tells the prophets what to say► sent his angel to show the people who serve
him the events that must happen soon.” 7 Jesus says to all his people, “Listen to this!
I am coming soon; God will abundantly bless everyone who obeys what has been
commanded in this book.”REVELATION 22:8
1875
REVELATION 22:18
John attested that he himself has heard and seen all these things. He was told to
tell others what has been revealed to him because its fulfillment was near, and everyone
should be ready.
Revelation 22:8-11
8 I, John, am the one who heard and saw in a vision these things that I have written
down. When I had heard and seen them, I immediately knelt down at the feet of the
angel who was showing them to me, in order to worship him. 9 But he said to me, “Do
not worship me I am just your fellow servant! I am also the fellow servant of your
fellow believers who are ◄the prophets/the ones who tell messages that come directly
from God►, and I am a fellow servant of those who obey what has been commanded
in this book. Instead, worship God!” 10 He also said to me, “Do not keep secret the
message about what God has foretold in this book, because it is almost time [MTY]
for him to what he has promised to do in this message. 11 Since that time is near, if
those who act in an evil manner want to continue to act that way [IRO], that is up to
them. God will soon ◄pay them back/punish them► for that. If those who are vile want
to continue to be vile [IRO], that is up to them. God will soon ◄pay them back/punish
them► for that. Those who are acting righteously should continue to act righteously.
And those who are holy should continue to be holy.”
Jesus announced that he had sent his angel to bear witness to the congregations
about all that John had seen. Jesus authoritatively identified himself as the Descendant
of King David and as the Messianic Morning Star.
Revelation 22:12-16
12 Jesus says this to everyone: “Listen! I am coming soon! And I will pay back
everyone according to what each one has done, by punishing or rewarding them. 13 I
am the one who began all things [MET] and the one who will cause all things to end
[MET]. I existed before all things existed and I will exist at the end of all things [DOU].
14 God is very pleased with the people who wash their robes, making themselves
spiritually clean [MET], because they will be able to eat the fruit of [MTY] the tree that
enables people to live forever, and because they will be able to enter the gates into the
holy city. 15 People who are unholy will not be allowed to enter the city. They include
people who practice sorcery, people who sin sexually, murderers, idol worshipers,
and everyone who enjoys telling lies and are continual liars. They can never enter
that city.”
16 “I, Jesus, sent my angel in order that he might tell you who are in the
congregations that all these things that have been said are true. I am the descendant
of King David whom the prophets promised would come [MET]. I am the one who is
like the bright morning star [MET], the one that Moses promised would come.”
God’s Spirit and the Bride invite all who desire to drink the living water to come and
drink, and they invite all who hear that invitation to extend it to others.
Revelation 22:17
17 God’s Spirit and his people, who are like [MET] the bride of Christ, say to each one
who desires to believe, “Come!” Whoever hears this should also say to each one who
desires to believe, “Come!” Spiritually thirsty people should come [MET]! Everyone
who desires the water that enables people to live forever should take it as a free gift!
Jesus warned about what would happen to anyone who adds to the message of this
book or who takes away any part of its revelation.
Revelation 22:18-19
18 “I, Jesus, solemnly warn everyone who hears what I have foretold in this book: If
anyone adds anything to this message, God will cause him to experience the plaguesREVELATION 22:19
1876
REVELATION 22:21
that are {that I have} described in this book. 19 If anyone omits any of the message
about what I have foretold in this book, God will take away that person’s right to eat
fruit from [MTY] the tree that enables people to live forever. He will also take away that
person’s right to enter God’s city. Both these things are described {I have described
both these things} in this book.”
Jesus declares that he is certainly coming soon.
Revelation 22:20
20 Jesus, who says that all the things written here are true, says, “Certainly I am
coming soon!” I, John, reply, “◄May it be so!/Amen!► Lord Jesus, come!”
John closes with a prayer that Jesus will continue to bless all God’s people.
Revelation 22:21
21 I pray that our Lord Jesus will continue to act kindly to all of you who are God’s
people. ◄Amen!/May it be so!►
